Which best describes you?
Text Link
Text Link
Text Link
Text Link
Home
Educators
Families
Organizations
Features
Pricing
About
Support
Help Center
Professional services
Resources & activities
Child safety
Advocates
Articles
Careers
Educators
Organizations
Features
Pricing
More
Families
About
Support
Professional services
Resources & activities
Pricing
About
Resources
Menu
Try for free
Log In
Privacy Policy
Last updated: 1 November 2024
This privacy policy sets out how Storypark Limited (“
Storypark
”, “
we
”, “
us
”, “
our
”) treats the privacy of those who use our Website and associated services and others with whom we interact.
Please take a moment to read this Privacy Policy so you understand how we process Personal Data.
SUMMARY OF PRIVACY POLICY
What Personal Data do we collect?
Personal Data you voluntarily provide to us, such as name, physical address, email address, login for the Services, feedback and suggestions for the Services, IP address, phone number, billing information in accordance with our Terms and Conditions, occupation, employer, job title, area of responsibilities, employment history, and educational qualifications.
Our email marketing list:  When you become an account holder, or where you elect to sign up to our email marketing list, we may collect your name, email address, and email marketing preferences.
Personal Data and other information we collect automatically: When you use our Service or browse our Website, we may collect information about your usage of the Service and web browsing.
Personal Data uploaded and transferred to the Service by Account Holders: We collect Personal Data about persons (including Children) indirectly when Account Holders use the Service, such as when an Account Holder creates a Child Record or Educator Portfolio, or uploads and transfers Content that contains Personal Data, or posts a comment or tags Content on the service that contains Personal Data of another person.
Statistical information: We may collect statistical information about your use of the Website and the Service to improve the features and overall user experience.
We may use various technologies to collect and store information when you use our Service, and this may include using cookies and similar tracking technologies, such as pixels and web beacons.
How do we use Personal Data?
To administer accounts.
To enable the features of the Services to be utilised and enjoyed, subject always to our terms and conditions at
storypark.com/terms-and-conditions
.
To analyse Service User behaviour (in respect of the Website) and Account Holder behaviour (in respect of the Service) for the purposes of improving, promoting, securing and monitoring the Service.
To respond to enquiries, feedback or complaints received from you.
To process payment for the Services by you and to help us to manage our accounts and administrative services.
To verify your identity.
For directly marketing to you (including by email, post, other means, or through functionality within the Service) with information about our Service, and subject to your preferences.
On an aggregated non-identifiable basis, to help Storypark understand and promote its market position.
Incidentally, where educators at child care organisations and their educational mentors, for their further professional development, may view some Content of an account to which an Early Childhood Provider has lawful access for the purposes of assessing performance and compliance with professional obligations.
To protect our legal interests and fulfil our regulatory obligations.
For ensuring the trust and safety of any Child and Service Users of the Service.
How do we share Personal Data?
Storypark shares information with service providers who support us to provide our Services and operate our business, including
Client relationship management services from Hubspot (https://legal.hubspot.com/privacy-policy)
Payment processing services from PayPal (
https://www.paypal.com/en/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full
) and Stripe (
https://stripe.com/nz/privacy
);
Subscription management and billing from Chargebee; (
https://www.chargebee.com/privacy/
)
Cloud server hosting from Amazon Web Services (
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/
);
Content delivery services from Sendgrid (
https://www.twilio.com/legal/privacy
), Transloadit (
https://transloadit.com/legal/privacy/
), Brightcove (
https://www.brightcove.com/en/legal/services-privacy-policy/
);
Customer support and communication services from Intercom (
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
) and Survey Monkey (
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy/
);
Customer feedback from Savio (
https://www.savio.io/privacy
);
Marketing services from Autopilot (
https://journeys.autopilotapp.com/legal/privacy-policy
) and ShareThis (
https://sharethis.com/privacy/
);
IT services from Google Workspace (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
) and Microsoft Azure (
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-gb/privacystatement
)
Bookkeeping services from Xero (
https://www.xero.com/nz/legal/privacy/
);
Data Warehousing and Reporting Services from Snowflake (
https://www.snowflake.com/privacy-policy
) and GoodData (
https://www.gooddata.com/legal/#privacy-policy
);
Video and phone call conversation recording and transcription from Gong (
https://www.gong.io/privacy-policy/
);
Customer research findings and analysis from Dovetail (https://dovetail.com/help/privacy-policy/);
Analytics services from Google (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
) and HotJar (
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/
) and Facebook (
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
) and Microsoft (
https://privacy.microsoft.com/PrivacyStatement
) and Linkedin (
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
) and Intercom (
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
) and Hubspot (
https://legal.hubspot.com/privacy-policy
).
Storypark also shares information with Analytics and Customisation partners and Advertising partners. These are third party advertising companies who may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about your activity on our Website over time to serve you online targeted advertisements. Storypark also shares information with Functionality and Performance partners that enable us to provide non-essential services on our Website. All of these uses are detailed in the Cookies and Tracking section below.
Your choices with respect to your Personal Data.
When you visit the Storypark website, you have the option to accept or reject the non-essential cookies that we use.
When you provide your Personal Data to access our content or register for our events, you will have the ability to opt-in to our marketing information.
When you are receiving our marketing information, you have the ability to amend your Personal Data or “unsubscribe” from marketing e-mails;
Storypark provides push notifications for users of its mobile applications. These are on by default, for registered users, and can be turned off in the application settings.
You have the right to access and correct your Personal Data, or that of your minor child that is controlled by us at any time.  Requests for such access and correction requirements can be made to the contact details in section 15 of this Privacy Policy. Please note certain requests must be directed to the Customer or Customer Organisation.
You can choose whether you accept cookies when you use the Storypark website and services. If you reject non-essential cookies, you may not receive website content that is relevant to your country, you may need to re-login to Storypark each time you return to use it, and some non-essential content may not appear as intended.
How to contact us:
For more information about this Policy, our privacy practices or to obtain access to or correction of your Personal Data or that of your minor child, please contact us at
hello@storypark.com
.
FULL VERSION OF PRIVACY POLICY
By accessing our Service, storypark.com (the “Website”), or by providing Personal Data directly to us, you consent to our processing your Personal Data in the manner and for the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy. If relevant to the Purposes set out in this Privacy Policy, Personal Data may at times include Sensitive Data.
1.Definitions
Capitalised terms defined in Storypark’s End User Terms have the same meaning in this Privacy Policy. In addition, the following capitalised terms have the following meanings:
a)
“Authorised Users” means all persons expressly authorised by the Customer (or, as applicable, Customer Organisations) and/or Primary Account Holder to access and use the Storypark Service in connection with the Customer Account, including Educators.
b)
“Authorised Viewer” means a person who is expressly authorised by the Primary Account Holder to view and/or access Child Content in the Application, being typically (but not exclusively) limited to that Child’s parents, guardians, family members and specialists.
c)
“Child Record” means a Family Child Record or an Organisation Child Record.
d)
“Content” means any content or materials including (but not limited to) still or moving images, videos, sound recordings or other audiovisual materials, artistic works, written works, administration data and Personal Data posted to the Storypark Service by an Authorised User or otherwise contained in any Child Record.
e)
“Customer” means the Storypark customer (or organisation operated by the customer, as applicable) through whose Customer Account you have been authorised to access and use the Storypark Service.
f)
“Customer Organisation” means any organisation, group, service or early childhood education and/or childcare centre for Children owned or operated by, or affiliated with, the Customer.
g)
“Data Protection Laws” means the data protection and privacy laws applicable to our processing of your Personal Data that we are committed to comply with, including as applicable:
the Privacy Act 2020 (New Zealand);
the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth, Australia);
all applicable Canadian federal and provincial privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the Personal Data Protection and Electronic Documents Act(federal); the Personal Data Protection Act (Alberta); the Personal Data Protection Act (British Columbia), and public sector privacy laws as may apply to our Customers and Customer Organisations;
all applicable United States federal and state privacy laws, including, but not limited to, the California Consumer Privacy Act of 2018 (CCPA), Early Learning Personal Data Protection Act (ELPIPA);
the General Data Protection Regulation (EU) 2016/679 (EU GDPR);
the United Kingdom Data Protection Regulation (UK GDPR); and/or
any other applicable privacy legislation.
h)
“Educator” means any childcare provider or educator at a Child’s Customer Organisation.
i)
"End User Terms” means the Storypark end user terms available at Terms (available at
storypark.com/terms-and-conditions
and, if you are accessing the Service for or on behalf of a Customer, the Customer agreement between Storypark and the relevant Customer.
j)
“Family Child Record” means any Content such as a child’s name, Content contributed by Authorised Viewers such as a Child’s parents, guardians, family members, and any other Content pertaining to a given Child that is accessible via the ‘child profile’ page that is not contained only within an Organisation Child Record. For clarity, Family Child Records are separate and distinct from Organisation Child Records.
k)
“Organisation Child Record” means the internal Storypark Child record created and maintained by the relevant Customer Organisation and/or Educators to be able to operate the Storypark Service in accordance with the Authorised Purpose. For clarity, Child Content may be added to an Organisation Child Record.
l)
“Primary Account Holder” means a Child’s parent or guardian or a person expressly authorised by the Child’s parent or guardian to administer and control a Family Child Record.
m)
“Security Incident” means any unauthorised or unlawful breach of security that leads to the accidental or unlawful destruction, loss, alteration, unauthorised disclosure of or access to Personal Data.
n)
“Service” means the Storypark Service.
o)
“Sensitive Data” means Personal Data relating to a person’s physical or mental health, race or religion, or other information deemed (or otherwise treated as) “sensitive” under applicable Data Protection Laws.
p)
“Service Users” means Customers, Customer Organisations, Primary Account HoldersAuthorised Users and Authorised Viewers.
q)
“Storypark” means the Storypark entity that you contract with (and, if you are a Customer, that you pay your fees to). This will be: Storypark Limited (a New Zealand limited liability company, registered in Wellington, New Zealand), or Storypark Canada Limited (an Ontario registered limited liability company), if you are a resident of Canada.
r)
“process” or “processing” means any operation or set of operations which is performed on Personal Data, such as collection, recording, organisation, structuring, storage, adaptation, use, disclosure, combination, restriction, or erasure.
2. Application
This Privacy Policy applies to all Personal Data processed by Storypark, including, but not limited to Personal Data submitted by Service Users through the Service. For certainty, this Privacy Policy does not apply to the Personal Data of Storypark employees.
3. Changes
From time to time we will review our Privacy Policy to keep pace with changes in our Service and any Data Protection Laws. This document is our most recently updated Privacy Policy. Your continued use of our Service or provision of Personal Data to us after any such changes constitutes your acceptance of, and agreement to this Privacy Policy, as revised. We encourage you to read it carefully.
4. Questions and concerns
If you have any questions or comments, or want to access, update, or delete the Personal Data we hold about you, or if you have a privacy concern, please contact us using the contact details in section 15 of this Privacy Policy.
Please provide sufficient detail about the information in question to help us locate it. We will respond to any privacy request in compliance with the applicable Data Protection Laws.  Please note that if your Personal Data is contained in an Organisation Child Record under the control of our Customer or Customer Organisation, we may direct your inquiry to our Customer.
5. Collection of Personal Data
We collect Personal Data when you use our Services, and may also collect Personal Data about you or others when Service Users create Family Child Records or Organisation Child Records within the Service. For example, this may include cases where a child care organisation or educational institution your child attends is a user of the Services.
We may collect the following categories of Personal Data in the following situations:
a)
Personal Data you voluntarily provide to us
: When you give us your Personal Data directly (whether face-to-face, by telephone, email, post, through social media or by communicating with us in any way), when we meet with an organisation wishing to do business with us and an individual from that organisation provides Personal Data about themselves, when you apply for a job with us, or when you sign up or register to become a Service User, or when you enter into a transaction with us you are voluntarily giving us the Personal Data that we collect.
Categories of Personal Data
: The Personal Data we may collect includes your name, physical address, email address, login for the Service, feedback and suggestions for the Service, IP address, phone number, billing information in accordance with our Customer Terms, occupation, employer, job title, area of responsibilities, employment history, and educational qualifications, and other such Personal Data you may provide to us.
b)
Our email marketing list
: When you become a Service User, or where you elect to sign up to our email marketing list, we may collect your name, email address, and email marketing preferences.
c) Personal Data we collect automatically
: When you use our Service or browse our Website, we may collect information about your usage and web browsing. We may collect Personal Data as log files, or through cookies or other tracking technologies (see the “Cookies and tracking” below for more information), store it against the associated Account, and link it to the other Personal Data we hold about an Account.
Categories of Personal Data:
The Personal Data we may collect includes your IP address, your operating system, your browser ID, time, date, your browsing activity, your interaction with the Service (including any Content, comments, and general location).
d) Personal Data uploaded and transferred to the Service by Service Users:
We collect Personal Data about persons (including Children) indirectly when Service Users use the Service, such as when a Service User:
creates a Child Record or invites another person to become a Service User (including an invitation to become a Primary Account Holder or Authorised User);
uploads and transfers Content that contains Personal Data (including photographs or videos of another person including Children, or uploads and transfers materials created by another person including Children); or
posts a comment or tags Content on the Service that contains Personal Data of another person.
In situations where a Service User creates a Family Child Record containing Personal Data or uploads Personal Data to a Family Child Record, the Service User is a joint-controller of that Personal Data alongside us, (i.e. we process the Personal Data directly for the individual (or their parent/guardian) and for those purposes described in this Privacy Policy and our Terms, and exercise control over that processing), to the extent that term applies under applicable Data Protection Laws. In situations where a Service User creates an Organisation Child Record containing Personal Data or uploads Personal Data to an existing Organisation Child Record, we act as a processer in respect of that Personal Data, (i.e. we process the Personal Data for our Customer and for those purposes described in this Privacy Policy and our Terms, and the Customer exercises control over that processing), to the extent that term applies under applicable Data Protection Laws. We may have no direct relationship with the person whose Personal Data you upload or transfer, and for that reason, you are responsible for making sure you have the obtained all consents and issued all notices necessary for us to process information about any such person (including where Sensitive Data relating to a Child is collected and stored in the relevant Child Record). Please see the End User Terms which outline your obligations in this regard.
e) Statistical information:
We may collect statistical (non-personal) information about your use of the Website and the Service to improve the features and overall user experience. This may include statistical information such as pages accessed on the Website and the Service, search terms, links that are clicked on, Website and Service visit times, browsers and operating systems, IP address, and cookies.
f) Cookies and tracking:
We may use various technologies to collect and store information when you use our Service, and this may include using cookies and similar tracking technologies, such as pixels and web beacons. You may control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, however your use of the Website and Service may be affected.
Personal Data may be collected as log files, or through cookies or other tracking technologies, stored against associated Accounts, and linked to the other Personal Data we hold about associated Accounts.
We use functionality and experience enhancement cookies that are used to improve the performance and functionality of our Website and Service but are non-essential for the Website or Service to operate as intended. However, without these cookies, certain functionality may become unavailable or you would be required to re-enter your login details each time you visit our Website. These are non-essential cookies that you can manage at any time through "Cookie Settings" on the footer of Storypark.com, or block through your browser settings, noting that blocking or rejecting cookies may affect your experience of the Website and Service. Specifically, these are cookies from
Storypark (to identify your timezone and allow you to stay logged in across multiple browser sessions)
Growsurf (enabling our customer referral programme - https://growsurf.com/privacy).
ShareThis (allowing you to interact with social networks - https://sharethis.com/privacy/)
Vimeo (enabling you to view video content we host on Vimeo - https://vimeo.com/privacy)
YouTube (enabling you to view video content we host on YouTube - https://policies.google.com/privacy)
We use measurement cookies to monitor and analyse web traffic, and track user behaviour, and help us understand how effective our marketing campaigns are. These cookies connect data from advertising networks with actions performed on our website. These are non-essential cookies that you can manage at any time through “Cookie Settings” on the footer of Storypark.com, or block through your browser settings.
Google Analytics (https://www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/) to analyse non-identifiable web traffic data to improve our services. If you prefer, you can opt out of the Google Analytics tracking cookies we use without affecting your ability to use our Website. You can opt-out of Google Analytics by installing the
Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on
For information about how to opt out of Google Analytics, visit:
https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout/
.
Facebook (
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
)
Intercom (
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy
)
Hubspot (
https://legal.hubspot.com/privacy-policy
).
LinkedIn (
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
)
Microsoft (
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-ca/privacystatement
)
Hotjar (
https://www.hotjar.com/legal/policies/privacy
) is a session recording and heat mapping service provided by Hotjar Ltd. Hotjar honours generic “Do Not Track” headers. This means the browser can tell its script not to collect any of the User's data. This is a setting that is available in all major browsers. Heat mapping services are used to display the areas of this Application that Users interact with most frequently. This shows where the points of interest are. These services make it possible to monitor and analyse web traffic and keep track of User behaviour. Some of these services may record sessions and make them available for later visual playback. Hotjar has an opt-out on their site (
https://www.hotjar.com/legal/compliance/opt-out
).
We use targeting & advertising cookies to collect information over time about your online activity on our Website and other online services to make our online advertisements more relevant to you, possibly based on your interests. These are non-essential cookies that are set if you opt-in to use these cookies in “Cookie Settings” in the footer of Storypark.com. You may also choose to block these cookies through your browser settings. The advertising cookies we set are for:
Bing (
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-ca/privacystatement
)
Facebook (
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/
)
Google (
https://policies.google.com/privacy
). You can opt-out of his on Google’s website (
https://adssettings.google.com/authenticated?hl=en
)
LinkedIn (
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy
)
You may set your browser to block any or all of these cookies.  Please note that if you disable cookies, you may be unable to access some features of our Website, however disabling cookies will not prevent you from transacting with us.
We use essential cookies on our Website where they are required for particular features to work – for example, if you are a logged in user, to allow you to remain logged in while you complete certain tasks. These cookies are required for you to use Storypark as intended.
6. Use of Personal Data
We process Personal Data for the following purposes:
a) to create and administer accounts.
b) to enable the features of the Service to be utilised and enjoyed, subject always to our End User Terms. This may, for example, entail incidental posting of photographs/videos of a Child on another Child’s Organisation Child Record. Those posts may remain viewable even once a Child no longer attends a Customer Organisation as long as the relevant Organisation Child Record is retained. If you do not agree to such incidental posting, or other transfers of Personal Data to an Organization Child Record, you must contact the administrator of the Organisation Child Record to advise them of your withdrawal or denial of consent;
c) to facilitate Service Users creating and updating Organisation Child Records;
d) to analyse user behaviour (in respect of the Website) and Service User behaviour (in respect of the Service) for the purposes of:
determining Service developments;
inviting users or Service Users to explore other features within the Website or Service, and otherwise to generally promote our Service;
ensuring the security of the Website and the Service; and
combating and preventing breaches of our End User Terms, other user agreements, this Privacy Policy and our other policies;
e) to respond to enquiries, feedback or complaints received from you;
f) to perform authorised financial transactions with you and to help us to manage our accounts and administrative services;
g) to verify your identity;
h) for directly marketing to you (including by email, post, other means, or through functionality within the Service) with information about our Service (if you receive direct marketing from us, and would like to opt-out, please see “Direct Marketing” below);
i) on an aggregated non-identifiable basis, to:
help Storypark understand its market position;
assist with marketing our Services to others, including in respect of any online advertising; and
deliver statistical results to help with general Storypark announcements;
j) incidentally, where Educators and their educational mentors, for their further professional development, may view, some content of an account or Child Records to which the relevant Customer or Customer Organisation has lawful access;
k) to protect our legal interests and fulfil our regulatory obligations, including any notification or reporting obligations and any access directions, imposed on us by any Government entity (if and to the extent necessary);
l) for helping ensure the trust and safety of any Child and Authorised Users of the Service; and
m) in other circumstances, provided we comply with applicable Data Protection Laws.
7. Lawful Basis for processing
As permitted or required under applicable Data Protection Laws, we may rely on the following legal bases to process Personal Data.
Consent:
In jurisdictions where consent is the only lawful basis for processing, your provision of Personal Data to us means that you agree and consent to our collection, use and disclosure of your Personal Data under this Privacy Policy. Please note that certain aspects of the Service can only be offered if you provide Personal Data to us and we may not be able to offer you certain aspects of the Service if you choose not to provide us with required Personal Data.
We may obtain your consent in different forms depending on the context of processing, such as:
if you expressly sign or agree to a document through electronic means or verbally; or
implicitly by providing the Personal Data voluntarily.
Please note that there are circumstances where the processing of Personal Data may be permitted without consent, or where we may or must disclose information without consent, in accordance with  applicable law.
You have the right to revoke your consent to the collection, use and disclosure of your Personal Data that is under our control at any time. However, revocation of your consent does not have retroactive effect, and may prevent us from providing certain aspects of the Service to you; in such circumstances, we will discuss with you the reason we need your Personal Data and why the revocation of your consent affects our ability to provide the Service to you. Where your Personal Data is under the custody and/or control of our Customer or Customer Organization and we act as Data Processor on behalf of the Customer or Customer Organization, we may not be able to give effect to your request and will direct you to the Customer or Customer Organization.
Performance of a contract
: Where contractual performance is a lawful basis for processing under Data Protection Laws, you acknowledge and agree that the processing identified below is necessary for the performance of a contract to which the data subject is party (being the Agreement):
to carry out user and account administration tasks;
to manage and deliver the Service; and
to manage any disputes (including disputes over invoices or delivery of the Service).
Legitimate interests:
Where legitimate interests is a lawful basis for processing under Data Protection Laws, in respect of all other processing of Personal Data detailed in this Privacy Policy (including direct marketing activities), such processing is necessary for the purposes of a legitimate interest pursued by Storypark, and we have assessed that such interests are not overridden by the interests or fundamental rights and freedoms of the persons to whom the Personal Data relates.
You have the right to object to the way we process your Personal Data where the processing is based on legitimate interests. For more information see “Your Rights” section below.
Data Processor:
In respect of Personal Data uploaded and transferred to the Service by Service Users, to the extent the term applies under applicable Data Protection Laws, we are a joint data-controller alongside the relevant Service User who creates or updates a Family Child Record (i.e. we process the Personal Data directly for the individual (or their parent/guardian) and for those purposes described in this Privacy Policy and our Terms, and exercise control over that processing).  We are a Data Processor to the relevant Service User who creates or updates an Organisation Child Record, to the extent that terms applies under applicable Data Protection Laws (i.e. we process the Personal Data for our Customer and for those purposes described in this Privacy Policy and our Terms, and the Customer exercises control over that processing). In such circumstances, the relevant Service User has custody and/or control of the Personal Data and is responsible for determining the legal basis upon which that Personal Data is processed. Please see the End User Terms which outline the Service User’s obligations in this regard.
8. Direct Marketing
All those to whom we send direct marketing communications have the option to opt-out of receiving further direct marketing communications from us. If you do not wish to continue to receive direct marketing communications from us and/or selected third parties you should opt-out by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in any email communications that we might send you.
Please note that some features of the Service may involve us providing, through the functionality within the Service, recommendations or suggestions for goods, services or benefits that we offer.
9. Retention and deletion of Personal Data
a) in some cases, retain a copy of your Personal Data to comply with our legal obligations, resolve disputes, enforce our agreements and to comply with our trust and safety obligations. Personal Data retained for these purposes will be archived and stored in a secure manner after your Account has been closed, and will not be accessed unless required for any of these reasons; and
b) retain Personal Data in an aggregated, de-identified or otherwise anonymous form, as permitted or required by applicable laws, such that there is no serious possibility of identifying you from the information.
10. Disclosure of Personal Data
We will not sell Personal Data to anyone.We share Personal Data with third parties for limited purposes, such as to help us run our business and provide the Website and Service. Those third parties can be categorised as follows:
a)
Service Users
: At the direction of a Customer, Customer Organisation or Primary Account Holder (as applicable) Storypark may disclose Content (which may contain Personal Data) through the Service to other Service Users. For example:
The family version of the Service enables Service Users to tag posts and Content in a way as to identify particular interests of a Child or features of a Child’s development or progress. Storypark may be directed to disclose this Personal Data to an Authorised User (such as an Educator), to facilitate their understanding of the Child’s progress, development, interests etc.
the Service will enable an Authorised User to access (and upload) sensitive information relating to a Child, solely for the purpose of their understanding of the Child’s progress, development, interests, etc.
Educators may share stories from an Organisation Child Record with Authorised Users and Authorised Viewers.
Authorised Viewers may view and/or access Child Content within the Application only to the extent authorised by a Primary Account Holder.
Stories from an Organisation Child Record (which may include sensitive information of a Child) may also be shared by Authorised Users with other family members of a Child’s Storypark community. However, Authorised Users cannot disclose notes, routines or plans from an Organisation Child Record with any other family members of a Child’s Storypark community or any other parents or families.
Educators may share group stories (which may include sensitive information of a Child) relating to two or more Children with family members from the Storypark community for the relevant Children.
Educators may share group plans (which may include sensitive information of a Child) with the Primary Account Holders for all Children included in the group plan.
Storypark may be directed to allow a Customer Organisation (or, if applicable a Customer that operates the Customer Organisation) to access an Educator portfolio and its associated Personal Data (where that Customer or Customer Organisation maintains the Account to which an Educator portfolio relates).
We may have no direct relationship with persons whose Personal Data you upload or transfer. For that reason and in relevant circumstances, you are responsible for making sure you have the appropriate consent and make the appropriate notifications for us to disclose any Content (which may contain Personal Data) in the manner you direct through the Service. To the extent necessary consent is not obtained, you must remove the applicable Personal Data from the Family Child Record without undue delay. Please see the End User Terms which outline your obligations in this regard.
If you no longer want to be contacted by one of our Service Users, please contact the relevant Customer or Customer Organisation directly.
b)
Service providers
:  We share your Personal Data with our third party service providers, who help us provide and support our Service. For example:
Client relationship management services from Hubspot
Payment processing services from PayPal and Stripe
Subscription management and billing from Chargebee
Cloud server hosting services from Amazon Web Services
Content delivery services from Sendgrid, Transloadit, Brightcove
Customer feedback services from Savio
Customer support and communication services from Intercom and Survey Monkey
Marketing services from Mixmax and Autopilot
IT services from Google Workspace and Microsoft Azure
Bookkeeping services from Xero
Data Warehousing and Reporting Services from Snowflake and GoodData
Video and phone call conversation recording and transcription from Gong
Customer research findings and analysis from Dovetail
We limit the information we provide to third parties to the information they need to help us provide or facilitate the provision of goods and services and associated purposes. We ensure that third parties are required to meet the privacy standards required by law in handling your Personal Data, and use your Personal Data only for the purposes that we give it to them.
c)
Sale, merger, consolidation, liquidation, reorganisation, or acquisition
: If Storypark or substantially all of its assets were acquired by a third party, Personal Data which we hold may be one of the transferred assets (subject to the same constraints on use and disclosure as under this policy).
d)
Legal obligation
: If we are under a duty or have a legal right to disclose or share Personal Data in order to comply with any legal obligation or request or investigation issued by any Government entity, or in order to enforce or apply our terms and conditions or to protect our rights, property, or the safety of our personnel or third parties. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organisations for the purposes of fraud protection, trust and safety and credit risk reduction.
CCPA:
If you are based in California in the USA, we agree that we will not: (a) sell your Personal Data to any third party; (b) retain, use or disclose your Personal Data for any purpose other than as set out in this Privacy Policy and any other agreement you sign up to with us; (c) retain, use, or disclose your Personal Data for a commercial purpose other than as set out in this Privacy Policy and any other agreement you sign up to with us; or (d) retain, use, or disclose the Personal Data outside of the direct business relationship between them, other than as set out in this Privacy Policy and any other agreement you sign up to with us.
11. Trans-border Personal Data flows
Storypark’s head office is located in New Zealand, so some limited Personal Data is transferred and/or stored there. For the purposes of the EU GDPR and the UK GDPR, New Zealand has been recognized as providing adequate protection
The vast majority of Personal Data we handle is stored and hosted in Australia.
All Personal Data relating to Children on Storypark is hosted in Australia.
‍
Some limited Personal Data may be provided to companies located in the USA who offer software as a service products that process content for inclusion on the Service (for example, conversion of images and videos to make them suitable for viewing online/ through a web browser). Those third parties located overseas are not permitted to (and are contractually obligated to not) access or use the Personal Data provided except for those limited purposes. We only choose reputable service providers and have agreements with such third parties that prevent them from using or disclosing to others the Personal Data we share with them, other than as is necessary to assist us.
In respect of the transfer of Personal Data to New Zealand, Canada, Australia, the USA and other countries, we will use reasonable efforts to obtain assurances from any third parties that they will safeguard Personal Data consistent with this Privacy Policy and all applicable Data Protection Laws.
While the information resides outside of the territory where you reside, it may be accessible to the local courts, law enforcement and national security authorities in a foreign jurisdiction.
12. Security of Personal Data
We have implemented reasonable technical, physical, and organizational security measures to protect Personal Data. We take reasonable steps to protect Personal Data, including through internal and external security, restricting access to Personal Data to those who have a need to know, maintaining technological products to prevent unauthorised computer access and regularly reviewing our technology to help maintain security. We choose technology partners considering their security and privacy policies and practices.
Personal Data stored in our system is protected by electronic and procedural safeguards. We take reasonable precautions to protect Personal Data from accidental loss and theft by storing it in secure data centres with off-site backups. Communication between Service Users and our servers is encrypted via industry-standard transport layer security (TLS).
The Service is protected by a secure and encrypted password that each Service User must choose themselves. Service Users should never share their passwords. Storypark is not responsible for any loss of data or breach of privacy if a Service User shares their password with someone else. We do not store your password on our servers, instead we store a one-way hash of your password.
Because internet transmissions cannot be guaranteed to be 100% secure, you acknowledge and agree that we cannot guarantee the security of Personal Data, and to the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, that you use the Service at your own risk.
In case of a security incident or any other breach of security safeguards, such as the loss of, unauthorised access to or unauthorised disclosure of Personal Data under Storypark’s control, we will respond in accordance with our obligations under applicable Data Protection Laws.
13. Your Rights
Under certain circumstances and subject to applicable laws, you have the right to access your Personal Data that we hold about you, and to ask for it to be corrected if you think it is wrong.
If you are based in Canada, you also have the right to withdraw your consent to our disclosure or use of your Personal Data, if we are the party with control over the Personal Data.  With respect to Personal Data for which a Customer or Customer Organization has custody and/or control, we will provide you with information to allow you to direct your request to the Customer or Customer Organisation.
If you are based in the European Union or the United Kingdom you have the right, under the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR (as applicable), to:
in certain circumstances, have your Personal Data erased;
restrict the processing of your Personal Data;
move, copy or transfer your Personal Data easily for your own purposes across different services in a safe and secure way;
object to processing where we rely on our legitimate interests as the lawful basis for processing;
withdraw your consent at any time, where our processing of your Personal Data is based on consent; and
lodge a complaint with an appropriate supervisory authority, if you consider that our processing of your Personal Data has breached the EU GDPR or the UK GDPR (as applicable).
If you are a resident of California, you have the right under the CCPA:
to request and obtain from us, once a year and free of charge, information about categories of Personal Data (if any) we disclosed to third parties for direct marketing purposes and the names and addresses of all third parties with which we shared Personal Data in the immediately preceding calendar year;
subject to certain exceptions, to request the deletion of your Personal Data that we have collected from you; and
subject to certain exceptions, not to receive discriminatory treatment for the exercise of your CCPA privacy rights.
We will respond to any request made in respect of the above in accordance with the applicable Data Protection Laws.
Please note that in certain circumstances we may refuse to respond to a rights request where we have the right to do so under applicable Data Protection Laws, for example, where a request is manifestly unfounded or excessive.
Requests for such access and correction requirements can be made to the contact details in section 15 of this Privacy Policy.
Please note that where we are not, or are no longer, in a position to identify you within the information we hold (including because of any de-identification techniques we may have employed), then your rights as described above shall not apply.
We will respond to any request made in respect of the above without delay, but in any case within one (1) month of a request, or two (2) months where the requests are complex or numerous (in which case, we will inform you of such delay), unless otherwise required by applicable Data Protection Laws.
14. Cancelling your Account
If your Storypark Account terminates (for whatever reason), the Personal Data associated with it may no longer be accessible to you via your account. Any Content you have posted from your Account may still be available to other Service Users that the Content has been associated with. There may continue to be residual copies of such Content due to ongoing data back-up and archiving.
15. How to Contact us
If you wish to exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy or any applicable Data Protection Laws or otherwise raise any privacy issue or complaint with us, you can do this by emailing our Privacy Officer at privacy@storypark.com
‍
Your email should provide evidence of who you are and set out the details of your request (e.g., the Personal Data, or the correction, that you are requesting).
If you are located in New Zealand and believe we are unlawfully processing your Personal Data, you can lodge a complaint with us directly using the above contact details, or you can lodge a complaint with the New Zealand Privacy Commissioner. Information about how to lodge a complaint is available at
Privacy Commissioner’s website
.
If you are located outside New Zealand, you may also lodge a complaint regarding our Personal Data processing activities as they relate to your Personal Data with your relevant privacy law supervisory authority.
Sub-section Policy: 
Sub-policy 0
https://www.paypal.com/en/webapps/mpp/ua/privacy-full:
Back To Home Page
Privacy Statement
1. Overview
2. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
3. Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
4. How Do We Process and Use Personal Data?
5. Do We Share Information?
6. How Do We Work with Other Services and Platforms?
7. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
8. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
9. What Are Your Rights?
10. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
11. Can Minors Use Our Services?
12. What Else Should You Know?
13. Contact Us
14. Definitions
15. Additional Information
Download Printable PDF
Privacy Statement
Last updated on December 23, 2024
1. Overview
PayPal
has developed this Privacy Statement to explain how we may collect, retain, process, share and transfer your
Personal Data
when you visit our
Sites
or use our
Services
. This Privacy Statement does not apply to online websites or services that we do not own or control, including websites or services of other PayPal
Users
. This Privacy Statement does not apply to Braintree products or services.
We have defined some terms that we use throughout the Privacy Statement. You can find the meaning of a capitalized term in the
Definitions
section.
Contact us
if you have questions about our privacy practices that are not addressed in this Privacy Statement.
2. What Personal Data Do We Collect?
We may collect information about you when you visit our Sites or use our Services, including the following:
Registration and use information –
When you register to use our Services by establishing an Account, we will collect Personal Data as necessary to offer and fulfill the Services you request. Depending on the Services you choose, we may require you to provide us with your name, address, telephone number, email and identification information to establish an Account. We may require you to provide us with additional Personal Data as you use our Services.
Transaction and experience information –
When you use our Services or access our Sites, for example, to make purchases from merchants, to receive money, to process payments or to send money to friends and family, we collect information about the transaction, as well as other information associated with the transaction such as amount sent or requested, amount paid for products or services, package delivery and tracking information, shipping address for PayPal purchases, merchant information, including information about any funding instruments used to complete the transaction, Device Information, Technical Usage Data, and Geolocation Information.
Participant information –
When you use our Services or access our Sites, we collect Personal Data you provide us about the other participants associated with the transaction.
Send or request money:
When you send or request money through the Services, we collect Personal Data such as name, address, telephone number, and financial account information about the participant who is receiving money from you or sending money to you. The extent of Personal Data required about a participant may vary depending on the Services you are using to send or request money.
Pay or request someone else to pay a bill:
If you use our Services to pay a bill for the benefit of someone else, or if you request a User to pay a bill for you, we collect Personal Data from you about the account holder such as name, address, telephone number, email, and account number of the bill that you intend to pay or request to be paid.
Add value to your accounts:
If you use our Services to add value to your Account or any other account you may have, or if you ask a User to add value to any of these accounts, we may collect Personal Data from you about the other party, or from the other party about you to facilitate the request. For example, if you use our Services to reload a mobile phone, or to request value be added to your mobile account, we may collect Personal Data and other information including mobile account number from the other participant.
Information about your friends and contacts –
It may be easier for us to help you transact with your friends and contacts if you choose to connect your contact list information with your Account. If you establish an account connection between your device or a social media platform and your Account, we will use your contact list information (such as name, address, email address) to improve your experience when you use the Services.
Information that you choose to provide us to obtain additional Services or specific online Services –
If you request or participate in an optional Site feature, or request enhanced Services or other elective functionality, such as linking your email account for all package tracking, we may collect additional information from you. We will provide you with a separate notice at the time of collection, if the use of that information differs from the uses disclosed in this Privacy Statement.
Personal Data about you if you use unbranded Services –
certain Services are available without being required to log in to or establish an Account. We will collect Personal Data when you are interacting with and making payments to merchants using our card payment services that do not carry the PayPal brand and when you checkout with PayPal without logging into an account. For our unbranded payment services, your interaction is with the merchant, on their platform. If you are an Account holder, we may collect information about unbranded transactions and associate them with your Account. If you are not an Account holder, or create an account at a later date, we will collect and store all information you provide and use such information in accordance with this Privacy Statement
Information about you from third-party sources –
We obtain information from third-party sources such as merchants, data providers, and credit bureaus, where permitted by law.
Other information we collect related to your use of our Sites or Services –
We may collect additional information from or about you when you communicate with us, contact our customer support teams or respond to a survey.
Notice to Non-Account holders
If you use our Services without creating or logging into an Account, we’ll still collect Personal Data, which may include your payment information, Device Information, and location. When you use our Services without creating or logging into an Account, we will use this information to process transactions, prevent fraud and comply with the law. We may connect this information with your Account, if you have one or if you create an Account at a later date.
3. Why Do We Retain Personal Data?
We retain Personal Data to fulfill our legal or regulatory obligations and for our business purposes. We may retain Personal Data for longer periods than required by law if it is in our legitimate business interests and not prohibited by law. If your Account is closed, we may take steps to mask Personal Data and other information, but we reserve our ability to retain and access the data for so long as required to comply with applicable laws. We will continue to use and disclose such Personal Data in accordance with this Privacy Statement.
4. How Do We Process and Use Personal Data?
We may
Process
your information for the following reasons:
To operate the Sites and provide the Services
, including to:
initiate a payment, send or request money, add value to an account, or pay a bill;
authenticate your access to an Account;
communicate with you about your Account, the Sites, the Services, or PayPal;
create an account connection between your Account and a third-party account or platform;
perform creditworthiness and other financial standing checks, evaluate applications, and compare information for accuracy and verification purposes; and
keep your Account and financial information up to date.
To manage our business needs
, such as monitoring, analyzing, and improving the Services and the Sites’ performance and functionality. For example, we analyze User behavior and perform research about the way you use our Services.
To manage risk and protect the Sites, the Services and you from fraud by verifying your identity.
PayPal’s risk and fraud tools use
Personal Data
,
Device Information
,
Technical Usage Data
and
Geolocation Information
from our Sites and websites that offer PayPal Services to help detect and prevent fraud and abuse of the Services.
To market to you
about PayPal products and Services and the products and services of unaffiliated businesses. We may also Process your Personal Data to tailor the marketing content and certain Services or Site experiences to better match your interests on PayPal and other third-party websites.
To provide personalized Services offered by PayPal on third-party websites and online services.
We may use your Personal Data and other information collected in accordance with this Privacy Statement to provide a targeted display, feature, Services or offer to you on third-party websites. We may use cookies and other tracking technologies to provide these online services and/or work with other third-parties such as merchants, advertising or analytics companies to provide these online services.
To provide you with location-specific options, functionality or offers
if you elect to share your Geolocation Information through the Services. We will use this information to enhance the security of the Sites and Services and provide you with location-based Services, such as advertising, search results, and other personalized content.
To comply with our obligations and to enforce the terms of our Sites and Services,
including to comply with all applicable laws and regulations.
To make it easier for you to find and connect with others,
we may use your information you have shared with the Service to suggest connections between you and people you may know. For example, we may associate information that we learn about you through your and your contacts’ use of the Services, and information you and others provide to suggest people you may know or may want to transact with through our Services. Social functionality and features designed to simplify your use of the Services with others vary by Service.
To respond to your requests,
for example to contact you about a question you submitted to our customer service team
.
5. Do We Share Information?
We may share your Personal Data or other information about you with others in a variety of ways as described in this section.
We may share your Personal Data or other information for the following reasons:
With other members of the PayPal corporate family:
We may share your Personal Data with members of the PayPal family of entities to, among other things, provide the Services you have requested or authorized; to manage risk; to help detect and prevent potentially illegal and fraudulent acts and other violations of our policies and agreements; and to help us manage the availability and connectivity of PayPal products, Services, and communications.
With other companies that provide services to us:
We may share Personal Data with third-party service providers that perform services and functions at our direction and on our behalf. These third-party service providers may, for example, provide you with Services, verify your identity, assist in processing transactions, send you advertisements for our products and Services, or provide customer support.
With other financial institutions:
We may share Personal Data with other financial institutions that we have partnered with to jointly create and offer a product, such as with Synchrony Bank in connection with the PayPal Extras credit card. These financial institutions may only use this information to market and offer PayPal-related products, unless you have given consent for other uses. We may also share Personal Data to process transactions, provide you with benefits associated with your eligible cards, and keep your financial information up to date.
With the other parties to transactions when you use the Services, such as other Users, merchants, and their service providers:
We may share information about you and your Account with the other parties involved in processing your transactions. This includes other Users you are sending or receiving funds from, and merchants and their service providers. The information might include:
Personal Data and Account Information necessary to facilitate the transaction;
information to help other participant(s) resolve disputes and detect and prevent fraud; and
aggregated data and performance analytics to help merchants better understand Users and to help merchants enhance Users’ experiences.
With other third parties for our business purposes or as permitted or required by law:
We may share information about you with other parties for PayPal’s business purposes or as permitted or required by law, including:
if we need to do so to comply with a law, legal process or regulations;
to law enforcement authorities or other government officials, or other third parties pursuant to a subpoena, a court order or other legal process or requirement applicable to PayPal or PayPal’s corporate family;
if we believe, in our sole discretion, that the disclosure of Personal Data is necessary or appropriate to prevent physical harm or financial loss or in connection with an investigation of suspected or actual illegal activity;
to protect the vital interests of a person;
to investigate violations of or enforce a user agreement or other legal terms applicable to any Service;
to protect our property, Services and legal rights;
to facilitate a purchase or sale of all or part of PayPal’s business;
in connection with shipping and related services for purchases made using a Service;
to help assess and manage risk and prevent fraud against us, our Users and fraud involving our Sites or use of our Services, including fraud that occurs at or involves our business partners, strategic ventures, or other individuals and merchants;
to banking partners as required by card association rules for inclusion on their list of terminated merchants;
to credit reporting and collection agencies;
to companies that we plan to merge with or be acquired by; and
to support our audit, compliance, and corporate governance functions.
With your consent:
We also will share your Personal Data and other information with your consent or direction, including if you authorize an account connection with a third-party account or platform.
In addition, PayPal may provide aggregated statistical data to third parties, including other businesses and members of the public, about how, when, and why Users visit our Sites and use our Services. This data will not personally identify you or provide information about your use of the Sites or Services. We do not share your Personal Data with third parties for their marketing purposes without your consent.
6. How Do We Work with Other Services and Platforms?
A significant benefit and innovation of PayPal’s Services is that you can connect your Account with a third-party account or platform. For the purposes of this Privacy Statement, an “account connection” with such a third-party is a connection you authorize or enable between your Account and a non-PayPal account, payment instrument, or platform that you lawfully control or own. When you authorize such a connection, PayPal and the third-party will exchange your Personal Data and other information directly. Examples of account connections include:
linking your Account to a social media account or social messaging service;
linking your email account to your Account to receive package tracking information;
connecting your Account to a third-party data aggregation or financial services company, if you provide such company with your Account log-in credentials; or
using your Account to make payments to a merchant or allowing a merchant to charge your Account.
If you choose to create an account connection, we may receive information from the third-party about you and your use of the third-party’s service. For example, if you connect your Account to a social media account, we will receive Personal Data from the social media provider via the account connection. If you connect your Account to other financial accounts, directly or through a third-party service provider, we may have access to your account balance and transactional information, such as purchases and funds transfers. We will use all such information that we receive from a third-party via an account connection in a manner consistent with this Privacy Statement.
Information that we share with a third-party based on an account connection will be used and disclosed in accordance with the third-party’s privacy practices. Before authorizing an account connection, you should review the privacy notice of any third-party that will gain access to your Personal Data as part of the account connection. For example, Personal Data that PayPal shares with a third-party account or platform such as a social media account may in turn be shared with certain other parties, including the general public, depending on the account’s or platform’s privacy practices.
7. How Do We Use Cookies and Tracking Technologies?
When you visit our Sites, use our Services, or visit a third-party website for which we provide online Services, we and our business partners and vendors may use cookies and other tracking technologies (collectively, “Cookies”) to recognize you as a User and to customize your online experiences, the Services you use, and other online content and advertising; measure the effectiveness of promotions and perform analytics; and to mitigate risk, prevent potential fraud, and promote trust and safety across our Sites and Services. Certain aspects and features of our Services and Sites are only available through the use of Cookies, so if you choose to disable or decline Cookies, your use of the Sites and Services may be limited or not possible.
Please review our
Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies
to learn more about how we use Cookies.
8. What Privacy Choices Are Available To You?
You have choices when it comes to the privacy practices and communications described in this Privacy Statement. Many of your choices may be explained at the time you sign up for or use a Service or in the context of your use of a Site. You may be provided with instructions and prompts within the experiences as you navigate the Services.
Choices Relating to the Personal Data We Collect
Personal Data.
You may decline to provide Personal Data when it is requested by PayPal, but certain Services or all of the Services may be unavailable to you.
Location and other device-level information
. The device you use to access the Sites or Services may collect information about you, including Geolocation Information and User usage data that PayPal may then collect and use. To restrict the collection and use of such information, please use the settings available in the device.
Choices Relating to Our Use of Your Personal Data
Online Tracking and Interest-Based Advertising. We work with partners and third-party service providers to serve you advertising using ad-related cookies and web beacons. You can opt-out of third-party advertising-related cookies and web beacons, in which case our advertising should not be targeted to you. You will continue to see our advertising on third party websites.
For more information on third-party advertising-related cookies and interest-based advertising, and to learn how to opt-out of these practices with companies participating in industry self-regulation, please visit
AdChoices
.
Mobile Device Tracking. You may opt out of tracking and receiving tailored advertisements on your mobile device by some mobile advertising companies and other similar entities by downloading the App Choices app at
https://youradchoices.ca/appchoices/
.
Personalized Services offered by PayPal on third-party websites and services. You may manage your preferences for other PayPal Services that are personalized and offered to you on third-party websites from your Account. We may also provide you with instructions and prompts on how to manage your preferences within the Service experience.
Finding and connecting with others. You may manage your preferences for finding and connecting with others from your account of the Service you use.
Choices Relating to Account Connections
When you authorize an account connection to a third-party account or platform, such as a social media account, you may be able to manage your connection preferences from your Account or the third-party account or platform. Please refer to the privacy notice that governs the third-party platform for more information on the choices you may have.
Choices Relating to Cookies
You may have options available to manage your cookies preferences. For example, your browser or internet device may allow you delete, disable, or block certain cookies and other tracking technologies. You can learn more by visiting AboutCookies.org. You may choose to enable these options, but doing so may prevent you from using many of the core features and functions available on a Service or Site.
You may have an option regarding the use of cookies and other tracking technologies when you use a Service or visit parts of a Site. For example, you may be asked if you want the Service or Site to “remember” certain things about you, and we will use cookies and other tracking technologies to the extent that you permit them.
You can learn more about our cookies and tracking technologies by visiting the Statement on Cookies and Tracking Technologies page.
Choices Relating to Your Registration and Account Information
Through your Account, you generally may review and edit Personal Data by logging in and updating the information directly or by contacting us.
Contact us
if you do not have an Account or if you have questions about your Account information or other Personal Data.
Choices Relating to Communication
Notices, Alerts and Updates from Us:
Marketing:
We may send you marketing content about our Sites, Services, products, products we jointly offer with financial institutions, as well as the products and services of unaffiliated third parties and members of the PayPal corporate family through various communication channels, for example, email, text, pop-ups, push notifications, and messaging applications. You may opt out of these marketing communications by following the instructions in the communications you receive. You may also adjust your communication preferences in your Account settings. For messages sent via push notifications, you may manage your preferences in your device.
Informational and Other:
We will send communications to you that are required or necessary to send to Users of our Services, notifications that contain important information and other communications that you request from us. You may not opt out of receiving these communications. However, you may be able to adjust the media and format through which you receive these notices.
9. What Are Your Rights?
You have certain rights in respect of your Personal Data. In particular, you have a right of access and correction. If you wish to exercise these rights, please
contact us
.
10. How Do We Protect Your Personal Data?
We maintain technical, physical, and administrative security measures designed to provide reasonable protection for your Personal Data against loss, misuse, unauthorized access, disclosure, and alteration. The security measures include firewalls, data encryption, physical access controls to our data centers, and information access authorization controls. While we are dedicated to securing our systems and Services, you are responsible for securing and maintaining the privacy of your password(s) and Account/profile registration information and verifying that the Personal Data we maintain about you is accurate and current. We are not responsible for protecting any Personal Data that we share with a third-party based on an account connection that you have authorized.
11. Can Minors Use Our Services?
Our Sites and Services are not directed to and should not be accessed by children under the age of majority. We do not knowingly collect information, including Personal Data, from minors or other individuals who are not legally able to use our Sites and Services. If we obtain actual knowledge that we have collected Personal Data from a minor, we will promptly delete it, unless we are legally obligated to retain such data.
Contact us
if you believe that we have mistakenly or unintentionally collected information from a minor.
12. What Else Should You Know?
Changes to This Privacy Statement
.
We may revise this Privacy Statement from time to time to reflect changes to our business, the Sites or Services, or applicable laws. The revised Privacy Statement will be effective as of the published effective date.
If the revised version includes a substantial change, we will provide you with at least 30 days’ prior notice by posting notice of the change on the “Policy Update” page of our website. We also may notify Users of the change using email or other means.
Transfers of Your Personal Data to Other Countries
Our operations are supported by a network of computers, cloud-based servers, and other infrastructure and information technology, including, but not limited to, third-party service providers. We and our third-party service providers store and Process your Personal Data outside of Canada, in the United States of America and elsewhere in the world. If your Personal Data is transferred to other countries, we will protect your information as described in this Privacy Statement.
13. Contact Us
Contact our Privacy Officer
online
or offline at PayPal Canada Co., MaRS Centre, West Tower, 661 University Avenue, Suite 506, Toronto, ON M5G 1M1
Click
here
to contact us about your PayPal Account or Service
Click
here
to contact us about your Xoom Account or Service
14. Definitions
Account
means a PayPal or Xoom member account.
Device Information
means data that can be automatically collected from any device used to access the Sites or Services. Such information may include, but is not limited to, your device type; your device’s network connections; your device’s name; your device’s IP address; information about your device’s web browser and the internet connection being used to access the Site or Services; Geolocation Information; information about apps downloaded to your device; and biometric data (e.g., Touch ID/Fingerprint to verify your identity).
Geolocation Information
means information that identifies with reasonable specificity your location by using, for instance, longitude and latitude coordinates obtained through GPS, Wi-Fi, or cell site triangulation. Some of our Services may ask you for permission to share your current location. Some of the Sites and Services require this information to provide a specific product or online Service. If you do not agree to our collection of the geolocation information, our Sites or Services may not function properly when you try to use them.
PayPal
means PayPal Canada Co. and subsidiaries, group companies or affiliates. In this Privacy Statement, PayPal is sometimes referred to as “we,” “us,” or “our,” depending on the context.
Personal Data
means personal information that can be associated with an identified or identifiable person. “Personal Data” can include name, address (including billing and shipping addresses), telephone number, email, payment card number, other financial account information, account number, date of birth, and government-issued credentials (e.g., driver’s license number, passport, and Social Insurance number).
Process
means any method or way that we use or handle Personal Data or sets of Personal Data, whether or not by automated means, such as collection, recording, organization, structuring, storage, adaptation or alteration, retrieval, and consultation, disclosure by transmission, disseminating or otherwise making available, alignment or combination, restriction, erasure or destruction of Personal Data.
Services
means any products, services, content, features, technologies, or functions, and all related websites, applications and services offered by PayPal or Xoom.
Sites
means the websites, mobile apps, official social media platforms, or other online properties through which PayPal offers the Services and which has posted or linked to this Privacy Statement.
Technical Usage
Data
means information we collect from your phone, computer or other device that you use to access the Sites or Services. Technical Usage Data tells us how you use the Sites and Services, such as what you have searched for and viewed on the Sites and the way you use our Services, including your IP address, statistics regarding how pages are loaded or viewed, the websites you visited before coming to the Sites and other usage and browsing information collected through Cookies.
User
means an individual who uses the Services or accesses the Sites.
15. Additional Information
The information provided in this section may be specific to customers depending on your region or how you use the Services. This information is provided to PayPal from third parties whom you may interact when using the Services.
Google ReCaptcha
PayPal uses ReCaptcha on the Sites and Services. Your use of ReCaptcha is subject to the Google
Privacy Policy
and
Terms of Use
.
ReCaptcha is only used to fight spam and abuse.
Sub-policy 1
https://stripe.com/nz/privacy:
Stripe Services Agreement
Stripe Connect
Platform Agreement
Account Agreement
Products and Programmes
Stripe Atlas
Stripe Adaptive Pricing
Stripe Climate
Climate Contribution Terms
Stripe Corporate Card
Stripe Customer Portal
Stripe Data Pipeline
Stripe Financial Connections
Stripe Identity
Stripe Issuing
Stripe Tax
Stripe Partner Ecosystem
Stripe Radar
Stripe Rewards
Stripe Verifications
Stripe Shop
Stripe Terminal
Terminal Purchase Terms
Terminal Reseller Terms
Terminal Device EULA
Stripe Treasury - Connected Accounts
Stripe Treasury - Platforms
Stripe Vault and Forward
Financial Services Terms
Acquirer Disclosure
Stripe Payments Company
PNC Bank
Payment Method Terms
Prohibited & Restricted Businesses
Privacy
Privacy Policy
Cookies Policy
Data Privacy Framework
Service Providers List
Data Processing Agreement
Data Transfers Addendum
Stripe Privacy Center
Intellectual Property
Intellectual Property Notice
Marks Usage
Stripe Apps
App Developer Agreement
App Marketplace Agreement
Licences
Consumer Terms
Last updated: January 16, 2025
This Privacy Policy includes important information about your personal data and we encourage you to read it carefully.
Welcome
We provide financial infrastructure for the internet. Individuals and businesses of all sizes use our technology and services to facilitate purchases, accept payments, send payouts, and manage online businesses.
This Privacy Policy (“Policy”) describes the Personal Data that we collect, how we use and share it, and details on how you can reach us with privacy-related inquiries. The Policy also outlines your rights and choices as a data subject, including the right to object to certain uses of your Personal Data.
Depending on the activity, Stripe assumes the role of a “data controller” and/or “data processor” (or “service provider”). For more details about our privacy practices, including our role, the specific Stripe entity responsible under this Policy, and our legal bases for processing your Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
Defined Terms
In this Policy, “Stripe”, “we”, “our,” or “us” refers to the Stripe entity responsible for the collection, use, and handling of Personal Data as described in this document. Depending on your jurisdiction, the specific Stripe entity accountable for your Personal Data might vary.
Learn More
.
“Personal Data” refers to any information associated with an identified or identifiable individual, which can include data that you provide to us, and that we collect about you during your interaction with our Services (such as device information, IP address, etc.).
“Services” refers to the products, services, devices, and applications, that we provide under the Stripe Services Agreement (“Business Services”) or the Stripe Consumer Terms of Service (“End User Services”); websites (“Sites”) like Stripe.com and Link.com; and other Stripe applications and online services. We provide Business Services to entities (“Business Users”). We provide End User Services directly to individuals for their personal use.
“Financial Partners” are financial institutions, banks, and other partners such as payment method acquirers, payout providers, and card networks that we partner with to provide the Services.
Depending on the context, “you” might be an End Customer, End User, Representative, or Visitor:
End Users.
When you use an End User Service, such as saving a payment method with Link, for personal use we refer to you as an “End User.”
End Customers.
When you are not directly transacting with Stripe, but we receive your Personal Data to provide Services to a Business User, including when you make a purchase from a Business User on a Stripe Checkout page or receive payments from a Business User, we refer to you as an “End Customer.”
Representatives.
When you are acting on behalf of an existing or potential Business User—perhaps as a company founder, account administrator for a Business User, or a recipient of an employee credit card from a Business User via Stripe Issuing—we refer to you as a “Representative.”
Visitors.
When you interact with Stripe by visiting a Site without being logged into a Stripe account, or when your interaction with Stripe does not involve you being an End User, End Customer, or Representative, we refer to you as a “Visitor.” For example, you are a Visitor when you send a message to Stripe asking for more information about our Services.
In this Policy, “Transaction Data” refers to data collected and used by Stripe to facilitate transactions you request. Some Transaction Data is Personal Data and may include: your name, email address, contact number, billing and shipping address, payment method information (like credit or debit card number, bank account details, or payment card image chosen by you), merchant and location details, amount and date of purchase, and in some instances, information about what was purchased.
1. Personal Data that we collect and how we use and share it
2. More ways we collect, use and share Personal Data
3. Legal bases for processing data
4. Your rights and choices
5. Security and retention
6. International data transfers
7. Updates and notifications
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
9. Contact us
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
1. Personal Data we collect and how we use and share it
Our collection and use of Personal Data differs based on whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, and the specific Service that you are using. For example, if you're a sole proprietor who wants to use our Business Services, we may collect your Personal Data to onboard your business; at the same time, you might also be an End Customer if you've bought goods from another Business User that is using our Services for payment processing. You could also be an End User if you used our End User Service, such as Link, for those transactions.
1.1 End Users
We provide End User Services when we provide the Services directly to you for your personal use (e.g., Link). Additional details regarding our collection, usage, and sharing of End User Personal Data, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Users
Using Link or Connecting your bank account
. Stripe offers a service called "Link," which allows you to create an account and store information for future interactions with Stripe’s Services and Business Users. You may save a number of different kinds of Personal Data using Link. For instance, you may save your name, payment method details, contact information, and address to conveniently use saved information to pay for transactions across our Business Users. When you choose to pay with Link, we will also collect Transaction Data associated with your transactions.
Learn More
.
You can also share and save bank account details to your Link account using Stripe’s
Financial Connections
product. When you use Financial Connections, Stripe will periodically collect and process your account information (such as bank account owner information, account balances, account number and details, account transactions, and, in some cases, log-in credentials). You can ask us to cease the collection of such data at any time.
Learn More
.
Finally, you can use Link to store your identity documents (such as your driver’s license) so that you can share them in future interactions with Stripe or its Business Users.
Paying Stripe
. When you purchase goods or services directly from Stripe, we receive your Transaction Data. For instance, when you make a payment to Stripe Climate, we collect information about the transaction, as well as your contact and payment method details.
Identity/Verification Services
. We offer an identity verification service that automates the comparison of your identity document (such as a driver’s license) with your image (such as a selfie). You can separately consent to us using your biometric data to enhance our verification technology, with the option to revoke your consent at any time.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Users, including about your online activity and your engagement with our End User Services, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Users
Services
. We use and share your Personal Data to provide the End User Services to you, which includes support, personalization (such as language preferences and setting choices), and communication about our End User Services (such as communicating Policy updates and information about our Services). For example, Stripe may use cookies and similar technologies or the data you provide to our Business Users (such as when you input your email address on a Business User’s website) to recognize you and help you use Link when visiting our Business User’s website. Learn more about how we use cookies and similar technologies in Stripe’s
Cookie Policy
.
Our Business Users.
When you use Link to make payments with our Business Users, we share your Personal Data, including name, contact information, payment method details, and Transaction Data with those Business Users.
Learn More
. You can also direct Stripe to share your saved bank account information and identity documents with Business Users you do business with. Once we share your Personal Data with Business Users, we may process that Personal Data as a Data Processor for those Business Users, as detailed in Section 1.2 of this Policy.  You should consult the privacy policies of the Business Users’ you do business with for information on how they use the information shared with them.
Fraud Detection and Loss Prevention
. We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect fraud and prevent financial losses for you, us, and our Business Users and Financial Partners, including detecting unauthorized purchases. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those that use our fraud prevention-related Business Services (such as Stripe Radar), with Personal Data about you (including your attempted transactions) so that they can assess the fraud or loss risk associated with the transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, we may use your Personal Data, including Transaction Data, to assess your eligibility for, and offer you, other End User Services or promote existing End User Services, including through co-marketing with partners such as Stripe Business Users.
Learn more
. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we use and share End User Personal Data with third party partners to allow us to advertise our End User Services to you, including through interest-based advertising, and to track the efficacy of such ads. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third-party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about ways we may use and share End Users' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.2 End Customers
Stripe provides various Business Services to our Business Users, which include processing in-person or online payments or payouts for those Business Users. When acting as a service provider—also referred to as a Data Processor—for a Business User, we process End Customer Personal Data in accordance with our agreement with the Business User and the Business User's lawful instructions. This happens, for example, when we process a payment for a Business User because you purchased a product from them, or when the Business User asks us to send you funds.
Business Users are responsible for ensuring that the privacy rights of their End Customers are respected, including obtaining appropriate consents and making disclosures about their own data collection and use associated with their products and services. If you're an End Customer, please refer to the privacy policy of the Business User you're doing business with for its privacy practices, choices, and controls.
We provide more comprehensive information about our collection, use, and sharing of End Customer Personal Data in our
Privacy Center
, including the
legal bases
we rely on for processing your Personal Data.
a. Personal Data we collect about End Customers
Transaction Data
. If you're an End Customer making payments to, receiving refunds or payments from, initiating a purchase or donation, or otherwise transacting with our Business User, whether in-person or online, we receive your Transaction Data. We may also receive your transaction history with the Business User.
Learn More
. Additionally, we may collect information entered into a checkout form even if you opt not to complete the form or transaction with the Business User.
Learn More
. A Business User who uses Stripe’s Terminal Service to provide its goods or services to End Customers may use the Terminal Service to collect End Customer Personal Data (like your name, email, phone number, address, signature, or age) in accordance with its own privacy policy.
Identity/Verification Information
. Stripe provides a verification and fraud prevention Service that our Business Users can use to verify Personal Data about you, such as your authorization to use a particular payment method. During the process, you’d be asked to share with us certain Personal Data (like your government ID and selfie for biometric verification, Personal Data you input, or Personal Data that is apparent from the physical payment method like a credit card image). To protect against fraud and determine if somebody is trying to impersonate you, we may cross-verify this data with information about you that we've collected from Business Users, Financial Partners, business affiliates, identity verification services, publicly available sources, and other third party service providers and sources.
Learn More
.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about End Customers, including about your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of End Customers
To provide our Business Services to our Business Users, we use and share End Customers' Personal Data with them. Where allowed, we also use End Customers' Personal Data for Stripe’s own purposes such as enhancing security, improving and offering our Business Services, and preventing fraud, loss, and other damages, as described further below.
Payment processing and accounting
. We use your Transaction Data to deliver Payment-related Business Services to Business Users — including online payment transactions processing, sales tax calculation, and invoice, bill, and dispute handling — and to help them determine their revenue, settle their bills, and execute accounting tasks.
Learn More
. We may also use your Personal Data to provide and improve our Business Services.
During payment transactions, your Personal Data is shared with various entities in connection with your transaction. As a service provider or data processor, we share Personal Data to enable transactions as directed by Business Users. For instance, when you choose a payment method for your transaction, we may share your Transaction Data with your bank or other payment method provider, including as necessary to authenticate you, Learn More, process your transaction, prevent fraud, and handle disputes. The Business User you choose to do business with also receives Transaction Data and might share the data with others. Please review your merchant’s, bank’s, and payment method provider’s privacy policies for more information about how they use and share your Personal Data.
Financial services
. Certain Business Users leverage our Services to offer financial services to you via Stripe or our Financial Partners. For example, a Business User may issue a card product with which you can purchase goods and services. Such cards could carry the brand of Stripe, the bank partner, and/or the Business User. In addition to any Transaction Data we may generate or receive when these cards are used for purchases, we also collect and use your Personal Data to provide and manage these products, including assisting our Business Users in preventing misuse of the cards. Please review the privacy policies of the Business User and, if applicable, our bank partners associated with the financial service (the brands of which may be shown on the card) for more information.
Identity/Verification services
. We use Personal Data about your identity to perform verification services for Stripe or for the Business Users that you are transacting with, to prevent fraud, and to enhance security. For these purposes we may use Personal Data you provide directly or Personal Data we obtain from our service providers, including for phone verification.
Learn More
. If you provide a selfie along with an image of your identity document, we may employ biometric technology to compare and calculate whether they match and verify your identity.
Learn More
.
Fraud detection and loss prevention.
We use your Personal Data collected across our Services to detect and prevent losses for you, us, our Business Users, and Financial Partners. We may provide Business Users and Financial Partners, including those using our fraud prevention-related Business Services, with your Personal Data (including your attempted transactions) to help them assess the fraud or loss risk associated with a transaction. Learn more about how we may use technology to assess the fraud risk associated with an attempted transaction and what information we share with Business Users and Financial Partners
here
and
here
.
Our Business Users (and their authorized third parties).
We share End Customers' Personal Data with their respective Business Users and parties directly authorized by those Business Users to receive such data. Here are common examples of such sharing:
When a Business User instructs Stripe to provide another Business User with access to its Stripe account, including data related to its End Customers, via Stripe Connect.
Sharing information that you have provided to us with a Business User so that we can send payments to you on behalf of that Business User.
Sharing information, documents, or images provided by an End Customer with a Business User when the latter uses Stripe Identity, our identity verification Service, to verify the identity of the End Customer.
The Business Users you choose to do business with may further share your Personal Data with third parties (like additional third party service providers other than Stripe). Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information.
Advertising by Business Users
. If you initiate a purchasing process with a Business User, the Business User receives your Personal Data from us in connection with our provision of Services even if you don't finish your purchase. The Business User may use your Personal Data to market and advertise their products or services, subject to the terms of their privacy policy. Please review the Business User’s privacy policy for more information, including your rights to stop their use of your Personal Data for marketing purposes.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share End Customers' Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.3 Representatives
We collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives of Business Users (for example, business owners) to provide our Business Services. For more information about how we collect, use, and share Personal Data from Representatives, as well as the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, please visit our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Representatives
Registration and contact information
. When you register for a Stripe account for a Business User (including incorporation of a Business), we collect your name and login credentials. If you register for or attend an event organized by Stripe or sign up to receive Stripe communications, we collect your registration and profile data. As a Representative, we may collect your Personal Data from third parties, including data providers, to advertise, market, and communicate with you as detailed further in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below. We may also link a location with you to tailor the Services or information effectively to your needs.
Learn More
.
Identification Information
. As a current or potential Business User, an owner of a Business User, or a shareholder, officer, or director of a Business User, we need your contact details, such as name, postal address, telephone number, and email address, to fulfill our Financial Partner and regulatory requirements, verify your identity, and prevent fraudulent activities and harm to the Stripe platform. We collect your Personal Data, such as ownership interest in the Business User, date of birth, government-issued identity documents, and associated identifiers, as well as any history of fraud or misuse, directly from you and/or from publicly available sources, third parties such as credit bureaus and via the Services we provide.
Learn More
. You may also choose to provide us with bank account information.
More
. For further information about other types of Personal Data that we may collect about Representatives, including your online activity, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Representatives
We typically use the Personal Data of Representatives to provide the Business Services to the corresponding Business Users. The ways we use and share this data are further described below.
Business Services
. We use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with Business Users to provide the Services requested by you or the Business User you represent.
In some instances, we may have to submit your Personal Data to a government entity to provide our Business Services, for purposes such as the incorporation of a business, or calculating and paying applicable sales tax. For our tax-related Business Services, we may use your Personal Data to prepare tax documents and file taxes on behalf of the Business User you represent. For our Atlas business incorporation Services, we may use your Personal Data to submit forms to the IRS on your behalf and file documents with other government authorities, such as articles of incorporation in your state of incorporation.
We share Representatives’ Personal Data with parties authorized by the corresponding Business User, such as Financial Partners servicing a financial product, or third party apps or services the Business User chooses to use alongside our Business Services. Here are common examples of such sharing:
Payment method providers, like Visa or WeChat Pay, require information about Business Users and their Representatives who accept their payment methods. This information is typically required during the onboarding process or for processing transactions and handling disputes for these Business Users.
Learn More
.
A Business User may authorize Stripe to share your Personal Data with other Business Users to facilitate the provision of Services through Stripe Connect.
The use of Personal Data by a third party authorized by a Business User is subject to the third party’s privacy policy.
If you are a Business User who has chosen a name that includes Personal Data (for example, a sole proprietorship or family name in a company name), we will use and share such information for the provision of our Services in the same way we do with any company name. This may include, for example, displaying it on receipts and other transaction-identifying descriptions.
Fraud detection and loss prevention
. We use Representatives’ Personal Data to identify and manage risks that our Business Services might be used for fraudulent activities causing losses to Stripe, End Users, End Customers, Business Users, Financial Partners, and others. We also use information about you obtained from publicly available sources, third parties like credit bureaus and from our Services to address such risks, including to identify patterns of misuse and monitor for terms of service violations. Stripe may share Representatives' Personal Data with Business Users, our Financial Partners, and third party service providers, including phone verification providers,
Learn More
, to verify the information provided by you and identify risk indicators.
Learn More
. We also use and share Representatives' Personal Data to conduct due diligence, including conducting anti-money laundering and sanctions screening in accordance with applicable law.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Representatives’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
. We may also use your Personal Data, including your Stripe account activity, to evaluate your eligibility for and offer you Business Services or promote existing Business Services.
Learn more
.
More
. For further information about additional ways by which we may use and share Representatives’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
1.4 Visitors
We collect, use, and share the Personal Data of Visitors. More details about how we collect, use, and share Visitors’ Personal Data, along with the
legal bases
we rely on for processing such Personal Data, can be found in our
Privacy Center
.
a. Personal Data we collect about Visitors
When you browse our Sites, we receive your Personal Data, either provided directly by you or collected through our use of cookies and similar technologies. See our
Cookie Policy
for more information. If you opt to complete a form on the Site or third party websites where our advertisements are displayed (like LinkedIn or Facebook), we collect the information you included in the form. This may include your contact information and other information pertaining to your questions about our Services. We may also associate a location with your visit.
Learn More
.
More
. Further details about other types of Personal Data that we may collect from Visitors, including your online activity, can be found in the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
b. How we use and share Personal Data of Visitors
Personalization
. We use the data we collect about you using cookies and similar technologies to measure engagement with the content on the Sites, improve relevancy and navigation, customize your experience (such as language preference and region-specific content), and curate content about Stripe and our Services that's tailored to you. For instance, as not all of our Services are available globally, we may customize our responses based on your region.
Advertising
. Where permitted by applicable law, and where required with your consent, we use and share Visitors’ Personal Data with third parties, including
Partners
, so we can advertise and market our Services and Partner integrations. Subject to applicable law, including any consent requirements, we may advertise through interest-based advertising and track the efficacy of such ads. See our
Cookie Policy
. We do not transfer your Personal Data to third parties in exchange for payment, but we may provide your data to third party partners, like advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services.
Learn more
.
Engagement
. As you interact with our Sites, we use the information we collect about and through your devices to provide opportunities for further interactions, such as discussions about Services or interactions with chatbots, to address your questions.
More
. For more information about additional ways we may use and share Visitors’ Personal Data, please see the
More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
section below.
2. More ways we collect, use, and share Personal Data
In addition to the ways described above, we also process your Personal Data as follows:
a. Collection of Personal Data
Online Activity
. Depending on the Service used and how our Business Services are implemented by the Business Users, we may collect information related to:
The devices and browsers you use across our Sites and third party websites, apps, and other online services (“Third Party Sites”).
Usage data associated with those devices and browsers and your engagement with our Services, including data elements like IP address, plug-ins, language preference, time spent on Sites and Third Party Sites, pages visited, links clicked, payment methods used, and the pages that led you to our Sites and Third Party Sites. We also collect activity indicators, such as mouse activity indicators, to help us detect fraud.
Learn More
. See also our
Cookie Policy
.
Communication and Engagement Information
. We also collect information you choose to share with us through various channels, such as support tickets, emails, or social media. If you respond to emails or surveys from Stripe, we collect your email address, name, and any other data you opt to include in your email or responses. If you engage with us over the phone, we collect your phone number and any other information you might provide during the call. Calls with Stripe or Stripe representatives may be recorded.
Learn More
. Additionally, we collect your engagement data, like your registration for, attendance at, or viewing of Stripe events and any other interactions with Stripe personnel.
Forums and Discussion Groups
. If our Sites allow posting of content, we collect Personal Data that you provide in connection with the post.
b. Use of Personal Data.
Besides the use of Personal Data described above, we use Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Analyzing, Improving, and Developing our Services
. We collect and process Personal Data throughout our various Services, whether you are an End User, End Customer, Representative, or Visitor, to improve our Services, develop new Services, and support our efforts to make our Services more efficient, relevant, and useful to you.
Learn More
.  We may use Personal Data to generate aggregate and statistical information to understand and explain how our Services are used.  Examples of how we use Personal Data to analyze, improve, and develop our products and services include:
Using analytics on our Sites, including as described in our Cookie Policy, to help us understand your use of our Sites and Services and diagnose technical issues.
Training machine learning models to power our Services and protect against fraud and other harm.
Analyzing and drawing inferences from Transaction Data to reduce costs, fraud, and disputes and increase authentication and authorization rates for Stripe and our Business Users.
Communications
. We use the contact information we have about you to deliver our Services, which may involve sending codes via SMS for your authentication.
Learn More
. If you are an End User, Representative, or Visitor, we may communicate with you using the contact information we have about you to provide information about our Services and our affiliates’ services, invite you to participate in our events, surveys, or user research, or otherwise communicate with you for marketing purposes, in compliance with applicable law, including any consent or opt-out requirements. For example, when you provide your contact information to us or when we collect your business contact details through participation at trade shows or other events, we may use this data to follow up with you regarding an event, provide information requested about our Services, and include you in our marketing information campaigns. Where permitted under applicable law, we may record our calls with you to provide our Services, comply with our legal obligations, perform research and quality assurance, and for training purposes.
Social Media and Promotions
. If you opt to submit Personal Data to engage in an offer, program, or promotion, we use the Personal Data you provide to manage the offer, program, or promotion. We also use the Personal Data you provide, along with the Personal Data you make available on social media platforms, for marketing purposes, unless we are not permitted to do so.
Fraud Prevention and Security
. We collect and use Personal Data to help us identify and manage activities that could be fraudulent or harmful across our Services, enable our fraud detection Business Services, and secure our Services and transactions against unauthorized access, use, alteration or misappropriation of Personal Data, information, and funds. As part of the fraud prevention, detection, security monitoring, and compliance efforts for Stripe and its Business Users, we collect information from publicly available sources, third parties (such as credit bureaus), and via the Services we offer. In some instances, we may also collect information about you directly from you, or from our Business Users, Financial Partners, and other third parties for the same purposes. Furthermore, to protect our Services, we may receive details such as IP addresses and other identifying data about potential security threats from third parties.
Learn More
. Such information helps us verify identities, conduct credit checks where lawfully permitted, and prevent fraud. Additionally, we might use technology to evaluate the potential risk of fraud associated with individuals seeking to procure our Business Services or arising from attempted transactions by an End Customer or End User with our Business Users or Financial Partners.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
. We use Personal Data to meet our contractual and legal obligations related to anti-money laundering, Know-Your-Customer ("KYC") laws, anti-terrorism activities, safeguarding vulnerable customers, export control, and prohibition of doing business with restricted persons or in certain business fields, among other legal obligations. For example, we may monitor transaction patterns and other online signals and use those insights to identify fraud, money laundering, and other harmful activity that could affect Stripe, our Financial Partners, End Users, Business Users and others.
Learn More
. Safety, security, and compliance for our Services are key priorities for us, and collecting and using Personal Data is crucial to this effort.
Minors
. Our Services are not directed to children under the age of 13, and we request that they do not provide Personal Data to seek Services directly from Stripe. In certain jurisdictions, we may impose higher age limits as required by applicable law.
c. Sharing of Personal Data.
Besides the sharing of Personal Data described above, we share Personal Data in the ways listed below:
Stripe Affiliates
. We share Personal Data with other Stripe-affiliated entities for purposes identified in this Policy.
Service Providers or Processors
. In order to provide, communicate, market, analyze, and advertise our Services, we depend on service providers. These providers offer critical services such as providing cloud infrastructure, conducting analytics for the assessment of the speed, accuracy, and/or security of our Services, verifying identities, identifying potentially harmful activity, and providing customer service and audit functions. We authorize these service providers to use or disclose the Personal Data we make available to them to perform services on our behalf and to comply with relevant legal obligations. We require these service providers to contractually commit to security and confidentiality obligations for the Personal Data they process on our behalf. The majority of our service providers are based in the European Union, the United States of America, and India.
Learn More
.
Financial Partners
. We share Personal Data with certain Financial Partners to provide Services to Business Users and offer certain Services in conjunction with these Financial Partners. For instance, we may share certain Personal Data, such as payment processing volume, loan repayment data, and Representative contact information, with institutional investors and lenders who purchase loan receivables or provide financing related to Stripe Capital.
Learn More
.
Others with Consent
. In some situations, we may not offer a service, but instead refer you to others (like professional service firms that we partner with to deliver the Atlas Service). In these instances, we will disclose the identity of the third party and the information to be shared with them, and seek your consent to share the information.
Corporate Transactions
. If we enter or intend to enter a transaction that modifies the structure of our business, such as a reorganization, merger, sale, joint venture, assignment, transfer, change of control, or other disposition of all or part of our business, assets, or stock, we may share Personal Data with third parties in connection with such transaction. Any other entity that buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your Personal Data, subject to the terms of this Policy.
Compliance and Harm Prevention
. We share Personal Data when we believe it is necessary to comply with applicable law; to abide by rules imposed by Financial Partners in connection with the use of their payment method; to enforce our contractual rights; to secure and protect the Services, rights, privacy, safety, and property of Stripe, you, and others, including against malicious or fraudulent activity; and to respond to valid legal requests from courts, law enforcement agencies, regulatory agencies, and other public and government authorities, which may include authorities outside your country of residence.
3. Legal bases for processing Personal Data
For purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) and other applicable data protection laws, we rely on a number of legal bases to process your Personal Data.
Learn More
. For some jurisdictions, there may be additional legal bases, which are outlined in the
Jurisdiction-Specific Provisions
section below.
a. Contractual and Pre-Contractual Business Relationships
. We process Personal Data to enter into business relationships with prospective Business Users and End Users and fulfill our respective contractual obligations with them. These processing activities include:
Creation and management of Stripe accounts and Stripe account credentials, including the assessment of applications to initiate or expand the use of our Services;
Creation and management of Stripe Checkout accounts;
Accounting, auditing, and billing activities; and
Processing of payments and related activities, which include fraud detection, loss prevention, transaction optimization, communications about such payments, and related customer service activities.
b. Legal Compliance
. We process Personal Data to verify the identities of individuals and entities to comply with obligations related to fraud monitoring, prevention, and detection, laws associated with identifying and reporting illicit and illegal activities, such as those under the Anti-Money Laundering ("AML") and Know-Your-Customer (“KYC") regulations, and financial reporting obligations. For example, we may be required to record and verify a Business User’s identity to comply with regulations designed to prevent money laundering, fraud, and financial crimes. These legal obligations may require us to report our compliance to third parties and subject ourselves to third party verification audits.
c. Legitimate Interests
. Where permitted under applicable law, we rely on our legitimate business interests to process your Personal Data. The following list provides an example of the business purposes for which we have a legitimate interest in processing your data:
Detection, monitoring, and prevention of fraud and unauthorized payment transactions;
Mitigation of financial loss, claims, liabilities or other harm to End Customers, End Users, Business Users, Financial Partners, and Stripe;
Determination of eligibility for and offering new Stripe Services (
Learn More
);
Response to inquiries, delivery of Service notices, and provision of customer support;
Promotion, analysis, modification, and improvement of our Services, systems, and tools, as well as the development of new products and services, including enhancing the reliability of the Services;
Management, operation, and improvement of the performance of our Sites and Services, through understanding their effectiveness and optimizing our digital assets;
Analysis and advertisement of our Services, and related improvements;
Aggregate analysis and development of business intelligence that enable us to operate, protect, make informed decisions about, and report on the performance of our business;
Sharing of Personal Data with third party service providers that offer services on our behalf and business partners that help us in operating and improving our business (
Learn More)
;
Enabling network and information security throughout Stripe and our Services; and
Sharing of Personal Data among our affiliates.
d. Consent
. We may rely on consent or explicit consent to collect and process Personal Data regarding our interactions with you and the provision of our Services such as Link, Financial Connections, Atlas, and Identity. When we process your Personal Data based on your consent, you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time, and such a withdrawal will not impact the legality of processing performed based on the consent prior to its withdrawal.
e. Substantial Public Interest
. We may process special categories of Personal Data, as defined by the GDPR, when such processing is necessary for reasons of substantial public interest and consistent with applicable law, such as when we conduct politically-exposed person checks. We may also process Personal Data related to criminal convictions and offenses when such processing is authorized by applicable law, such as when we conduct sanctions screening to comply with AML and KYC obligations.
f. Other valid legal bases
. We may process Personal Data further to other valid legal bases as recognized under applicable law in specific jurisdictions. See the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section below for more information.
4. Your rights and choices
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have choices regarding our collection, use, and disclosure of your Personal Data:
a. Opting out of receiving electronic communications from us
If you wish to stop receiving marketing-related emails from us, you can opt-out by clicking the unsubscribe link included in such emails or as described
here
. We'll try to process your request(s) as quickly as reasonably practicable. However, it's important to note that even if you opt out of receiving marketing-related emails from us, we retain the right to communicate with you about the Services you receive (like support and important legal notices) and our Business Users might still send you messages or instruct us to send you messages on their behalf.
b. Your data protection rights
Depending on your location and subject to applicable law, you may have the following rights regarding the Personal Data we process about you as a data controller:
The right to request confirmation of whether Stripe is processing Personal Data associated with you, the categories of personal data it has processed, and the third parties or categories of third parties with which your Personal Data is shared;
The right to request access to the Personal Data Stripe processes about you (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe rectify or update your Personal Data if it's inaccurate, incomplete, or outdated;
The right to request that Stripe erase your Personal Data in certain circumstances as provided by law (
Learn More
);
The right to request that Stripe restrict the use of your Personal Data in certain circumstances, such as while Stripe is considering another request you've submitted (for instance, a request that Stripe update your Personal Data);
The right to request that we export the Personal Data we hold about you to another company, provided it's technically feasible;
The right to withdraw your consent if your Personal Data is being processed based on your previous consent;
The right to object to the processing of your Personal Data if we are processing your data based on our legitimate interests; unless there are compelling legitimate grounds or the processing is necessary for legal reasons, we will cease processing your Personal Data upon receiving your objection (
Learn More
);
The right not to be discriminated against for exercising these rights; and
The right to appeal any decision by Stripe relating to your rights by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
, and/or relevant regulatory agencies.
You may have additional rights, depending on applicable law, over your Personal Data. For example, see the Jurisdiction-specific provisions section under United States below.
c. Process for exercising your data protection rights
To exercise your data protection rights related to Personal Data we process as a data controller, visit our
Privacy Center
or contact us as outlined below.  For Personal Data we process as a data processor, please reach out to the relevant data controller (Business User) to exercise your rights. If you contact us regarding your Personal Data we process as a data processor, we will refer you to the relevant data controller to the extent we are able to identify them.
5. Security and Retention
We make reasonable efforts to provide a level of security appropriate to the risk associated with the processing of your Personal Data. We maintain organizational, technical, and administrative measures designed to protect the Personal Data covered by this Policy from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse.
Learn More
. Unfortunately, no data transmission or storage system can be guaranteed to be 100% secure.
We encourage you to assist us in protecting your Personal Data. If you hold a Stripe account, you can do so by using a strong password, safeguarding your password against unauthorized use, and avoiding using identical login credentials you use for other services or accounts for your Stripe account. If you suspect that your interaction with us is no longer secure (for instance, you believe that your Stripe account's security has been compromised), please
contact us
immediately.
We retain your Personal Data for as long as we continue to provide the Services to you or our Business Users, or for a period in which we reasonably foresee continuing to provide the Services. Even after we stop providing Services directly to you or to a Business User that you're doing business with, and even after you close your Stripe account or complete a transaction with a Business User, we may continue to retain your Personal Data to:
Comply with our legal and regulatory obligations;
Enable fraud monitoring, detection, and prevention activities; and
Comply with our tax, accounting, and financial reporting obligations, including when such retention is required by our contractual agreements with our Financial Partners (and where data retention is mandated by the payment methods you've used).
In cases where we keep your Personal Data, we do so in accordance with any limitation periods and record retention obligations imposed by applicable law.
Learn More
.
6. International Data Transfers
As a global business, it's sometimes necessary for us to transfer your Personal Data to countries other than your own, including the United States. These countries might have data protection regulations that are different from those in your country. When transferring data across borders, we take measures to comply with applicable data protection laws related to such transfer. In certain situations, we may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests from officials, such as law enforcement or security authorities.
Learn More
.
If you are located in the European Economic Area (“EEA”), the United Kingdom ("UK"), or Switzerland, please refer to our
Privacy Center
for additional details. When a data transfer mechanism is mandated by applicable law, we employ one or more of the following:
Transfers to certain countries or recipients that are recognized as having an adequate level of protection for Personal Data under applicable law.
EU Standard Contractual Clauses approved by the European Commission and the UK International Data Transfer Addendum issued by the Information Commissioner’s Office. You can obtain a copy of the relevant Standard Contractual Clauses.
Learn More
.
Other lawful methods available to us under applicable law.
Stripe, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and as applicable.
Learn More
.
Stripe’s privacy practices, as described in this Privacy Policy, comply with the Cross Border Privacy Rules System (“CBPR”) and Privacy Rules for Processor (“PRP”) systems. These systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating economies. Where CBPR and/or PRP are recognized as a valid transfer mechanism under applicable law, Stripe will transfer Personal Data in accordance with the CBPR and PRP certifications Stripe has obtained. More information about the framework can be found
here
and
here
. If you have unresolved privacy or data use concerns that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S. based third-party dispute resolution provider (free of charge) at
https://feedback-form.truste.com/watchdog/request
. To view the status of our certifications, please click
here
(CBPR) and
here
(PRP).
7. Updates and notifications
We may change this Policy from time to time to reflect new services, changes in our privacy practices or relevant laws. The “Last updated” legend at the top of this Policy indicates when this Policy was last materially revised. Any changes are effective the latter of when we post the revised Policy on the Services or otherwise provide notice of the update as required by law.
We may provide you with disclosures and alerts regarding the Policy or Personal Data collected by posting them on our website and, if you are an End User or Representative, by contacting you through your Stripe Dashboard, email address and/or the physical address listed in your Stripe account.
8. Jurisdiction-specific provisions
Australia
. “Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under applicable privacy laws in Australia, including the Privacy Act 1988 (Cth) as amended from time to time.
If we use personal information to make automated decisions that could reasonably be expected to significantly affect your rights or interests, we will provide the legally required information and transparency via our
Privacy Center
, and/or on a case by case basis.
If you are an Australian resident and dissatisfied with our handling of any complaint you raise under this Policy, you may consider contacting the Office of the Australian Information Commissioner.
Brazil
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO Adi Gilad at dpo@stripe.com. Brazilian residents, for whom the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados Pessoais (“LGPD”) applies, have rights set forth in Article 18 of the LGPD.
Canada
. As used in this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Federal Personal Information Protection and Electronic Documents Act (“PIPEDA”), the Personal Information Protection Act, SBC 2003 c 63, in British Columbia, the Personal Information Protection Act, SA 2003 c P-6.5, in Alberta, and the Act Respecting the Protection of Personal Information in the Private Sector, CQLR c P-39-1 (“Quebec Private Sector Act”), in Quebec.
Learn more.
“Personal Data” includes “personal information” as defined under those laws.
Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer is the person in charge of personal information, including under the Quebec Private Sector Act.  You may contact them via email at privacy@stripe.com.  When Stripe collects Personal Data belonging to Canadian (including Quebec) residents, it transfers that data to data centers in the United States.  When Stripe relies on service providers to process Personal Data as described herein, those service providers may also be located outside of Canada or Quebec.
You have the right to request access or rectification of the Personal Data Stripe holds related to you or to withdraw any consent given to the processing of such personal data.  You may exercise those rights by contacting Stripe’s Chief Privacy Officer at privacy@stripe.com.  If you are an End Customer, you should contact the Business User with which you transacted to exercise your rights.
EEA and UK
. You may exercise your rights by contacting our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If you are a resident of the EEA or the Stripe entity accountable for your Personal data is otherwise subject to the GDPR, and you believe our processing of your information contradicts the GDPR, you may direct your questions or complaints to the Irish Data Protection Commission. If you are a resident of the UK, direct your questions or concerns to the UK Information Commissioner’s Office. You also have additional rights under the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Learn More
.
India
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Digital Personal Data Protection Act (“DPDPA”) once the DPDPA enters into effect. Further, the term “data controller” includes “data fiduciaries,” and the term “data subject” includes “data principal,” both as defined in the DPDPA.
In some cases, and as permitted under the DPDPA, we may rely on “legitimate use” as a legal basis. For example, we might do so when you voluntarily provide your Personal Data to us. Where we are required to obtain your explicit and informed consent, we will do so on a case by case basis. “Consent Managers” as defined under the DPDPA may submit a request to revoke or provide consent using the methods described in the Contact Us section below, or as set out in the following paragraph, or via other means made available by Stripe in the future. We may ask for proof of authorization and identity before processing such a request.
You have the right to contact Stripe to nominate another individual, who may, in the event of your death or incapacity, exercise your rights under this Privacy Policy and under the DPDPA and implementing regulations.
In certain cases, you may be asked to consent to the collection and processing of your Aadhaar number by Stripe India Private Limited and/or its third party verification partner(s). The purpose of this collection is to facilitate the identification verification process as required under applicable laws. Your provision of Aadhaar details is purely voluntary, and you may provide other identification documents as may be accepted by us from time to time. You will not be denied service merely for not submitting Aadhaar details.
If you have any questions or complaints regarding the processing of your Personal Data in India, or if you want to receive this Policy or communicate with us about privacy in one of India’s official languages, please
contact our Nodal and Grievance Officer
.
Learn More
. Alternatively, you may contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. If we are unable to address your complaint or grievance, you have the right to escalate the matter to the Data Protection Board of India.
Indonesia
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes Law No. 11 of 2008 as amended by Law No. 19 of 2016 on Electronic Information and Transactions, Government Regulation No. 71 of 2019 on the Implementation of Electronic Systems and Transactions, and Minister of Communication and Informatics Regulation No. 20 of 2016 on Personal Data Protection in Electronic Systems, and from September 2024, Law No. 27 of 2022 concerning Personal Data Protection (“PDP Law”). If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Japan
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Act on the Protection of Personal Information (“APPI”). When we transfer Personal Data of data subjects in Japan to jurisdictions not recognized as ‘adequate’ by the Personal Information Protection Commission, we enter into written agreements with any third parties located outside of Japan. These written agreements provide rights and obligations equivalent to those provided under the Japanese Act on the Protection of Personal Information. For more information on how we ensure that third parties protect your data and where your data is located, please see above or contact us as described below. For a description of foreign systems and frameworks that may affect the implementation of equivalent measures by the third party, see
here
. In some cases, and as permitted under the APPI, we may rely on “public interest” as a legal basis, such as fraud detection and loss prevention.
Malaysia
. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Singapore
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2012 (“PDPA”) (No. 26 of 2012) as amended from time to time. In some cases, and as permitted under the PDPA, we may rely on “deemed consent” as a legal basis. For example, we do so when you voluntarily provide your personal data to us. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com.
Switzerland
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (“FADP”), as revised. To exercise your rights under the FADP, please contact our DPO at dpo@stripe.com. You may also have additional rights under the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework.
Learn More
.
Thailand
. In this Policy, “applicable law” includes the Personal Data Protection Act 2019 (“PDPA”). If we rely on certain legal bases (such as “legal obligation” or “contractual necessity” and you do not provide us with your Personal Data, we may not be able to lawfully provide you services. If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please contact our DPO at
dpo@stripe.com
. Where required, we have put in place appropriate safeguards for the cross-border transfer of Personal Data from Thailand, including the EU Standard Contractual Clauses as adapted for Thailand data transfers in accordance with the Notification of the Personal Data Protection Committee on Criteria for the Protection of Personal Data Sent or Transferred to a Foreign Country Pursuant to Section 29 of the Personal Data Protection Act, B.E. 2562 B.E. 2566 (2023).
United States
. If you are a consumer located in the United States (“US”), we process your personal information in accordance with US federal and state privacy laws. For additional  details, please review the information below and see our additional U.S. Privacy Disclosures
here
. Stripe uses cookies, including advertising cookies, as described in our
Cookie Policy
.
Your Rights and Choices
. As a US consumer and subject to certain limitations under US privacy laws, you may have choices regarding our use and disclosure of your Personal Data.  In addition to the
above rights
, you may also have the rights listed in this section. Please see our Privacy Center to
learn more
about data subject rights metrics and
learn more
about the laws under which these rights may apply.
Exercising the right to know: You have a right to request additional information about the categories of personal information collected, sold, disclosed, or shared; purposes for which this personal information was collected, sold, or shared; categories of sources of personal information; and categories of third parties with whom we disclosed or shared this personal information.
Exercising the right to opt-out from a sale or sharing: We do not transfer your personal data to third parties in exchange for payment. However, as noted above, we may provide the data to third party partners, such as advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our products and Services to you. Because these third parties may use the data Stripe provides for their own purposes, Stripe's provision of data to these parties may be considered a data “sale” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising) as those terms are defined under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. You can opt out of targeted advertising and any related data “sales” or “sharing” (for behavioral advertising)
here
.
Exercising the right to limit the use or sharing of Sensitive Personal Information: We do not sell or share (for behavioral advertising) Sensitive Personal Information as defined by US privacy laws and have not done so in the past 12 months. Learn more about our collection and use of Sensitive Personal Information over the last 12 months
here
.
Profiling with legal or similarly significant effects
: In the event that we engage in profiling or automated decision making for which applicable law entitles you to an opt out we will provide you with notice of how to exercise that opt-out right.
Appeal
: If you wish to appeal any of our decisions regarding a rights request under US privacy laws, you may do so by contacting Stripe’s Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) at
dpo@stripe.com
.
To submit a request to exercise any of the rights described above, please contact us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. Please note that rights under some U.S. state laws do not apply to Personal Data we collect, process, and disclose when you act as a consumer to obtain financial products or services from Stripe for personal, family, or household purposes. The federal Gramm-Leach Bliley Act may govern how Stripe shares and protects that data instead. See our
US Consumer Privacy Notice
below for more information.
We will verify your request by asking you to send it from the email address associated with your account or requiring you to provide information necessary to verify your identity, including name, address, transaction history, photo identification, and other information associated with your account.
You may designate, in writing or through a power of attorney, an authorized agent to make requests on your behalf to exercise your rights under the CCPA and other applicable US privacy laws. Your agent may submit a request on your behalf by contacting us using the methods described in the Contact Us section below. We may still require you to directly verify your identity and confirm that you gave the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
Global Privacy Control signals
. Stripe honors the Global Privacy Control (GPC) opt-out preference signals.
Learn More
.
9. Contact us
If you have any questions or complaints about this Policy, please
contact us
. If you are an End Customer (i.e., an individual doing business or transacting with a Business User), please refer to the privacy policy or notice of the Business User for information regarding the Business User’s privacy practices, choices and controls, or contact the Business User directly.
10. US Consumer Privacy Notice
The following Consumer Privacy Notice applies to you if you are an individual who resides in the United States and obtains financial services from Stripe primarily for your own personal, family, or household purposes.
Last updated: January 16, 2025
FACTS
WHAT DOES STRIPE DO WITH YOUR PERSONAL INFORMATION?
Why?
Financial companies choose how they share your personal information.  Federal law gives consumers the right to limit some but not all sharing.  Federal law also requires us to tell you how we collect, share, and protect your personal information.  Please read this notice carefully to understand what we do.
What?
The types of personal information we collect and share depend on the product or service you have with us. This information can include:
• Social Security Number
• Contact details
• Account balances and transaction history
• Payment, transaction, and purchase information and history
When you are
no longer
our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
How?
All financial companies need to share customers' personal information to run their everyday business. In the section below, we list the reasons financial companies can share their customers' personal information; the reasons Stripe chooses to share; and whether you can limit this sharing.
Reasons we can share your personal information
Does Stripe Share?
Can you limit this sharing
For our everyday business purposes – such as to process your transactions, maintain your account(s), respond to court orders and legal investigations, or report to credit bureaus
Yes
No
For our marketing purposes - to offer our products and Services to you
Yes
No
For joint marketing with other financial companies
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your transactions and experiences
Yes
No
For our affiliates' everyday business purposes - information about your creditworthiness
No
We don’t share
For our affiliates to market to you
No
We don’t share
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data not collected through Financial Connections)
Yes
Yes
For nonaffiliates to market to you  (for data collected through Financial Connections)
No
We don’t share
To limit our sharing
Login to your Link account at
app.link.com/settings
and toggle off data sharing from the Messaging menu.
Please note: If you are a new customer, we can begin sharing your information 30 days from the date we sent this notice. When you are no longer our customer, we continue to share your information as described in this notice.
However, you can contact us at any time to limit our sharing.
Questions?
Contact us at privacy@stripe.com or visit us at https://support.link.com
Who we are
Who is providing this notice?
Stripe, Inc., Stripe Payments Company, and their affiliates that provide consumers services in the U.S.
What we do
How does Stripe protect my personal information?
To protect your personal information from unauthorized access, destruction, loss, alteration, or misuse we use security measures to comply with federal law.  These measures include computer safeguards and secured files and buildings.  We impose access controls along with ongoing monitoring to prevent data misuse, and we require our service providers to take similar steps to protect your information.
How does Stripe collect my personal information?
We collect your personal information, for example, when you
• open a Link account;
• ask Stripe to process a payment for goods or services;
• provide bank account information to Stripe using Financial Connections
We also collect your personal information from others, such as affiliates or other companies.
Why can’t I limit all sharing?
Federal law gives you the right to limit only
• sharing for affiliates’ everyday business purposes — information about your creditworthiness
• affiliates from using your information to market to you
• sharing for nonaffiliates to market to you.
State laws and individual companies may give you additional rights to limit sharing. See the Other Important Information section below for more information on your rights under state law.
What happens when I limit sharing for an account I hold jointly with someone else?
Your choices will apply to everyone on your account.
Definitions
Affiliates
Companies related by common ownership or control. They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Our affiliates include companies operating under the Stripe name, such as Stripe Technology Europe, Ltd. and Stripe Payments UK, Ltd.
Nonaffiliates
Companies not related by common ownership or control.  They can be financial and nonfinancial companies.
• Nonaffiliates with which we share personal information include service providers that perform services or functions on our behalf, Business Users with which you choose to transact, partners with which we share data to provide you with services, and advertising partners, analytics providers, and social networks, who assist us in advertising our Services to you.
Joint Marketing
A formal agreement between non-affiliated financial companies that together market financial products or services to you.
• Our joint marketing partners include financial companies we partner with to provide you with financial services.
Other important information
Vermont: If your account with us is associated with a Vermont billing address, we will not disclose information about your creditworthiness to our affiliates and will not disclose your personal information, financial information, credit report, or health information to nonaffiliated third parties to market to you, other than as permitted by Vermont law, unless you authorize us to make those disclosures.  For joint marketing, we will only disclose your name, contact information, and information about your transactions.  Additional information concerning our privacy policies can be found in our
Privacy Policy
and
Privacy Center
.
California: If your account with us is associated with a California billing address, we will not disclose Personal Data we collect about you except to the extent permitted under California law.  For instance, we may disclose your Personal Data as necessary to process transactions or provide products and services you request, at your instruction, as required for institution risk control, and to safeguard against fraud, identity theft, and unauthorized transactions.
For additional information about our privacy practices, please visit the
Stripe Privacy Center
.
Sub-policy 2
https://www.chargebee.com/privacy/:
Join us at Beelieve ’25 on April 8-9 in San Francisco!
Discover stories of monetization, growth, and reinvention in the age of AI.
Learn more
English
English
Deutsch
Dutch
Français
Chargebee Privacy Notice
Effective Date: 18 Jul 2024
For prior version, please
click here
CHARGEBEE INC.
(“Chargebee”, "We", "Us" or "Our") is committed to protecting your privacy. This Privacy Notice describes how Chargebee collects, uses, shares and otherwise processes the personal information of individuals covered by this Privacy Notice, including choices and rights available to such individuals with respect to their personal information.
This Privacy Notice applies to all customers and end customers of Our products and services, visitors of www.chargebee.com, www.brightback.com www.rev-lock.com and www.numberz.co (“Website”) and individuals who engage with us or We engage with, whereby We control or determine the means and purposes of processing their personal information (“You” or “Your”). Such engagement includes but is not limited to availing Our products and services, engaging with Us for recruitment purposes, attending events that We host and any other engagement with Us relating to sales, marketing and research purposes, including when we engage with our partner and service providers. It applies to personal information that We may either collect directly from You or from third parties, in certain cases.
We encourage You to read this Privacy Notice in conjunction with any other information that We may provide to You at the time of collection or processing of Your personal information, including in the form of notices specific to such engagement.
Our Website is not intended for use by individuals under the age of 16 years or who are otherwise considered as minors under the law they are subject to, and consequently, such individuals are prohibited from using Our Website or engaging with Us. We do not knowingly collect any personal information from such individuals and You are also prohibited from sharing personal information pertaining to such individuals to Us. If you are a parent or legal guardian and believe Your child has given Us information and You did not provide consent, please contact Us at the email and address provided below under “Contact Us.
What personal information do We collect about You?
Depending on who You are and how We are engaging with You, We may collect information including:
Personal identifiers such as name, email address, contact number, mailing address, identification number, signature;
General information such as location data, title, position, industry, area of work;.
Online identifiers such asIP address, device identifier, browser identifier, internet service provider, operating system, date/time stamp, clickstream data, geolocation data, cookies, beacons, pixel tags, log files and mobile ad identifiers or similar technology, unique pseudonyms and other persistent and probabilistic identifiers that can be used to identify a particular individual or device;
Internet or other electronic network activity information such as browsing history, search history, and information regarding Your interaction with an internet website or use of a website, application or advertisement, information from analytics services (such as Google and Visual Website Optimiser);
Engagement specific information such as
Educational qualifications, work experience, skills, employment history, remuneration, CV/resume, insurance information, health information, credit references, background verification details and results, criminal history for recruitment purposes,
communication and general preferences, interview and survey responses, opinions and feedback for research purposes, and
payment related information such as billing address, shipping address, cardholder details, card number, bank account number and other financial information;
Sensitive personal information or special category of personal information such as Your social security number, state identification card, passport number, geolocation data, government identification, biometric information for identification, criminal history data, health information, or any other such category of personal information that are considered as sensitive personal information or special category of personal information under relevant privacy laws. For sensitive personal information, We obtain affirmative express consent from You if such information is to be disclosed to a third party or used for a purpose other than those for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by You through the exercise of opt-in choice. We treat as sensitive any personal information received from a third party where the third party identifies and treats it as sensitive; and.
Other personal information which You may provide Us or We may collect about You from You or third parties as part of the engagement with You or in order to engage with You.
How do We collect Your personal information?
We may collect Your personal information in various ways, which could either be directly from You or from third parties.
We may collect personal information directly from You at the time of registration for Our products and services, events that We sponsor or host, through forms You submit on Our website, blogs and other forums We host or manage, when You enter information on our Website or through cookies and other internet identifiers.
We may collect personal information about You from publicly available sources or third parties such as from our business partners, event organizers, platforms and other service providers, including from single sign-on services, database services and social media websites. In such cases, We rely on the third party’s commitment that You have authorized the disclosure of such personal information to Us.
On what basis do We collect Your personal information?
In most cases, We collect Your personal information on the basis of Your desire to avail a particular service from Us or engage with Us, including to complete a transaction using our platform. Therefore, our processing in many cases occurs on the basis of Your consent or the need to perform a contract or commitment that We may have with You. However, in addition to this, there are other bases on which We may collect or process Your personal information. These are as follows:
For compliance with legal obligations, including for business accounting and tax purposes such as in relation to record-keeping, compliance, disputes, and filings;
Legitimate interest, where We have assessed that it is beneficial to You and is in Our legitimate business interest.
Any other legal basis relevant to the specific personal information as permitted under applicable law.
What do We use Your personal information for?
We may use Your personal information for the following purposes:
To provide, improve and develop our products, services and Website:
This includes delivering our products and services to You, administering Your account, operating our Products and ensuring its availability, integrity and security, performance monitoring, debugging, administering our Website, processing payments from You, maintaining KYC details, preventing misuse of our products, services and websites or violation of terms, responding to Your service requests and queries, providing analytics or reports to You with respect to Your use of Our products and services, tracking renewals and Your subscription details, assessing Your business needs and proposing or demonstrating Our other suitable products, understanding Your usage patterns and behaviour within Our products and Websites, compiling statistical reports and insights on Your usage patterns and behaviour, develop new products and services, improve user experience and interface and for such other internal purposes to improve, enhance, support, develop and operate Our products, services, Websites and business.
To process registrations and complete transactions:
This includes processing Your personal information with respect to Our events, webinars, contests, blogs, community forums, and other programs that You register or sign-up for, such as to process any payments from You in relation to such registration or sign-up, reaching out to You with details of such registration or sign-up and enabling Your use of such registrations and sign-ups. It also includes completing any specific transactions for You have submitted any forms or information to Us, such as, to list You or Your product on Our marketplace, allowing You to download certain collaterals from our Website.
To comply with business and legal obligations:
This includes business accounting, tax, auditing, compliance, recordkeeping, legal functions, to consider and implement mergers, acquisitions, reorganizations, bankruptcies, and other business transactions such as financings, preventing violation of laws and limiting Our damages, responding to and compliance with legal requests from administrative, judicial and other authorities and regulators, including Our obligation to screen prospective customers, customers, end customers and individuals for compliance with sanctions regulations, pursuing legal remedies, to respond to or disclose as part of judicial proceedings, arbitration and mediation.
To ensure security and for protection of rights:
To protect our products, services and business operations; to ensure safety and protect the rights and property of Chargebee or those of our stakeholders; to prevent and detect fraud, unauthorized activities and access, and other misuse; where We believe necessary to investigate, prevent or take action regarding illegal activities, suspected fraud, situations involving potential threats to the safety or legal rights of any person or third party, or violations of our Terms of Service.
For sales and marketing activities:
This includes marketing communications, campaigns and drives to reach out to customers and potential customers, contextualizing and personalizing marketing content, sending product and organization updates and newsletters, sending rewards, incentives, gifts and vouchers, send information and updates to You pertaining to Your usage, publishing Your testimonials, comments or reviews from and on our Website, blogs and community forums, publishing case studies, blog posts and other marketing content, hosting webinars, events and other programs, taking and publishing photographs, videos and information about the events, showing personalized and behavioural advertisements and analyzing Your usage and behaviour patterns.
For business and research purposes:
This includes reaching out for and conducting surveys, setting up interviews, soliciting feedback, analysing usage and behaviour patterns, learning preferences and sending incentives.
For recruitment activities:
This includes evaluation for job openings, retaining information for future job opportunities and reaching out with respect to any job opportunities.
For other company initiatives:
This includes processing information in relation to CSR and community building initiatives, responsible disclosure policy or bug bounty program, and other specific initiatives and programs that We host or organize.
For cookies that We process, You may refer to our cookie policy for more details, which can be accessed in the section “How We use cookies” when You click the shield widget  available on the bottom left corner of our Website.
How do We protect Your information?
We implement a variety of security measures designed to help maintain the security of Your personal information when We process the same.
How long do We keep Your personal information?
We retain Your personal information for a period of time consistent with the purpose of collection and processing, as required to fulfill our legal obligations as well as for enforcing Our agreements. We determine the appropriate retention period for personal information on the basis of the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal information being processed, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of the personal information, whether We can achieve the purposes of the processing through other means, and any applicable legal requirements. For example, We will retain certain identifiers for as long as it is necessary to continue maintaining Your account and providing You our products and services, to comply with Our tax, accounting, and record-keeping obligations, to administer certain warranties, and for research, development, and safety purposes, as well as an additional period as necessary to protect, defend, or establish Our rights, defend against potential claims, and to comply with Our legal obligations.
Typically after expiry of the applicable retention periods, Your personal information will be deleted, unless such deletion is rendered impractical or unreasonably burdensome due technical or other reasons, including where it becomes technically impossible, data retained as part of automatic archiving and back-up procedures, In such cases where any information is retained, We will implement appropriate measures designed to prevent misuse of such information. In certain circumstances, We may anonymize Your personal information so that it can no longer be associated with You, in which case We may use such information without further notice to You.
Do We share Your information with third parties?
Yes, We may share Your information with third parties listed below for the purposes set forth in this Privacy Notice, subject to a lawful basis and in compliance with applicable laws  (including, as applicable, after providing You additional notice, or obtaining Your consent).
Our affiliates and companies We acquire in future:
They assist in provision of Our products and services as well as with other business needs and purposes.
Vendors and service providers:
They provide services to help us with our business activities such as research, analyzing Your usage patterns and behaviour and compiling insights, showing personalized advertisements, marketing, data enrichment, administration of events, compliance with laws, including screening prospective customers, customers, end customers and individuals in order to comply with sanctions regulations, preventing violation of laws, performance monitoring, product implementation and integrations, recruitment, and other business purposes.
Partners:
They assist in marketing outreach and other activities, sponsor events, product integration and other strategic initiatives. We may disclose Your personal information to Partners for their marketing outreach where You have consented to such disclosure, for identifying common customers to assess Your business needs and propose suitable products and for other joint-initiatives.
Auditors, accountants, lawyers and other professional advisers:
They assist us in compliance with accounting and other business requirements, advise on various legal aspects, prevent violation of law and ensure compliance with law.
Investors, insurance companies and financial institutions:
We may disclose Your information to potential investors if We are involved in any merger, acquisitions, asset purchase or corporate restructuring, to current investors as part of reporting, and to financial institutions in case We seek any financial assistance or as part of any KYC requirements.
Regulators, law enforcement authorities and courts:
We may disclose Your information to regulators and law enforcement authorities in case of any request from them for information or where necessary to protect You, third parties or Our rights, and to court or as part of judicial proceedings, arbitration or other dispute resolution mechanism, including to enforce our agreements and claim remedies available to us.
Do We transfer any information across borders?
We may process Your personal information in the countries where We are located, including the United States, European Union, India, Australia or any other country where our vendors, service providers, partners and other third parties listed above are located, which may or may not be subject to an adequacy decision for the purposes of General Data Protection Regulation (EU Regulation 2016/679). However, when We transfer Your personal information across borders of countries, We will ensure that it is subject to lawful basis and is transferred in compliance with applicable laws, such as execution of Standard Contractual Clauses for transfers from EEA, International Data Transfer Addendum for transfers from UK. We will take reasonable measures to ensure that Your personal information is subject to appropriate safeguards.
Certification under EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Data Privacy Framework
Chargebee complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Chargebee has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to (a) the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles), with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF; and  (b) Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view Our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
When Chargebee transfers personal data as a data controller to a third party acting as an agent on Our behalf, We shall remain liable under the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, as applicable, if any third party that We share Your information with processes Your information in a manner inconsistent with the EU-U.S. DPF Principles, UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF EU-U.S. DPF Principles, unless We prove that We are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Chargebee commits to
(a) Resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of Your personal data. EU, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Us at
privacy@chargebee.com
. The contact details of Our EU representative is provided under the ‘Contact Us’ section below.
(b) Cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (DPAs) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO) (and the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (GRA)) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Chargebee’s compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In certain circumstances, We may be required to disclose personal data in response to the lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
An EU, UK or Swiss individual has the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms (additional information can be found in
Annex I to the DPF
).
What Rights do You have?
Depending on the data protection law that applies to You, You may have certain rights relating to Your personal information, such as:
Right to access Your personal information held by Us;
Right to rectify inaccurate or complete any incomplete personal information;
Right to erase or delete Your personal information;
Right to object or restrict Our processing of Your personal information in specific circumstances, including to opt-out of marketing communications, opt-out of disclosure of Your personal information to third parties to the extent such third party is not acting as an agent to perform tasks on behalf of and under Our instructions, and where applicable, opt-out of use of Your personal information for a purpose that is materially different from the purpose(s) for which it was originally collected or subsequently authorized by You;
Right to receive personal information provided concerning You that You have provided to Us or transfer such information to another entity in a structured, commonly accepted, and machine-readable format; and
Right not to be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, which produces legal effects or similarly significantly affects You.
California and Virginia specific rights are provided below.
How can You exercise Your rights?
In order to exercise Your rights, You may contact us on the email address set forth in the ‘Contact Us’ section below with details of the right You intend to exercise, the details or nature of personal information with respect to which You intend to exercise the right, where known, Your location and where known, the law under which You are exercising this right. Alternatively, You may submit a request
here
. In certain cases, We might require additional information from You in order to address Your request or to verify Your identity. We will look into Your requests and respond within the timelines prescribed under applicable law. Occasionally, taking into account the nature of the request We receive, We might, to the extent permitted under applicable law and subject to conditions therein, either seek for additional time or reject Your request. In such cases, We endeavor to keep You informed.
In cases where You object to or opt-out of certain types of processing, We will retain Your personal information to the extent required to ensure We do not reach out to You or process Your information for such purposes, such as adding it to an opt-out or do-not-disturb list.
Where We have made available specific ways to opt-out of certain communications and processing, We encourage You to exercise Your rights using such specified ways, such as,
For cookies, You can opt-out by selecting Your preferences in the  shield widget available on the bottom left corner of our Website. While You can control the use of cookies at the individual browser level, choosing to disable certain cookies may limit Your use of certain features or functions on our Website, product or services.
For marketing communications that You receive from Us or on our behalf, We encourage You to exercise Your opt-out using the ‘unsubscribe’ or by unsubscribing
here
or similar option provided in such marketing communication. Please note that opting out of marketing communications does not opt You out of receiving communications related to any existing relationship with Us, such as communications about products and services You have subscribed to, such as maintenance, downtimes, security information and about events and programs You have registered or opted in for.
For exercising Your rights as a user of Our products and services, You may exercise Your rights using the various functionalities available to You in Your use of the products and services, including by updating Your settings, preferences and profile information within Your account.
What information do We not control?
Third Party links
: In certain cases, We may include links to third party websites and products. These third party websites and products have separate and independent terms and privacy policies. Since We neither own or control such websites and products, We are not responsible or liable  for the content and activities of these websites or products. Nonetheless, We seek to protect the integrity of Our Website and welcome any feedback about these links.
Blogs:
Our website offers publicly accessible blogs. The comments on our blog may be managed by a third party application that may require You to register to post a comment. We do not have access or control of the information posted to the blog comments. You will need to contact or login into the third party application if You want Your personal information that was posted to the comments section removed. To learn how the third party application uses Your information, please review their privacy policy.
Changes to our Privacy Notice
We may update this Privacy Notice to reflect changes to Our privacy practices. If We make any material changes adversely affecting Your rights, We will notify You by means of a notice or banner on this website prior to the change becoming effective, or where You are a customer of Chargebee, by sending communication to the email address to an administrator of Your account, or an email address associated with Your account, or through an in-app banner or notification. We encourage You to periodically review this page for the latest information on Our privacy practices.
Contact Us
If there are any questions regarding this Privacy Notice, the privacy practices of this website or Your engagement with Us, You may contact us using the information below:
CHARGEBEE INC.
909 Rose Avenue, Suite 950, North Bethesda, MD 20852
privacy@chargebee.com
Contact details of the EU representative:
CHARGEBEE B.V.
Piet Heinkade 55
1019GM Amsterdam
Netherlands
privacy@chargebee.com
California and Virginia specific rights and provisions
This section provides additional details about the personal information We collect about consumers resident in California and Virginia and sets forth such consumers' rights under the California Consumer Privacy Act as amended by the California Privacy Rights Act (CCPA), and the Virginia residents under the Virginia Consumer Data Protection Act (VCDPA). For avoidance of doubt, this section applies only to California and Virginia residents and their personal information We collect as a Business (as defined in the CCPA and VCDPA). This section does not address or apply to our handling of personal information that is exempt under the CCPA or VCDPA.
1. Collection of Personal Information.
The categories of personal information We have collected in the twelve (12) months prior to the Effective Date and that We may collect include :
Identifiers;
Commercial information;
Internet or other electronic network activity information;
Geolocation data;
Audio, electronic, visual, or similar information;
Professional or employment-related information;
Education information;
Inferences drawn from any of the above; and
Sensitive personal information (social security number, state identification card, passport number, geolocation data, government identification, biometric information for identification, criminal history data, health information).
2. Purposes of Collection
. We collect this personal information for the following business purposes, as more thoroughly described in the "
What do We use Your personal information for?
" section above:.
To provide, improve and develop our products, services and Website
To process registrations and complete transactions
To comply with business and legal obligations
To ensure security and for protection of rights
For sales and marketing activities
For business and research purposes
For recruitment activities
For other company initiatives
3. Disclosure of Personal Information.
We have disclosed the categories of personal information listed in clause 1 above for a business purpose in the twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of this Privacy Notice and may disclose such personal information to service providers, contractors or other third parties who support our business.
4. Sale and Sharing of Personal Information.
While we do not “sell” personal information in the traditional sense (i.e., for money), we may be considered as “selling” and “sharing” personal information through our use of third-party analytics and advertising cookies. In the twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of this Privacy Notice, We have sold/shared (as defined under the CCPA) the following categories of personal information to facilitate our advertising efforts:
Internet or other electronic network activity information, such as your interaction with our website and services (via the use of third-party cookies and similar tools).
Additionally, we do not and will not sell personal information if we have actual knowledge that a consumer is less than 16 years of age. We do not have actual knowledge that we “sell” or “share” information from individuals under 16 years of age. To exercise your right to opt-out of sale/sharing, please see below.
Right to opt out:  You have the right to opt-out of “sales” and “sharing” of your personal information, as those terms are defined under the CCPA. To exercise your right to opt-out of the “selling” or “sharing” of Your personal information, please select Your preferences in the    shield widget available on the bottom left corner of our Website. Please note that submitting an opt-out request will only opt You out of sharing data with third parties that may be considered “sales” under CCPA, but it will not opt-out of sharing data with Our service providers.
We may also disclose some of Your personal information described above for business purposes to the third parties listed in "
Do We share Your information with Third Parties?
" section above.
5. Deidentification of Personal Information
.
Occasionally, we may deidentify personal information and use the deidentified information for our internal purposes. We commit to maintaining and using this information in deidentified form and will not attempt to reidentify the information except to determine whether our deidentification process is effective.
6. Your Rights
Rights of the residents of the State of California :
You have certain rights, subject to certain limitations under applicable law, with respect to Your personal information, including:
a.  With respect to personal information collected about You in the twelve (12) months prior to the effective date of this Privacy Notice but collected after January 1, 2022, right to request for:
The categories of personal information We collected about You;
The categories of sources from which We collected that information;
Our business or commercial purpose for collecting or selling that information;
The categories of third parties with whom We shared that information; and
The specific pieces of personal information We collected about You.
b.  The right to request the correction of inaccurate personal information collected
c.   The right to request deletion of Your personal information held by the Us or by Our service provider, contractor, or any other third party We have disclosed personal information to. We shall hold a confidential record of all deletion requests for the purpose of preventing the selling of such personal information for which You have submitted a deletion request;
d.  The right to "opt out" of any sale or sharing of personal information (as defined in the CCPA), if such sale or sharing occurs.
e.   The right to request the transfer of specific pieces of personal information to any other entity.
f. The right to limit use and disclosure of sensitive personal information in specific instances as set forth in CCPA.
g.   The right not to be discriminated against for exercising Your rights under CCPA.
Your Privacy Rights Under the California Shine the Light
California residents who provide Us certain personal information are entitled to request and obtain from us, free of charge, information about the personal information (if any) We have shared with third parties for their own direct marketing use. Such requests may be made once per calendar year for information about any relevant third-party sharing in the prior calendar year. You can submit a “Shine the Light” request by using the contact information under “Contact Us.” Please include in Your request a current California address and Your attestation that You are a California resident.
Do Not Track
Kindly note, some web browsers and mobile operating systems offer a “Do Not Track” setting that You can activate to signal Your preference not to have information about Your online browsing activities monitored and collected. Currently, Our Website, products and services do not recognize “Do Not Track” signals.
Rights for the residents of the Commonwealth of Virginia:
You have certain rights, subject to certain limitations under applicable law, with respect to Your personal data, including
a.   The right to confirm whether We are processing the personal information collected and the right to access such personal information.
b.  The right to correct inaccuracies in the personal data collected taking into account the nature of the personal information and the purposes of the processing of the personal information
c.   The right to request the deletion of personal information provided by or obtained from You;
d.  The right to request the deletion of personal information collected from sources other than You. We shall comply with such a request by either (i) retaining a record of the deletion request and the minimum information necessary for the purpose of ensuring Your personal information remains deleted from the business’s records and not using such retained information for any other purpose pursuant to this Section or (ii) opting You out of the processing of such personal information for any purpose except those exempted by the Virginia Data Protection Act;
e.   The right to request the transfer of the personal information collected to another controller in a technically feasible and readily usable format;
f.The right to opt-out of the processing of the personal information for purposes of (i) targeted advertising, (ii) the sale of personal information, or (iii) profiling in furtherance of decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects concerning You.
California and Virginia consumers may make a request pursuant to their rights under the CCPA and VCDPA respectively by contacting us at
ccpa@chargebee.com
or
via
mail to our postal address set forth above. We will verify Your request using the information associated with Your account, so please raise the request using the e-mail address associated with Your account. We will let You know if We need additional information to verify Your identity, such as Your Government identification. We shall not disclose further the personal information collected for verification of a consumer’s request or retain it longer than it is necessary for the purpose of verification.
If We are unable to verify Your identity after a good faith attempt, We may deny the request and, if so, We will explain the basis for the denial. Consumers may also designate an authorized agent to exercise these rights on their behalf. Authorized agents must provide us sufficient verification in their first communication with Us of their legal ability to submit a request on the consumer’s behalf. Businesses acting as authorized agents must provide both (1) a certificate of good standing with its state of organization, and (2) a written authorization signed by the California resident. Individuals acting as authorized agents must provide either (1) a notarized power of attorney signed by the California resident, or (2) a written authorization signed by the California resident expressly authorizing the individual to act on their behalf. For security reasons, We reserve the right to reject requests from authorized agents who do not fulfill these requirements to protect the personal information of the individual in question.
7. Where We are a service provider.
We may also act as a service provider (as the term is defined in the CCPA). When We act as a service provider, including by providing our services to another company that You interact with, We follow the instructions of the company that engaged us as a service provider and You should directly contact that company if You have any questions or would like more details on how Your personal information is processed by that company.
PRIVACY POLICY
What personal information do We collect about You?
How do We collect Your personal information?
On what basis do We collect Your personal information?
What do We use Your personal information for?
How do We protect Your information?
How long do We keep Your personal information?
Do We share Your information with third parties?
Do We transfer any information across borders?
What Rights do You have?
How can You exercise Your rights?
What information do We not control?
Changes to our Privacy Notice
Contact Us
California and Virginia specific rights and provisions
+
Subscribe to the best subscription and revenue growth news, trends, and insights delivered straight to your inbox.
Sub-policy 3
https://aws.amazon.com/privacy/:
Select your cookie preferences
We use essential cookies and similar tools that are necessary to provide our site and services. We use performance cookies to collect anonymous statistics, so we can understand how customers use our site and make improvements. Essential cookies cannot be deactivated, but you can choose “Customize” or “Decline” to decline performance cookies.
If you agree, AWS and approved third parties will also use cookies to provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content, including relevant advertising. To accept or decline all non-essential cookies, choose “Accept” or “Decline.” To make more detailed choices, choose “Customize.”
Accept
Decline
Customize
We use cookies and similar tools (collectively, "cookies") for the following purposes.
Essential
Essential cookies are necessary to provide our site and services and cannot be deactivated. They are usually set in response to your actions on the site, such as setting your privacy preferences, signing in, or filling in forms.
Performance
Performance cookies provide anonymous statistics about how customers navigate our site so we can improve site experience and performance. Approved third parties may perform analytics on our behalf, but they cannot use the data for their own purposes.
Allow performance category
Allowed
Functional
Functional cookies help us provide useful site features, remember your preferences, and display relevant content. Approved third parties may set these cookies to provide certain site features. If you do not allow these cookies, then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Allow functional category
Allowed
Advertising
Advertising cookies may be set through our site by us or our advertising partners and help us deliver relevant marketing content. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less relevant advertising.
Allow advertising category
Allowed
Blocking some types of cookies may impact your experience of our sites. You may review and change your choices at any time by selecting Cookie preferences in the footer of this site. We and selected third-parties use cookies or similar technologies as specified in the
AWS Cookie Notice
.
We display ads relevant to your interests on AWS sites and on other properties, including cross-context behavioral advertising. Cross-context behavioral advertising uses data from one site or app to advertise to you on a different company’s site or app.
To not allow AWS cross-context behavioral advertising based on cookies or similar technologies, select “Don't allow” and “Save privacy choices” below, or visit an AWS site with a legally-recognized decline signal enabled, such as the Global Privacy Control. If you delete your cookies or visit this site from a different browser or device, you will need to make your selection again. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
AWS Cookie Notice
.
Cross-context behavioral ads
Allow
Don't allow
To not allow all other AWS cross-context behavioral advertising,
complete this form by email
.
For more information about how AWS handles your information, please read the
AWS Privacy Notice
.
We will only store essential cookies at this time, because we were unable to save your cookie preferences.
If you want to change your cookie preferences, try again later using the link in the AWS console footer, or contact support if the problem persists.
Skip to main content
Privacy Notice
Last Updated: February 21, 2025
To see prior version, click
here
.
This Privacy Notice describes how we collect and use your personal information in relation to AWS websites, applications, products, services, events, and experiences that reference this Privacy Notice (together, “AWS Offerings”).
This Privacy Notice does not apply to the “content” processed, stored, or hosted by our customers using AWS Offerings in connection with an AWS account. See the agreement governing your access to your AWS account and the
AWS Data Privacy FAQ
for more information about how we handle content and how our customers can control their content through AWS Offerings. This Privacy Notice also does not apply to any products, services, websites, or content that are offered by third parties or have their own privacy notice.
Personal Information We Collect
How We Use Personal Information
Cookies
How We Share Personal Information
Location of Personal Information
How We Secure Information
Access and Choice
Children’s Personal Information
Third Party Sites and Services
Retention of Personal Information
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
Examples of Information Collected
Personal Information We Collect
We collect your personal information in the course of providing AWS Offerings to you.
Here are the types of information we gather:
Information You Give Us:
We collect any information you provide in relation to AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information you give us.
Automatic Information:
We automatically collect certain types of information when you interact with AWS Offerings. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect automatically.
Information from Other Sources:
We might collect information about you from other sources, including service providers, partners, and publicly available sources. Click
here
to see examples of information we collect from other sources.
How We Use Personal Information
We use your personal information to operate, provide, and improve AWS Offerings. Our purposes for using personal information include:
Provide AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to provide and deliver AWS Offerings and process transactions related to AWS Offerings, including registrations, subscriptions, purchases, and payments.
Measure, Support, and Improve AWS Offerings:
We use your personal information to measure use of, analyze performance of, fix errors in, provide support for, improve, and develop AWS Offerings.
Recommendations and Personalization:
We use your personal information to recommend AWS Offerings that might be of interest to you, identify your preferences, and personalize your experience with AWS Offerings.
Comply with Legal Obligations:
In certain cases, we have a legal obligation to collect, use, or retain your personal information. For example, we collect bank account information from AWS Marketplace sellers for identity verification.
Communicate with You:
We use your personal information to communicate with you in relation to AWS Offerings via different channels (e.g., by phone, email, chat) and to respond to your requests.
Marketing:
We use your personal information to market and promote AWS Offerings.
Fraud and Abuse Prevention and Credit Risks:
We use your personal information to prevent and detect fraud and abuse in order to protect the security of our customers, AWS, and others. We may also use scoring methods to assess and manage credit risks.
Purposes for Which We Seek Your Consent:
We may also ask for your consent to use your personal information for a specific purpose that we communicate to you.
Cookies
To enable our systems to recognize your browser or device and to provide, market, and improve AWS Offerings, we and approved third parties use cookies and other identifiers. For more information about cookies and how we use them, please read our
Cookie Notice
.
How We Share Personal Information
Information about our customers is an important part of our business and we are not in the business of selling our customers’ personal information to others. We share personal information only as described below and with Amazon.com, Inc. and the affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls that are either subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice.
Transactions Involving Third Parties:
We make available to you services, software, and content provided by third parties for use on or through AWS Offerings. You can tell when a third party is involved in your transactions, and we share information related to those transactions with that third party. For example, you can order services, software, and content from sellers using the AWS Marketplace and we provide those sellers information to facilitate your subscription, purchases, or support.
Third-Party Service Providers:
We employ other companies and individuals to perform functions on our behalf. Examples include: delivering AWS hardware, sending communications, processing payments, assessing credit and compliance risks, analyzing data, providing marketing and sales assistance (including advertising and event management), conducting customer relationship management, and providing training. These third-party service providers have access to personal information needed to perform their functions, but may not use it for other purposes. Further, they must process that information in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection law.
Business Transfers:
As we continue to develop our business, we might sell or buy businesses or services. In such transactions, personal information generally is one of the transferred business assets but remains subject to the promises made in any pre-existing Privacy Notice (unless, of course, the individual consents otherwise). Also, in the unlikely event that AWS or substantially all of its assets are acquired, your information will of course be one of the transferred assets.
Protection of Us and Others:
We release account and other personal information when we believe release is appropriate to comply with the law, enforce or apply our terms and other agreements, or protect the rights, property, or security of AWS, our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for fraud prevention and detection and credit risk reduction.
At Your Option:
Other than as set out above, you will receive notice when personal information about you might be shared with third parties, and you will have an opportunity to choose not to share the information.
Location of Personal Information
Amazon Web Services, Inc. is located in the United States, and our affiliated companies are located throughout the world. Depending on the scope of your interactions with AWS Offerings, your personal information may be stored in or accessed from multiple countries, including the United States. Whenever we transfer personal information to other jurisdictions, we will ensure that the information is transferred in accordance with this Privacy Notice and as permitted by applicable data protection laws.
How We Secure Information
At AWS, security is our highest priority. We design our systems with your security and privacy in mind.
We maintain a wide variety of compliance programs that validate our security controls. Click
here
to learn more about our compliance programs.
We protect the security of your information during transmission to or from AWS websites, applications, products, or services by using encryption protocols and software.
We follow the Payment Card Industry Data Security Standard (PCI DSS) when handling credit card data.
We maintain physical, electronic, and procedural safeguards in connection with the collection, storage, and disclosure of personal information. Our security procedures mean that we may request proof of identity before we disclose personal information to you.
Access and Choice
You can view, update, and delete certain information about your account and your interactions with AWS Offerings. Click
here
for a list of examples of information that you can access. If you cannot access or update your information yourself, you can always contact us for assistance.
You have choices about the collection and use of your personal information. Many AWS Offerings include settings that provide you with options as to how your information is being used. You can choose not to provide certain information, but then you might not be able to take advantage of certain AWS Offerings.
Account Information:
If you want to add, update, or delete information related to your account, please go to the
AWS Management Console
. When you update or delete any information, we usually keep a copy of the prior version for our records.
Communications:
If you do not want to receive promotional messages from us, please unsubscribe or adjust your communication preferences in the
AWS Management Console
or the
AWS Email Preference Center
. If you do not want to receive in-app notifications from us, please adjust your notification settings in the app or your device.
Cookies Preferences:
You can change your cookie preferences on AWS sites at any time by clicking Cookie Preferences in the footer of the AWS site. You can also manage cookies through your browser settings.
The "Help" feature on most browsers and devices will tell you how to remove cookies from your device, how to prevent your browser or device from accepting new cookies, how to have the browser notify you when you receive a new cookie, or how to disable cookies altogether.
Sellers and Amazon Partners:
Sellers and Amazon Partner Network members can add, update, or delete information in the
AWS Marketplace
and
APN Partner Central
, respectively.
Children’s Personal Information
We don’t provide AWS Offerings for purchase by children. If you’re under 18, you may use AWS Offerings only with the involvement of a parent or guardian.
Third Party Sites and Services
AWS Offerings may embed content provided by others or include links to other websites and applications. These companies may collect information about you when you interact with their content or services. We are not responsible for the practices of these companies. Please consult their privacy policies to learn about their data practices.
Retention of Personal Information
We keep your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
If you have any concerns about privacy at AWS, please
contact us
with a thorough description, and we will try to resolve the issue for you.
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services, Inc., our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services, Inc., 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, ATTN: AWS Legal
Contact details for specific jurisdictions including the European Economic Area, the UK and Switzerland, can be found in “Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions” below.
If you interact with AWS Offerings on behalf of or through your organization, then your personal information may also be subject to your organization’s privacy practices, and you should direct privacy inquiries to your organization.
Our business changes constantly, and our Privacy Notice may also change. You should check our website frequently to see recent changes. You can see the date on which the latest version of this Privacy Notice was posted. Unless stated otherwise, our current Privacy Notice applies to all personal information we have about you and your account. We stand behind the promises we make, however, and will never materially change our policies and practices to make them less protective of personal information collected in the past without informing affected customers and giving them a choice.
EU-US Data Privacy Framework, UK Extension, and Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework
Amazon Web Services, Inc. participates in the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension to the EU-US Data Privacy Framework, and the Swiss-US Data Privacy Framework. Click
here
to learn more.
Additional Information for Certain Jurisdictions
We provide additional information about our controllers and data protection officers (as applicable), the privacy, collection, and use of personal information of prospective and current customers of AWS Offerings located in certain jurisdictions.
Brazil
Controller of Personal Information
. When Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda., A. Presidente Juscelino Kubitschek, 2.041, Torre E - 18th and 19th Floors, Vila Nova Conceicao, Sao Paulo, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering. The data protection officer for Amazon AWS Serviços Brasil Ltda. can be contacted at aws-brazil-privacy@amazon.com.
Processing
. We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint with Brazil’s National Data Protection Authority (ANPD) through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Transfers outside of Brazil
. When we transfer your personal information outside Brazil, we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
Canada
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements; and
lodge a complaint with us regarding our practices related to your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or by mail at 120 Bremner Blvd, 26th Floor, Toronto, Ontario, M5J 0A8, Canada, ATTN: AWS Canada Legal. Further, the Amazon Web Services Canada, Inc. Privacy Officer can be contacted at
aws-canada-privacy@amazon.com
or by mail at the address noted above.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Costa Rica
Your Rights
. With respect to data collected and processed by Amazon Web Services Costa Rica (“AWS Costa Rica”), you have the rights of access, rectification, erasure, restriction, or complaint. When you consent to AWS Costa Rica processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time and AWS Costa Rica will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please
contact us
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us at Zona Franca America, Edificio C7. 600 norte de Plaza Real Cariari, sobre la paralela a la Autopista General Cañas. San Francisco de Heredia, Costa Rica.
European Economic Area, UK, and Switzerland
Controller of Personal Information.
When Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is the provider of an AWS Offering, Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, 38 Avenue John F. Kennedy, L-1855, Luxembourg, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL is also the authorized representative of Amazon Web Services, Inc. in the EEA.
Processing.
We process your personal information on one or more of the following legal bases:
as necessary to enter into a contract with you or a legal entity you represent, to perform our contractual obligations, to provide AWS Offerings, to respond to requests from you, or to provide customer support;
where we have a legitimate interest, as described in this Privacy Notice (see How We Use Personal Information above);
as necessary to comply with relevant law and legal obligations, including to respond to lawful requests and orders; or
with your consent.
Information We Retain After Your Account is Closed.
If you decide to terminate your agreement and close your AWS account, we will retain your content for a period of up to 90 days after account closure, during which you may still access part of the AWS Management Console in order to retrieve your billing documents and to contact customer support. During this period, you may also decide to reopen your AWS account. At the end of this period, we will delete any content remaining in your account.
After account closure, we may need to keep certain information for an additional period of time for legal and legitimate business purposes. For example, we may retain personal information such as your contact information (e.g., name, email address, physical address) and any invoices that AWS has sent to you (e.g., record of purchases, applicable discounts, and tax information) for tax and accounting purposes. If applicable, AWS may also retain records of communications with you, as well as relevant logs (e.g., a log of your account closure) for dispute resolution purposes. We further may keep records for preventing fraud and ensuring security, for example in case of misuse of our services or violation of our terms.
Your Rights
. Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means.
Questions and Contacts.
If you wish to do any of these things or have a data-protection related question, and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
The data protection officer for Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL can be contacted at aws-EU-privacy@amazon.com.
You can also lodge a complaint with our principal supervisory authority, the
Commission Nationale pour la Protection des Données in Luxembourg
, or with a local authority.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Cookies.
Please refer to our
Cookie Notice
.
Transfers outside of the EEA.
When we transfer your personal information outside the EEA we do so in accordance with the terms of this Privacy Notice and applicable data protection law.
India
For any prospective or current customers of Amazon Web Services India Private Limited (formerly known as Amazon Internet Services Private Limited), our mailing address is: Amazon Web Services India Private Limited, Block E, 14th Floor, Unit Nos. 1401 to 1421, International Trade Tower, Nehru Place, New Delhi, Delhi 110019, India, ATTN: AWS India Legal.
Japan
Controller of Personal Information
Any personal information provided to or gathered by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN.
Any personal information collected by Amazon Web Services, Inc. is controlled primarily by Amazon Web Services, Inc.
Use of Personal Information
We jointly use your personal information for such purposes as described in this Privacy Notice with domestic and foreign affiliates that Amazon.com, Inc. controls, including Amazon Web Services, Inc., Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., Amazon Web Services EMEA SARL, and other global entities that either are subject to this Privacy Notice or follow practices at least as protective as those described in this Privacy Notice. Jointly used personal information includes personal information described under “Personal Information We Collect” and “Example of Information Collected” above. Amazon Web Services, Inc. is the business operator primarily responsible for managing jointly used personal information.
We share personal information with third parties only to the extent described under “How We Share Personal Information” above and in accordance with the Act on Protection of Personal Information.
When we share your personal information with third parties outside of Japan, such as sellers of products on AWS Marketplace and sponsors of AWS events, we require the recipients to adopt personal information security measures to protect your personal information.
Please see
here
for information on the countries where third parties may be located, and the applicable data privacy laws and data protection systems in these countries.
Your Rights
You may have the right to request access to or delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law. If you wish to submit a data subject access request, please
contact us
(for AWS customers) or contact us at our mailing address, Amazon Web Services Japan G.K., 3-1-1 Kamiosaki, Shinagawa-ku, Tokyo 141-0021 JAPAN, ATTN: AWS Japan Legal (for current or prospective customers of Amazon Web Services Japan G.K. and non-customers in Japan).
Malaysia
A Bahasa Malaysia translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Nigeria
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Nigeria Limited, located at 3-5 Sinari Daranijo Street, Off Ajose Adeogun, Victoria Island, Lagos, Nigeria (“AWS Nigeria”), AWS Nigeria is the data controller.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information;
request portability of personal information that you have provided to us (which does not include information derived from the collected information), where the processing of such personal information is based on consent or a contract with you and is carried out by automated means; and
request information about the possibility of refusing consent and the consequences of doing so.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Nigeria customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
.
You can also file a complaint with Nigeria’s National Information Technology Development Agency through its official channels.
When you consent to our processing your personal information for a specified purpose, you may withdraw your consent at any time, and we will stop any further processing of your data for that purpose.
Peru
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Peru S.R.L., located at Av. Jorge Basadre 349 San Isidro, Lima (“AWS Peru”), AWS Peru is the data controller and the personal data bank holder of the following data banks: customers, prospective customers, and vendors.
Personal Information.
Depending on how you engage with AWS Peru, we may process one or more of the following kinds of personal information: name, identity card number, Tax ID, contact information (such as address, telephone, email address), profession, banking and credit card details, and physical or electronic signature. For more information about the personal information that we collect, click
here
.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
ask whether we hold personal information about you and request copies of such personal information and information about how it is processed;
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
request us to restrict the processing of personal information where the processing is inappropriate;
object to the processing of personal information; and
exercise any other rights afforded by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS Peru customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
You can also file a complaint before the Peruvian National Data Protection Authority through its official channels.
Data Processors and Transfers to Third Parties.
We may share your personal information as described in this Privacy Notice and as permitted by the Peruvian Personal Data Protection Regulations, including to Amazon Web Services Inc., located at 410 Terry Avenue North, Seattle, WA 98109-5210, United States of America, for the purposes of providing services and engaging in marketing, business development, and sales efforts with respect to cloud services that Amazon Web Services, Inc. sells globally; and enabling the provision of data hosting, storage, and processing by Amazon Web Services, Inc. as AWS Peru’s data processor.
Philippines
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services Philippines, Inc. (“AWS Philippines”), you may contact the Data Protection Officer (“DPO”) and Data Compliance Officer for Privacy (“COP”)
here
if you are an AWS Philippines customer. If you are not an AWS customer, you may contact the DPO and COP at 21st floor Arthaland Century Pacific Tower, 5th Avenue 1634 Bonifacio Global City, Taguig, Philippines.
South Africa
Controller of Personal Information.
With respect to personal information provided to Amazon Web Services South Africa Proprietary Limited, located at 29 Gogosoa Street, Observatory, Cape Town, South Africa, 7925 (“AWS South Africa”), AWS South Africa is the responsible party.
Your Rights.
Subject to applicable law, you have the right to:
request that inaccurate personal information is corrected;
request deletion of personal information that is no longer necessary for the purposes underlying the processing, processed based on withdrawn consent, or processed in non-compliance with applicable legal requirements;
object, at any time to the processing of your personal information for purposes of direct marketing other than direct marketing by means of unsolicited electronic communications from AWS which is prohibited unless you give consent to receive such direct marketing;
object, at any time (at which point we will cease processing of your personal information), to the processing of your personal information if you feel the processing of that personal information is not necessary for protection of your legitimate interest/s; proper performance of a public law duty by a public body; or pursuance of the legitimate interests of AWS or of a third party to whom the information is supplied; and
to submit a complaint to the Information Regulator of South Africa regarding interference with the protection of your personal information.
If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS South Africa customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, please contact us
here
or at the address under Controller of Personal Information above.
The Information Regulator Contact Details. The Information Regulator of South Africa is located at: JD House, 27 Stiemens Street, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2001. P.O. Box 31533, Braamfontein, Johannesburg, 2017. You may direct general enquiries by email to:
enquiries@inforegulator.org.za
. You may direct complaints by email to:
POPIAComplaints@inforegulator.org.za
.
South Korea
AWS does not knowingly collect personal information from children under the age of 14 without the consent of the child's parent or guardian.
How We Share Personal Information
AWS may share personal information as described in this Privacy Notice, including with affiliates of Amazon Web Services, Inc.
AWS has contracts in place with the following third party service provider(s) (delegatees) to perform functions on behalf of AWS in Korea, and they may have access to your personal information as needed to perform their functions described below:
The details of delegation for event management can be found on the relevant event page.
AWS may share your personal information with the following third party service provider(s) outside of Korea as described below:
If you do not agree with the above-stated overseas transfers, please stop using AWS Services and close your AWS Account.
Deletion of Personal Information
AWS will delete your personal information (including after closure of your AWS account) as described in this Privacy Notice. When deleting personal information, AWS will take standard commercially reasonable measures to make the personal information practically irrecoverable or irreproducible. The specific manner of deletion will depend on the information being deleted, how the information was collected and stored, and your interactions with us. Electronic documents or files containing personal information will be deleted using a technical method that makes recovery or retrieval of such information practically impossible or renders the data no longer personally identifiable. Non-electronic documents or files containing personal information will be shredded, incinerated, or both.
Retention of Personal Information
AWS Korea keeps your personal information to enable your continued use of AWS Offerings, for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this Privacy Notice, as may be required by law (including for tax and accounting purposes as may be required by the Framework Act on National Taxes of Republic of Korea or other laws), or as otherwise communicated to you. How long we retain specific personal information varies depending on the purpose for its use, and we will delete your personal information in accordance with applicable law.
If you have any privacy questions or requests please contact:
AWS Korea Privacy
Email: aws-korea-privacy@amazon.com
Korean translation of this Privacy Notice can be found
here
.
Turkey
Controller of Personal Information.
When AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi is the provider of an AWS Offering, AWS Turkey Pazarlama Teknoloji ve Danışmanlık Hizmetleri Limited Şirketi, located at Esentepe Mahallesi Bahar Sk. Özdilek/River Plaza/Wyndham Grand Hotel Apt. No: 13/52 Şişli/İstanbul, Turkey, is the data controller of personal information collected or processed through the AWS Offering.
United States
These additional disclosures are required by certain state privacy laws to the extent they apply to your use of AWS Offerings, and serve as a Notice at Collection under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Categories of personal information collected
. The personal information that we may collect, or may have collected from consumers in the preceding twelve months, fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, alias, address, phone numbers, or IP address, your AWS account log-in information, or a government-issued identifier (such as a state-issued ID number, which may be required to verify your identity when completing certain AWS certification courses, or an ID you provide for identity verification, which in some cases may reflect citizenship or immigration status);
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information;
characteristics of protected classifications under California or US federal law, such as age, race, or gender or gender identity, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis;
commercial information, such as purchase activity;
internet or other electronic network activity information, including content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details;
information used to prevent and detect fraud or other unauthorized activity, including informing customers if such activity were to affect them;
biometric information, such as your voice or appearance, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of a speech or image recognition service;
geolocation data, which may in some cases constitute precise geolocation information, such as the location of your device or computer, for example if you enable location services to enhance your experience through event applications we offer;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, including when you communicate with us by phone or otherwise;
professional or employment-related information, for example data you may provide about your business;
inference data, such as information about your preferences; and
education information, such as information about enrollment status, fields of study, or degrees, honors, and awards received.
We collect this information from you, automatically through your interaction with the AWS Offerings, or from third parties. For more information about the personal information we collect, click
here
. We collect this information for the business and commercial purposes described in the “How We Use Personal Information” section above.
Categories of personal information disclosed for a business purpose
. The personal information that we may have disclosed about consumers for a business purpose in the preceding twelve months fall into the following categories established by the California Privacy Rights Act and other state privacy laws, depending on how you engage with the AWS Offerings:
Identifiers, such as your name, address, or phone numbers, for example if we use a third-party carrier to deliver AWS hardware, or government identifier or certain types of ID you provide for identity verification, which may in some cases reflect your citizenship or immigration status, for example if we use a third-party service to verify your identity;
personal information as described in subdivision (e) of Section 1798.80 of the California Civil Code, such as a credit card number or other payment information, for example if we use a third-party payment processor;
information that may reveal your age, gender or gender identity, race, or other protected classifications under California or US federal law, for example if we conduct user surveys or analysis using a third-party service provider;
commercial information, such as the details of a product or service you purchased if a third-party service provider assists in providing that product or service to you;
internet or other electronic network activity information, such as if we use a third-party service provider to help us gather reports for analyzing the health of our devices and services;
information relating to our prevention and detection of unauthorized activity, such as attempted fraud;
biometric information, for example if you choose to participate in a demonstration of certain AWS services facilitated by a third-party service provider;
geolocation data, which may constitute precise geolocation data, for example if we enable transportation services from a third party in connection with an AWS event;
audio, visual, electronic or other similar information, for example if a third-party service provider reviews recordings of customer support phone calls for quality assurance purposes;
professional or employment-related information, for example if we provide information to a third-party service provider for verification or registration as part of the AWS Offerings;
education information, for example if we facilitate employment or internship recruitment activities for participants in the AWS Educate program; and
inference data, for example if we use a third-party service provider to store information about your preferences.
For more information about the personal information we may disclose for a business purpose, click
here
.
Your Data Rights
. You may have certain data rights under state privacy laws, including to request information about the collection of your personal information by us, to access your personal information in a portable format, and to correct or delete your personal information. If you wish to do any of these things and you are an AWS customer, please contact us
here
. If you are not an AWS customer, or you are an authorized agent under applicable state law, please contact us
here
or at the address under
Contacts, Notices, and Revisions
above. Additionally, you may have the right to appeal the denial of any of these rights by submitting a form that will be provided to you if we deny a data request. Depending on your data choices, certain services may be limited or unavailable.
To ensure the security of your AWS account, we will generally ask you to verify your request using the contact information you have already provided. If you are an authorized agent making a request on behalf of a consumer pursuant to applicable state law, we may ask you to provide information verifying you have proper authority to make the request on behalf of the consumer or we may ask the consumer to verify their identity with us directly.
No sale or sharing of personal information
. We do not sell or share any personal information of consumers, as those terms are defined under the California Privacy Rights Act.
De-identified Data Disclosure.
AWS may use de-identified data in some instances. AWS either maintains such data without attempting to re-identify it or treats such data as personal data subject to applicable law.
California Privacy Rights Act Sensitive Personal Information Disclosure
. The categories of data that we collect and disclose for a business purpose include “sensitive personal information” as defined under the California Privacy Rights Act. We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for any purpose not expressly permitted by the California Privacy Rights Act.
California Privacy Rights Act Retention Disclosure
. To enable your continued use of AWS Services, we keep your personal information for as long as it is required in order to fulfill the relevant purposes described in this AWS Privacy Notice, as permitted or as may be required by law, or as otherwise communicated to you.
California Privacy Rights Act Non-Discrimination Statement
. We will not discriminate against any consumer for exercising their rights under the California Privacy Rights Act.
Colorado Privacy Act and Oregon Privacy Act Profiling Disclosure
. We do not engage in profiling of consumers in furtherance of automated decisions that produce legal or similarly significant effects, as those terms are defined under the Colorado Privacy Act or the Oregon Privacy Act.
Examples of Information Collected
Information You Give Us
You provide information to us when you:
search for, subscribe to, or purchase AWS Offerings;
create or administer your AWS account (and you might have more than one account if you have used more than one email address when using AWS Offerings);
configure your settings for, provide data access permissions for, or otherwise interact with AWS Offerings;
register for or attend an AWS event;
purchase or use content, products, or services from third-party providers through the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
offer your content, products, or services on or through AWS Offerings or the AWS Marketplace (or other similar venues operated or provided by us);
communicate with us by phone, email, or otherwise;
complete a questionnaire, a support ticket, or other information request forms;
post on AWS websites or participate in community features; and
employ notification services.
Depending on your use of AWS Offerings, you might supply us with such information as:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
payment information, including credit card and bank account information;
information about your location;
information about your organization and your contacts, such as colleagues or people within your organization;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
content of feedback, testimonials, inquiries, support tickets, and any phone conversations, chat sessions and emails with or to us;
your image (still, video, and in some cases 3-D), voice, and other identifiers that are personal to you when you attend an AWS event or use certain AWS Offerings;
information regarding identity, including government-issued identification information;
corporate and financial information; and
VAT numbers and other tax identifiers.
Automatic Information
We collect information automatically when you:
visit, interact with, or use AWS Offerings (including when you use your computer or other device to interact with AWS Offerings);
download content from us;
open emails or click on links in emails from us; and
interact or communicate with us (such as when you attend an AWS event or when you request customer support).
Examples of the information we automatically collect include:
network and connection information, such as the Internet protocol (IP) address used to connect your computer or other device to the Internet and information about your Internet service provider;
computer and device information, such as device, application, or browser type and version, browser plug-in type and version, operating system, or time zone setting;
the location of your device or computer;
authentication and security credential information;
content interaction information, such as content downloads, streams, and playback details, including duration and number of simultaneous streams and downloads;
AWS Offerings metrics, such as offering usage, occurrences of technical errors, diagnostic reports, your settings preferences, backup information, API calls, and other logs;
the full Uniform Resource Locators (URL) clickstream to, through, and from our website (including date and time) and AWS Offerings, content you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, and page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs);
email addresses and phone numbers used to contact us; and
identifiers and information contained in cookies (see our
Cookie Notice
).
Information from Other Sources
Examples of information we receive from other sources include:
marketing, sales generation, and recruitment information, including your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
subscription, purchase, support, or other information about your interactions with products and services offered by us, our affiliates (such as AWS training courses), or third parties (such as products offered through the AWS Marketplace) in relation to AWS Offerings;
search results and links, including paid listings (such as Sponsored Links); and
credit history information from credit bureaus.
Information You Can Access
Examples of information you can access through AWS Offerings include:
your name, email address, physical address, phone number, and other similar contact information;
usernames, aliases, roles, and other authentication and security credential information;
your subscription, purchase, usage, billing, and payment history;
payment settings, such as payment instrument information and billing preferences;
tax information;
email communication and notification settings; and
if you participate in the AWS Marketplace or Amazon Partner Network (or other similar venues operated or provided by us), your account, your status, subscriptions, and other information.
Customers can access the information above through AWS Offerings, such as the
AWS Management Console
(including the
My Account
,
Billing Dashboard
,
Bills
,
Payment Methods
,
Payment History
,
Preferences
and
Tax Settings
pages), the
AWS Email Preference Center
,
AWS Marketplace
, and
APN Partner Central
.
AWS support for Internet Explorer ends on 07/31/2022. Supported browsers are Chrome, Firefox, Edge, and Safari.
Learn more »
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
Login
Close
Profile
Your profile helps improve your interactions with select AWS experiences.
View profile
Log out
Sub-policy 4
https://www.twilio.com/legal/privacy:
Print this page
Customer and Partner Agreements
Terms of Service
Acceptable Use Policy
Service and Country Specific Requirements
Data Protection Addendum (DPA)
Security Overview
Service Level Agreements
Advisory Services Terms
Professional Services Terms
Twilio Marketplace Terms
Twilio Segment Customer Data Platform Destination Integration and Listing Terms
AI/ML Terms
European Electronic Communications Code Rights Waiver
Customer Name Changes and Assignments
Updates to Legal Terms and Conditions
Privacy
Data Privacy at Twilio
Privacy Notice
Binding Corporate Rules
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
Sub-processors
GDPR
Customer Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
Mobile Application Terms
Twilio Frontline End User App Terms
Twilio Authy App Terms
Supplier Agreements
Supplier Purchase Order Terms and Conditions
Country-Specific Terms
Supplier Data Protection Addendum
Supplier Code of Conduct
Intellectual Property
DMCA Policy
Trademark
Resources for Law Enforcement
Government Requests
Transparency Report
Civil Requests
Submit a request or subpoena
Code of Conduct & Ethics Hotline
Twilio Code of Conduct
Ethics and Whistleblower Hotline
Digital Promotions General Rules
Sweepstakes Rules
Customer Research and User Experience
Acknowledgement and Waiver
Legal Notices for Twilio's Web Site
Impressum (Germany)
Italy ALIAS Database Code of Conduct
Code of Conduct (Italy)
Twilio Privacy Notice
Last Updated
:
February 6, 2025
(View the prior version of our privacy notice
here
An icon of a outbound link arrow
)
Introduction
The Privacy program of Twilio Inc. and its
group companies
(‘Twilio’, ‘we’ or ‘our’) is built on our
Binding Corporate Rules
('BCRs'), which serve as our code of conduct that governs our global processing of personal data.
In order to provide products and services ('Services') to our customers and conduct our day-to-day business operations, including the operation of our websites, we collect, use and share, or otherwise process personal data about our customers, our customers’ authorized users ('end user') and their customers, our website visitors and business contacts.
Personal data
is any information that directly identifies you, such as your name and email address, or that indirectly identifies you, for example a phone number or device identifier.
The personal data we may collect and process about you varies depending on our relationship with you. We may have a direct relationship with you because you have set up an account or consented to receive marketing communications from us, or we may have an indirect relationship with you via your relationship with one of our customers; for example you may be their employee or their customer.
We take privacy, data protection and our legal obligations very seriously. We are committed to being transparent with you about how we use personal data. This Privacy Notice ('Notice') aims to describe our privacy practices in a clear, accessible and easy to understand way and to let you know how you can exercise your rights in relation to your data.
This Notice applies where Twilio processes personal data as a
data controller
, in connection with the Services we provide to our customers and the operation of our business, including our websites.  As a data controller, we determine the purpose (why) and means (how) of personal data processing and are ultimately responsible for the correct handling of your data, in accordance with applicable law.  This Notice describes our general privacy practices. Depending on how you interact with us or the specific services you use, additional privacy notices may apply. These supplemental notices will be provided to you at or before the time we collect your personal data. These supplemental notices should be read together with this Notice and are incorporated by reference.
This Notice
does not apply
to the Personal Data we process in relation to job applicants. This is covered by our
Global Applicant Privacy Notice
.
We also process personal data for most of our Services as a
data processor
. As a data processor, we process personal data related to our customers' employees, end users and customers on behalf of our customers to provide Services to them in accordance with their instructions. These instructions are set out in our customer agreements,
Data Protection Addendum
, service specific terms or through a customer's use or configuration of a product feature.  You should contact these organizations directly for information about how they process your personal data as a
data controller
and to exercise your rights in relation to that data.
Contents of our Privacy Notice
Personal Data We Process
How We Process Personal Data
How We Disclose Personal Data
International Data Transfers
How We Secure Personal Data
How Long We Retain Personal Data
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Children
Automated Decision-Making
How to Contact Us
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
Twilio Product Privacy
Personal Data We Process
The personal data we collect about you depends on your relationship with us and the purposes for which we process that personal data. The following describes the types of personal data that we collected and disclosed for a business purpose in the preceding 12 months.
Personal Data You Share With Us Directly
Contact Information -
When you sign up for a Twilio, Sendgrid or Segment account and use any of our Services, request product information, ask for a call from our sales team, or participate in events, we ask you to provide us with your name, company name, business address, phone number, email address and other contact information. We also ask you to create a password and name your account (or accounts, if you have more than one).
Customer Account Data -
We process certain personal data to manage our relationship with you and administer you or your company’s account. This includes purchase history, names or contact information of individuals authorized to manage the Twilio account on behalf of our customer to set up, access and manage billing. We also collect personal data required to administer use of your account and the Services, and information to allow us to verify your identity for Know Your Customer or other identity verification purposes.
Customer Content -
We receive and store the content of communications received from you or our customers and other personal data uploaded to the Services or generated for our customers’ use as part of the Services, which we may be authorized by you or our customer to use, where necessary for specific legitimate business purposes and in accordance with applicable law.
Marketing and Contact Preferences -
We use information about how you would like to be contacted and choices you have made to send you marketing communications.
Payment Information -
In connection with Services you pay for, we ask you to provide our payment processor with your payment method information like a credit card or your Paypal account and your billing address. Our payment processor, acting on our behalf, gathers this so we can bill you for your use of our Services. Our payment processor will share your billing address with Twilio for this purpose.
Personalization Details -
Some of our products, such as our short code service, may require you to complete an application form by providing details about your or your company’s  intended use of the product to determine eligibility for these products.
Professional Information -
The information we process about you with respect to your employment or profession, including company, job title, email address, phone number and online business networking profile.
Subscriber Records -
For some of our communications products, we may also obtain proof of identity from you or our customer that includes a proof of address, name, physical address, or other identification information. For example, to use our
Trust Hub
or to obtain a phone number in certain countries, local law may require us to have a physical service address on file for the individual who will be using that Twilio number, whether that’s you or our customer's end user.
Support and Feedback -
When you interact with us on our websites including through our AI chatbots (e.g. our Help Center Assistant), over the phone or via email, we process the phone number or email address that you use, the content of your interaction and the feedback you provide about our Services. You may also provide us with feedback about our Services in surveys and questionnaires. We will let you know when a call may be recorded, in accordance with applicable law.
Personal Data We Generate or Collect Automatically
Communications Usage Data -
When you or our customers use Twilio communications products, we collect electronic communications metadata, such as phone numbers and routing information, the source and destination of a communication, location of the device generated in the context of delivering the communication, date, time, duration and type of communication, status of the message, error data and traffic records.
Device Information and IP Addresses -
When you use our account portal, we collect your IP address and device information through tracking technologies like cookies, web beacons, pixels, and similar technologies. We also collect IP addresses when you make requests to our APIs and in our server logs. Additionally, we collect information about your device, such as your computer or mobile device operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model, browser type, screen resolution, unique identifiers, and general location information such as city or town when you use our account portal.
We do not collect precise geolocation information.
Online Activity Information -
When you visit Twilio websites, including our web forms, we use tracking technologies such as cookies, web beacons, and pixels to collect the following data: your device and browser, time zone setting, web pages visited, products you view or search for, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information, IP address.
Security Identifiers or SIDs -
When you sign up for an account with Twilio, we’ll automatically assign you and each of your accounts a unique security ID and generate an API token for each account. We keep a record of these credentials so we know it is you making the requests when your application makes requests to our API using these credentials.
Customer Proprietary Network Information -
When you use certain US voice-based communications services, Twilio collects information associated with your service usage. This includes information such as the number of phone calls, call destinations, call locations, type, and service configuration, and is known as Customer Proprietary Network Information ('CPNI'). CPNI does not include information such as your name, address, phone number, or the content of phone calls. We use CPNI to market Twilio-related Services to which you are not already subscribed unless you have exercised your right to opt out. For information about your CPNI choices, see the section “
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
” below.
Personal Data Collected From Other Sources
Add-On Service Data -
In the event you purchase our Services through one of our
Add-On Partners
, they may share your personal data with us to fulfill their contractual obligations. Add-On Partners may share your personal data in the form of leads when you download Twilio content on the Add-On Partner’s website or you participate in events and webinars of which Twilio is a sponsor.
Professional Data -
We collect certain personal data such as employment or professional information from sources other than you. We may combine this data with other personal data that you share with us.
Publicly-Available Sources -
We may also use publicly-available information about you that we have gathered through services like LinkedIn, or we may obtain information about you or your company from third party providers, such as your industry, the size of your company, and your company’s website URL.
Social Media Data -
Social media service providers such as Google, LinkedIn, and Meta may provide us with information about you, in accordance with your privacy settings on those sites.
Telecommunication Data -
We receive communication-related data from telecommunications operators, aggregators and carriers that may include phone type, carrier history, SIM status and history, city and/or country where phone was first registered, contract and account type, IP address city and/or country and a validation result of personal data provided by our customer and whether it matches data held by the carrier.
How We Process Personal Data
The purposes for which we process personal depends on your relationship with us. We only use personal data that is necessary to fulfill the specified purposes listed below as applicable to you and in accordance with applicable data protection law.
Purpose
Personal Data Processed
Legal Basis for Processing
Creating and managing accounts, including verification of the identity of our customer’s end user for Know-Your-Customer (KYC) or identity verification purposes.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Professional Information
Subscriber Records
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Carrying out Twilio’s core business operations, such as account administration, accounting, auditing and compliance, business analytics, filing taxes, finance, forecasting, consolidated management and reporting, product strategy and revenue planning.
Add-On Service Data
Professional Information
Customer Account Data
Support and Feedback
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Billing and relationship management.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Communications Usage Data
Payment Information
Legitimate Interest
Providing, optimizing and maintaining our Services and, platform, including debugging and troubleshooting.
Add-On Service Data
Subscriber Records
Online Activity Information
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Preventing, detecting and investigating security incidents and managing the security of Twilio’s platform, services, websites and accounts.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Preventing, detecting, or investigating abuse or misuse of Twilio’s platform or Services , including spam, fraud, illegal activities, or violations of the
Twilio Acceptable Use Policy
,
or assisting telecommunications service providers, regulators, or law enforcement agencies with combating spam, fraud, or illegal activities.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Contact Information
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Telecommunications Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Legal Obligation
Determining eligibility for certain Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Payment Information
Personalization Details
Subscriber Records
Legitimate Interest
For routing and connectivity purposes to send messages on behalf of our customers, including transmitting, distributing and exchanging communications using phone numbers, either through the public switched telephone network or other communications networks.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Legitimate Interest
Providing customer support, including responding to your requests and communicating with you about your account and use of the services, including suspicious activity or security alerts.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Professional Information
Support and Feedback
Security Identifier
Other personal data provided by requestor
Legitimate interest
Sending important notifications about our Services.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Complying with legal and regulatory obligations, telecommunication service provider requirements and communications industry codes of practice.
Subscriber Records
Customer Content
Communications Usage Data
Customer Account Data
Legitimate Interest
Sending marketing communications in accordance with your marketing preferences.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Analyzing your interest in our Services and delivering marketing campaigns that are relevant to you.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Security Identifier
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Deploying cookies and other tracking technologies in accordance with your online settings.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Understanding how visitors navigate our websites, and tracking and optimizing the performance of our advertising activities.
Device Information
Online Activity Information
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Understanding how customers are using our platform and improving the website navigation experience.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Online Activity Information
Professional Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Conducting questionnaires and surveys to improve our Services and provide training to our employees.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Personalization Details
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Managing your participation in our events and webinars and granting you access to whitepapers and on-demand resources.
Add-On Service Data
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Professional Data
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Collecting sales insights and performing lead scoring.
Contact Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing our business by updating, expanding, and analyzing our customer relationship records.
Contact Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Professional Data
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Consent
Identifying potential job candidates.
Publicly Available Sources
Social Media Data
Legitimate Interest
Developing or improving our Services, including anonymizing, de-identifying, pseudonymizing and aggregating personal data for this purpose.
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Customer Account Data
Personalization Details
Support and Feedback
Legitimate Interest
As otherwise authorized by you or our customer in Service specific terms or through your or our customer’s use and configuration of features in a product.
Data used will vary based on customer authorization
Legitimate Interest
Protecting the health and safety of our employees, visitors and our properties.
Contact Information
Customer Account Data
Legal Obligation
Protecting the rights and freedoms of individuals, meeting legal or regulatory obligations, including complying with valid court orders, disclosure requests, subpoenas, and other appropriate legal mechanisms.
Add-On Service Data
Communications Usage Data
Customer Content
Device Information and IP
Addresses
Online Activity Information
Marketing and Contact Preferences
Payment Information
Subscriber Records
Telecommunication Data
Security Identifier
Legal Obligation
Legitimate Interest
How We Disclose Personal Data
We disclose personal data to third parties in limited circumstances in order to provide the Services and to otherwise run our business. Below are the different scenarios under which we may disclose your data to third parties.
Telecommunications Service Providers
Twilio’s communications products provide an easier way for developers to build applications that make use of the publicly switched telephone network ('PSTN') to send communications. Therefore, we engage with a global network of telecommunications operators, aggregators, carriers and other communication service providers (collectively, “telecommunications service providers”) as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How telecommunications service providers handle this data is generally determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Where telecommunications service providers transmit the content of a communication, they function neither as data controllers nor data processors, instead they act simply as a conduit to transmit communication content. In the event telecommunications services providers process any personal data for their own purposes such as communications metadata required to transmit the message, or for billing or fraud prevention purposes, they also act as data controllers.
We may have to share Subscriber Records with local government authorities or local telecommunications carriers that provide connectivity services. However, we don’t share subscriber records for purposes other than this, and we treat these records with our highest confidentiality.
Other Communications Service Providers
For proper routing and connectivity, Twilio also enables sending or receiving communications through communications service providers that do not use the PSTN, these are referred to as Over-the-Top ('OTT') communications service providers. If you or our customer chooses to use Twilio to send or receive communications by way of these providers, Twilio will disclose communications content and other data to these providers as necessary to route and connect those communications from the sender to the intended recipient. How those OTT communications service providers, as data controllers, handle this data is determined by their own policies and local regulations.
Third Party Service Providers
Twilio engages third-party vendors and service providers to carry out certain personal data processing functions on our behalf. These providers are limited to only accessing or using personal data to provide services to us and must provide reasonable assurances they will appropriately safeguard the data.
Add-On Partners
Add-ons are additional features, functionality or services offered by Twilio’s Add-on partners (who are third parties not affiliated with Twilio). Twilio may make Add-ons available through the Twilio Marketplace. Some Add-ons may need to access or collect some of your information, including personal data. If you choose to use an Add-on, Twilio will disclose your information to the Add-on partner so you can use the Add-on. Twilio does not control Add-on partners’ use of your information and their use of your information will be in accordance with their own policies. If you do not want your information to be disclosed to an Add-on partner, then you should not use the Add-on.
Twilio Group Members
We may disclose your personal data among Twilio Group Members. Twilio Group Members will only use the information as described in this Notice. Twilio Group Members are listed in Appendix 1 in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
Compliance with Legal Obligations
We may disclose your personal data to a third party if:
If we reasonably believe that disclosure is compelled by applicable law, regulation, legal process, or a government request (including to meet national security, emergency services, or law enforcement requirements);
to enforce our agreements and policies;
to protect the security or integrity of our Services;
to protect ourselves, our other customers, or the public from harm or illegal activities, including security threats, spam and fraud; or
to respond to an emergency which we believe in good faith requires us to disclose data to assist in preventing a death or serious bodily injury.
For more details, please see the procedure laid out in our
Binding Corporate Rules
.
If Twilio is required by law to disclose any personal data about you, we will notify you or our customers of the disclosure requirement to the extent legally permitted and where Twilio determines such disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation. Further, we object to information requests we do not believe were issued properly.
Business Transfers
In connection with a corporate sale, merger, reorganization, dissolution or similar event, personal data about you may be part of the assets transferred or disclosed in connection with the due diligence for any such transaction. If required by law, we will notify you prior to such a transfer and provide you with information about any choices you may have with respect to your personal data.
Aggregated, Anonymized or De-identified Data
Aggregated, anonymized and de-identified data may be derived by Twilio from your personal data but is generally not considered personal data under data protection law as this data does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity. We may use and disclose de-identified, anonymized or aggregated data to third parties. We do not disaggregate or reidentify de-identified data.
International Data Transfers
As a global organization, we may need to transfer your personal data to Twilio affiliates, contractors, service providers and third parties in various countries and jurisdictions around the world. When we transfer your personal data, we take care to use appropriate safeguards to ensure your personal data remains protected.
Data Transfers to the United States and Elsewhere
When you use our account portal, or our other Services, your personal data may be transferred to the United States, where our primary processing facilities are located, and possibly to other countries where we or our service providers operate.
Safeguards for Data Transfers
Twilio employs appropriate safeguards for cross-border transfers of personal data, as required by applicable local law.
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“EU-U.S. DPF”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“Swiss-U.S. DPF“)
As set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce Twilio is officially certified under the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and Swiss-U.S. DPF and relies on these certifications as its primary transfer mechanisms for transfers of personal data from the EU and Switzerland to the U.S. Twilio adheres to the DPF principles for onward transfers of personal data to third parties and remains liable for damages caused by third parties under the DPF unless Twilio did not cause the event giving rise to damage. The U.S. Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Twilio’s compliance with the DPF. To learn more about the DPF Program, and to view our certifications, please visit the
DPF website
.
Twilio’s Binding Corporate Rules
Twilio has established and implemented a set of
Binding Corporate Rules
for internal transfers of personal data between Twilio Group Members in the European Union and Twilio Group Members elsewhere as a data controller. Twilio’s BCRs have been approved by European Union Data Protection Authorities and are a commitment by Twilio to adequately protect personal data that Twilio processes regardless of where the information resides. You can access Twilio’s BCR-Controller Policy
here
.
Where neither the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, Swiss-EU DPF nor Twilio's BCRs apply, we rely instead on other data transfer mechanisms to transfer personal data outside the EEA, the UK, and Switzerland, such as Standard Contractual Clauses and the UK’s International Data Transfer Agreement.
APEC CBPR & PRP Participation
Twilio’s privacy practices, described in this Notice, comply with the APEC Cross Border Privacy Rules (“CBPR”) and Privacy Recognition for Processors (“PRP”) Systems. The APEC, CBPR and PRP systems provide a framework for organizations to ensure protection of personal data transferred among participating APEC economies. More information about the APEC framework can be found
here
.
How We Secure Personal Data
To protect personal data from loss, or unauthorized use, access or disclosure, Twilio uses reasonable and appropriate security measures designed to protect the security of your personal data both online and offline. These measures vary based on the sensitivity of the personal data we collect, process and store and the current state of technology.  All systems used to support our business are governed by Twilio’s Information Security Policy and Standards which are built on industry standards and best practices such as the ISO 27001 and NIST standards. More information about our security measures can be found in our
Security Overview
.
How Long We Retain Personal Data
We endeavor not to retain personal data in a form which permits identification of individuals for longer than is necessary for the purposes for which that data is processed. We retain personal data in accordance with Twilio's record retention policies and guidelines as revised and updated from time to time.
Twilio will store your Customer Account Data as long as needed to provide you or our customer with the Services and to operate our business. If you ask Twilio to delete specific personal data from your Customer Account Data (see ‘
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
’ below), we will honor this request, unless deleting that information prevents us from carrying out necessary business functions, such as billing for our services, calculating taxes, or conducting required audits.
Your Rights and Choices About Your Data
Depending on the data protection laws applicable to you, you may have the following rights in relation to your personal data that we process as a data controller:
that we provide details about the categories of personal data that we collect about you, including how we collect and share it;
that we provide you access to, and a copy of, the personal data we collect about you;
that we update or correct any inaccurate personal data we have about you;
that we delete the personal data we have about you;
that we restrict processing of personal data about you;
that we provide you with your personal data in a structured, commonly used format and to transmit that information to another controller, and where feasible, transmit the information directly;
that we provide you with the right to object to the processing of personal data, including profiling;
that we provide you with a free, easy mechanism to object to use of your personal information for direct marketing purposes;
that you not be subject to a decision based solely on automated processing, including profiling, that produces legal effects or similarly affects your individual rights;
to withdraw your consent; and
to complain to a competent supervisory authority and/or to commence proceedings in a court of competent jurisdiction.
Twilio will honor your rights subject to limitations in certain situations, such as where Twilio can demonstrate that it has a legal requirement or legitimate interest to process your data or can legitimately apply an exemption to the exercise of a right under applicable law. More information about these rights can be found in our Binding Corporate Rules Controller Policy
Rule 10
and
Appendix 3
.
If you are a
US resident
interested in what personal data we have disclosed lately for our business purposes, here’s a list:
Identifiers
Commercial information
Financial information
Internet or other electronic activity information
Geolocation information
Professional or employment information
By “our business purposes,” we mean that we only disclose personal data as we describe in the section "
How We Disclose Personal Data
" above.  Also, as described in the “How We Use Cookies & Other Tracking technologies” section below, we process personal data to deliver ads targeted to your interests on other companies’ websites and mobile apps. Some of these activities may be considered “sharing” or “targeted advertising” under certain laws. You have the right to opt out of the processing of your personal data for targeted advertising, and can do so by adjusting your preferences using our Cookie Preferences Tool located on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
You also have the right to request the restriction of processing of your sensitive personal information. Where applicable, the respective sensitive personal information will be marked accordingly and may only be processed by us for certain purposes. At the current time, however, we do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes other than those expressed in this Privacy Notice or otherwise permitted by applicable law, and these uses cannot be limited under California law.
You may have additional rights under our
Binding Corporate Rules
in the EU. For example, where you believe your personal data has been transferred by an EU-based Twilio company to our US headquarters and processed by the US company in breach of the Binding Corporate Rules, you may have a right to:
Lodge a complaint with the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe;
Lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority in the same country as the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe; and
Bring a court action against the Twilio company that transferred your data outside Europe.
If Twilio processes your personal data as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will either direct you to contact our customer to exercise your rights.
How To Exercise Your Rights and Choices
The following sections provide information about how to exercise certain rights in relation to your personal data. To exercise any other rights, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
Accessing and Controlling Account Data
As part of our Services, we provide you with a number of self-service features at no additional cost within the Twilio console itself, including the ability to access your data, update any incorrect data, download a copy of your data, delete your data, or restrict the use of your data. You can make various choices about your Customer Account Data through the account portal when you log into your Twilio account or through the marketing preferences center. Any other requests about your data you cannot make through these self-service tools, you can request by contacting
Customer Support
.
Closing Your Account and Deletion
To request closure or deletion of your Twilio account, you can contact
Customer Support
. Please be aware that closure or deletion of your Twilio account will result in you permanently losing access to your account and the data in the account. After closure of your account, certain information associated with your account may remain on Twilio’s servers in an aggregated form that does not identify you. Similarly, after you close your account, we will retain data — including personal data — associated with your account that we are required to maintain for legal purposes or for necessary business operations (see “
How Long We Retain Personal  Data
” section above) until it’s no longer needed.
Identity Verification
In some instances, we will need to verify your identity before honoring your request. We will generally verify your identity by asking you to provide personal data related to your recent interactions with us. Thereafter, we will process your request and inform you of any decisions we have made about your request.  Additionally, you may exercise your privacy rights through an authorized agent. If we receive your request from an authorized agent, we may ask for evidence that you have provided such agent with a power of attorney or that the agent otherwise has valid written authority to submit requests to exercise rights on your behalf. If you are an authorized agent seeking to make a request, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
.
We won’t discriminate against you or change the price of our services if you make a request, but if you ask us to delete your data, it may affect your ability to use our Services.
Customer Proprietary Network Information (CPNI)
As an individual Twilio account holder or as an authorized representative of a Twilio customer in the US, you have the right to restrict Twilio’s use of
CPNI
. To opt-out of the use of CPNI data related to your Twilio account to market other Twilio Services based on your usage of our Services, click
here
.  Please note that, if you have subscribed for the services on behalf of an organization, the CPNI relates to the service usage by that organization and not you individually. Opting-out of the use of CPNI for marketing will not unsubscribe you from other types of marketing contacts from Twilio and will not affect the status of the services you currently have with us. Your approval or opt-out of the use of your CPNI outside of the services to which you are already subscribed is valid until you affirmatively revoke or limit such approval.
Communication Preferences
You can opt out of receiving marketing communications from us at any time through your marketing preferences page by clicking the “unsubscribe” link at the bottom of any marketing email you receive from Twilio. You can also
update your communication preferences
using our online form or contact our
Customer Support
Team to communicate your choice to opt out. Please note that it may take up to three days to remove your contact information from our marketing communications lists, so you may receive correspondence from us for a short time after you make your request. You will not be able to opt out of service emails from us, such as password reset emails, billing emails, or notifications of updates to our terms, unless you deactivate your account.
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
Twilio uses common information gathering tools such as cookies, web beacons, pixels and other similar tracking technologies to automatically collect information as you navigate our websites, your account or when you interact with emails we send to you.
Cookies
A cookie is a small text file that is stored in your browser or elsewhere on your hard drive. Cookies allow Twilio to identify your device as you navigate our websites or your account. This makes navigating and interacting with our websites or your account more efficient, easy and meaningful for you.
Twilio uses both session and persistent cookies. Session cookies are cookies that disappear from your computer or browser when you turn off your computer. Persistent cookies stay on your computer even after you’ve turned it off.
The cookies on our websites fall into three categories: (1) Required Cookies, (2) Functional Cookies, and (3) Advertising Cookies. To learn more about each category of cookie, you can visit our cookie consent tool by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting.
Manage Your Cookie Preferences
Twilio uses a cookie consent tool, which you can utilize to customize your cookie preferences. When you visit our website for the first time, a cookie consent banner will pop up and ask you to customize your cookie preferences. If you decide to change your preferences at a later date, you can easily do so by clicking on the “Cookie Preferences” link on the bottom right of the Twilio website you are visiting. Please note that Required Cookies cannot be disabled and if you decide to opt-out of Functional Cookies, certain functionality of our websites or your account may be impacted.  Any choices concerning cookies are browser and/or device specific. If you clear your cookies from your browser on any of your devices, your choices will need to be reset.
Manage Cookies Using Your Browser
In addition to using our Cookie Consent tool, you can use your browser settings to opt out of Functional Cookies and Advertising Cookies. For more information on how to do that, click
here
. To manage privacy and storage settings for cookies, click
here
.
Universal Opt-Out Mechanisms
Global Privacy Control (GPC) and Do Not Track (DNT) are tools that you can use to inform websites of your privacy preferences in regard to ad trackers. To set up GPC, you can visit the
Global Privacy Control
page. To set DNT, you can visit the
All About DNT
page. Please note that this may impact the functionality of our websites or your account.
Opt Out of Advertising Cookies
To learn more about how to opt out of targeting and advertising cookies, you can go to the
Your Online Choices
page, the
Network Advertising Initiative
page, and the
Digital Advertising Alliance’s Consumer Choice
page. These opt-out tools are provided by third parties, not Twilio. We do not control or operate these tools or the choices that advertisers and others provide through these tools.
Web Beacons
Twilio also uses web beacons to gather data about your use of our websites, your account, and how you interact with emails we have sent to you. Web beacons are clear electronic images that can recognize certain types of data on your computer, like when you view a particular website tied to the web beacon, and a description of a website tied to the web beacon. Additionally, we may put web beacons in marketing emails that notify us when you click on a link in the email that directs you to a Twilio website.
Children
Our Services are not directed to or intended to be used by children (under the age of 13 in the US and UK, or 16 in the EEA). We do not knowingly permit children to sign up for a Twilio account. If we become aware that a child has signed up for an account, we will take reasonable steps to deactivate the account and remove their personal data from our records as quickly as possible. If you believe an underage person has signed up for a Twilio account, please contact us at
privacy@twilio.com
with the subject line “Children”.
Automated Decision Making
Automated decision-making occurs when an electronic system uses personal data to make a decision about you, without human involvement. Twilio uses automated decision-making leveraging a variety of signals derived from records we collect or obtain from third party vendors, to help monitor, identify, and suspend accounts sending spam or engaging in other abusive or fraudulent activity.  We may also use this information to evaluate your account application and make decisions about whether to approve or decline. If your account is suspended or not approved under these circumstances you will be notified and given an opportunity to request human review of the decision.
We may rely on other automated decision-making where:
We have notified you of the decision and provided you with the opportunity to request a human review of the decision
It is necessary to perform a contract with you and appropriate measures are in place to safeguard your rights
We have your consent and we have put in place appropriate measures to safeguard your rights
How to Contact Us
If you have any questions, concerns or complaints about this Notice or our data protection practices, please do not hesitate to contact our Data Protection Officer by emailing us at
privacy@twilio.com
or by writing to us at any of the following addresses:
Worldwide Headquarters
Twilio Inc.
101 Spear Street, 5th Floor
San Francisco CA 94105
EEA Headquarters
Twilio Ireland Limited
70 Sir John Rogerson's Quay
Dublin 2
D02 R296, Ireland
Complaints
We will endeavor to resolve questions, concerns or complaints you raise with us in accordance with our
Complaints Handling Procedure
. In the unlikely event that we are unable to resolve your concern, you can find information about your options to seek assistance through independent dispute resolution mechanisms or complaints to your local data protection authority
here
.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Twilio commits to refer unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF to JAMS, an alternative dispute resolution provider based in the United States, the European Union, the United Kingdom, and/or Switzerland. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, please visit
https://www.jamsadr.com/DPF-Dispute-Resolution
for more information or to file a complaint. The services of JAMS are provided at no cost to you.
You have the possibility, under certain conditions, to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance that are not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms. You can find more information in the DPF
ANNEX-I-introduction.
If your question or complaint relates to personal data we process as a data processor on behalf of a customer, we will direct you to contact our customer to address your question or complaint.
Changes to Our Privacy Notice
We will periodically review this Notice and may change it to address legal, technical or business development requirements or make clarifications. When we change this Notice, the most current version will be available at
https://www/twilio.com/legal/privacy
with the date indicating when it was last updated. If we make material changes that affect your rights, we will provide you with advance notice, such as by posting a message in the Twilio console or sending an email to the address we have on file for you. We will comply with applicable law with respect to any changes we make to this Notice. We will also seek your consent to material changes, where required by applicable law.
Twilio Product Privacy
Twilio offers a range of industry-leading communications and customer data platform services to our customers. Depending on the Service, Twilio may be a data controller and data processor of personal data used to provide the Services.
Twilio processes personal data (Communications Usage Data and Customer Content) for most of our Services as a data processor acting on the instruction of our customer and in accordance with the terms of our agreement with a customer, our
Data Protection Addendum
, and service specific terms. Our Services provide customers with ways to control, access and secure their data.
We also offer customers the ability to store, delete, access, or exercise other choices about their personal data. The ability to make these choices depends on the Service being used and how it is being used by a customer. Customers are referred to our
API docs
for each of our Services, along with SendGrid’s
documentation
and Segment’s
documentation
to find more detailed information about managing personal data collected and stored in connection with their use of our Services. We also provide an overview of our retention and deletion practices, including how to delete data you control in our
support documentation
. We provide information about the security measures we use to protect our customer’s data  in our
Security Overview
, and if you are located in a country that requires you to obtain information about our supplemental measures, you may read more about those measures
here
.
For some of the Services we also act as a data controller where disclosed and agreed to by our customer in the agreement, Data Protection Addendum, product specific terms or via the customers’ use and configuration of a product or feature.As a data controller, Twilio is responsible for the processing of the personal data.
For more detail on our Services, please find information below or by visiting our
products page
.
Authy
The Authy service is our standalone two-factor authentication (2FA) service for desktop and mobile. The Authy apps generate one time passwords and push notifications that can be used as a part of a two-step verification process with your Authy-compatible accounts to add another layer of security. Authy’s 2FA can be used on its own or with applications that directly integrate with Authy’s 2-factor authentication API.
Due to the nature of the Authy service, Twilio collects the following additional personal data elements to our other Services:
Identifiers
Once you open the Authy app, we ask you to provide us with a phone number to create your Authy account. We send a verification code to that phone number to be sure that the person creating the Authy account also has control over the phone number entered. This phone number is considered your “primary device,” and will be the identifier for your Authy account. We use that phone number to identify you, to provide you 2FA services, and to maintain logs for security and anti-fraud purposes. We also collect your email address, and we use it for identity verification and account recovery purposes.
Device Information
When you download and open the Authy desktop or mobile app, we automatically collect information about the type of device you have downloaded the app on and your device identifier. We collect this to ensure we deliver the right version of the app for your device and so that we can provide appropriate follow up support as necessary. We also use your device information to ensure proper delivery of our service and to provide and deliver support and maintenance of the Authy app.
Login History and Authy Account History
When you use an Authy token to log into an account, whether the token was generated on the app or one sent to you via your phone number, we collect and keep information associated with your login activity including information like your IP address, what application you logged in to, that you logged in, and when. If you change your phone number or email associated with your Authy account, we will also keep a log of that. We collect this information to monitor for suspicious activity and also as another piece of information that could be used to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Geolocation information
If you have location services turned on, we collect your location based on your IP address. We use this information for anti-fraud purposes, to check for suspicious activity and as another piece of information we can use to verify your identity if we suspect your account may be compromised.
Frontline Services
To use the Frontline services, you must log in to the Frontline app using a third party account (through your Single Sign-On provider). The authentication of your login details is handled by that third party and we only collect the information you expressly agree to share with us at the time you give permission to link the Frontline app with the third party account. We only gather the information you and our customers give us access to, and we only use it for the purposes for which you and our customers have provided it to us. Please see the
Frontline App Terms
for specific details about your relationship with us.
SendGrid Services
The SendGrid services also collect additional data in the form of web beacons placed in the body of emails delivered using the SendGrid platform. This allows us to keep track of whether or not an email has been delivered, opened, clicked on, whether it bounced or was treated as spam. You can learn more about web beacons in the section titled “
How We Use Cookies and Other Tracking Technologies
” above.
Voice Intelligence
Voice Intelligence incorporates artificial intelligence and machine learning to transcribe and analyze voice calls into a structured format that allows our customers to drive their business processes. To translate voice calls into structured content, Twilio processes certain data as a controller, including personal data contained in voice calls disclosed to us by our customer through their use of the service.
Sub-policy 5
https://transloadit.com/legal/privacy/:
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Imprint
In order to provide this service, we capture and store information about you and about users
uploading material to the service:
As of 25 May 2018, the European General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) has come into force. We
wrote this post to outline what Transloadit - and our customers - can do to make sure the new rules
are being followed.
Who is responsible for data protection?
Since we are a small company, we do not have an external data officer. Responsible for data
protection are our founders Tim Koschützki and Kevin van Zonneveld. You can reach them at
founders@transloadit.com
.
What data is collected?
Transloadit collects and shares information about its customers. Since Transloadit is a B2B service,
this concerns data on businesses. We also receive a limited amount of data on our customers'
customers. These are the individuals or 'data subjects' that the GDPR specifically aims to protect,
and they come in contact with Transloadit when we handle their uploads or when they request the
status of encoding progress of their files.
As far as these cases are concerned, Transloadit receives the following
data
on end-users:
From the website
IP addresses
Request headers
Data entered on our website
The browser session (identified through a cookie)
Information used to analyze usage of our platform via self-hosted, GDPR compliant, anonymized
analytics
From the API
IP addresses
Request headers
Your user agent (browser, device, etc.)
Data submitted to our API (media files, uploads)
All data stored by us is only used for internal processing, and never sold or otherwise given away.
Since Transloadit does not store data on data subjects, migration or deletion tools are not
applicable.
What data is stored exactly?
Transloadit only stores links to uploaded media files in the status JSON of an
Assembly
.
We do not store any other data coming from data subjects.
From external providers
When a user uses the Uppy demo at transloadit.com to select files from external providers like
Google, Facebook (Meta), Dropbox, Box, OneDrive, we fetch data on behalf of users: The user's email
and the files or photos that they selected in the web UI. The email is only briefly shown in the UI,
but never stored anywhere. The files that the user has selected can be uploaded if the user chooses
to, in which case they will be stored on our servers for 24h under locations only known to the user
and for the sole reason of inspecting and evaluating the file uploading process that we offer, and
then automatically deleted. The data is never shared with third parties.
AI/ML model training
Transloadit does not use any data to train AI/Machine Learning models. Google Workspace APIs are
also not used to develop, improve, or train generalized AI and/or ML models.
Storing media files
Transloadit only stores temporary files, and we do
so for
24 hours
. Files are hashed and anonymized.
Transloadit employees only look at your files to troubleshoot problems. This rarely happens, and
when it does, we do so with the understanding that anything we see is to be kept strictly
confidential.
Any Transloadit employee or subcontractor with access to these systems will have signed an NDA,
which among other things, includes enforcing two-factor authentication for critical services,
encrypted drives, and password managers.
If it is important to you that the media files of your end-users, kept during the 24-hour window,
temporarily resides in a particular region, Transloadit currently operates in the regions:
us-east-1
(Virginia, USA)
eu-west-1
(Ireland)
ap-southeast-1
(Singapore)
By default, the endpoint
https://api2.transloadit.com/
is used, Transloadit will serve your users
from the region closest to them, but you can also opt to exclusively address one region, by using an
endpoint like
https://api2-eu-west-1.transloadit.com/
. In this case, no data for the request
leaves this region.
Storing Assemblies
Assemblies
contain links to the media files that have been uploaded by data subjects. If
the links point to files temporarily hosted by us, then these links will expire after 24 hours (at
the point when the associated files are discarded). Links to files that were exported to your own
storage system (Amazon S3, FTP server, Rackspace container, etc.) will expire based on the expiry
policy you set forth on these containers.
Assemblies
will be archived after three months following their creation. Any
Assembly Status
JSON will cease to be available through
https://api2.transloadit.com/assemblies/[[assembly_id]] after three months, along with all links to
media files uploaded for this
Assembly
. Assembly IDs are secure: only the data subject,
you as our customer and Transloadit staff know these Assembly IDs.
Third-party services
We use the following third-party services which also store data about you. Third party customer data
counts as personal data about you.
Supplier
Subject
Data
Encryption
Anonymized
Discarded
Archived
Transloadit
End user (data subject)
Browser identifiers except IP
Instantly
AWS S3
End user (data subject)
Media files
✅
>24h
AWS RDS
Customer (business)
Address, email
✅
>30d
AWS RDS
Customer (business)
Assembly metadata
✅
>30d
AWS RDS
Customer (business)
Credentials for writing to cloud storage
aes256
✅
AWS RDS
Customer (business)
Transloadit password
bcrypt
✅
Discourse
Customer (business)
Public support tickets
n/a
Intercom
Customer (business)
Browser identifiers
Intercom
Customer (business)
Support tickets
Sentry
Customer (business)
Browser errors
✅
✅
Papertrail
Customer (business)
Logs
>7d
Stripe
Customer (business)
Credit card data
PCI compliant
Zoom
Customer (business)
Temporary file download to local server for transcoding
Instantly
Encryption
: At rest. All connections in transit are
protected by tls
Anonymized
: Any data that can be used to identify the 'data subject' is scrubbed
Discarded
: Data is destroyed
Archived
: Data is accessible only by founders
Transloadit's API can optionally use YouTube API Services when exporting files to the YouTube
platform if you so instruct in your
Template
. If you use this feature, Googles Privacy
Policy applies additionally to all data that is sent to YouTube. A copy of this policy can be found
here:
https://www.google.com/policies/privacy
.
For reference, we do not process, save or share any user data when exporting videos to YouTube using
🤖/youtube/store
. Nevertheless, you can manage Transloadit's
access to your Google account at any time in the
Google security settings
.
Breach notifications
In the event that your private data or API-uploaded temporary files are disclosed to unauthorized
people (such as hackers), Transloadit will send out email notifications to all possibly affected
parties. We will also update our blog at https://transloadit.com/blog, our Twitter account at
https://twitter.com/transloadit and our status page at https://transloaditstatus.com.
Your information and your rights
If you are based within the EEA (European Economic Area) or within another jurisdiction that has
similar data protection laws, under certain circumstances, you have the following rights:
the right to be told how we use your information and obtain access to your information;
the right to have your information rectified or erased, or to place restrictions on processing
your information;
the right to object to the processing of your information e.g. for direct marketing purposes or
where the processing is based on our legitimate interests;
the right to have any information you provided to us on an automated basis returned to you in a
structured, commonly-used and machine-readable format, or sent directly to another company, where
technically feasible (“data portability”);
where the processing of your information is based on your consent, the right to withdraw that
consent subject to legal or contractual restrictions;
the right to object to any decisions based on the automated processing of your personal data,
including profiling; and
the right to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority responsible for data protection
matters (e.g. in the UK, the Information Commissioner’s Office).
If you request a copy of your information, you may be required to pay a statutory fee.
If we hold any information about you which is incorrect or if there are any changes to your details,
please let us know so that we can keep our records accurate and up to date.
If you withdraw your consent to the use of your personal information for purposes set out in our
Privacy Policy, we may not be able to provide you with access to (parts of) our website,
applications, and services.
We will retain your personal information for the duration of our business relationship and
afterwards for as long as is necessary and relevant for our legitimate business purposes, or as
otherwise permitted by applicable laws and regulations. When we no longer need your personal
information, we will dispose of it in a secure manner (without further notice to you).
Changes to our privacy policy
We may change this privacy policy from time to time. Nevertheless, we will not reduce your rights
under this privacy policy. We will always update the privacy policy on our website, so please try to
read it when you visit the website (the ‘last updated’ reference tells you when we last updated this
privacy policy).
Cookies, analytics and traffic data
Cookies are small text files that are transferred from our website and stored on your device. We use
cookies to help us provide you with a personalized service, and to help make our website and service
better for you.
Our cookies may be session cookies (temporary cookies that identify and track users within our
websites) which are deleted when you close your browser or persistent cookies (cookies that enable
our website to “remember” who you are and to remember your preferences within our website) which
will stay on your computer or device after you close your browser).
We only use strictly necessary cookies. For analytics, we use a self-hosted service that is GDPR
compliant and anonymizes data on impact. We also don't share any remaining data. The cookies that
remain are required for our website to work, meaning that under EU law, we are not required to show
any cookie banners.
Data Processing Addendum (DPA)
If you require a countersigned copy of our DPA, please
reach
out to support
.
Last Updated
This privacy policy was last updated on September 28, 2024.
Sub-policy 6
https://www.brightcove.com/en/legal/services-privacy-policy/:
Page not found.
Sorry, we couldn’t find the page you’re looking for.
Back to home
Sub-policy 7
https://www.intercom.com/legal/privacy:
blank
blank
blank
blank
blank
Skip to content
Terms & Policies
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Intercom Additional Product Terms
Privacy Policy
Data Processing Addendum
Product Privacy Notice
Intercom Regional Data Hosting Addendum
Support Policy
Premier Services Policy
Cookie Policy
Security Policy
Subprocessors List
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Intercom Website Terms of Use
Academy Terms
Service Level Agreement
Acceptable Use Policy
Code of Conduct
Trademark Usage
Intercom Global Anti-Corruption Statement
Intercom Partner Code of Conduct
Intercom DMCA Policy
Law Enforcement Guidelines
European Digital Services Act Notice
Terms of Service
Definitions
Intercom Services
Customer Data and Customer Obligations
Security
Third-Party Platforms and Third Party Messaging Apps
Ownership
Subscription Term, Fees & Payment
Term and Termination
Limited Warranty
Availability
Support
Limitation of Remedies and Damages
Indemnification
Confidential Information
Publicity
General Terms
Intercom Additional Product Terms
Privacy Policy
Purpose and Scope
Personal Data Collected by Intercom
How and Why We Use Your Personal Data
Sharing Your Personal Data
Retention of Your Personal Data
Transfers of Your Personal Data
How We Store and Safeguard Personal Data
Your Privacy Rights and Choices
Children’s Privacy
Changes to this Notice and Questions
Collection and Use of Personal Data of California Residents
Data Processing Addendum
Product Privacy Notice
Intercom Regional Data Hosting Addendum
Scope
RDH Services
Exhibit A to the RDH Addendum: European Data Hosting
Exhibit B to the RDH Addendum: Australian Data Hosting
Support Policy
Premier Services Policy
Cookie Policy
Introduction
Cookies and similar technologies and the processing of personal data
What are cookies?
Why do we use cookies?
What type of cookies do we use and what are they used for?
Security Policy
Overview
Security Team
Best Practices
Infrastructure
Data
Data Transfer
Authentication
Permissions and Admin Controls
Application Monitoring
Security Audits and Certifications
Customer Responsibilities
Subprocessors List
Data Privacy Framework Notice
Intercom Website Terms of Use
Acceptance of Terms
Permission to Use the Site
User Content
Restrictions on User Content and Your Conduct
Intellectual Property Rights in User Content
User Content You Post Becomes Public
We Are Not Responsible for User Content
Proprietary Rights
Enforcement of Copyrights
Notify Us of Infringers
How to Communicate with Us
Site Availability
Links to Other Sites
Warranty Disclaimer
Limitation of Liability
Indemnity
Termination and Suspension
Governing Law and Dispute Resolution
General Terms
Academy Terms
Intercom Academy Terms
Access
Participant Responsibilities
Restrictions on Use
Badges
Ownership
Feedback
Privacy
Suspension and Termination
Disclaimer
Modifications
Independent Contractors
Service Level Agreement
Acceptable Use Policy
Code of Conduct
Our Code Of Conduct
Speak Up
Potential Consequences Of Code Violations
Promote Labor, Employment, And Immigration Compliance
Prevent Harassment And Discrimination
Conflicts Of Interest
Keep Clear And Accurate Financial Records
Business Partner Relationships
Zero-Tolerance For Corruption
Avoid Improper Gifts And Entertainment
Respect Trade Controls
Keep Intercom Secrets Safe
Protect Intercom Assets And Promote Our Solutions
Protect Our Employee And Customer Information
Fair Competition
Use Social Media Responsibly
Promote Sustainability
Protect And Celebrate Our Culture
Trademark Usage
Intercom Marks and License
Permissible Use of the Intercom Marks
Impermissible Use of the Intercom Marks
Termination
Ownership
No Warranties
Your Liability for Third-Party Claims
Additional Legal
Questions
Intercom Global Anti-Corruption Statement
Summary
Bribery and Kickbacks
Records and Reporting
Applicability and Enforcement
Intercom Partner Code of Conduct
Labor and Employment Laws
Anti Corruption Laws
Competition
International Trade and Export Controls
Recordkeeping, Financial Integrity, and Honest and Accurate Dealings
Intellectual Property and Confidential Information
Raising Issues and Concerns
Certification and Application
Intercom DMCA Policy
Law Enforcement Guidelines
European Digital Services Act Notice
Effective day
1 November 2024
1. PURPOSE AND SCOPE
1.1 At Intercom, we respect your privacy and data protection rights and recognize the importance of protecting the personal data we collect and process. This Privacy Policy is designed to help you to understand what personal data we collect about you and how we use and share it.
1.2 When we refer to Intercom, we mean Intercom R&D Unlimited Company, a company registered in Ireland with offices at 124 St Stephen's Green, Dublin 2, DC02 C628; Intercom, Inc. a Delaware corporation with offices at 55 2nd Street, 4th Fl., San Francisco, CA 94105, USA; Intercom Software UK Limited, a private limited company registered in the United Kingdom ("
UK
") with offices at Level 9, the Warehouse 207-211 Old St, London, EC1V 9NR UK; Intercom Software Australia Pty Ltd, a company registered in Australia with offices at 285A Crown St. Surry Hills NSW 2010, Australia, 1st Floor, Sydney, and Intercom's group companies ("
Intercom
", "
we
", "
us
", "
our
").
1.3 This Privacy Policy applies to you if you:
interact with any of Intercom’s websites (including
www.intercom.com
and
www.intercom.io
) or our social media pages (collectively, the "Sites") ("
website users
");
visit any of Intercom’s premises ("
office visitors
");
attend an Intercom event or an event which Intercom sponsors ("
event attendees
");
use Intercom's communication and messaging products, customer workspaces, mobile applications, and our other applications and services (collectively, the "
Intercom Services
") ("
customers
");
are a marketing prospect, who is anyone whose data Intercom processes for the purposes of assessing customer eligibility ("
marketing prospect
"); or
receive marketing communications from Intercom.
The below Privacy Policy applies to you irrespective of where you are based. There are certain additional parts of the Privacy Policy that will apply to you where you are a resident of the EEA, UK, Switzerland, or California. These additional parts do not apply to everyone.
1.4 For the purposes of the General Data Protection Regulation (or any successor or equivalent legislation in the UK) ("
GDPR
"), either Intercom R&D Unlimited Company or Intercom, Inc., Intercom Software UK Limited, Intercom Software Australia Pty Ltd, or any other Intercom group company from time to time, is the controller of your personal data.
2. PERSONAL DATA COLLECTED BY INTERCOM
2.1 PERSONAL DATA WE COLLECT AND RECEIVE
The personal data that we collect about you broadly falls into the categories set out in the following table. Some of this information you provide voluntarily when you interact with the Intercom Services and Sites, or when you attend an event or visit our premises. Other types of information may be collected automatically from your device, such as device data and service data. From time to time, we may also receive personal data about you from third party sources (as further described in the table).
Registration, contact, and company information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
avatars;
company name;
your role in your company.
Payment information:
credit card information;
billing and mailing addresses;
other payment-related information.
Device data:
operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model;
browser type;
screen resolution;
IP address;
unique device identifiers.
Service data:
the website you visited before browsing to the Intercom Services;
how long you spent on a page or screen;
how you interact with our emails;
navigation paths between pages or screens;
date and time;
pages viewed;
links clicked.
Third party source data:
profile information gathered from social networking sites;
information that you have viewed or interacted with our content;
company information;
job titles;
avatars;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
addresses;
approximate geolocation data.
The sources of this third party personal data may include:
contact enrichment and lead generation providers; and
targeted online advertising providers
Registration, contact and company information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
company name;
Payment information:
credit card information;
billing and mailing addresses;
other payment-related information.
Visitation Data
time and date of arrival;
photograph ID;
signature;
CCTV footage.
Registration, contact and company information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
mailing addresses;
company name;
your role in your company.
Visitation Data
time and date of arrival;
photograph ID;
signature;
CCTV footage.
Third party source data:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
mailing addresses;
company name;
your role in your company.
The sources of this third party personal data may include:
The event organizer
Registration and contact information:
first and last names;
email addresses;
phone numbers;
mailing addresses;
company name;
your role in your company.
Payment information:
credit card information;
billing and mailing addresses;
other payment-related information.
Device data:
operating system type and version number, manufacturer and model;
browser type and language;
screen resolution;
IP address;
unique device identifiers.
Service data:
the website you visited before browsing to the services;
how long you spent on a page or screen;
navigation paths between pages or screens;
session date and time;
activity status (including first seen, last seen, last heard from - and last contacted);
pages viewed;
links clicked;
language preferences
tags applied within customer accounts
Intercom assigned user identifier.
Third party source data
profile information gathered from social networking sites;
information that you have viewed or interacted with our content;
company information;
job titles;
avatars;
email addresses;
phone number;
approximate geolocation data.
The sources of this third party personal data may include:
Our identity resolution and insight management provider; and
Our geolocation IP intelligence provider
2.2 COOKIES AND OTHER TRACKING TECHNOLOGIES
Some device data, service data and third party source data is collected through the use of first or third party cookies and similar technologies. The Intercom Messenger service (and specifically the domains widget.intercom.io and api-iam.intercom.io) does not collect, retain, or share data regarding a particular user's activity across multiple websites or applications that are not owned by Intercom. Intercom does assign each user a unique user ID within the scope of an individual website, but does not collect or retain IP or any information that would allow Intercom to identify the same particular user on more than one website. For more information, please see Intercom's
Cookie Policy
.
Do Not Track
. Some Internet browsers may be configured to send "Do Not Track" signals to the online services that you visit. We currently do not respond to "Do Not Track" or similar signals. To find out more about "Do Not Track," please visit
http://www.allaboutdnt.com
.
3. HOW AND WHY WE USE YOUR PERSONAL DATA
3.1 We collect and process your personal data for the following purposes and, if you are from the European Economic Area (EEA), the UK or Switzerland, on the following legal bases:
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
: We process your personal data to perform our contract with you for use of our Services and Sites and to fulfill our obligations under applicable terms of service. Where we have not entered into a contract with you, we process your personal data in reliance on our legitimate interests to operate and administer the Intercom Services and Sites. For example, to create, administer and manage your account.
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
: We may send you service, technical and other administrative messages in reliance on our legitimate interests in administering the Intercom Services. For example, we may send you messages about the availability or security of the Intercom Services. We also process your personal data to respond to your comments and questions and to provide customer care and support. When we have entered into an agreement with you, we process your personal data as necessary to meet our contractual obligations to you.
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
: We process your personal data to improve and optimize the Intercom Services and Sites and to understand how you use the Intercom Services and Sites, including to monitor usage or traffic patterns and to analyze trends and develop new products, services, features and functionality in reliance on our legitimate interests or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your consent.
Sending marketing communications
: We process your personal data to send you marketing communications via email, post or SMS about our products, services and upcoming events that might interest you in reliance on our legitimate interests or where we seek your consent. Please see the "Your Privacy Rights and Choices" section below to learn how you can control your marketing preferences.
Registering office visitors
: We process your personal data for security reasons and for the purpose of hosting your visit to the extent such processing is necessary for our legitimate interests in protecting our premises and confidential information against unauthorized access and the safety of our staff and office visitors.
Managing event registrations and attendance
: We process your personal data to plan and host events for which you have registered or that you attend, including sending related communications to you. This processing is based on our legitimate interest in ensuring the successful organization of the event, as well as providing you with relevant information regarding your participation.
Maintaining security of the Intercom Services and Sites
: We process your personal data to control unauthorized use or abuse of the Intercom Services and Sites, or otherwise detect, investigate or prevent activities that may violate Intercom policies or applicable laws, in reliance on our legitimate interests to maintain and promote the safety and security of the Intercom Sites and Services.
Displaying personalized advertisements
: We process your personal data to advertise to you and to provide personalized information, including by serving and managing advertisements on our Sites and on third party sites, in reliance on our legitimate interests to support our marketing activities and advertise our products and services or, where necessary, to the extent you have provided your consent.
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
: including invoicing, audits, fraud monitoring and prevention. This processing is based on our legitimate interest in ensuring efficient business operations and on the necessity to comply with legal obligations.
Complying with legal obligations
: We process your personal data when cooperating or complying with public and government authorities, courts or regulators in accordance with our obligations under applicable laws and to protect against imminent harm to our rights, property or safety, or that of our users or the public, as required or permitted by law.
3.2 In certain circumstances, we may collect your personal data on a different legal basis. If we do, or if we use your personal data for purposes that are not compatible with, or are materially different than, the purposes described in this notice or the point of collection, we will explain how and why we use your personal data in a supplementary notice at or before the point of collection. Where we refer to legal bases in this section we mean the legal grounds on which organizations can rely when processing personal data.
3.3 Please note these legal bases only apply to you if you are resident in the EEA, the UK or Switzerland.
3.4 If you have any questions about our legal bases for processing your personal data, please contact us through our
Privacy Request Form
.
4. SHARING YOUR PERSONAL DATA
4.1 We may disclose some or all of the personal data we collect to the following third parties:
To Intercom Group Companies:
Intercom Inc.;
Intercom R&D Unlimited Company;
Intercom Software UK Limited;
Intercom Software Australia Pty Ltd;
Any such other group companies, as may be added to this list from time to time.
Service Providers:
Consultants and vendors engaged by us to support our provision of the Intercom Services and Sites and the operation of our business;
Any such other Service Providers, as may be added to the
Subprocessor list
, from time to time.
Advertising Partners:
Third party advertising companies may use cookies and similar technologies to collect information about your activity on the Intercom Services and other online services over time to serve you online targeted advertisements, including the companies listed in the third-party cookies section of our
Cookie Policy
.
Professional Advisors:
Professional advisors, such as lawyers, auditors and insurers, in the course of the professional services that they render to us.
Compliance with Law Enforcement:
Comply with applicable laws, lawful requests, and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas or requests from government authorities;
Protect our, your or others’ rights, privacy, safety or property (including by making and defending legal claims);
Enforce the terms and conditions that govern the Services; and
Prevent, identify, investigate and deter fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft.
Business Transfers:
Parties to transactions or potential transactions (and their professional advisors) involving a corporate divestiture, merger, consolidation, acquisition, reorganization, sale or other disposition of all or any portion of the business, assets, or equity interests of Intercom Group Companies (including, as part of a bankruptcy or similar proceeding).
4.2
Aggregated or anonymized information
. We may also share aggregated or anonymized information with third parties for other purposes. Such information does not identify you individually, but may include usage, viewing and technical information such as the websites you generally use, the configuration of your computer, and performance metrics related to the use of websites which we collect through our technology, products and services. If we are required under applicable law to treat such information as personal data, then we will only disclose it as described above. Otherwise, we may disclose such information for any reason.
4.3
Third party websites
. The Sites may also contain links to third party websites. This Privacy Policy applies solely to information processed by us. You should contact the relevant third party websites for more information about how your personal data is processed by them.
5. RETENTION OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
5.1 We retain your personal data only for as long as necessary to fulfill the purposes set out in this Privacy Policy.
5.2 Note that content you post may remain on the Sites even if you cease using the Sites or we terminate access to the Sites.
6. TRANSFERS OF YOUR PERSONAL DATA
6.1 The Intercom Services and Sites, and our messenger domains are provided and hosted in the United States. If you are located outside the United States, we may transfer, and process, your personal data outside of the country in which you are resident to other Intercom Group Companies and our service providers including to, Ireland, the UK, Australia and other such countries as we deem appropriate from time to time. These countries may not have equivalent privacy and data protection laws (and, in some cases, may not be as protective). We will protect your personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy wherever it is processed.
6.2 Certain recipients (our service providers and other companies) who process your personal data on our behalf may also transfer personal data outside the country in which you are resident. Where such transfers occur, we will make sure that an appropriate transfer agreement is put in place to protect your personal data.
6.3 If you are a resident of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, we will protect your personal data when it is transferred outside of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland by processing it in a territory which the European Commission has determined provides an adequate level of protection for personal data; or otherwise ensuring appropriate safeguards are in place to protect your personal data. For transfers of your personal data to:
Intercom Group Companies based in the US, we rely on the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“
EU-U.S. DPF
”), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF (“
UK-U.S. DPF
”), and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (“
Swiss-U.S. DPF
”) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (“
DPF
”) program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
;
other Intercom Group Companies based outside of the US, we rely on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) or the UK International Data Transfer Agreement (IDTA); and
recipients who are located outside of the EEA, the UK or Switzerland, we rely on the EU-U.S. DPF, UK-U.S. DPF or Swiss-U.S. DPF where those recipients are located in the US or for onward transfers from the US, and otherwise we rely on the EU Standard Contractual Clauses (SCCs) or the UK International Data Transfer Agreement (IDTA).
6.4 Intercom, Inc. complies with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce.  Intercom, Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to (i) the EU-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK-U.S. DPF and (ii) the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.  If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern.  To learn more about the DPF program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
6.5 In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Intercom, Inc. commits to resolve DPF Principles-related complaints about our collection and use of your Personal Information. EU, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our handling of Personal Information received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF or the Swiss-U.S. DPF should first contact Intercom through our
Privacy Request Form
.
6.6 In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF, Intercom, Inc. commits to cooperate and comply respectively with the advice of the panel established by the EU data protection authorities (“
DPAs
“), the UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO), the Gibraltar Regulatory Authority (“
GRA
“) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (“
FDPIC
“) with regard to unresolved complaints concerning our handling of personal data received in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF and the Swiss-U.S. DPF. Under certain conditions, it may be possible to invoke binding arbitration for complaints regarding DPF compliance not resolved by any of the other DPF mechanisms, see
here
for additional information.
Intercom, Inc. remains responsible if its service provider, when acting on its behalf, processes personal data in a manner inconsistent with the DPF Principles, unless it is not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage.
The Federal Trade Commission has jurisdiction over Intercom, Inc.’s compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework EU-U.S. DPF, the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
7. HOW WE STORE AND SAFEGUARD PERSONAL DATA
We care about protecting personal data. That is why we put in place appropriate measures that are designed to secure your personal data. You can find out more about our technical and organizational safeguards on our Security page:
https://www.intercom.com/security
.
8. YOUR PRIVACY RIGHTS AND CHOICES
8.1 Depending on your location and subject to applicable laws, you may have certain data protection rights. If you are a resident of the EEA or the UK you have the following data protection rights:
If you wish to access, correct, update or request deletion of your personal data, you can do so at any time.
You can object to processing of your personal data, ask us to restrict processing of your personal data or request portability of your personal data.
You have the right to opt-out of marketing communications we send you at any time. If you no longer wish to receive our newsletter and promotional communications, you may opt-out of receiving them by clicking on the "unsubscribe" or "opt-out" link in the communications we send you. Please note, however, that it may not be possible to opt-out of certain service-related communications. You can let us know at any time if you do not wish to receive marketing messages by contacting us on the Intercom Messenger or by contacting us using the contact details below.
Similarly, if we have collected and processed your personal data with your consent, then you can withdraw your consent at any time. Withdrawing your consent will not affect the lawfulness of any processing we conducted prior to your withdrawal, nor will it affect processing of your personal data conducted in reliance on lawful processing grounds other than consent.
You have the right to complain to a data protection authority about our collection and use of your personal data. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority. Contact details for data protection authorities in the EEA and the UK are available
here
.
8.2 You can exercise any of these rights by submitting a request through our
Privacy Request Form
.
8.3 If you are a California resident, you can find information about how we use your personal data and about your privacy rights in
Section 11
of this notice.
9. CHILDREN'S PRIVACY
Our Services and Sites are not intended for use by anyone under the age of 16. Intercom does not knowingly collect personal data from anyone under the age of 16. If you are under 16, you may not attempt to register for our Services or send any information about yourself to us, including your name, address, telephone number, or email address. If we become aware that we have collected personal data from someone under the age of 16 without verification of parental consent, we will delete that information promptly. If you are a parent or legal guardian of a child under 16 and believe that a child has provided us with their personal data, please contact us through our Privacy Request Form.
10. CHANGES TO THIS NOTICE AND QUESTIONS
10.1 We may amend this Privacy Policy from time to time in response to changing legal, technical or business developments. When we update it, we will take appropriate measures to inform you, consistent with the significance of the changes we make. If we make material updates to this Privacy Policy we will update the effective date at the top of the Privacy Policy.
10.2 We have appointed a Data Protection Officer responsible for managing and addressing inquiries related to this Privacy Policy. If you have any questions, comments or concerns about this Privacy Policy or the way your personal data is being used or processed by Intercom, please contact us through our Privacy Request Form or by using the Contact Us link in the footer of this page.
11. COLLECTION AND USE OF PERSONAL DATA OF CALIFORNIA RESIDENTS
11.1 SCOPE
Except as otherwise provided, this Section 11 applies only if you are a California resident. For purposes of this section, "Personal Information" has the meaning given in the California Consumer Privacy Act ("
CCPA
"), the California Privacy Rights Act of 2020 ("
CPRA
"), and any regulations promulgated under either law, in each case, as amended from time to time.
This Section 11 does not apply to;
information exempted from the scope of the CCPA;
activities governed by a different privacy notice, such as notices we give to California personnel or job candidates; or
Personal Information we collect, use, and share on behalf of our customers as a "
service provider
" under the CCPA.
11.2 YOUR CALIFORNIA PRIVACY RIGHTS
You have the following rights:
Right to Information/Know
You can request whether we have collected your Personal Information, and in certain cases, the following information about how we have collected and used your Personal Information during the past 12 months:
The categories of Personal Information we have collected.
The categories of sources from which we collected the Personal Information.
The business or commercial purpose for collecting, sharing, and/or selling Personal Information.
The categories of Personal Information that we sold or disclosed for a business purpose.
The categories of third parties to whom Personal Information was sold, shared, or disclosed for a business purpose.
Right to Access
. You can request a copy of the Personal Information that we have collected about you during the past 12 months.
Right to Correction
. You can request that we correct inaccurate Personal Information that we have collected about you.
Right to Deletion
. You can ask us to delete the Personal Information that we have collected from you.
Right to Opt-Out of Tracking for Targeted Advertising Purposes
. While we do not sell Personal Information for money, like many companies, we use services that help deliver targeted ads (also known as interest-based ads) to you, as we have described in the “How and Why We Use Your Personal Data” section above. The CCPA classifies our use of some of these services as “sharing” your Personal Information with the advertising partners that provide the services, from which you have the right to opt-out.
Right to Nondiscrimination
. You are entitled to exercise the rights described above free from discrimination prohibited by the CCPA.
11.3 HOW TO EXERCISE YOUR RIGHTS
Right to Information/Know, Access, Correction, and Deletion
. You can exercise any of these rights by submitting a request through our
Privacy Request Form
or by mailing us at 55 2nd Street, 4th Fl., San Francisco, CA 94105, USA, Attention: Compliance.
Right to Opt-Out of Tracking for Targeted Advertising Purposes
. You can submit requests to opt-out of tracking for targeted advertising purposes by using our
Your Privacy Choices
. Your request to opt-out will apply only to the browser and the device from which you submit the request.
Verification of Identity
. We will need to verify your identity to process your information/know, access, correction, and deletion requests and reserve the right to confirm your California residency. To verify your identity, we may require you to log into an Intercom online account (if applicable), provide government identification, give a declaration as to your identity under penalty of perjury, and/or provide additional information. These rights are not absolute, and in some instances, we may decline your request as permitted by law.
Authorized Agents
. Your authorized agent may make a request on your behalf upon our verification of the agent's identity and our receipt of a copy of the valid power of attorney given to your authorized agent pursuant to California Probate Code Sections 4000-4465. If you have not provided your agent with such a power of attorney, you must provide your agent with written and signed permission to exercise your CCPA rights on your behalf, provide the information we request to verify your identity and provide us with written confirmation that you have given the authorized agent permission to submit the request.
11.4 PERSONAL INFORMATION THAT WE COLLECT, USE AND DISCLOSE
The table below describes our Personal Information practices by reference to the categories in the “Personal Data Collected by Intercom” section above and the categories described in the CCPA (Cal. Civ. Code Section 1798.140(v)) and describes our practices currently and during the 12 months preceding the effective date of this Privacy Policy. Information you voluntarily provide to us, such as in free-form webforms, may contain other categories of personal information not described below. Note that:
We do not “sell” personal information as defined by the CCPA and have not sold Personal Information in the preceding 12 months.
We do not use or disclose sensitive personal information for purposes that California residents have a right to limit under the CCPA.
CCPA statutory category
Personal Information “PI” we collect in this category
Business/commercial purpose for collection
Categories of third parties to whom we “disclose” PI for a business purpose
Categories of third parties with whom we “share” PI
Identifiers
Registration, contact, and company information
Visitation data
Third party source data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Registering office visitors
Managing event registrations and attendance
Maintaining security of the Intercom Services and Sites
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Professional or employment- related data
Registration, contact, and company information
Third party source data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Registering office visitors
Managing event registrations and attendance
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Financial information
Payment information
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
None
Internet or network information
Device data
Service data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Communicating with you about the Intercom Services and providing customer support
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Maintaining security of the Intercom Services and Sites
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Complying with legal obligations
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
Sensory information
Registration, contact, and company information
Visitation data
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Registering office visitors
Managing event registrations and attendance
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
None
Inferences
Data derived from the above categories
Providing and facilitating delivery of the Intercom Services and Sites
Improving the Intercom Services and Sites
Sending marketing communications
Displaying personalized advertisements
Carrying out other legitimate business purposes
Intercom group companies
Service providers
Advertising partners
Professional advisors
Authorities and others
Business transferees
Advertising partners (to facilitate online advertising)
This site uses cookies and similar technologies ("cookies") as strictly necessary for site operation. We and our partners also would like to set additional cookies to enable site performance analytics, functionality, advertising and social media features. See our
Cookie Policy
for details. You can change your cookie preferences in our Cookie Settings.
Reject All
Accept All
Manage your cookies
Sub-policy 8
https://www.surveymonkey.com/mp/legal/privacy/:
Overview
Terms of Use
Governing Services Agreement
Service-Specific Terms
Privacy Basics
Privacy Notice
1. Introduction
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
5. Data Retention
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
7. Security
8. Minors
9. Data Transfers
10. Who is my data controller?
11. Your rights
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
13. Information specific to other services
Cookies
Cookies Used on Survey Pages
Acceptable Uses Policy
Security
General
Print this Page
Privacy Notice
Versions:
December 5, 2024 (current)
November 7, 2024
July 15, 2024
February 15, 2024
November 1, 2023
September 22, 2023
August 1, 2023
June 15, 2023
October 10, 2022
August 16, 2021
July 1, 2021
November 2, 2020
August 6, 2020
July 7, 2020
November 20, 2019
September 26, 2019
January 2, 2019
April 11, 2018
LAST UPDATED: December 5, 2024
1. Introduction
1.1 Scope
This Privacy Notice applies to all the products, services, websites and apps offered by  SurveyMonkey Inc., SurveyMonkey Europe UC, SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda., SurveyMonkey Netherlands B.V., and other SurveyMonkey affiliates (collectively “SurveyMonkey”), except where otherwise noted. The services include SurveyMonkey, SurveyMonkey Apply, SurveyMonkey Audience, SurveyMonkey Rewards, SurveyMonkey Contribute, Wufoo, TechValidate, GetFeedback Direct, and GetFeedback Digital. We refer to those products, services, websites, and apps collectively as the “services” in this Privacy Notice. Unless otherwise noted in your contract, our services are provided by SurveyMonkey Inc. inside of the United States, by SurveyMonkey Brasil Internet Ltda. inside of Brazil, and by SurveyMonkey Europe UC everywhere else.
US residents: Please visit our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
for more information on our privacy practices specific to individual states.
This Privacy Notice does not apply to personal information we collect from our employees or job applicants in their capacity as employees or candidates. Employees and candidates should refer to our Employee Privacy Notice or
Candidate Privacy Notice
, respectively.
1.2
Quick Links
If you want to identify your data controller please see the “
Who is my data controller?
” section below.
For a quick snapshot of how SurveyMonkey treats personal information see our
Privacy Basics
.
2. Personal Data we collect and the sources
2.1 What do we mean by 'Personal Data'?
References in this Privacy Notice to data, personal information, or information, are all references to Personal Data. Personal Data means information relating to a living individual (a "Data Subject") who is, or can be, reasonably identified from the information, either alone or in conjunction with other information.
2.2 Who do we collect data about?
We group consumers or businesses into the following categories:
Creator
: the business or consumer that holds an account within a SurveyMonkey service that either directly creates surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires or that can collaborate, commenting, or review surveys, forms, applications, or questionnaires within an account.
Respondent
: the individual that receives a survey, form, application, or questionnaire powered by a SurveyMonkey service.
Panelist
: the individual that uses Contribute or Rewards to take surveys sent by SurveyMonkey on behalf of Creators, or an individual that receives surveys through a third party panel provider. Privacy information specific to panelists can be found in our
Contribute Privacy Notice
,
Rewards Privacy Notice
, and
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
.
Visitor
: you are just visiting one of our websites because you are curious,  have been invited to review a survey as a guest, or you have heard about us from our marketing and sales channels!
2.3 Types of Personal Data We Collect
(a) Contact information.
You might provide us with your contact information (for example: name or email address), whether through use of our services, a form on our website, an interaction with our sales or customer support team, or a response to one of SurveyMonkey’s own surveys or forms.
(b) Cookie information.
We use first party and third party cookies and tracking services that employ cookies and page tags (also known as
web beacons
) to collect data about visitors to our websites. This data includes usage and user statistics. Emails sent by SurveyMonkey or by users through our services also include page tags that allow the sender to collect information about who opened those emails and clicked on links in them. We provide more information on cookies in our
Cookies Notice.
(c) Customer support information.
We collect information submitted through our Customer Support portal, such as name, email, and message text. We also record the content of Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales calls.
(d) Usage information.
We collect usage information about you whenever you interact with our websites and services. This includes which webpages you visit, what you click on, when you perform those actions, what language preference you have, what you buy and so on.
(e) Device and browser data.
We collect information from the device and application you use to access our services. Device data mainly means your IP address, operating system version, device type, device ID/MAC address, system and performance information, browser type, and other device, network and browser signals. If you are on a mobile device we also collect the UUID for that device. We also infer your geographic location based on your IP address.
(f) Event data.
Like most websites today, our web servers keep log files that record data each time a device accesses those servers. The log files contain data about the nature of each access, including originating IP addresses, internet service providers, the files viewed on our site (e.g., HTML pages, graphics, etc.), operating system versions, device type and timestamps.
(g) Referral information.
If you arrive at a SurveyMonkey website from an external source (such as a link on another website or in an email) or have been invited to review a survey as a guest, we record information about the source that referred you to us.
(h) Integration data.
We collect information from third parties with whom SurveyMonkey enables integrations in order to allow you to use both services.
(i) Account information.
Registration information.
You need a SurveyMonkey account before you can use SurveyMonkey services. When you register for an account, we collect your first and last name, username, password and email address.
Billing information.
If you make a payment to SurveyMonkey, we require you to provide your billing details, a name, address, email address and financial information corresponding to your selected method of payment (e.g., a credit card number and expiration date or a bank account number). If you provide a billing address, we will regard that as the location of the account holder to determine the SurveyMonkey entity with whom you contract and the sales tax, if applicable, to be applied to your purchase.
Account settings.
You can set various preferences and personal details on pages like your
account settings page
(or on your account settings page for our other products as applicable). These may include, for example, your default language, time zone and communication preferences (e.g., opting in or out of receiving marketing communications from SurveyMonkey).
(j) Address book information.
We may allow you to import email addresses and other contact information into an
Address Book
so you can easily invite people to take your surveys or fill in your form via our collectors. We do not use this data for our own purposes or to contact anyone, except at your direction.
(k) Survey/form/application data.
We store your survey/form/application data (questions and responses) for you and provide analysis tools for you to use with respect to this data.
(l) First party profile information.
When you sign up for our services you are asked to provide us with information about yourself and to give us more detailed insights into who you are. If you are in a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account this may include providing your photo so your administrator(s) and colleagues can identify you.
(m) Third party profile information.
We may combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn, ZoomInfo, and other data brokers) with information we hold about you to create a user profile.
3. How we use the Personal Data we collect
3.1 Creator
We process Personal Data about you as a Creator where:
You have consented;
We need to
f
ulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interes
t; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.1.1
Consent
We rely on your consent to process the following data elements:
(a)
Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with collect data from and advertising cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses. We use this data to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices. We may do so, for instance, to tailor ads, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. You can withdraw your consent at any time.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
To learn more about interest-based advertising and how to opt-out of it, please see our
Cookies Notice
in Section 6. By clearing your cookies in your browser settings, you will no longer see personalized messages in this way but you continue to see ads over the internet that are not based on the information you provided to SurveyMonkey. Depending on your geographic location you can also withdraw your consent using our in-product cookie management tools.
(b) Contact information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries, send you information as part of the services, and send you marketing information. In jurisdictions where opt-in is required, we will only send you marketing materials based on your consent.
3.1.2
Contract
We collect and use the following data elements on the basis that we have to use this information in order to fulfill our contract with you:
(a) Account information.
We need to use your account information to run your account, provide you with services, bill you for our services, resolve disputes such as chargebacks and refund requests, provide you with customer support, and contact you or your organization about your service or account. These communications are of a transactional nature (e.g., service-related announcements, billing-related matters, changes to our services or policies, a welcome email when you first register). You cannot opt out of these communications since they are required to provide our services to you.
We may also use billing information in aggregate to adjust or manage pricing at the individual level or across all service users.
(b) Customer support information.
We will use information submitted through our Customer Support emails, chats, or phone calls, such as name, email, and message content, in order to provide you with customer support.
(c) Usage information.
We use data about how you use our services and how our services are performing to ensure that we’re meeting our service-level agreements (SLAs) or other contractual obligations to you.
(d) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it. We will also use this data to facilitate account verification and sign in and to enforce our password sharing and security policies. We collect this to help us improve your service experience through a specific device/browser by optimizing how the website looks in a particular browser, how your screen brightness affects your experience and to ensure the service operates optimally and as it should on different devices and browsers.
(e) Integration data.
We collect and use information from third parties and integration partners, where applicable to one of our services, to:
Ensure you can sign-up to our service from a third party integration like Facebook/LinkedIn/Microsoft/Google/SSO;
Ensure you can use our service in conjunction with other services.
See further information
here
on our API partners – for other SurveyMonkey services see below or on the website for that service.
(f) Survey questions and survey responses.
We use machine learning techniques on survey data in order to provide users with useful statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. For example, if you have used open text questions in a survey, our machine learning may provide you with useful insights into sentiment and/or the trends in responses to that question in our Analyze survey tool. You have a choice as regards whether or not to use some of these features. For further information see our Respondent Section.
(g) Aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses.
We use aggregated or de-identified information to provide users with useful benchmarking statistics and more relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services.
We also use this data to enforce our agreements, where applicable.
3.1.3
Legitimate interests
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Contact information.
Where consent is not required, we use contact information to send you marketing information based on our legitimate interests for as long as you do not opt out. You can opt out of marketing communications at any time by clicking on the “unsubscribe” link in emails or changing the relevant setting on your
My Account
page.
(b) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for you. This data is de-identified where possible.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our other services.
For example: We collect information about the types of surveys/forms/applications you create (e.g., HR surveys), the types of plans you purchase and your account transactional behavior to build a profile about you so as to help direct you and your organization to other relevant features and services we offer and to optimize user experience, for example by making recommendations to you or your organization.
We may also use usage information such as levels and nature of activity in your account and number of responses you are receiving to personalize the features and services we highlight for you and your organization in our Sites, improve user experience and to make recommendations to you and your organization about our services through our sales and marketing efforts.
(d) Event data.
We use events contained in log data for many different business purposes to include:
To create new services, features, content or make recommendations.
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services.
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
To investigate security issues.
For example: Your IP address is used to determine where an unknown/unauthorized access may have occurred in your account (abuse monitoring).
(e) First party information.
We process other aspects of your account information (like the personal information you provide about your job, your job title, and your marketing preferences) as well as information obtained from public sources, to provide you with a personalized experience and relevant and useful marketing information as well as to make other product, feature and service recommendations to you and your organization to optimize the use of the services we offer (where permitted by law).
You can object to us using your information as described above but in some cases, our ability to fully and properly provide our services to you may be impacted if you do not want us to collect or use the above data. Furthermore, if you are a SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holder, your organization controls some of the data which you include in your profile and they can also edit or remove that information through the primary administrator(s) of that account.
(f) Third party information.
We combine information about you from third party sources (such as LinkedIn and ZoomInfo) with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve your service experience.
(g) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes.
(h) End page data.
If you use our survey tool, depending on the package you are on and the settings you have selected, your Respondents may reach the standard
survey end page
on completion of a survey. The end page is part of the SurveyMonkey website. We may include our own
research surveys
and polling on this end page. These surveys are optional for any Respondent to take or skip.
(i) De-identified Device Data.
We use aggregated or de-identified Device Data to extract usage patterns and to improve our services.
(j) De-identified Survey Data.
We use machine learning techniques on aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses to understand usage and improve our services.
3.1.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to use and disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or (where possible) de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.2 Respondent
We process Personal Data about you as a Respondent where:
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility to deliver the services to the Creator of the survey;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
3.2.1
Contract
(a) Contact information.
We only use contact information to respond to an inquiry on behalf of a Customer if you, as a Respondent, contact us.
(b) Cookies.
We use required cookies to ensure the operation of a Creator’s survey, form, application, or other SurveyMonkey product. These cookies are used to ensure that all aspects of the survey operate appropriately and optimally. For more information please read our
Cookies section below
and our
Respondent Cookies Notice
.
Examples: We use page tags to allow the email sender (for a survey or form for example) to measure the performance of email messaging and to learn how to improve email deliverability and open rates. We also use cookies to ensure a respondent can only take a survey once (where the Creator has set this function) and to track completion rates of surveys.
After completion of a survey, in most cases, you will be redirected to our website and treated as a website visitor where other cookies may be used so you should read our Website Visitor section if this is of interest to you.
(c) Device and browser data.
We use device data both to troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
We use your device and browser data to provide our services to the Creator. For example: your IP address is used to ensure that you do not complete the same survey, form, application or questionnaire twice if the creator has included settings to avoid this (ballot stuffing).
(d) Inferred geographic location.
We also may infer your geographic location based on your IP address. This allows Creators to filter responses by inferred geographic location. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(e) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To create and improve services, features, content or make recommendations;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(f) Third parties and integration data.
We will collect and use information from third parties and integration partners to facilitate Creators in sending surveys/forms/applications/questionnaires to you.
(g) Survey response data.
SurveyMonkey may use first party machine learning or third party artificial intelligence tools on data around the type of survey the Creator has sent you, the question type, survey responses (at an aggregated and de-identified/pseudonymized level only), and device and event data associated with responses to  fulfill our contract with Creators and provide Creators with useful and relevant insights from the data they have collected using our services. Specifically, we use machine learning on survey data to help Creators by:
identifying trends in their responses;
ongoing training of models to optimize responses;
making product recommendations and providing guidance on which products and services work best in different scenarios (For an example of this check out how SurveyMonkey Genius works here);
Extracting and analyzing usage patterns, for example, we might identify when respondents prefer multiple choice versus open text questions and make predictive response suggestions when certain question types are selected. We might also use this data to help improve analysis of responses;
undertaking personalization for survey Creators;
improving user experience (for example, by collecting and using device and browser information from Respondents to improve how our survey service operates on those devices and in those browsers or by altering questions to match the responses being provided by a Respondent); and
identify insightful data trends (which do not disclose Personal Data) and make recommendations to Creators based on those trends.
A Creator has some controls over how we use responses and may have opted-out of applying machine learning to responses where it is
linked to a specific product feature
in some cases.
3.2.2
Legitimate Interest
s
We process your personal information in the following categories of data for legitimate interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Usage information.
We use information about how you use our services to improve our services for you and all users and to make recommendations to our customers about usage of our services.
For example: We collect information about the types of questions you answer. This data will be aggregated and/or de-identified where possible, so we can examine patterns in terms of respondent preferences when submitting responses. We collect and use all this data to help us improve our product so that questions are easier to answer and to help improve the completion rates on surveys/forms.
We will also use information such as the type of survey, form, questionnaire or application that you answered to personalize products we show you on completion of a survey and to understand trends in our service adoption. See more about
Customizing Survey End Page here
).
(b) Responses (in aggregated and/or de-identified form).
To build new product features.
(c) Inferred geographic location.
We may infer your geographic location based on your IP address to produce aggregated data around Respondent location trends. We will use this information to compare and look at trends on how our service operates and how you interact with surveys, on different browsers and devices. Note: we do not collect precise (GPS) location.
(d) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present personalized advertisements such as display, videos, and content on the web or connected devices. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(e) Customer support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support for our Customer. This data is de-identified where possible.
3.2.3
Legal obligation
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use usage data, event data, and aggregated or de-identified survey questions and responses:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To investigate security issues;
To prevent or address potentially unlawful activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity . For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
3.3 Visitor
We process Personal Data about you as a Visitor where:
You have consented;
We need to fulfill our contractual responsibility;
We have a legitimate interest; and
We have a legal obligation.
In some cases, as a former website visitor, we may not have any personal information about you (for example if you have not interacted with our site or have cleared your cookies).
3.3.1
Consent
When you have consented, we collect and use the following information about you:
(a) Contact Information.
We use contact information to respond to your inquiries or send you information about our services, either where you have agreed to this at the point of providing your information or where you operate in a business which may be interested in our services and for as long as you do not opt-out. opt-out of this marketing at any time.
(b) Cookies and similar technology.
We or third party data and advertising platforms that we work with may use or combine multiple technologies, such as non-required cookies, page tags, mobile identifiers and IP addresses to infer users’ common identities across different services and multiple devices such as tablets, browsers, and mobile phones. We may do so to tailor ads to users, personalize marketing, to enable us to determine the success of our advertising campaigns and to improve upon them. We use this data to personalize online marketing campaigns to be relevant to you and your interests in our services. You can withdraw your consent at any time on our Cookie Banner.
If you do not want SurveyMonkey to use this information to serve you targeted ads about our services, you may indicate your preferences at
https://www.aboutads.info
,
https://preferences-mgr.truste.com/
or, if you are located in the European Union, at
https://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
. You may continue to receive ads over the internet that are not based on information you provided to SurveyMonkey.
These third party data and advertising platforms may sometimes use data that we provide to them in order to improve their technologies and their ability to match common devices to users.
3.3.2
Contract
(a) Device and event data.
We use device data to fix bugs and troubleshoot problems with our service and to make improvements to it.
(b) Comments/Content.
Any comments or content linked to you which you share if you are a guest invited to collaborate on a survey.
3.3.3
Legitimate Interest
s
We also carry out the following processing for legitimate business interests pursued by us. We have undertaken to ensure that we place clear limitations on each of these uses so that your privacy is respected and only the information necessary to achieve these legitimate aims is used.
(a) Third party profile information.
Where permitted by law, we combine information about you from third party sources with information we hold about you to create a user profile, which will help us to make our sales and marketing efforts more relevant to you and to personalize and improve our marketing/sales campaigns and website experience
(b) Email address.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
(c) Usage information.
We use information about how you have interacted with our websites to improve our website services for you and all users. Some examples relevant to you:
Examples: We collect information about the webpages you have visited and your activity on our sites at an aggregate level. We collect this information so that we can track the most visited and most useful parts of our website to identify what are our most popular services.
(d) Event data.
We use event data for many different business purposes including the following:
To monitor abuse and troubleshoot;
To track your preferences and create new services, features, content or make recommendations personalized for you;
To track behavior at the aggregate/de-identified level to identify and understand trends in the various interactions with our services; and
To fix bugs and troubleshoot product functionality.
(e) Customer Support information.
We may use information provided to our Customer Support, Customer Success, and Sales teams such as name, email, and message content to train machine learning models to better predict customer support question type, provide answers, generate insights about customer support trends, and to improve our Customer Support. This data is de-identified where possible.
(f) Referral information.
We use referral information to track the success of our integrations and referral processes. For example, if you clicked on an advertisement for one of our brands, presented by one of our partners on the web, which brought you to one of our websites, we will record this information to help us track the success of advertising campaigns.
3.3.4
Legal obligation.
(a)
To respond to legal requests, we may need to disclose information we hold about you. If we receive a subpoena or other legal request, we may need to inspect the data we hold to determine how to respond.
(b)
We may also use event data:
To enforce our agreements where applicable;
To prevent potentially illegal activities; and
To screen for and prevent undesirable or abusive activity. For example, we have automated systems that screen content for phishing activities, spam, and fraud under our
Acceptable Uses Policy
.
4. How we share or disclose Personal Data
4.1 Information you share
Many of our services let you share information with others. Remember that when you share information publicly, it can be indexable by search engines. Our services provide you with different options on sharing and deleting your content but we cannot delete content from search engines so you need to be careful about information you make public.
4.2 Information we share
We do not share your information or data with third parties outside SurveyMonkey except in the following limited circumstances:
(a)
If you are a Creator that is part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your account information and data will be shared with the primary administrator(s) and your survey data may also be visible to other members in your team with whom you share your surveys or with whom you collaborate. Your administrator(s) will be able to view your account data, change your passwords, suspend, transfer or terminate your account or restrict your settings. Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(b)
If you are the primary administrator of a SurveyMonkey team plan, the team name and the domain of the email address on your account may be shared with an individual who has been invited to preview a survey created by one of the members of your team in order to facilitate their request to join the team. You can learn more about how to adjust Team Discovery settings
here.
(c)
If you are part of a SurveyMonkey Enterprise or team plan, your plan’s administrator(s) can transfer your survey questions and responses to, or share them with, other members in your team, including your plan’s administrator(s) themselves.  Your plan’s administrator(s) can also delete your survey questions and responses.  Your plan’s administrator(s) may also have the ability to make changes to any aspects of your survey questions and analysis.  Please refer to your organization’s internal policies if you have questions about this.
(d)
If your organization has purchased a SurveyMonkey Enterprise plan and you are using an email address on a domain owned by your employer or organization linked to your individual account, you may be asked to migrate to the SurveyMonkey Enterprise Account and your email address, name and account data will subsequently be visible to the primary administrator(s) for that account once you have been migrated. You may be notified in advance of this migration and given an opportunity to change the email address linked to your account if you are not using your account for business purposes.
(e)
To help us provide certain aspects of our services we use our affiliates and trusted key partners – in particular, we engage third parties to:
facilitate our collectors for sending surveys by email or text to Respondents. For email delivery, we use
SparkPost
and for text/SMS services we use
Twilio
. We share the relevant contact information for respondents (email address or phone number as applicable) with these third parties.
facilitate Creators in making
payments
.
to facilitate the delivery of certain features, for example if you use the “Create a survey using AI” we will send your survey prompts to our AI vendor. We recommend that you do not include Personal Data in these prompts but if you do they will be shared with the AI vendor.
to detect fraud (to include, for example, performing identify checks or verify malicious IPs).
deliver and help us track our marketing and advertising content.
help us track website conversion success metrics.
manage our sales and customer support services to you, including for resolving any disputes.
We enter into confidentiality and data processing terms with partners to ensure they comply with high levels of confidentiality and best practices in privacy and security standards and we regularly review these standards and practices. You can find more information in our
Subprocessor Statement
.
(f)
On your instructions, we share your information or data if you choose to use an integration in conjunction with SurveyMonkey services, to the extent necessary to facilitate that use. See further information
here
on our API partners.
(g)
We also may have to share information or data for the following purposes:
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request;
To enforce applicable policies, including investigation of potential violations;
To detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security or technical issues;
To protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of our users, the public or to SurveyMonkey and/or as required or permitted by law; and
To facilitate a sale, merger or change in control of all or any part of our company or business or in preparation for any of these events.
5. Data retention
If you are a Creator, we generally do not delete the data in your account as long as your account is active – you are responsible for and control the time periods for which you retain this data. You can read about this
here
for account use. Here are some exceptions:
If you are a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) user on our platforms and you have not engaged with the service actively for some time, we reserve the right to delete your account and data in accordance with our data retention policy.
If you have exceeded your response limit as a SurveyMonkey Basic (free) account holder, we will delete the overages if you do not upgrade within a fixed timeframe.
We also encourage Creators to actively review their data retention practices in their account and take care to retain data only as long as is strictly necessary.
We also describe the expiry periods for cookies on our websites in our
Cookies Notice
.
6. Personalized marketing and cookies
We and our partners use cookies and similar technologies on our websites. For more information see our
Cookies Notice
. For information about cookies used in our surveys please see
Cookies used on Survey Pages
. If you are a customer of SurveyMonkey and separately use cookies or similar technologies in conjunction with any of our products and services, then you yourself will be responsible for complying with any laws related to the use of those technologies and this Privacy Notice is not applicable to that use by you.
You can also choose to remove or disable cookies via your
browser settings
and, depending on your geographic location you can withdraw consent to non-essential cookies using the in-product cookie preferences tool.
You can opt-out from direct marketing in your account and we provide opt-out options in all direct marketing emails. Finally, if you do not wish to see personalized marketing content on the web related to our service you can clear the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article on how to do this
here
.
Depending on your geographic location, we may share your email address in hashed form with marketing vendors to present targeted and personalized marketing and sales information online. You can opt out via
this portal
.
7. Security
We have a security statement related to our self-serve businesses (SurveyMonkey and Wufoo) available to view
here
. For information about security related to our other business lines you can speak to a sales representative by completing the form
here
.
8. Safety of Minors
Our services (including creating and responding to surveys) are not intended for and may not be used by minors. “
Minors
” are individuals under the age of 16 (or under a higher age as provided in certain countries or territories). SurveyMonkey does not knowingly collect Personal Data from Minors or allow them to register. If it comes to our attention that we have collected Personal Data from a Minor, we may delete this information without notice. If you have reason to believe that this has occurred, please contact customer support.
9. Data Transfers
Your information and data may be processed in and transferred or disclosed in the United States and countries in which our affiliates are located and in which our service providers are located or have servers. You can view a list of these locations in our
EU Data Transfer Statement
. You can also read about data that is stored in our other data centers here in our
International Data Center Overview
. We ensure that the recipient of your Personal Data offers an adequate level of protection, for instance by entering into the appropriate back-to-back agreements with standard contractual clauses or other transfer mechanisms as approved by the European Commission or relevant data protection authority.
We have also provided a
help article
which answers some additional questions about data transfers to the US.
9.1
EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles.
SurveyMonkey Inc. has self-certified its compliance under the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework, the UK Extension and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. is committed to subjecting all personal information received from the European Union (EU) member countries, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to the Framework’s applicable Principles. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union and the United Kingdom in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. SurveyMonkey Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. If there is any conflict between the terms in this Privacy Notice and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework Program, and to view our certification, please visit
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/
.
SurveyMonkey Inc. also complies with the onward transfer liability provisions of the DPF.
When SurveyMonkey Inc. receives personal information under the DPF and then transfers it to a third-party service provider acting as agent on SurveyMonkey Inc.'s behalf, SurveyMonkey Inc. has certain liability under the DPF if both (i) the agent processes the information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF and (ii) SurveyMonkey Inc. is responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. In certain situations, SurveyMonkey Inc. may be required to disclose Personal Data in response to lawful requests by public authorities, including to meet national security or law enforcement requirements.
With respect to Personal Data received or transferred pursuant to the DPF, SurveyMonkey Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission.  Please contact SurveyMonkey Inc. as described in Section 11 below if you have any concerns or complaints of any nature. If you have an unresolved privacy or data use concern that we have not addressed satisfactorily, please contact our U.S.-based third party dispute resolution provider, (free of charge) at
https://www.jamsadr.com/dpf-dispute-resolution
.
Under certain conditions, more fully described on the DPF website
https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/s/article/How-to-Submit-a-Complaint-Relating-to-a-Participating-Organization-s-Compliance-with-the-DPF-Principles-dpf
, you may invoke binding arbitration when other dispute resolution procedures have been exhausted.
10. Who is my data controller?
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback to a Creator using SurveyMonkey services, that Creator is the controller of your data, and SurveyMonkey is the processor of that data.
For SurveyMonkey Enterprise account holders, your organization’s primary administrator controls some basic account level information which you input when setting up your account like name, email address, and profile photo.
If you have provided survey responses, filled out a form, submitted an application, or provided website feedback directly to SurveyMonkey, then SurveyMonkey is the controller and our use of that data is described by this Notice and in our
SurveyMonkey Research Privacy Notice
.
If you are a Creator and have received more responses than your plan allows (“overage data”), SurveyMonkey is the controller over the overage data until you change your plan type, or the overage data is deleted in accordance with section 12.4 of our
Terms of Use
or per the terms of your negotiated contract.
SurveyMonkey is a controller for the account-level data provided by its Creators and panelists from Contribute and Rewards. More information can be found in section 13.6 of this Privacy Notice.
11. Your rights
You may wish to exercise a right to obtain information about yourself or to correct, update or delete that information. For more information about these rights you can read about it
here
. Some of these rights may be subject to some exceptions or limitations in local law. Please note your rights and choices vary depending upon your location. We will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and we will respond to your request to exercise these rights within a reasonable time (and in all cases within 30 days of receiving a request) subject to the below for specific categories of person.
11.1
Apply Applicants
For SurveyMonkey Apply users please see
information on how to exercise your rights here
.
11. 2 Creator
Where you hold an account with any SurveyMonkey service, you are entitled to a copy of all Personal Data which we hold in relation to you. You also may be entitled to request that we restrict how we use your data or object to some aspect of our treatment of your data. You can access a lot of your data in your own account when you log in. If you want to exercise your rights, please contact us
here
.
Depending on your plan type, SurveyMonkey also enables you to export your own response data from our system in a variety of formats so that you can back it up or use it with other applications. Alternatively, for assistance in exporting or deleting responses, you can contact us.
11.3 Respondent
Where you have responded to a survey, form, questionnaire or application sent to you by a Creator using a SurveyMonkey service, you will need to reach out directly to that individual or organization to discuss managing, deleting, accessing, restricting access to or otherwise withdrawing consent for use of the information which you provided to them in your responses. SurveyMonkey does not control your response data and, accordingly, is not in a position to directly handle these requests in relation to that data. If you are having difficulties finding this Creator or if you have any other questions after reading this Privacy Notice, you can
contact us
through
our support team
and we will try our best to help you.
11.4 Panelist
If you have created a Rewards or Contribute account with us, you can request a copy of your Personal Data, delete your Personal Data, or correct it.
11.5 Visitor
Where you have visited our website and you want to exercise any of the above rights please contact our support team
here
. Alternatively, if your request is for the right to be forgotten as it relates only to our use of cookies you can achieve this by clearing the cookies in your browser settings. See our Help Center article describing how to do this
here
.
11.6 Authorized Agent
If you are a third party organization acting on behalf of a data subject (or class of data subjects) to exercise data subject rights, we do work with you. In this case:
We ask you to follow our process outlined in this Privacy Notice for security reasons so that we can independently verify the Creator (if it is a Creator) making any requests to exercise their rights.
Where applicable, we directly interact with a Creator’s registered email address, because we authenticate users with username and unique password and not with other identifying information (e.g., photo ID or similar).
Please do not share other forms of personal identification for data subjects with us when submitting requests.
11.7
Other rights and choices
For rights and choices specific to US consumers, please refer to our
Region Specific Privacy Notice
. Please note we will take reasonable steps to verify your identity and the authenticity of your request as described in that Notice.
11.8
Contact
Except as explicitly provided herein, please use the following contact information for privacy inquiries
SurveyMonkey Inc.
910 Park Pl, Suite 300
San Mateo, California 94403
United States
Or contact us
here
.
SurveyMonkey Europe UC
Ella House, Suite 40.4
40 Merrion Square East
Dublin 2
D02 NP96
Ireland
Or contact us
here
.
Data Protection Officer
: SurveyMonkey's Data Protection Officer is registered with the Irish Data Protection Commission.  Contact our DPO at
dpo@surveymonkey.com
.
Note that our contact form is the
best
way to make a rights request with us.
11.9
Complaints
If you are a resident in the European Union and you are dissatisfied with how we have managed a complaint you have submitted to us, you are entitled to contact your local data protection supervisory authority. As SurveyMonkey Europe UC operates its business in Ireland, it operates under the remit of the Irish Office of the Data Protection Commissioner (see:
IDPC Website
).
12. Changes to our Privacy Notice
We can make changes to the
Privacy Basics
and this Privacy Notice from time to time. We will identify the changes we have made on
this page
. In circumstances where a change will materially change the way in which we collect or use your personal information or data, we will send a notice of this change to all of our account holders.
13. Privacy information specific to other services
Although this Privacy Notice applies to all our Services, some information may be specific to individual Services. Please see below for more information
13.1
TechValidate
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our TechValidate users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.1.1
TechFacts
TechFacts are published on an anonymous basis – that is, no Respondent Personal Information is displayed in a TechFact unless your Respondents authorize the use of their name and company affiliation. You are able to see the individual respondent’s identity in your account and, if you give a SurveyMonkey employee permission to view that response, then SurveyMonkey will also see this. However, we never publish or disseminate this information (unless you explicitly ask us to do so).
We assign a unique identification number to each TechFact. The ID will appear on each copy of the TechFact. Our site is designed so that visitors may look up and view TechFacts without the collection of any personal information (except for such visitor's internet protocol (IP) address).
13.2
SurveyMonkey Apply
SurveyMonkey Apply is an online application system that helps organizations collect applications, manage subscriptions and facilitate reviews. Our main Privacy Notice applies to
apply.surveymonkey.com
(“SurveyMonkey Apply”) except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is applicable only to our survey tool. Responses and Respondents in this section are intended as reference to applicants and their applications for the purposes of use of SurveyMonkey Apply.
When an applicant submits an application through SurveyMonkey Apply, their login information can be used for multiple applications across the SurveyMonkey Apply site.
If you have any questions about your personal information in the context of our SurveyMonkey Apply service, you can contact us
here
.
13.3
Wufoo
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our Wufoo users except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool.
13.3.1
Your control over your form data
We store your form data (form content and responses) for you. You have the following controls over your form data:
Download/backup your form data. We provide you with the ability to export, share and publish your form data in a variety of formats. This allows you to create your own backups or work with your data offline. See
here
for data exporting instructions.
Delete your form data. You can delete your form data (including parts of forms, entire forms, and responses to forms) through your account's user interface. See
here
for how to delete form entries.
Cancel your Wufoo account. You can cancel your Wufoo account at any time through your account management page. Any cancellation of your Wufoo account will result in the deletion of your account and all form data stored in it. This data cannot be recovered once your account is cancelled. Please be aware that we may for a time retain residual information in our backup and/or archival copies of our database for up to 90 days.
We would like to emphasize that we will not use your form data to compete with you, market to your clients, or contact them for any other means of profit. We will also not sell your form data to anyone.
13.4
GetFeedback Digital (formerly Usabilla)
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Digital users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Digital’s service, in which case this Section takes precedence.
Information about GetFeedback Digital APIs is provided
here
.
Information about GetFeedback Digital partners is provided
here
.
We do not delete customer data unless the customer has instructed us to do so. You can delete your data at any time. You can also set a data retention period between 1-36 months after which data is automatically deleted.
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
To adjust your preferences and settings around data and information you must be logged into your account and/or can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com for assistance or you can read about this more
here
.
To exercise your data rights (as described in our main Privacy NoticeSection 14 above) you can use our
contact form
(please specify that this is a GetFeedback Digital request) or you can contact GetFeedback Digital’s team at privacy@getfeedback.com.
13.5
GetFeedback Direct
Our main Privacy Notice applies to our GetFeedback Direct users, except where the Privacy Notice specifies a section that is only applicable to our survey tool, or information in this section distinguishes our treatment of data and information in the case of GetFeedback Direct's service, in which case this section takes precedence. If you are part of any of our early adopter programs our main Privacy Notice will apply to you.
13.5.1
Sentiment Analysis
Sentiment Analysis and other additional machine learning features are auto-implemented for all customer accounts and cannot be switched off. If you do not wish to collect sentiment on your response data you should avoid use of open text response questions.
13.5.2
Salesforce
GetFeedback Direct is a Salesforce ISVforce partner. If you have created a GetFeedback Direct account, the registration information you provide will be disclosed to Salesforce.com, Inc. and will be used by Salesforce.com, Inc. pursuant to its privacy policy (see
Salesforce Privacy Policy
). More information about how to automate emails in GetFeedback Direct using Salesforce is available
here
. Information about displaying a Post Chat Survey in Salesforce Chat can be found
here
.
13.5.3
Suppression Lists
You can manage your suppression lists and map these to Salesforce so as to ensure you comply with unsubscribe requests from your Respondents by following the steps outlined
here
. For clarity, we are not responsible for how you manage your suppression lists.
13.5.4
Contact Us
To exercise your rights (as described in Section 11 of the Privacy Notice), please contact the GetFeedback Direct support team at
help@getfeedback.com
.
13.6
Audience
If you are a panelist using our Rewards or Contribute apps, please read the following notices as they apply to your use of those Services:
SurveyMonkey Contribute Privacy Notice
SurveyMonkey Rewards Privacy Notice
If you are a panelist responding to a SurveyMonkey survey through a third party, please read the following notice as it applies to your use of those Services:
Third Party Panel Privacy Notice
Sub-policy 9
https://www.savio.io/privacy:
Menu
Product
Features
Use Cases
Centralize & Organize Feedback
Get all your product feedback in one place
Analyze & Prioritize
Spot trends & use CRM data to inform decisions
Communicate internally
Quickly align stakeholders on your data-backed roadmaps
Close the Loop
Tell prospects and customers their features have shipped
By Role
For Product Teams
Centralize, organize, and prioritize features
For Sales Teams
Identify features to win deals
For Customer Success Teams
Build evidence to drive retention
Integrations
HubSpot CRM
Log feedback and prioritize by HubSpot data
Intercom
Log feature requests from Intercom
JIRA
Update feature request status from JIRA
See All Integrations
Savio integrates with 12+ tools
Case Studies
Scale Computing
Becoming a more data-driven Product team
Housecall Pro
Tracking requests from 60k+ users
Tettra
Moving from Zapier and Airtable
DocSpring
From no system to a safe place for feedback
Broca
CS becomes a trusted partner to Product
Reclaim
Building a feedback system that scales
Pricing
Resources
Blog
Changelog
Savio API
Knowledgebase
Product Roadmap Guides
Savio's Mental Model
Login
Demo
Try Free
Privacy Policy
Effective Mar 21 2024
Savio Technology Inc. and our affiliates ("
us
", "
we
", or "
our
") respect your privacy and are committed to protecting it by complying with this policy.
This policy describes the types of information we may collect from you or that you may provide when you visit  https://www.savio.io (our "
Website
") or use our services, including web application (the “
Application
”, together with the Website, the “
Services
”) and our practices for collecting, using, maintaining, protecting, and disclosing that information.We will only use your personal information in accordance with this policy unless otherwise required by applicable law. We take steps to ensure that the personal information that we collect about you is adequate, relevant, not excessive, and used for limited purposes.
Please read this policy carefully to understand our policies and practices for collecting, processing, and storing your information. If you do not agree with our policies and practices, your choice is not to use our Services. By accessing or using our Services, you indicate that you understand, accept, and consent to the practices described in this policy. This policy may change from time to time. Your continued use of the Services after we make changes indicates that you accept and consent to those changes, so please check the policy periodically for updates.
Unless otherwise defined in this policy, the terms used in this policy have the same meanings as in our Terms and Conditions, accessible from https://www.savio.io
1. Information We Collect About You
We collect and use several different types of information for various purposes to provide and improve our Services, including.
2. Types of Data Collected
Personal Data
, while using the Services, we may ask you to provide us with certain personally identifiable information including, but not limited to, Email address, First name and last name, telephone number, user name or similar identifier, billing and account information, cookies and Usage Data and any other identifier we may use to contact you (“
Personal Data
”).
We may use your Personal Data to contact you with newsletters, marketing or promotional materials and other information that may be of interest to you. You may opt out of receiving any, or all, of these communications from us by following the unsubscribe link or instructions provided in any email we send or by contacting us.
Non-personal information
, that does not directly or indirectly reveal your identity or directly relate to an identifiable individual, such as demographic information, or statistical or aggregated information. Statistical or aggregated data does not directly identify a specific person, but we may derive non-personal statistical or aggregated data from personal information. For example, we may aggregate personal information to calculate the percentage of users accessing a specific Services.
Usage Data
, we may also collect information on how the Service is accessed and used ("
Usage Data
"). This Usage Data may include information such as your computer's Internet Protocol address (e.g. IP address), browser type, browser version, the pages of our Service that you visit, the time and date of your visit, the time spent on those pages, unique device identifiers and other diagnostic data.
Non-personal details about your Website interactions
, including the full Uniform Resource Locators (URLs), clickstream to, through and from our Website (including date and time), products you viewed or searched for, page response times, download errors, length of visits to certain pages, page interaction information (such as scrolling, clicks, and mouse-overs), methods used to browse away from the page, or any phone number used to call our customer service number.
3. How We Collect Information About You
We use different methods to collect your information, including through:
Direct interactions with you
when you provide it to us
, for example, by filling in forms or corresponding with us by phone, email, or otherwise.
Automated technologies or interactions
, as you use our Services. Information collected automatically may include usage details, IP addresses, and information collected through cookies and other tracking technologies.
Information You Provide to Us
The information we collect directly from you through our Services may include:
Information that you provide by filling in forms on our Services. This includes information provided at the time of registering to use our Website, subscribing to our Application or requesting further services. We may also ask you for information when you report a problem with our Services.
Records and copies of your correspondence (including email addresses), if you contact us.
Information We Collect Through Cookies and Other Automatic Data Collection Technologies
As you navigate through our Website and interact with our Application, we may use cookies or other automatic data collection technologies to collect certain information about your equipment, browsing actions, and patterns, including:
Details of your visits to our Website, including traffic data, location data, logs, and other communication data and the resources that you access and use on the Website.
Information about your computer and internet connection, including your IP address, operating system, and browser type.
We may also use these technologies to collect information about your online activities over time and across third-party websites or other online services (behavioral tracking). The information we collect automatically is statistical information and may include personal information. It helps us to improve our Services and to deliver a better and more personalized service, including by enabling us to:
Estimate our audience size and usage patterns.
Store information about your preferences, allowing us to customize our Services according to your individual interests.
Speed up your searches.
Recognize you when you return to our Website.
The technologies we use for this automatic data collection may include:
Cookies (or browser cookies).
A cookie is a small file placed on the hard drive of your computer. You may refuse to accept browser cookies by activating the appropriate setting on your browser. However, if you select this setting you may be unable to access certain parts of our Website. Unless you have adjusted your browser setting so that it will refuse cookies, our system will issue cookies when you direct your browser to our Services
Examples of Cookies we use:
Session Cookies.
We use Session Cookies to operate our Service.
Preference Cookies.
We use Preference Cookies to remember your preferences and various settings.
Security Cookies.
We use Security Cookies for security purposes.
Flash Cookies.
Certain features of our Services may use local stored objects (or Flash cookies) to collect and store information about your preferences and navigation to, from, and on our Services. Flash cookies are not managed by the same browser settings that are used for browser cookies.
Web Beacons.
Pages of our Services and our e-mails may contain small electronic files known as web beacons (also referred to as clear gifs, pixel tags, and single-pixel gifs) that permit us, for example, to count users who have visited those pages or opened an email and for other related website statistics (for example, recording the popularity of certain website content and verifying system and server integrity).
You can instruct your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, if you do not accept cookies, you may not be able to use some portions of our Service.
4. How we Use your Personal Data
We use information that we collect about you or that you provide to us, including any Personal Data:
To provide and maintain our Services.
To notify you about changes to our Services.
To allow you to participate in interactive features of our Services.
To provide customer support
To gather analysis or valuable information so that we can improve our Services.
To monitor the usage of our Services.
To detect, prevent and address technical issues
To provide you with news, special offers and general information about other goods, services and events which we offer that are similar to those that you have already purchased or enquired about unless you have opted not to receive such information.
To provide you with notices about your subscription, including expiration and renewal notices.
To improve our Services, products, marketing, or customer relationships and experiences.
In any other way we may describe when you provide the information.
For any other purpose with your consent.
5. Retention of Data
We will retain your Personal Data for as long as is necessary for the purposes set out in this policy. We will retain and use your Personal Data to the extent necessary to comply with our legal obligations (for example, if we are required to retain your data to comply with applicable laws), resolve disputes and enforce our legal agreements and policies.
Under some circumstances we may anonymize your personal information so that it can no longer be associated with you. We reserve the right to use such anonymous and de-identified data for any legitimate business purpose without further notice to you or your consent.
6. Transfer of Personal Data
Your information, including Personal Data, may be transferred to - and maintained on - computers located outside of your state, province, country or other governmental jurisdiction where the data protection laws may differ from those of your jurisdiction.
If you are located outside of the United States and choose to provide information to us, please note that we transfer the data, including Personal Data, to the United States and process it there.
Your consent to this Privacy Policy followed by your submission of such information represents your agreement to that transfer.
Savio Technology Inc. will take all the steps reasonably necessary to ensure that your data is treated securely and in accordance with this policy and no transfer of your Personal Data will take place to an organization or a country unless there are adequate controls in place including the security of your Personal Data and other information.
When necessary, we utilize approved transfer mechanisms (such as adequacy decision or the Standard Contractual Clauses in the EU) to ensure the necessary protection of your personal information. Please ask for our Data Protection Agreement for additional information on our mechanisms, protocols and policies for transfers of information.
7. Accessing, Correcting and Deleting Personal Data
It is important that the information we hold about you is accurate and current. Please keep us informed if your Personal Data changes. By law you have the right to request access to and to correct the personal information that we hold about you.
You can access, update or request deletion of Personal Data you have provided to us directly within your account settings section. We cannot delete your Personal Data except by also deleting your user account. We may not accommodate a request to change information if we believe the change would violate any law or legal requirement or cause the information to be incorrect. We may charge you a fee to access your personal information, however, we will notify you of any fee in advance.
If you wish to be informed about what Personal Data we hold about you or if you want it to be removed from our systems, please contact us at
support@savio.io
We may request specific information from you to help us confirm your identity and your right to access, and to provide you with the personal information that we hold about you or make your requested changes. Applicable law may allow or require us to refuse to provide you with access to some or all of the personal information that we hold about you, or we may have destroyed, erased, or made your personal information anonymous in accordance with our record retention obligations and practices. If we cannot provide you with access to your personal information, we will inform you of the reasons why, subject to any legal or regulatory restrictions.
8. Disclosure of Personal Data
We may disclose Personal Data that we collect or you provide as described in this policy:
In accordance with applicable law, to a buyer or other successor in the event of a merger, divestiture, restructuring, reorganization, dissolution, or other sale or transfer of some or all of our assets, whether as a going concern or as part of bankruptcy, liquidation, or similar proceeding, in which personal information held by us about our customers and users is among the assets transferred.
To third parties to market their products or services to you if you have consented to these disclosures. We contractually require these third parties to keep personal information confidential and use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them.
To contractors, service providers, and other third parties we use to support our business (such as analytics and search engine providers that assist us with Website improvement and optimization, including OpenAI) and who are contractually obligated to keep personal information confidential, use it only for the purposes for which we disclose it to them, and to process the personal information with the same standards set out in this policy.
To fulfill the purpose for which you provide it.
For any other purpose disclosed by us when you provide the information.
With your consent.
We may also disclose your personal information:
To comply with any court order, law, or legal process, including to respond to any government or regulatory request, in accordance with applicable law.
To enforce or apply our Terms of Service and other agreements, including for billing and collection purposes.
If we believe disclosure is necessary or appropriate to protect our rights, property, or safety of our customers, or others. This includes exchanging information with other companies and organizations for the purposes of fraud protection and credit risk reduction, To prevent or investigate possible wrongdoing in connection with the Services and to protect against general liability.
9. Security of Data
The security of your Personal Data is very important to us. We use physical, electronic, and administrative measures designed to secure your personal information from accidental loss and from unauthorized access, use, alteration, and disclosure.
The safety and security of your information also depends on you. Where we have given you (or where you have chosen) a password for access to certain parts of our Services, you are responsible for keeping this password confidential. We ask you not to share your password with anyone.
Unfortunately, the transmission of information via the Internet is not completely secure. Although we do our best to protect your Personal Data, we cannot guarantee the security of your personal information transmitted to our Services. Any transmission of personal information is at your own risk. We are not responsible for circumvention of any privacy settings or security measures contained on the Services.
10. Our Policy on "Do Not Track" Signals under the California Online Protection Act (CalOPPA)
We do not support Do Not Track. Do Not Track is a preference you can set in your web browser to inform websites that you do not want to be tracked. You can enable or disable Do Not Track by visiting the Preferences or Settings page of your web browser.
11. Your Data Protection Rights under the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR)
Legal Basis for Processing Personal Data
We will only collect and process your information when we have a legal basis to do so. We collect or process your Personal Data because:
We need to perform a contract with you
You have given us permission to do so
The processing is in our legitimate interests and it is not overridden by your rights
For payment processing purposes
To comply with the law
As a data subject within the meaning and applicability of the GDPR, you have certain data protection rights. Savio Technology Inc. aims to take reasonable steps to allow you to correct, amend, delete or limit the use of your Personal Data.
If you wish to be informed about what Personal Data we hold about you or if you want it to be removed from our systems, please contact us at support@savio.io.
In certain circumstances, you have the following
data protection rights
:
The right to access, update or delete the information we have on you.
Whenever made possible, you can access, update or request deletion of your Personal Data directly within your account settings section. If you are unable to perform these actions yourself, please contact us to assist you.
The right of rectification.
You have the right to have your information rectified if that information is inaccurate or incomplete.
The right to object.
You have the right to object to our processing of your Personal Data.
The right of restriction.
You have the right to request that we restrict the processing of your personal information.
The right to data portability.
You have the right to be provided with a copy of the information we have on you in a structured, machine-readable and commonly used format.
The right to withdraw consent.
You also have the right to withdraw your consent at any time where Savio Technology Inc. relied on your consent to process your personal information.
Please note that we may ask you to verify your identity before responding to such requests.
You have the right to complain to the relevant Data Protection Authority about our collection and use of your Personal Data. For more information, please contact your local data protection authority in the European Economic Area (EEA).
12. Service Providers
We may employ third party companies and individuals to facilitate our Services ("Service Providers"), provide the Services on our behalf, perform Service-related services or assist us in analysing how our Services are used.
These third parties have access to your Personal Data only to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for any other purpose.
Analytics
We may use third-party Service Providers to monitor and analyse the use of our Services.
Google Analytics
. Google Analytics is a web analytics service offered by Google that tracks and reports website traffic. Google uses the data collected to track and monitor the use of our Service. This data is shared with other Google services. Google may use the collected data to contextualise and personalise the ads of its own advertising network.
You can opt-out of having made your activity on the Service available to Google Analytics by installing the Google Analytics opt-out browser add-on. The add-on prevents the Google Analytics JavaScript (ga.js, analytics.js and dc.js) from sharing information with Google Analytics about visits activity.
For more information on the privacy practices of Google, please visit the Google Privacy & Terms web page:
https://policies.google.com/privacy?hl=en
Fullstory
. Fullstory is provided by FullStory, Inc.  You can prevent Fullstory from using your information for analytics purposes by opting-out. To opt-out of Fullstory service, please visit this page:
https://www.fullstory.com/optout/
For more information on what type of information Fullstory collects, please visit the Terms of Use page of Fullstory:
https://www.fullstory.com/legal/terms-and-conditions/
Clarity
. Clarity is provided by Microsoft Corp. You can opt out of Clarity telemetry by
selecting Microsoft here
. If you install the
Protect My Choices extension
for your browser, you can ensure your opt-out preference is saved.
Segment
. Segment is provided by Twilio Inc.  For more information on Segment's privacy practices, please visit the Twilio Privacy Policy:
https://www.twilio.com/legal/privacy
Behavioral Remarketing
Savio Technology Inc. uses remarketing services to advertise on third party websites to you after you visited our Service. We and our third-party vendors use cookies to inform, optimise and serve ads based on your past visits to our Service.
Facebook
. Facebook remarketing service is provided by Facebook Inc. You can learn more about interest-based advertising from Facebook by visiting this page:
https://www.facebook.com/help/164968693837950
. To opt-out from Facebook's interest-based ads, follow these instructions from Facebook:
https://www.facebook.com/help/568137493302217
. Facebook adheres to the Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioural Advertising established by the Digital Advertising Alliance. You can also opt-out from Facebook and other participating companies through the Digital Advertising Alliance in the USA
http://www.aboutads.info/choices/
, the Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada in Canada
http://youradchoices.ca/
or the European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance in Europe:
http://www.youronlinechoices.eu/
, or opt-out using your mobile device settings.
For more information on the privacy practices of Facebook, please visit Facebook's Data Policy:
https://www.facebook.com/privacy/explanation
RB2B
. RB2B is provided by GetEmails, LLC d/b/a R! B2B. When you visit or log in to our website, cookies  and similar technologies may be used by our online data partners or vendors to associate these activities with other personal information they or others have about you, including by association with your email or home address.  We (or service providers on our behalf) may then send communications and marketing to these email or home addresses. You may opt out of receiving this advertising by visiting https://app.retention.com/optout.  Information is sent to RB2B from only website visitors from the USA.
Payments
We may provide paid products and/or services within the Service. In that case, we use third-party services for payment processing (e.g. payment processors).
We will not store or collect your payment card details. That information is provided directly to our third-party payment processors whose use of your personal information is governed by their Privacy Policy. These payment processors adhere to the standards set by PCI-DSS as managed by the PCI Security Standards Council, which is a joint effort of brands like Visa, MasterCard, American Express and Discover. PCI-DSS requirements help ensure the secure handling of payment information.
The payment processors we work with are:
Stripe
. Their privacy policy can be viewed at
https://stripe.com/us/privacy
Additional Service Providers
We rely on a number of additional third-party software services. This section describes providers we integrate with, what data is stored by these providers, and how that data is used. This list is not meant to be exhaustive and is included here for illustrative purposes. As the Service improves and technologies change we may integrate with different or additional providers. If you have questions or would like more details about how your data is stored and shared, please contact us.
Intercom
. We use Intercom to provide support and communicate with users about their account via in-app chat and email. We send Intercom your full name, email address and account information.
Amazon Web Services (AWS)
. AWS Relational Database Service (RDS) hosts the database backend of the Servive. We also use Amazon Simple Storage Service (S3) to host customer images and files.
Userlist
. We use Userlist to email users and visitors.  We send Userlist your full name, email address and account information.
Mailgun
. We use Mailgun to send transactional email to users.  We send Mailgun your full name and email address.
13. Links to Other Sites
Our Services may contain links to other sites that are not operated by us. If you click a third party link, you will be directed to that third party's site. We strongly advise you to review the privacy policy of every site you visit. We have no control over and assume no responsibility for the content, privacy policies or practices of any third party sites or services.
14. Children's Privacy
Our Services are not intended for anyone under the age of 18. We do not knowingly collect personally identifiable information from anyone under the age of 18. If you are a parent or guardian and you are aware that a childhas provided us with Personal Data, please contact us. If we become aware that we have collected Personal Data from children without verification of parental consent, we take steps to remove that information from our servers.
15. Changes to This Privacy Policy
We may update this policy from time to time. We will notify you of any changes by posting the new policy on this page. We include the date the privacy policy was last revised at the top of the page. You are responsible for ensuring we have an up-to-date, active, and deliverable email address for you.
You are advised to review this Privacy Policy periodically for any changes. Changes to this Privacy Policy are effective when they are posted on this page.
16. Contact Us
If you have any questions about this policy, please contact us at privacy@savio.io
/>
Sub-policy 10
https://journeys.autopilotapp.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Privacy policy
Effective date: 17 November 2017
AutopilotHQ, Inc. (“Autopilot,” “we” or “us”) makes available certain online tools, including its Autopilot services, comprised of certain “software as a service” offerings that include tools, content and resources that allow you to automate your sales and marketing processes.
This Privacy Policy applies to www.autopilothq.com (the “Site”) which is owned and operated by Autopilot, as well as to the Autopilot software and services provided by Autopilot (the “Services”). At Autopilot, we recognize and respect your privacy. This Privacy Policy explains how we collect, use and disclose personally identifying information about individuals (“Personal Information”) that is gathered through our Site and Services.
By using our Site and Services, you agree to this Privacy Policy, which is subject to and incorporates by reference our Terms of Use, including their limitation on liability. To review the Terms of Use, go to
terms of use
.
In this Policy, the following definitions apply:
The term “Customer” means a customer of Autopilot who is a user of the Site and a subscriber of the Services.
The term “Consumer” means a customer or user of a website developed and operated by an Autopilot Customer.
We may collect certain Personal Information from our Customers. Through the provision of our Services, we may also receive information, which may include Personal Information, about Consumers who use our Customers’ Sites. This Privacy Policy applies to how Autopilot uses and discloses the Personal Information it collects or receives through the Site or Service.
This Privacy Policy does not apply (i) to the collection, use or disclosure of Personal Information about Consumers by our Customers, or (ii) to our Customers’ websites. We have no control over our Customer’s information privacy practices. You should check the Privacy Policy of any website you use for information about how that site collects, uses and discloses Personal Information.
Changes to this privacy policy
As we update our Site and Services and roll-out new versions or features, we may change this Privacy Policy. You should check
http://www.autopilothq.com/legal/privacy-policy
frequently to review our current Privacy Policy, which is effective as of the effective date listed above. Your continued use of any of our Site and Services once you have been notified of the modified Privacy Policy constitutes your deemed acceptance and understanding of the Privacy Policy as in effect at the time of your continued use.
Personal information we collect and receive
About our customers
Account Information. Customers may browse our Site without creating an online account, but to use our Services you must create an account. To create an account, you must enter your full first and last name, business name and email address.
Payment Information. When you subscribe to our Services, we collect your billing address, credit/debit card number, expiration date, and other billing information necessary to process the transaction. We use this information to process your transaction.
History and Usage. We also collect information about our Customers’ use of the Services, including their order history, Services usage and other similar information.
Facebook. We allow Customers to “Like” our Site and Services through their Facebook Account. However, while we do track which Customers choose to “Like” us, at this time we do not collect any information from Facebook about Customers who choose to “Like” us.
Other Information. In addition, we may ask Customers to submit certain optional information about their business, such as their industry, target customers or demographics, and other information. We may also collect or receive information from third parties (e.g. Slack.com), and public records and sources. We may combine such information with the Personal Information we have collected about Customers.
About Visitors to our Site
We automatically collect through our Site and Services, information that is often not personally identifiable, such as the website from which visitors came to our Site, IP address, browser type, domain name, referring URL, page views and information relating to the device through which users access the Site. We may combine this information with the Personal Information we have collected about Customers.
About Consumers
While we do not directly collect any Personal Information from Consumers or users of our Customers’ websites, we may collect certain non-personally-identifiable information about Consumers that use our Customers’ websites, in order to provide Customers with information about how their sites are accessed and used. For example, we may receive IP address, browser type, domain name, referring URL, page views and information relating to the device through which Consumers access our Customers’ Site.
In addition, our Customers may, through their Sites and their use of our Services, collect additional information from Consumers such as name, e-mail address and other contact information. We may receive this Consumer information, which may include Personal Information, and store it on behalf of our Customers. However, we will not use this Personal Information about Consumers for our own purposes. We maintain such Personal Information about Consumers only on behalf of our Customers; this information belongs to our respective Customers, not to Autopilot. As noted above, our Customers’ collection, use and disclosure of Consumer Personal Information is not governed by this Privacy Policy. By disclosing Consumer personal information to Autopilot, a Customer acknowledges that it has read, understood and agreed to this Privacy Policy and warrants that it has obtained the consent of the relevant Consumer to such collection, use and disclosure of personal information as described in this Privacy Policy.
How we use personal information
We use the Personal Information we collect online for the following types of purposes:
to provide our products and Services to Customers, including to generate reports for Customers about visitors to their Sites;
to process payments and orders;
to respond to requests or inquiries from Customers, to communicate with Customers about their accounts or orders, and for similar customer-service-related purposes;
to effectuate or enforce a transaction or agreement with a Customer;
to tailor the information we send or display to Customers;
to send marketing and promotional e-mails to our Customers (not Consumers); and
to improve our Site, offerings or services and to better understand how users access and use our Site and offerings, on an aggregated and individualized basis.
Notwithstanding anything else in this Privacy Policy, we also may use aggregate or non-personally identifying information about Customers or Consumers for market analysis, research, marketing or other purposes. We may also identify your company name and/or logo on client lists, marketing materials, and/or press releases. If you wish to be excluded from this program, do so by emailing: “marketing AT autopilothq.com”.
How we disclose personal information
We may disclose any of the Personal Information we collect or receive through our Site and Services as follows:
to our contractors or service providers who provide services or perform functions on our behalf;
in response to a subpoena or other legal process by a governmental entity or third party, or if otherwise required by law;
to protect or enforce our rights or property, including as evidence in litigation in which we are involved;
in the event of the sale or dissolution (bankruptcy) of assets, in whole or in part, of Autopilot or any of its affiliates; and
to our affiliates and subsidiaries, for purposes consistent with this Privacy Policy.
Further, we may disclose Consumer information to the Customer who owns such information. As noted above, Consumer information, including Personal Information, belongs to the Customer that operates the website through which the information was collected, not to Autopilot. Notwithstanding anything else in this Privacy Policy, our Customers may access, view and download any Consumer information belonging to them, and we have no control over their collection, use or disclosure of this information.
We will not disclose Personal Information to any third parties for such third parties’ own marketing purposes, unless we first receive your consent. However, we may share aggregate or non-personally identifying information with third parties for marketing, advertising, research or other purposes.
Cookies and analytics
When you interact with our Site, we strive to make your experience easy and meaningful. We or our third party service providers may use cookies, web beacons (clear GIFs, web bugs) and similar technologies to track site visitor activity and collect site data. We may combine this data with the Personal Information we have collected from Customers. In addition, we use cookies to collect site activity data about visitors to our Customers’ sites.
Cookies. We (or our third party service providers) use cookies to track visitor activity on the Site. A cookie is a text file that a website transfers to your computer’s hard drive for record-keeping purposes. Our cookies assign a random, unique number to each visitor’s computer. They do not contain information that would personally identify the visitor, although we can associate a cookie with any identifying information that is or has been provided by a Customer while visiting our Site. We or our third party service providers use cookies that remain on your computer for a specified period of time or until they are deleted (persistent cookies). These cookies record clickstream information (data reporting the URLs, or names of the pages, on our Site that have been visited). We may also use cookies that exist only temporarily during an online session (session cookies). These cookies allow you to log in to your account and they allow us to identify you temporarily as you move through the Site. Most browsers allow users to refuse cookies, but doing so may impede the functionality of some portions of our Site.
Web Beacons. Web beacons are tiny graphics with a unique identifier, similar in function to cookies, that are used to track the online movements of Web users. In contrast to cookies, which are stored on your computer’s hard drive, Web beacons are embedded invisibly on webpages and may not be disabled or controlled through your browser.
Third Parties. As noted, we may also engage third parties to track and analyze site activity on our behalf. To do so, these third parties may place cookies or web beacons to track user activity on our Site. We use the data collected by such third parties to help us administer and improve the quality of the Site and to analyze usage of the Site.
Third-party links
At times, our Site may contain links to other, third-party websites. Any access to and use of such linked websites is not governed by this Privacy Policy, but, instead, is governed by the privacy policies of those third party websites. We are not responsible for the information practices of such third party websites.
Customer websites and content
We have no control over, nor are we responsible for, the content of our Customers’ websites. We exercise no editorial or managerial control over Customers’ websites. You should check the Privacy Policy for such website, to understand how your information may be collected, used, disclosed and secured by the operator of such website.
Marketing communications
To Our Customers. You may opt-in to receive emails from us about information that we believe may be of interest to you as well as news and offers from us or other third parties, which may include our newsletter or information about special offers, products or offerings, or other items.
If, at any time, you would like to stop receiving these promotional e-mails, you may follow the opt-out instructions contained in any such e-mail. If you opt-out of receiving emails or promotions from us, we still may send you e-mail about your account, any Services you have requested or received from us, or for other customer-service purposes.
We will not send emails to Consumers or users of our Customers’ websites. However, our Customers may use Autopilot’s Service to send commercial e-mails to users or Consumers. Under our policies, Customers may only use the Service to send commercial emails to users or Consumers who have opted in to receiving such e-mails. Each email sent by a Customer through our Service contains an opt-out mechanism through which you may tell a Customer you do not wish to receive future marketing emails from the Customer. However, we are not responsible for the emails sent by our Customers, through our Services, and we cannot guarantee that Consumers will follow our policies or comply with applicable laws. Consumers can report suspected abuse to privacy@autopilothq.com.
Consent to transfer information to the United States and Australia
Please note that information we collect or receive may be transferred to and processed in the United States and in Australia. By using our Site and Services, you consent to the transfer and processing of your Personal Information in the United States and Australia, jurisdictions which may not provide the same level of protection that exists in other countries such as those in the European Economic Area. Your consent is voluntary. If, however, you do not consent, we will not be able to provide you with our Services.
Security
We use commercially reasonable physical, technical and administrative measures to protect the security of the Personal Information that we collect or receive from loss, misuse, and unauthorized access, disclosure, alteration, and destruction. Please be aware that despite our best efforts, no data security measures can guarantee 100% security all of the time.
EU - U.S. and Swiss - U.S. Privacy Shield
With respect to the Personal Information we receive from or on behalf of our customers in the EU and Switzerland, AutopilotHQ, Inc. in the U.S. complies with the EU-U.S. and Swiss-U.S. Privacy Shield Frameworks, as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. You can review our Privacy Shield Notice at
https://www.autopilothq.com/legal/privacy-shield
Access to personal information
In most circumstances Autopilot allows Customers to access the personal information Autopilot holds about them. However, access may be denied where Autopilot is permitted or required by law to deny access to such information.
How to contact us
Questions? You may contact us with any questions or concerns about this Privacy Policy at
privacy@autopilothq.com
.
Sub-policy 11
https://sharethis.com/privacy/:
Opens in a new window
Opens an external website
Opens an external website in a new window
Close this dialog
This website stores data such as cookies to enable essential site functionality, as well as marketing, personalization, and analytics.
You may change your settings at any time or accept the default settings.
You may close this banner to continue with only essential cookies.
Privacy Policy
Storage Preferences
Marketing
Personalization
Analytics
Save
Accept All
Reject All
Privacy
To read our Privacy Policy in other languages please select below:
Francais
Español
Italiano
Português
Deutsche
日本語
Bahasa Indonesia
Melayu
Tagalog
हिन्दी
عربى
ShareThis is a division of
Predactiv, Inc.
, a data company. ShareThis takes privacy seriously. This Privacy Notice sets out what data we collect, how we collect it, why we process it, who we may share it with and, where the data we collect is personal data, your rights with respect to such personal data. ShareThis may change this Notice from time to time by updating this page. You should check this page from time to time to ensure that you are up to date with any changes.
ShareThis is committed to processing information in accordance with applicable laws (including where applicable the European Union’s General Data Protection Regulation (“
GDPR
”) and the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”) and as described in this Privacy Notice. For specific information about how ShareThis adheres to European, UK and Brazil data protection law and your rights as an EEA, UK, Swiss or Brazil data subject please click
here.
For information about how ShareThis adheres to applicable U.S. Privacy laws in States such as California, Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada, Oregon, Texas, Utah, Virginia, and Washington, please click
here
.
To access information for Publishers, please visit the Publisher Information page
here
.
To access Publisher Terms of Use, please click
here
.
Last Updated on: February 19, 2025
Opt-Out of Data Collection and Sharing
About ShareThis and Its Tools
ShareThis provides website operators (“Publishers”) with customizable social sharing tools, which makes sharing online content simple. Any user of a website can easily share anything on the web with their friends on social sites, such as Facebook, Twitter, Email, Digg, Reddit and more through using one of our tools on that website (“
ShareThis Icon
”).
ShareThis also collects pseudonymous data about internet users and how they interact with content, websites, and advertisements while online. Some of the data is collected via our tools such as the
ShareThis Icon
, and some is collected through third-party data providers via our parent company Predactiv. Certain data collected from each publisher related to the activity we observe on that publisher’s site is provided back to that Publisher. We also may license a larger data set (including the data collected via Predactiv) to advertisers, agencies, and other businesses (our “Customers”) to facilitate the delivery of relevant, targeted advertising and for a number of other reasons which are listed below.
We do this by using technology such as cookies and pixels (including the pixels and cookies of our customers) (“
ShareThis Publisher Applications
”) to gather information regarding the browsing and sharing activities of Internet users, both on websites that have the ShareThis Icon and similar tools installed on them. We also receive data from others who operate in the data analytics and advertising industries. We analyze and aggregate the data we collect to create groups of data (called audience segments) based on defined criteria.  For example, we segment into groups internet users who we believe have similar characteristics, interests, needs or behavioral patterns. Where we are able to infer that two or more browsers or devices are the same user or household, we may use that information to bolster our audience segments. We compile this data to provide analytics to our Publishers and license it to our Customers for a number of purposes as described below, including targeted advertising.
Targeted advertising has the aim of displaying advertising which is more likely to be of interest to internet users, based on analyses of their recent browsing and sharing activities and interactions with the website and adverts. It is also sometimes referred to as interest-based advertising or online behavioral advertising. For more information on this type of advertising,
click here
.
Contents
I. Data Collection and Use
II. The GDPR and Your Rights as a Swiss, EU, or UK Data Subject
III. The LGPD and Your Rights as a Brazil Data Subject
IV. The U.S. State Privacy Laws and Your Rights as a Data Subject
V. Data Sharing or Disclosure, Recipients of Your Data
VI. Commitments to Privacy Standards
VII. User Choices and Opt-out Rights
I.
Data Collection and Use
In order to offer our products and services, we collect and use data relating to the websites you visit to display personalized advertisements, provide analytics, and data modeling based on social sharing, by us or third parties. This data is pseudonymous personal data in that it may not be used directly by ShareThis to identify an actual person. This data does enable our systems to recognize your computer, device and/or browser over time. In many places, this pseudonymous data is considered personal data and/or personal information under applicable law.
We do not intentionally collect identifiable personal information such as your name, postal address, phone number, email address, credit card information, or anything else that can allow us or our customers to contact you directly as part of our products and services. We may collect identifiable personal information and even financial information such as payment or bank details if you are one of our Publishers or if you have a business relationship with ShareThis.
We have set out below the categories of data we process and why we process each category of data. Note: The categories of data we process under California law includes (a) Personal and Online Identifiers such as: IP address, mobile advertising IDs and similar pseudonymous UIDs and (b) Internet or other electronic network activity information, including, but not limited to, browsing history, and information regarding a consumer’s interaction with an internet website application, or advertisement.
Usage Data and Profile Information
1.1 Usage Data
We collect information about how
Internet users
browse the Internet and interact with online content and advertisements through our ShareThis Icon, the ShareThis Publisher Applications and user interactions with advertisements on the Internet. We call this “Usage Data”.
Usage Data includes:
The unique IDs of the cookie(s) placed on your web browser (example: 37d387ca-f68a-11e5-b87d-0e58954c72b1) and/or a hashed version of an email address which help us recognize your browser or device over time.
Information about the user’s browser and device
User agent string
Webpages viewed (including the URL addresses of such pages and search parameters, which may include search terms and key words) and the previous web pages that referred the user to that webpage
Time when webpages are viewed
Search queries from which users are directed to a webpage
Navigation from page to page
Interactions with the webpage, including items clicked or selected and content highlighted or copied
Shares of content including what content is shared and where – for example, the relevant social media site (e.g., Twitter, Facebook)
Geographic information such as country, city, state, or postal code.
IP addresses
Device IDs
Although the Usage Data listed above is not used by ShareThis to directly identify an actual person, it is considered to be personal data in many places.
1.2 Profile Information
We receive information about the content of the websites that you visit and information about the audience of those websites to enable us to infer and create groups of users who have similar characteristics, interests, or behavioral patterns. We combine the Usage Data with data we receive from third party advertisers, analytics vendors and data partners to create categories of data that are helpful to advertisers seeking to deliver a more personalized advertising experience. For example, if a user regularly views or shares content about shopping for a car, our systems may infer that this user may be interested in purchasing an automobile.  This practice is sometimes referred to as interest-based advertising, and a segment titled “interested in automobile” is sometimes referred to as an audience segment or a “profile.” When we group this data into profiles, we refer to it as
“Profile Information”.
We can infer this Profile Information (by reference to browser identifiers, not actual names) using the information we obtain from third parties about the likely content and characteristics of the users and audiences of the websites which are visited. For example, visitors to a particular website may have an interest in cars while visitors to a different website may typically be within a certain age or income range. Where we are able to infer that two or more browsers or devices are the same user or household, we may use that information to bolster our Profile Information.
The characteristics by which we group users relate to age ranges, income ranges, education, gender, product or activity interests and family composition (e.g., how many children in the family), on the basis of information available about the typical audience of websites they visit and content viewed.
In certain cases where Publishers that we work with utilize the “Google Analytics By ShareThis WordPress” plug-in on their websites, ShareThis uses a Google Analytics feature currently known as Google Analytics Demographics, in order to better understand the audience demographics of those Publisher websites, and to provide insights about those demographics to the Publishers that own or operate those websites. To learn more about Google Analytics’ privacy practices, please click
here
. To opt-out of Google Analytics by installing the Google Analytics Opt-out Browser Add-on, please click
here
, or you may also visit the
NAI consumer choice page
.
In the U.S., ShareThis creates modeled segments based off of demographic attributes where those attributes are aligned with the target audience of products marketed by pharmaceutical drug companies.
ShareThis does not create Profile Information based on topics we believe to be sensitive under applicable law, or based on visits to adult entertainment websites.
1.3 How we obtain Usage Data and Profile Information
We collect Usage Data when your device visits our website, uses or interacts with our services (including sharing content with the ShareThis Icon), when your device visits Publishers’ websites that use ShareThis Publisher Applications, and when your device views or clicks advertisements that we serve or are served on our behalf. We do so by using cookies placed on your browser (to the extent that cookies are not-restricted by the browser), pixel tags, and HTTP headers (or other communication protocols) and the use of hashed email address. We may also use probabilistic IDs generated via the user agent string and IP address when cookies are restricted by the browser.
Our use of Cookies and other Tracking Technologies
Web Environment:
(desktop, tablet, and smartphone browsers)
ShareThis places cookies containing a UID on the browsers of visitors to websites that use ShareThis Publisher Applications. The ShareThis Publisher Applications also may enable cookies to be placed by ShareThis partners and our Customers to enable the synchronization of unique identifiers between ShareThis and our third-party partners and Customers.
Cookies:
Small text files that contain a string of characters and uniquely identify a browser. Many browsers are initially set up to accept cookies. However, you may be able to change your browser settings to refuse or otherwise restrict cookies. Check your browser’s “Help” files to learn more about handling cookies on your browser.
Below is a description of the cookies placed by ShareThis.
Cookie
Duration
Purpose
_stid
1 year
ShareThis cookie ID.
_stidv
10 years
ShareThis cookie ID version.
wordpress_test_cookie
Session
ShareThis cookie, tests if we have access to cookies.
pubconsent
13 months
ShareThis cookie set to indicate user has made a declaration about GDPR data collection for IAB TCF v1 format.
st_optout
10 years
ShareThis cookie set to indicate that user has opted out from data collection.
_ga
2 years
Google Analytics cookie used by ShareThis to distinguish users.
_gat
1 day
Google Analytics cookie used by ShareThis to distinguish users.
_gid
1 day
Google Analytics cookie used by ShareThis to distinguish users.
visopt_s
3 months
VWO cookie to see the number of times the browser was closed and reopened.
_vis_opt_test_cookie
Session
VWO session cookie to see if the cookies are enabled on the browser of the user or not. Helps in tracking the number of browser sessions of a visitor.
_vwo_uuid_v2
1 year
VWO cookie calculates unique traffic on a website.
intercom-id-fe2c9dmj
10 months
Intercom: Anonymous visitor identifier cookie for site visitors.
intercom-session-fe2c9dmj
7 months
Intercom: Identifier for each unique browser session. Session cookie is refreshed on each successful logged-in ping, extending it to 1 week from that moment. User can access their conversations and have data communicated on logged out pages for 1 week, as long as the session isn’t intentionally terminated with ‘Intercom (’shutdown’), which usually happens on logout.
pxcelBcnLcy
Sessions
ShareThis Tag Management System cookie to track latency on reporting beacon.
pxcelAcc3PC
1 day
ShareThis Tag Management System cookie to check whether third party cookies are accepted by the browser. This is only set if there is no incoming cookie in the request.
pxcelPage_c010
and/or
pxcelPage_c010_B
and/or
pxcelPage_c010_C
and/or
pxcelPage_c010_D
1 year
ShareThis Tag Management System cookie to track status of pixel rotation loading. ShareThis uses a different cookie for different groups of sites within the ShareThis network.
usprivacy
n/a
ShareThis reads if the usprivacy cookie is present in the publisher domain.
fpestid
13 months
Fpestid is a ShareThis cookie ID set in the domain of the website operator.
Pixel tags:
These are small blocks of code on a webpage which read and place cookies. When you visit a webpage, ShareThis’ pixel will see if your browser has a ShareThis cookie installed on it. If it doesn’t, the pixel will place the cookie. If the browser already has a ShareThis cookie, the pixel will “read” the cookie and will send us information such as the time you viewed a webpage, the type of browser used and your IP address. This is how we learn about your interests and enable our customers to deliver targeted advertising to you.
HTTP headers:
These are transmitted whenever a webpage is viewed, and contain technical information required to connect your browser to the webpage. This information may include information about the browser and the requested webpage. ShareThis collects this information.
Hashed emails:
Hashing an email is a cryptographic function. Hashing is a way of encrypting a piece of data, like an email address, into a hexadecimal string. By doing this, each email address becomes an unrecognizable jumble of numbers and letters. This technique doesn’t allow us to send you an email message or to identify who you are. However, it does allow us to recognize your browser or device in the same way that cookies help us to recognize your browser or device. ShareThis may obtain hashed emails from our advertising partners to help provide our products and services. We may also receive and hash emails you provide to our Publishers. For more information, and to better understand the choices available to you, please visit https://thenai.org/opt-out/ama-opt-out/.
Mobile Environments:
(Mobile applications)
To serve ads in mobile applications identifiers may be used, such as Google Advertising ID or Apple IDFA, depending on the operating system of your mobile device. The advertiser identifier does not identify you directly, but it enables advertisers and their technology partners to recognize your mobile device over time. Many of the mobile operating systems which provide these advertising IDs also provide the functionality to reset them and/or to record your opt-out choice. See your device manufacturer for more information or visit NAI Mobile opt-out page at
https://www.networkadvertising.org/mobile-choice/
.
Connected TV Environments:
(Mobile applications)
To serve ads onto TV streaming devices and smart TVs, pseudonymous advertising identifiers may be used. The advertiser identifier does not identify you directly, but it enables advertisers and their technology partners to recognize your smart TV and/or streaming device over time. Many streaming devices and smart TVs that provide these advertising IDs also provide the functionality to reset them and/or to record your opt-out choice. See your device manufacturer for more information or visit the NAI SmartTV opt-out page at https://thenai.org/opt-out/connected-tv-choices/.
Linking Environments:
(browsers and mobile apps used)
To serve you personalized advertisements and provide a seamless online experience, third party data partners that we work with may link your identifiers on the different environments you use. We may enable the linking of our Usage Data through cookie syncing. We do not use plain text information that may be used by ShareThis to identify you such as your name or address to operate the linking. Our data partners may use exact linking methods by leveraging the pseudonymous data collected through our technology such as advertising partner identifiers.
Probabilistic IDs
: Some browsers may block or otherwise restrict our ability to place cookies in the ShareThis domain. When this occurs, ShareThis may use a combination of user agent and IP address to help us recognize a browser or device over time.
You can manage cookies, change consents, or opt out of personalized ads using the mechanisms described in ‘
User Choices’
.
1.4 How we use Usage Data and Profile Information
We use Usage Data and Profile Information internally for the following business purposes:
To enable our tools to function;
Pursuant to our relationship with Google Analytics Demographics, to enable demographic reporting features we provide to our Publishers;
To link browsers and devices that we infer might belong to the same household;
To enable us to sync unique identifiers;
To enable ST to manage the security of our Website, tools, networks, and systems.
To comply with applicable laws.
We may also use Usage Data and Profile Information and/or audience segments and license such information to our Customers for the following business purposes including (where not prohibited under applicable law):
To enable the delivery of targeted advertising
To conduct market research and analytics in order to find meaningful patterns in the data that enables ShareThis to draw insights into how web Users generally behave. This may have specific application to companies seeking to better understand the characteristics of their target customer. It also may help hedge funds attempting understanding macro investment trends.
For data modeling in order to draw inferences. For example, to create lookalike audiences models.
To create modeled segments based off of demographic attributes.
To enhance security features or reduce fraud, including ad fraud,
To enhance addressability features that enable a company to recognize the same browser, device and/or user over time.
Our Customers who we share your data with may use this information to generate their own Profile Information. They may independently gain other demographical information about you through their own cookies or web beacons and combine it with the data we provide to them. While we ask our customers to avoid merging data received from ShareThis with identifiable personal data such as a clear email address (i.e., in violation of the
NAI Code of Conduct
), the use of cookies and pixel tags by these third-party advertisers, publishers, and ad networks are subject to their own privacy policies.  Please refer to the ‘Recipients of Your Data’ section of this Privacy Notice for more information about who we disclose your data to.
Children
ShareThis does not intentionally collect data from children and does not tailor any Profile Information or otherwise license data to enable targeting of children under 18 years of age. If you are a parent or guardian and believe we may be processing data of children you are responsible for, please see the section on User Choices and Rights, or contact us directly.
Emails from Users with ShareThis Icon
When you share to email with the ShareThis Icon, you choose how to connect to email from your device. We will only know what content you shared, and that you did so by means of email. We do not receive any information about the email itself, for example, your email address, the email address of the recipient or the content of your email. We are not responsible for the information shared by users via the ShareThis Publisher Applications.
Account Information
“
Account Information
” means the information which
Publishers
and
representatives of Publishers
provide when they register for an account with us and when they use their account.
Many of our services can be used without registering with us. However if you are a Publisher, or represent a Publisher, and want to use some of our enhanced features, you will need to register with us.
If you choose to register with us, you must be and you affirm that you are 18 years of age or older.
We do not sell or share registration information with third parties for direct marketing purposes.
Business contacts data
We may process your personal data if you are or your employer has a business relationship with us. For example, if you’re a Customer, a prospective Customer, a vendor/supplier of ours, or a business partner, we may process your data. The personal data we hold about you refers to your professional life (name, email address, billing address, office address, phone numbers, title, company you work for). We would have collected that information from exchanging emails or business cards, meeting at industry meetings or client sessions etc. We may process that data for a number of legitimate business purposes, including: a) to communicate with you within the context of our business relationship; b) to provide our products or services; c) for billing and invoicing purposes; and d) for sales, marketing and product promotional purposes ((e.g., uploading emails into LinkedIn and similar platforms to advertise new services to current and prospective Customers).
This data may also be processed for the purposes set out in the section ‘
General purposes which apply to all data.’
Employee and Job Applicants’ data
If you are an employee of ShareThis, or you apply for a role with ShareThis, in the US or in Europe, please refer to our HR Policy for information about how we process your data. These can be obtained from our HR department at
HR@ShareThis.com
.
Data Collected on ShareThis.com
This section sets out how we process data of
visitors of our corporate website
(our “Website”, ShareThis.com), apart from any
‘Usage Data and Profile Information’
and the
‘Account Information’
which relates only to Publishers who register with us.
When you visit our Website, you may choose to provide information to us voluntarily if you interact with ShareThis.com in certain ways, such as by applying for employment with ShareThis, or using one of our contact forms. This information is used only for the reasons for which it was collected, such as responding to your communication, and it is not shared with third parties other than trusted service providers who are contractually required to only use such data to fulfill the purpose for which it was collected.
We use cookies and similar tracking technologies to collect data automatically when you visit ShareThis.com and use that information to help administer the Website, to remember your preferences, to conduct website analytics and for security and fraud prevention purposes.
Where we enable third parties to collect pseudonymous information on ShareThis.com (e.g., using cookies and pixels), that information may be viewed as a sale of data by ShareThis under applicable in certain jurisdictions such as California. To address this, we provide you with a privacy notice when you visit the Website and the opportunity to opt-out of these third-party data collection practices on our Website. We encourage you to visit the applicable policies of those third parties or visit www.aboutads.info to learn more about interest-based advertising and to see your opt-out choices from other participating companies that may be collecting and using data on ShareThis.com.
General purposes which apply to all data
There are a number of “general” reasons that ShareThis may process data on our systems. Many of them are required by applicable law and/or to help us ensure that the Internet remains a safe space. Some of them enable us to promote and grow our business. If you’d like additional information, please email privacy@sharethis.com.
We may also process data for the following purposes: a) as required by applicable law; b) to cooperate with competent legal authorities such as data protection regulators, the police and the FBI; c) to enforce our terms and conditions, including by obtaining advice and conducting legal proceedings; d) to protect our operations, property and interests, and those of third parties; e) to sell and promote the sale of our business and/or assets.
Finally, ShareThis may transfer information to a successor entity in connection with a corporate merger, consolidation, sale of assets, bankruptcy, or other corporate change. If ShareThis is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of all or a portion of its assets, you will be notified via email and/or a prominent notice on our website of any change in ownership or uses of your information, as well as any choices you may have regarding your information.
II.
The GDPR and Your Rights as an EU, Swiss, or UK Data Subject
If you are located in the European Economic Area (EEA), the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR) applies to our processing of personal data. If you are located in Switzerland, The Swiss Federal Data Protection Act applies to our processing of personal data. If you are located in the United Kingdom, then the Data Protection Act 2018 applies to our processing of personal data. These laws each grant those located respectively in the EEA, Switzerland, and the UK a set of clear privacy rights and imposes responsibilities on ShareThis as we process the personal data of data subjects located in those places. The ShareThis privacy policy outlines how and why ShareThis processes personal data. This section is designed to provide more information on how ShareThis adheres to the above data protection laws and your rights as a data subject. For purposes of this privacy policy, we’ll refer to the above data protection laws as “EEA Data Protection Laws” and data subjects located in the above places as “EEA Data Subjects.”
Definition of Personal Data
EEA Data Protection Laws define personal data broadly. As such, where Usage Data and/or Profile Information relates to an individual in the EEA, we treat it as personal data. Similarly, nearly all of the data collected from EEA Data Subjects in the context of our normal business operations is likely to be considered personal data. This includes: a) data collected via visits to ShareThis.com; b) data collected from Customers, Publishers and business partners; and c) data collected from employees and prospective employees.
Special Categories of Personal Data
ShareThis does not collect nor process any special categories of personal data with respect to EEA Data Subjects, and we do not create Profile Information of audience segments of such consumers based on special categories of personal data (i.e. data revealing racial or ethnic origin, political opinions, religious or philosophical beliefs, or trade union membership, genetic data, biometric data, data concerning health, or data concerning a natural person’s sex life or sexual orientation).
Legal Basis for Processing
EEA Data Protection Laws requires entities seeking to process personal data to have a valid legal basis for doing so. The legal basis utilized by ShareThis include: a) consent (our primary legal basis with respect to our Processing of Usage Data and Profile Information); b) legitimate interest (i.e., where we believe that our need to process the data and/or the value we deliver by processing such data is not outweighed by the rights of the data subject); c) where necessary for the performance of a contract; and d) where processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations. We will endeavor to outline our legal basis for the most common types of processing conducted by ShareThis. For example, we may process
TC Strings
for the purpose of ensuring and being able to demonstrate that Users have consented to or not objected to the processing of their personal data in connection with targeted ads.
Cookie and Similar Tracking Technologies
– We endeavor to obtain consent for our placement of cookies, pixels and similar tracking technologies as required under the ePrivacy Directive as implemented throughout the EEA. As ShareThis does not have direct relationships with Internet users in many cases, we ask Publishers and other partners to obtain a consent on our behalf as described below.  Where we directly place cookies (e.g., via ShareThis.com) we directly obtain the consent from data subjects we’ve identified as being from the EEA or other place where consent is required.
Usage Data and Profile Information
– We obtain a consent for our placement of cookies as described above, and ShareThis also processes Usage Data and Profile Information with consent.
Website Data
– We collect personal data via ShareThis.com. Where that data is provided to ShareThis (e.g., via completing an online form), we consider it either Account Data and/or data collected pursuant to a business relationship which are described below. Where we place cookies via the Website, we use consent. Where data is collected automatically (e.g., log files containing IP addresses), we process such data via our legitimate interest and in order to maintain the Website and help us to a better job of personalizing the Website to the interests of visitors.
Account Data and Business Relationships
– We require some Publishers to setup an Account with ShareThis. Similarly, we maintain accounts containing personal data with most of the vendors who provide services to ShareThis, our Customers, our employees, and our business partners. If you are an employee of one of those entities, ShareThis may have your personal data including your name, your work email, or your work telephone number. For data subjects located in the EEA, Switzerland, or UK, we process this data under the legal basis of contractual necessity. In other words, we need to process this data in order to honor the terms of the contract between ShareThis and the Publisher, Customer, vendor, Etc. This includes maintaining an account and login credentials, billing and payment purposes, communicating with the other party, and fulfilling requests. Where we are seeking to market additional products and services to these entities, we will do so via legitimate interest unless applicable law dictates that we use consent (e.g., for email marketing).
General Purposes
– There are a number of instances where ShareThis processes personal data which are distinct from the descriptions provided above. For example:
Legal and Regulatory Compliance – Like most companies, ShareThis will process data in order to comply with law, cooperate with requests from competent legal authorities such as the police, and to pay taxes. The legal basis for this type of processing is necessary for ShareThis to meet our legal and regulatory obligations.
Enforcement of legal obligations – To enforce our terms and conditions, protect of our intellectual property and/or the rights of third parties, ShareThis processes personal data in these instances via our legitimate interest. This may include obtaining advice and conducting legal proceedings.
Sell and Promote our Business – ShareThis may choose to conduct, evaluate and/or promote the sale of our business via our legitimate interest.
Aggregated Data
– Where we aggregate data and remove digital identifiers (e.g., cookie IDs), we may use this data for internal research, marketing, and statistical analysis purposes.
Data Controller
ShareThis is generally a Controller of data with respect to the data processed as described above. Where the EEA Data Protection Laws apply to Usage Data and Profile Information and we share this data with our Customers, our Customers are independent controllers in relation to their processing of such data and they process it in accordance with their own privacy policies. ShareThis is also the controller of the data it collects via ShareThis.com.
Data Processors
ShareThis also has a number of agents and service providers who operate as processors of data on ShareThis’ behalf. These agents and service providers are only able to use the data as specifically directed by ShareThis and only to provide the services requested by us. They are also contractually obligated to process the data securely and under confidentiality obligations.
EEA Data Subject Rights
Where the EEA Data Protection Laws apply, such data subjects have certain rights, including: a) The right to be informed about the types of data being processed and the legal basis for processing; b) the right to access and see the data being processed; c) the right of rectification, to make corrections to data subject to processing; d) the right to erase data; e) the right to restrict processing of data; f) the right of data portability; g) the right to object to the processing of data and f) the right not to be subject to automated decision-making. Some of these rights apply only in certain circumstances and depend on the legal basis relied upon to process the data. As an example, the right to object applies to processing which is carried out because it is necessary for our legitimate interests and only if we cannot demonstrate compelling legitimate grounds which outweigh your rights, interests and freedoms. The same right does not apply to processing which is necessary for us to comply with our legal obligations or to perform a contract with you. These rights may extend to the personal data we place into cookies or similar tracking technologies.
Where processing is based on your consent, in accordance with the GDPR, the Swiss Federal Data Protection Act, and UK Data Protection Act (as applicable), you may withdraw that consent at any time, although any processing previously carried out will still be legal. In order to exercise your data subjects’ rights or if you have any questions about these rights, you can write to us at
privacy@sharethis.com
. We will endeavor to respond to any requests to exercise your rights within one month from when they are made, although this period may be extended in some cases in which case we will inform you before the expiration of the one-month period.
You also have the right to submit complaints to the supervisory authority in your jurisdiction. A list of supervisory authorities in the EEA can be found here:
https://edpb.europa.eu/about-edpb/board/members_en
.
How ShareThis interacts with our Publishers on GDPR, Swiss, and UK Data Protection compliance
If you are in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, you may be familiar with websites asking you to consent to the use of cookies and similar technologies. If you are in the UK, you may see similar consent notices which pertain to the UK Data Protection Act. Where the ShareThis Applications are used to process personal data from data subjects in places where a notice and/or consent is required, our Publishers are required to notify you about the use of the ShareThis Applications, mention ShareThis as a third party who processes your personal data and ask you to consent to such processing as well as the placement of cookies.
Cross-border transfers of EEA, Swiss, and UK personal data
We generally process data in the United States. When we share data, we provide data to companies globally. In each case, we have safeguards in place which allow those transfers to happen in a way that ensures data is handled in accordance with the applicable law.
When we transfer personal data outside the EEA, Switzerland, or UK, unless the recipient or location to which the data is transferred has been approved by the appropriate authorities as providing an adequate level of protection for personal data, we put in place measures to ensure that the transfer complies with the applicable data protection law and that the personal data which is transferred is appropriately safeguarded.
When we enter into business relationships which involves the transfer of  personal data of EEA Data Subjects to the United States, we put in place reasonable transfer mechanisms such as the EU standard contractual clauses with the recipient. More information about international data transfers under the GDPR can be found at
https://ec.europa.eu/info/law/law-topic/data-protection/international-dimension-data-protection_en
.  If requested, we may make available a copy of such safeguards, as required by EAA Data Protection Laws.
Data Protection Officer and Representative
ShareThis has appointed a data protection officer to supervise our personal data processing-related activities, and to respond to requests as required.  Our DPO can be contacted as follows: Vincent Potier (ShareThis DPO):
dpo@sharethis.com
ShareThis’ representative in the UK is: ShareThis UK Limited of 10 John Street, London WC1N 2EB, UK.
ShareThis’ representative in the EU is: Verasafe and they may be reached at representative@sharethis.com.
III.
The LGPD and Your Rights as a Brazil Data Subject
If you are located in Brazil, then the Brazilian General Law for the Protection of Personal Data (LGPD) applies to our processing of personal data. The LGPD grants those located Brazil a set of clear privacy rights and imposes responsibilities on ShareThis as we process the personal data of data subjects located in Brazil. The ShareThis privacy policy outlines how and why ShareThis processes personal data. This section is designed to provide more information on how ShareThis adheres to the LGPD and your rights as a data subject located in Brazil.
Definition of Personal Data
The LGPD defines personal data broadly. As such, where Usage Data and/or Profile Information relates to an individual in Brazil, we treat it as personal data. Similarly, nearly all of the data collected from EEA, Swiss, and UK data subjects in the context of our normal business operations is likely to be considered personal data. This includes: a) data collected via visits to ShareThis.com; b) data collected from Customers, Publishers and business partners; and c) data collected from employees and prospective employees, as applicable.
Special Categories of Personal Data
ShareThis does not collect nor process any special categories of personal data with respect to data subjects in Brazil.
Legal Basis for Processing
The LGPD entities seeking to process personal data to have a valid legal basis for doing so. The legal basis utilized by ShareThis include: a) consent; b) legitimate interest (i.e., where we believe that our need to process the data and/or the value we deliver by processing such data is not outweighed by the rights of the data subject); c) where necessary for the performance of a contract; and d) where processing is necessary to comply with our legal obligations.
Brazil and Data Subject Rights
Where the LGPD applies, such data subjects have certain rights, including: a) The right to be informed about the types of data being processed and the legal basis for processing; b) the right to access and see the data being processed; c) the right of rectification, to make corrections to data subject to processing; d) the right to erase data; e) the right to restrict processing of data; f) the right of data portability; g) the right to object to the processing of data and f) the right not to be subject to automated decision-making. Some of these rights apply only in certain circumstances and depend on the legal basis relied upon to process the data. If you are located in Brazil and have questions about how ShareThis implements these rights, please email us at privacy@sharethis.com.
IV.
The U.S. State Privacy Laws (e.g., CCPA) and Your Rights as a Data Subject
A number of U.S. states (e.g., California, Colorado, Connecticut, Nevada, Oregon, Virginia, Utah and Texas) have enacted laws that may provide additional privacy protections for data subjects and users located into those states, including:
the right to see what data we have about you, your computer or device (i.e., the right to know),
the right to correct the data we have about you, your computer or device, or to port that data to a different provider (subject to limitations),
the right to delete the data we have about you, your computer or device (i.e., the right to delete), and
the right to opt-out of the sale or sharing of data about you, your computer or device to certain third parties (i.e., the right to opt-out from sales or sharing of your information) and the right to opt-out of profiling and/or targeted ads.
These U.S. state laws define personal information broadly. And as such, almost all of the information we collect is considered personal information under these laws. U.S. data subjects may send an email to
privacy@sharethis.com
to exercise those rights of visit data subject access page. California data subjects may also call us on our toll free CCPA privacy hotline at 1-800-272-1765. Some U.S. states provide you with the right to further appeal our determination to a consumer protection agency located in that state. For example:
Colorado – The Colorado Attorney General’s Office.
Maryland – Maryland Attorney General Consumer Protection Division.
Nebraska – Nebraska Attorney General’s Office.
New Hampshire – Data Privacy Unit of the Consumer Protection and Antitrust Bureau of the New Hampshire Attorney General’s Office.
New Jersey –  Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety of New Jersey.
Texas – For denied appeals, visit the Texas Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
Virginia – For denied appeals, visit the Virginia Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
We do not treat users that exercise any of the above rights differently or otherwise discriminate against users exercising privacy rights. However, we may not be able to honor a right if doing so would violate applicable law. ShareThis does not sell data collected via our Website or the data we use to operate our business. However, we transfer personal information collected via the ShareThis Publisher Applications to third parties and as such are considered to have sold data over the past twelve months under California law, including any of the Usage Data, Profile Information and/or audience segments.
We generally ask only for the minimum information necessary to help us process a subject access or deletion request and will keep information pertaining to your request for up to two years. If you are a customer of ShareThis with a login and password to the ShareThis platform, we ask that you first direct your request to the person or persons at your organization that administers the relationship with ShareThis. California data subjects may also call us on our toll free CCPA privacy hotline at 1-800-272-1765.
CCPA Metrics for 2023
Pursuant to CCPA Regulation 999.317(g), ShareThis informs you of the following metrics:
Total
Whole
Part
Denied
a. The number of CCPA requests to know that ShareThis received, complied with whole or part and denied in 2023
0
0
0
0
b. The number of CCPA requests to delete that ShareThis received, complied with whole or part and denied in 2023
17
17
0
0
c. The number of CCPA requests to opt-out that ShareThis received via our email form, complied with whole or part and denied in 2023
9
9
0
0
d. The median number of days within which ShareThis substantively responded to requests to know, requests to delete and requests to opt-out
Total
Requests to know
0
Requests to delete
27
Requests to opt-out
Real Time
Total
e. The number of opt-out requests we received via the ShareThis opt-out page or industry opt-out pages worldwide in 2023 all of which resulted in the real-time placement of an opt-out cookie by ShareThis as described in this privacy policy.
7,524,354
V.
Data Sharing or Disclosure, Recipients of Your Data
We sell and/or share Usage Data, Profile Information and/or audience segments with the following types of businesses, and with the exception of Publishers, we view each of the below as our Customers:
Publishers – We provide analytics tools for Publishers based on the data collected via the ShareThis tools.
Advertisers and Retailers – companies seeking to better understand their customers so as to more effectively serve those customer’s needs
Advertising Agencies – companies that purchase advertising on behalf of other companies.
Advertising Technology Companies – companies that enable the delivery of advertising, mostly via digital channels, including demand side platforms, supply side platforms, advertising exchanges and ad servers.
Marketing Technology Companies – companies that enable the delivery of marketing messages via channels such as email and SMS.
Data Companies – companies that process data into profiles that enable other companies to market and advertise more effectively.
Professional Services Companies – Companies that provide high level strategy and analytic services.
Security or Fraud Prevention Vendors – Companies that help ensure the security and reliability of their customer’s data or infrastructure.
Investment Firms – Financial services companies and investment firms seeking to better understand how consumers use the Internet.
We share this information for the purposes listed in the section
‘Data Collection and Use
.’
Where the GDPR or similar privacy or data protection laws applies to Usage Data and Profile Information and we share this data with our Customers, our Customers are independent controllers in relation to their processing of such data and they process it in accordance with their own privacy policies.
Customers may share the data which they process with other third parties who are not mentioned in this Privacy Notice, in accordance with their own privacy policies.   As an example, they may use third party service providers to display advertising or other content on their behalf.
Please review some of our Customer’s privacy policies for more information:
LiveRamp:
https://liveramp.com/privacy/
AppNexus:
https://www.appnexus.com/platform-privacy-policy
Eyeota :
https://www.eyeota.com/privacy-policy
Lotame:
https://www.lotame.com/about-lotame/privacy/
Nielsen:
https://www.nielsen.com/legal/privacy-principles/nielsen-marketing-cloud-services-privacy-statement/
Retargetly:
https://retargetly.com/privacy-policy
1plusX:
https://www.1plusx.com/privacy-policy/
AptivIO:
https://aptiv.io/privacy-policy
Dunn & Bradstreet:
https://www.dnb.com/ca-en/utility-pages/privacy-policy.html
2. Other third-party agents and service providers
We share the data described in this Privacy Notice trusted agents with data storage and processing facilities such as Amazon Web Services who are required under contract to only process data according to our written instructions and we require them to use data only for the purposes of providing services to us and to implement security controls and to maintain the confidentiality of that information. Here are the categories of service providers utilized by ShareThis:
Cloud data storage providers such as Amazon Web Services;
Customer billing systems providers;
Email service providers offering tools to send emails on our behalf;
Website analytics providers such as Google analytics;
Customer relationship management software providers;
Vendors assisting us with legally required audits;
Third-party computer programmers helping ensure our systems are operating properly;
Job ticket support vendors helping us record issues and debug; and
Security vendors.
3. Data Retention
We have defined retention policies for different types of personal data. We only retain data for as long as necessary for the purpose for which we process it and only as long as it remains relevant, unless we need to retain it because we are required to do so by law, to defend and exercise claims, or for regulatory reasons.
3.1 Usage Data, Profile Information and Data Collected via ShareThis.com
We retain Usage Data and Profile Information for up to 13 months from the date of collection for targeted advertising, and for up to 36 months for insights and analytics. We also retain data collected via ShareThis.com for up to 36 months for analytics and to ensure that our website functions properly.
We may aggregate and anonymize data so that it can no longer be linked to a device or individual, therefore it ceases to be personal data, and we may retain this data for longer periods.
3.2 Account Information
We retain Account Information for as long as you have an active account with us. If you have not logged into any of our services with your username and password for a period of 14 consecutive months, we may deem your account as being inactive and delete your Account Information. This could result in the loss of data you may have saved and we do not accept liability for such deletion.
You always have the option to cancel your account with us at any time. Simply sign into the site and click on the My Account at the top of the page. Click on Edit Profile and then select Deactivate Account and follow the instructions. You may also request to have your Account Information removed by submitting a request to
privacy@sharethis.com
.
4. Data Security
The security of your information is a high priority to ShareThis. We have implemented industry-standard security measures.
While no transmission of data over the Internet is guaranteed to be completely secure, we strive to protect your data. It may be possible for third parties not under the control of ShareThis to unlawfully intercept or access transmissions of private communications. ShareThis cannot ensure or warrant the security of information you transmit to us.
VI.
Commitments to Privacy Standards
ShareThis promotes transparency and control for users as members of various self-regulatory programs. Some U.S. states provide you with the right to further appeal our determination to a consumer protection agency located in that state. For example:
Colorado – The Colorado Attorney General’s Office.
Maryland – Maryland Attorney General Consumer Protection Division.
Nebraska – Nebraska Attorney General’s Office.
New Hampshire – Data Privacy Unit of the Consumer Protection and Antitrust Bureau of the New Hampshire Attorney General’s Office.
New Jersey –  Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety of New Jersey.
Texas – For denied appeals, visit the Texas Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
Virginia – For denied appeals, visit the Virginia Attorney General’s Office, Consumer Protection Division.
ShareThis is a member of the following self-regulatory programs:
Network Advertising Initiative (NAI):
ShareThis is a member in good standing with the NAI. The NAI offers an online
web opt-out platform
to allow consumers to express their choices and provides general information related to privacy and
Interest Based Advertising
.
The Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA):
ShareThis adheres to the Digital Advertising Alliance Self-Regulatory Principles for Online Behavioral Advertising.  The
DAA opt-out platform
offers the consumer a choice page to opt out from advertising services, and general information related to privacy.
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA):
ShareThis adheres to the
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance’s (“EDAA”) principles
.  The
EDAA opt-out platform
offers consumers in the European Union a choice page to opt out from advertising services, and general information related to privacy.
VII.
User Choices and Opt-out Rights
If you do not want to receive advertisements based on Usage Data and Profile Information collected by ShareThis on your current browser, you can change and manage your preferences in relation to the collection and processing of Usage Data and Profile Information by clicking the ShareThis opt-out button available on this privacy policy. When data subjects opt-out, ShareThis will stop profiling, engaging in targeted advertising and/or selling or otherwise transferring data about their browser or device to third parties in accordance with applicable law.
If you do not want to receive ads based on Usage Data collected by ShareThis whatever device or browser used, you must opt-out from our services for each device and each internet web browser.
Opt-Out of Data Collection and Sharing
Click below to “Limit Ad-Tracking” function on mobile devices:
Instructions by Google for most Androids:
Google Play Help
Instructions by Apple for iOS version 6 and above:
Apple Support Center
Furthermore:
This process does not mean you will stop seeing advertisements, but that the advertisements you do see will not be influenced by the Usage Data collected and Profile Information used by ShareThis.
If you have any questions about your opt-out rights, you can write to us at
privacy@sharethis.com
.
Browser environment:
(desktop, tablet, and smartphone browsers)
When you change your consents or opt out, an opt-out cookie will be set on your browser. We must maintain the opt-out cookie on your browser in order to recognize you as having opted out from our service. The ShareThis opt-out cookie is like any other cookie; therefore, if you clear that cookie from your browser, use a different internet browser, or use a new computer to access the internet you must go through the process again.
You can also opt out by visiting the following links.
Network Advertising Initiative (“NAI”) Opt-Out Platform
Digital Advertising Alliance (“DAA”) Opt-Out Platform
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (“EDAA”) Opt-Out Platform
The
Ghostery browser extension
is also a good tool to see a list of all third-party cookies on each website you visit and allows you to selectively opt out.
Note:
The opt-out tools above are currently cookie-based i.e., they set a cookie on your browser which tells us that you have opted out. This means that the opt-out will only function if your browser is set to accept third party cookies. If your browser is set to automatically reject cookies or if you remove all cookies from your browser, the opt-out mechanism will not work since we would not see an opt-out cookie on your browser.
Also keep in mind that cookies are browser based, therefore if you change browsers, operating systems, or computers you would need to opt out again.
Mobile environment:
While the opt-out methods described above often work for mobile web browsing, they are cookie-based and are therefore less reliable in mobile “app” environments that may not accept interest-based advertising cookies.
Instead, you can typically opt out at the mobile platform level by the “limit ad tracking” function within the settings, as described below. Though we do not collect data from mobile apps for interest-based advertising, we or third parties we work with may use such data collected by others in delivering interest-based ads.
Most Android Users:
To use the “opt-out of interest-based advertising” option, follow the instructions provided by Google here:
Google Play Help
.
Please note that this is a device setting and will disable interest-based ads from all providers, and not just for ShareThis.
iOS users:
(version 6 and above)
To use the “Limit Ad-Tracking” option, follow the instructions provided by Apple here:
Apple Support Center
.
Please note that this is a device setting and will disable interest-based ads from all providers, and not just for ShareThis.
Do Not Track
/ Opt-out Preference Signals
:
You may also stop the collection of your Usage Data by using the do-not-track function, opt-out preference signals, or similar privacy controls of your browser. ShareThis recognizes these do-not-track signals from your browser. As required by law, or where we are able to ascertain that such signals are enacted by you and not set by default by your browser, we will consider them to be an indication that you have opted out.
Onward Transfer/Data Privacy Framework:
ShareThis is a division of Predactiv, Inc. As such, ShareThis is a U.S.-based covered entity of Predactiv and participates in and has certified its compliance with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss U.S. DPF.  To read more about our compliance with DPF, please review Predactiv’s privacy policy
here
.
Contact Information
ShareThis, Inc.
3000 El Camino Real
Building 4, Suite 200
Palo Alto, CA 94306, USA
privacy@sharethis.com
We have appointed a data protection officer to supervise our personal data
processing-related activities, and to respond to requests as required. Our DPO can be contacted as follows:
Vincent Potier (ShareThis DPO): dpo@sharethis.com
ShareThis’ representative in the UK is: ShareThis UK Limited of 10 John Street, London
WC1N 2EB, UK
VeraSafe has been appointed as ShareThis’s representative in the European Union for data protection matters, pursuant to Article 27 of the General Data Protection Regulation of the European Union. If you are in the European Economic Area, VeraSafe can be contacted in addition to representative@sharethis.com, only on matters related to the processing of personal data. To make such an inquiry, please contact VeraSafe using this contact form: https://verasafe.com/public-resources/contact-data-protection-representative or via telephone at: +420 228 881 031.
Opt-out confirmed
Now, we can’t sell your data.
Close
Back to contents
EN
ES
DE
FR
IT
ZH-TW
PT
JA
132k
Shares
Share
Tweet
Pin
Email
Share
Share
Sub-policy 12
https://policies.google.com/privacy:
Privacy & Terms
Overview
Privacy Policy
Terms of Service
Technologies
FAQ
Google Account
Privacy Policy
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
Data transfer frameworks
Key terms
Partners
Updates
Google Privacy Policy
When you use our services, you’re trusting us with your information. We understand this is a big responsibility and work hard to protect your information and put you in control.
This Privacy Policy is meant to help you understand what information we collect, why we collect it, and how you can update, manage, export, and delete your information.
If European Union or United Kingdom data protection law applies to the processing of your information, you can review the
European requirements section
below to learn more about your rights and Google’s compliance with these laws.
Privacy Checkup
Looking to change your privacy settings?
Take the Privacy Checkup
Effective September 16, 2024
|
Archived versions
|
Download PDF
Contents
Introduction
Information Google collects
Why Google collects data
Your privacy controls
Sharing your information
Keeping your information secure
Exporting & deleting your information
Retaining your information
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
European requirements
About this policy
Related privacy practices
We build a range of services that help millions of people daily to explore and interact with the world in new ways. Our services include:
Google apps, sites, and devices, like Search, YouTube, and Google Home
Platforms like the Chrome browser and Android operating system
Products that are integrated into third-party apps and sites, like ads, analytics, and embedded Google Maps
You can use our services in a variety of ways to manage your privacy. For example, you can sign up for a Google Account if you want to create and manage content like emails and photos, or see more relevant search results. And you can use many Google services when you’re signed out or without creating an account at all, like searching on Google or watching YouTube videos. You can also choose to browse the web in a private mode, like
Chrome Incognito
mode, which helps keep your browsing private from other people who use your device. And across our services, you can adjust your privacy settings to control whether we collect some types of data and how we use it.
To help explain things as clearly as possible, we’ve added examples, explanatory videos, and definitions for
key terms
. And if you have any questions about this Privacy Policy, you can
contact us
.
Information Google collects
We want you to understand the types of information we collect as you use our services
We collect information to provide better services to all our users — from figuring out basic stuff like which language you speak, to more complex things like which
ads you’ll find most useful
,
the people who matter most to you online
, or which YouTube videos you might like. The information Google collects, and how that information is used, depends on how you use our services and how you manage your privacy controls.
When you’re not signed in to a Google Account, we store the information we collect with
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or
device
you’re using. This allows us to do things like maintain your preferences across browsing sessions, such as your preferred language or whether to show you more relevant search results or ads based on your activity.
When you’re signed in, we also collect information that we store with your Google Account, which we treat as
personal information
.
Things you create or provide to us
When you create a Google Account, you provide us with
personal information
that includes your name and a password. You can also choose to add a
phone number
or
payment information
to your account. Even if you aren’t signed in to a Google Account, you might choose to provide us with information — like an email address to communicate with Google or receive updates about our services.
We also collect the content you create, upload, or receive from others when using our services.  This includes things like email you write and receive, photos and videos you save, docs and spreadsheets you create, and comments you make on YouTube videos.
Information we collect as you use our services
Your apps, browsers & devices
We collect information about the apps, browsers, and
devices
you use to access Google services, which helps us provide features like automatic product updates and dimming your screen if your battery runs low.
The information we collect includes
unique identifiers
, browser type and settings, device type and settings, operating system, mobile network information including carrier name and phone number, and application version number. We also collect information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, including
IP address
, crash reports, system activity, and the date, time, and
referrer URL
of your request.
We collect this information when a Google service on your device contacts our servers — for example, when you install an app from the Play Store or when a service checks for automatic updates. If you’re using an
Android device with Google apps
, your device periodically contacts Google servers to provide information about your device and connection to our services. This information includes things like your
device type and carrier name
, crash reports, which apps you've installed, and, depending on your device settings,
other information about how you’re using your Android device
.
Your activity
We collect information about your activity in our services, which we use to do things like recommend a YouTube video you might like. The activity information we collect may include:
Terms you search for
Videos you watch
Views and interactions with content and ads
Voice and audio information
Purchase activity
People with whom you communicate or share content
Activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Chrome browsing history you’ve
synced with your Google Account
If you use our
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
, we may collect call and message log information like your phone number, calling-party number, receiving-party number, forwarding numbers, sender and recipient email address, time and date of calls and messages, duration of calls, routing information, and types and volumes of calls and messages.
You can visit your Google Account to find and manage activity information that’s saved in your account.
Go to Google Account
Your location information
We collect location information when you use our services, which helps us offer features like driving directions, search results for things near you, and ads based on your location.
Depending on the products you’re using and settings you choose, Google may use different types of location information to help make some services and products you use more helpful. These include:
GPS and other
sensor data from your device
IP address
Activity on Google services
, such as from your searches or
places you label like home or work
Information about things near your device
, such as Wi-Fi access points, cell towers, and Bluetooth-enabled devices
The types of location data we collect and how long we store it depend in part on your device and account settings. For example, you can
turn your Android device’s location on or off
using the device’s settings app. You can also turn on
Location History
if you want to create a private map of where you go with your signed-in devices. And if your Web & App Activity setting is enabled, your searches and other activity from Google services, which may also include location information, is saved to your Google Account. Learn more about
how we use location information
.
In some circumstances, Google also collects information about you from
publicly accessible sources
. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. We may also collect information about you from trusted partners, such as directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, marketing partners who provide us with information about potential customers of our business services, and security partners who provide us with information to
protect against abuse
. We also receive information from partners to provide
advertising and research services on their behalf
.
We use various technologies to collect and store information, including
cookies
,
pixel tags
, local storage, such as
browser web storage
or
application data caches
, databases, and
server logs
.
Why Google collects data
We use data to build better services
We use the information we collect from all our services for the following purposes:
Provide our services
We use your information to
deliver our services
, like processing the terms you search for in order to return results or helping you share content by suggesting recipients from your contacts.
Maintain & improve our services
We also use your information to
ensure our services are working as intended
, such as tracking outages or troubleshooting issues that you report to us. And we use your information to
make improvements
to our services — for example, understanding which search terms are most frequently misspelled helps us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Develop new services
We use the information we collect in existing services to help us develop new ones. For example, understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Provide personalized services, including content and ads
We use the information we collect to customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and
customized search results
. For example,
Security Checkup
provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products. And, depending on your available settings, Google Play could use information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
Depending on your settings, we may also show you
personalized ads
based on your interests and activity across Google services. For example, if you search for “mountain bikes,” you may see ads for sports equipment on YouTube. You can control what information we use to show you ads by visiting your ad settings in
My Ad Center
.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on
sensitive categories
, such as race, religion, sexual orientation, or health.
We don’t show you personalized ads based on your content from Drive, Gmail, or Photos.
We don’t share information that personally identifies you with advertisers, such as your name or email, unless you ask us to. For example, if you see an ad for a nearby flower shop and select the “tap to call” button, we’ll connect your call and may share your phone number with the flower shop.
Go to My Ad Center
Measure performance
We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used. For example, we analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design. And we also use data about the ads you interact with, including your related Google Search activity, to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We use a variety of tools to do this, including Google Analytics. When you visit sites or use apps that use Google Analytics, a Google Analytics customer may choose to enable Google to
link information
about your activity from that site or app with activity from other sites or apps that use our ad services.
Communicate with you
We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly. For example, we may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location. Or we may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services. And if you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Protect Google, our users, and the public
We use information to help improve the
safety and reliability
of our services. This includes detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or
the public
.
We use different technologies to process your information for these purposes. We use automated systems that analyze your content to provide you with things like customized search results, personalized ads, or other features tailored to how you use our services. And we analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content. We also use
algorithms
to recognize patterns in data. For example, Google Translate helps people communicate across languages by detecting common language patterns in phrases you ask it to translate.
We may
use the information we collect
across our services and across your devices for the purposes described above. For example, depending on your available settings, if you watch videos of guitar players on YouTube, you might see an ad for guitar lessons on a site that uses our ad products. Depending on your account settings,
your activity on other sites and apps
may be associated with your personal information in order to improve Google’s services and the ads delivered by Google.
If other users already have your email address or other information that identifies you, we may show them your publicly visible Google Account information, such as your name and photo. This helps people identify an email coming from you, for example.
We’ll ask for your consent before using your information for a purpose that isn’t covered in this Privacy Policy.
Your privacy controls
You have choices regarding the information we collect and how it's used
This section describes key controls for managing your privacy across our services. You can also visit the
Privacy Checkup
, which provides an opportunity to review and adjust important privacy settings. In addition to these tools, we also offer specific privacy settings in our products — you can learn more in our
Product Privacy Guide
.
Go to Privacy Checkup
Managing, reviewing, and updating your information
When you’re signed in, you can always review and update information by visiting the services you use. For example, Photos and Drive are both designed to help you manage specific types of content you’ve saved with Google.
We also built a place for you to review and control information saved in your Google Account. Your
Google Account
includes:
Privacy controls
Activity Controls
Decide what types of activity you’d like saved in your account. For example, if you have YouTube History turned on, the videos you watch and the things you search for are saved in your account so you can get better recommendations and remember where you left off. And if you have Web & App Activity turned on, your searches and activity from other Google services are saved in your account so you can get more personalized experiences like faster searches and more helpful app and content recommendations. Web & App Activity also has a subsetting that lets you control whether
information about your activity on other sites, apps, and devices that use Google services
, such as apps you install and use on Android, is saved in your Google Account and used to improve Google services.
Go to Activity Controls
Ad settings
Manage your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that
partner with Google
to show ads. You can modify your interests, choose whether your personal information is used to make ads more relevant to you, and turn on or off certain advertising services.
Go to My Ad Center
About you
Manage personal info in your Google Account and control who can see it across Google services.
Go to About You
Shared endorsements
Choose whether your name and photo appear next to your activity, like reviews and recommendations, that appear in ads.
Go to Shared Endorsements
Sites and apps that use Google services
Manage information that websites and apps using Google services, like Google Analytics, may share with Google when you visit or interact with their services.
Go to How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Ways to review & update your information
My Activity
My Activity allows you to review and control data that’s saved to your Google Account when you’re signed in and using Google services, like searches you’ve done or your visits to Google Play. You can browse by date and by topic, and delete part or all of your activity.
Go to My Activity
Google Dashboard
Google Dashboard allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Go to Dashboard
Your personal information
Manage your contact information, such as your name, email, and phone number.
Go to Personal Info
When you’re signed out, you can manage information associated with your browser or device, including:
Signed-out search personalization:
Choose
whether your search activity is used to offer you more relevant results and recommendations.
YouTube settings: Pause and delete your
YouTube Search History
and your
YouTube Watch History
.
Ad Settings:
Manage
your preferences about the ads shown to you on Google and on sites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Exporting, removing & deleting your information
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Inactive Account Manager
allows you to give someone else access to parts of your Google Account in case you’re unexpectedly unable to use your account.
And finally, you can also
request to remove content
from specific Google services based on applicable law and our policies.
There are other ways to control the information Google collects whether or not you’re signed in to a Google Account, including:
Browser settings: For example, you can configure your browser to indicate when Google has set a
cookie
in your browser. You can also configure your browser to block all cookies from a specific domain or all domains. But remember that our services
rely on cookies to function properly
, for things like remembering your language preferences.
Device-level settings: Your device may have controls that determine what information we collect. For example, you can
modify location settings
on your Android device.
Sharing your information
When you share your information
Many of our services let you share information with other people, and you have control over how you share. For example, you can share videos on YouTube publicly or you can decide to keep your videos private. Remember, when you share information publicly, your content may become accessible through search engines, including Google Search.
When you’re signed in and interact with some Google services, like leaving comments on a YouTube video or reviewing an app in Play, your name and photo appear next to your activity. We may also display this information in
ads depending on your Shared endorsements setting
.
When Google shares your information
We do not share your personal information with companies, organizations, or individuals outside of Google except in the following cases:
With your consent
We’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent. For example, if you
use Google Home to make a reservation
through a booking service, we’ll get your permission before sharing your name or phone number with the restaurant. We also provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account. We’ll ask for your explicit consent to share any
sensitive personal information
.
With domain administrators
If you’re a student or work for an organization that uses Google services, your
domain administrator
and resellers who manage your account will have access to your Google Account. They may be able to:
Access and retain information stored in your account, like your email
View statistics regarding your account, like how many apps you install
Change your account password
Suspend or terminate your account access
Receive your account information in order to satisfy applicable law, regulation, legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Restrict your ability to delete or edit your information or your privacy settings
For external processing
We provide personal information to our
affiliates
and other trusted businesses or persons to process it for us, based on our instructions and in compliance with our Privacy Policy and any other appropriate confidentiality and security measures. For example, we use service providers to help operate our data centers, deliver our products and services, improve our internal business processes, and offer additional support to customers and users. We also use service providers to help review YouTube video content for public safety and analyze and listen to samples of saved user audio to help improve Google’s audio recognition technologies.
For legal reasons
We will share personal information outside of Google if we have a good-faith belief that disclosure of the information is reasonably necessary to:
Respond to any applicable law, regulation,
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
. We share information about the number and type of requests we receive from governments in our
Transparency Report
.
Enforce applicable Terms of Service, including investigation of potential violations.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, security, or technical issues.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our
users
, or the public.
We may share
non-personally identifiable information
publicly and with our partners — like publishers, advertisers, developers, or rights holders. For example, we share information publicly to
show trends
about the general use of our services. We also allow
specific partners
to collect information from your browser or device for advertising and measurement purposes using their own cookies or similar technologies.
If Google is involved in a merger, acquisition, or sale of assets, we’ll continue to ensure the confidentiality of your personal information and give affected users notice before personal information is transferred or becomes subject to a different privacy policy.
Keeping your information secure
We build security into our services to protect your information
All Google products are built with strong security features that continuously protect your information. The insights we gain from maintaining our services help us detect and automatically block security threats from ever reaching you. And if we do detect something risky that we think you should know about, we’ll notify you and help guide you through steps to stay better protected.
We work hard to protect you and Google from unauthorized access, alteration, disclosure, or destruction of information we hold, including:
We use encryption to keep your data private while in transit
We offer a range of security features, like
Safe Browsing
, Security Checkup, and
2 Step Verification
to help you protect your account
We review our information collection, storage, and processing practices, including physical security measures, to prevent unauthorized access to our systems
We restrict access to personal information to Google employees, contractors, and agents who need that information in order to process it. Anyone with this access is subject to strict contractual confidentiality obligations and may be disciplined or terminated if they fail to meet these obligations.
Exporting & deleting your information
You can export a copy of your information or delete it from your Google Account at any time
You can export a copy of content in your Google Account if you want to back it up or use it with a service outside of Google.
Export your data
To delete your information, you can:
Delete your content from
specific Google services
Search for and then delete specific items from your account using
My Activity
Delete specific Google products
, including your information associated with those products
Delete your entire Google Account
Delete your information
Retaining your information
We retain the data we collect for different periods of time depending on what it is, how we use it, and how you configure your settings:
Some data you can delete whenever you like, such as your
personal info
or the content you create or upload, like
photos
and
documents
. You can also delete
activity information
saved in your account, or
choose to have it deleted automatically
after a set period of time. We’ll keep this data in your Google Account until you remove it or choose to have it removed.
Other data is deleted or anonymized automatically after a set period of time, such as
advertising data
in server logs.
We keep some data until you delete your Google Account, such as information about how often you use our services.
And some data we retain for longer periods of time when necessary for legitimate business or legal purposes, such as security, fraud and abuse prevention, or financial record-keeping.
When you delete data, we follow a deletion process to make sure that your data is safely and completely removed from our servers or retained only in anonymized form. We try to ensure that our services protect information from accidental or malicious deletion. Because of this, there may be delays between when you delete something and when copies are deleted from our active and backup systems.
You can read more about Google’s
data retention periods
, including how long it takes us to delete your information.
Compliance & cooperation with regulators
We regularly review this Privacy Policy and make sure that we process your information in ways that comply with it.
Data transfers
We maintain
servers around the world
and your information may be processed on servers located outside of the country where you live. Data protection laws vary among countries, with some providing more protection than others. Regardless of where your information is processed, we apply the same protections described in this policy. We also comply with certain
legal frameworks
relating to the transfer of data.
When we receive formal written complaints, we respond by contacting the person who made the complaint. We work with the appropriate regulatory authorities, including local data protection authorities, to resolve any complaints regarding the transfer of your data that we cannot resolve with you directly.
European requirements
How to exercise your rights and contact Google
If European Union (EU) or United Kingdom (UK) data protection law applies to the processing of your information, we provide the
controls
described in this policy so you can exercise your rights to request access to, update,
remove
, and restrict the processing of your information. You also have the right to object to the processing of your information or export your information to another service.
If you have additional questions or requests related to your rights,
you can contact Google and our data protection office
. And you can contact your local data protection authority if you have concerns regarding your rights under local law.
Data controller
Unless otherwise stated in a service-specific privacy notice, the
data controller responsible for processing your information
depends on where you are based:
Google Ireland Limited for users of Google services based in the European Economic Area or Switzerland, located at Gordon House, Barrow Street, Dublin 4, Ireland.
Google LLC for users of Google services based in the United Kingdom, located at 1600 Amphitheatre Parkway, Mountain View, California 94043, USA.
Google LLC is the data controller responsible for processing information indexed and displayed in services like
Google Search
and Google Maps regardless of your location. Google Ireland Limited is the data controller responsible for processing information to train Google’s AI models for the purpose of deploying them in services provided by Google Ireland Limited in the European Economic Area or Switzerland.
Legal bases of processing
We process your information for the
purposes
described in this policy, based on the following legal grounds:
We process your data in order to provide a service you’ve asked for under a contract.
We process your data for our legitimate interests and those of
third parties
while applying
appropriate safeguards
that protect your privacy.
We process your data when necessary to protect the vital interests of you or another person.
We process your data when we have a legal obligation to do so.
We ask for your consent to process your data for specific purposes and you have the right to withdraw your consent at any time.
How you use Google services and your privacy settings will determine what data is processed, the purposes for which this data is processed, and the legal bases for processing data. The table below explains these processing purposes, the kinds of data processed, and the legal grounds for processing this data, in more detail.
Why and how we process data
What data is processed
Legal grounds
To provide Google services, products, and features
Examples of processing activities:
We process the terms you search for in order to return results.
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video.
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account.
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, we use your shipping address or delivery instructions for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
We process your payment information when you buy extra storage for Google Drive.
We can use contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail.
Google also collects information about you from publicly accessible sources. For example, if your name appears in your local newspaper, Google’s Search engine may index that article and display it to other people if they search for your name. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
We can help you share your location using
Google Location Sharing
, so that others can find you on a map, or know your estimated time of arrival.
As described in the
Sharing your information
section, we’ll share personal information outside of Google when we have your consent, and provide you with controls to
review and manage third party apps and sites
you have given access to data in your Google Account.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as loading a YouTube video, or processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order when you purchase services or physical goods from us.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users
. For example, using contact info (like names and email addresses) of people you interact with in Google products to make it easier to find who you’re looking for when you want to share and communicate with these people in other Google services like Gmail, Photos and Assistant.
With your
consent
, such as when you choose to share your location with Google Location Sharing.
To maintain and improve Google services, products, and features
To maintain the service so it works as intended, such as debugging the service, tracking issues or troubleshooting issues.
Examples of processing activities:
We continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
We log users’ interactions with buttons on apps like Google Maps and Search to help understand if they are functioning as intended.
To make improvements to Google services and to help improve the safety and reliability of these services, such as to detect, prevent, and respond to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm the service or users.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your interactions with our services to help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
We analyze which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
We analyze usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
We analyze queries on Google Shopping in order to determine which products, merchants, and brands are relevant to different kinds of queries.
Google Chrome’s Safe Browsing feature can send information about suspicious websites between a user’s browser and Google's servers to help protect against phishing, malware, malicious ads, and more.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as using logs of interactions with Google apps to ensure they are working as intended.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing which search terms are most frequently misspelled to help us improve spell-check features used across our services.
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, improving Google Translate’s translation quality and increasing the availability of Translate in more languages.
To develop new Google services, products and features
Examples of processing activities:
Understanding how people organized their photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos.
Understanding how users view and creators generate short-form content helped Google develop new YouTube services.
Depending on your settings, we can save audio recordings of voice interactions with services like Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
We use publicly available information online or from other public sources to help train new machine learning models and build foundational technologies that power various Google products such as Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
We use your interactions with AI models and technologies like Gemini Apps to develop, train, fine-tune, and improve these models to better handle your requests, and update their classifiers and filters including for safety, language understanding, and factuality.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, understanding how people used photos in Picasa, Google’s first photos app, helped us design and launch Google Photos. Or using information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features using these foundational technologies, like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, using information about your activity in our services, like your interactions with Gemini Apps, to train and improve machine learning models, and update their language understanding capabilities, safety classifiers and filters.
With your
consent
, such as saving audio recordings of voice interactions with Google Search, Assistant, Maps, and Gboard to develop and improve Google audio technologies.
To provide personalized services, including content and ads
To customize our services for you, including providing recommendations, personalized content, and customized search results.
Examples of processing activities:
Google’s Security Checkup feature provides security tips adapted to how you use Google products.
Google News may provide you with local news results based on your approximate location.
Google Search may provide you with results based on your approximate location.
Google Assistant can use your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
Google Play uses information like apps you’ve already installed and videos you’ve watched on YouTube to suggest new apps you might like.
We may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
Google can show you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips.
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services.
Depending on your settings, to show you personalized ads based on your interests.
Examples of processing activities:
If you search for “mountain bikes” or watch videos of mountain biking, you may see an ad for sports equipment in your search results or on YouTube.
If you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web.
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when Google Assistant uses your contacts to send a message at your request, like “Send a text to John Smith.”
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Customize our services to provide you with a better user experience.
For example, displaying a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country, providing security tips adapted to how you use Google products, or tailoring the experience to be age-appropriate, if relevant.
Provide advertising, which allows us to offer many of our services without a fee.
For example, showing you ads based on the context of the site you’re visiting, like ads for gardening equipment on a page about gardening tips. (And when ads are personalized, we ask for your consent.)
With your
consent
, such as recommending apps on Google Play based on videos you’ve watched on YouTube, or showing you personalized ads based on your interests, like ads that relate to baking as you browse the web after watching videos about baking on YouTube.
To measure performance - We use data for analytics and measurement to understand how our services are used.
Examples of processing activities:
We analyze data about your visits to our sites to do things like optimize product design.
We use data about the ads you interact with to help advertisers understand the performance of their ad campaigns.
We use data about which places users click most on Google Earth to understand which features are popular and to identify bugs.
Google Search measures the number of times a particular query has been made, and how users perceive the quality of their search results, to make Search more useful.
Google Translate analyzes data on the number of translations made and the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality, in order to identify potential new features and address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
We may share non-personally identifiable information with our partners like content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Understand how people use our services to ensure and improve the performance of our services.
For example, analyzing usage of Google Translate to improve translation quality and increase the availability of Translate in more languages.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, monitoring usage patterns on Google Earth to identify bugs.
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, analyzing the number of times a translation is marked as poor quality on Google Translate in order to address issues that users are experiencing on the service.
Develop new products and features that are useful for our users.
For example, analyzing data on the number of translations made on Google Translate to identify potential new features.
Fulfill obligations to our partners like developers and rights holders.
For example, providing reporting to content licensors to accompany royalty payments.
To communicate with you - We use information we collect, like your email address, to interact with you directly.
Examples of processing activities:
We may send you a notification if we detect suspicious activity, like an attempt to sign in to your Google Account from an unusual location.
We may let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
If you contact Google, we’ll keep a record of your request in order to help solve any issues you might be facing.
Google services like Photos may send you marketing communications about its product offerings like printing promotions, depending on your settings.
Google services like YouTube Premium and YouTube Music Premium may notify you about upcoming changes to your subscription.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
To
perform a contract
with you, such as when you contact Google for support or sign up for communications about product updates.
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Provide, maintain, and improve services to meet the needs of our users.
For example, informing you about our services, such as to let you know about upcoming changes or improvements to our services.
Marketing to inform users about our services.
For example, emailing users of Photos about a printing promotion.
To protect Google, our users, and the public
To help improve the safety and reliability of our services, including detecting, preventing, and responding to fraud, abuse, security risks, and technical issues that could harm Google, our users, or the public.
Examples of processing activities:
We collect and analyze IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
We analyze your content to help us
detect abuse
such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
We process information about requests to remove content from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
To meet any applicable law, regulation, legal process or enforceable governmental request.
Examples of processing activities:
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process.
Legal obligations sometimes require us to retain certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, such as information about a payment you’ve made to Google for tax or accounting purposes.
Various laws and regulations require us to put in place measures to confirm that our users are old enough to use our services. To help determine your age, we process the date of birth you provide. We also process information about your activity in our services, both when you’re signed in to a Google Account or signed out, and use machine learning technology to determine if you are likely over 18. In certain cases, if we cannot confirm that you are old enough to use our services by other means, we can request other information to verify your age, like your government ID, credit card, a photo of you, or your phone number.
The information processed will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
Things you create or provide to us
:
Content you create, upload, or receive (like photos, videos, emails, docs and spreadsheets).
Google Dashboard
allows you to manage information associated with specific products.
Personal information that you provide us when you create a Google Account (like your
name
and password,
phone number
, date of birth, or
payment information
).
Information that we collect as you use our services
:
Information about your apps, browsers & devices
, such as
unique identifiers
tied to the browser, application, or device you’re using; and information about the interaction of your apps, browsers, and devices with our services, (like IP address, crash reports, and system activity).
Information about your activity in our services
, such as your search terms, Chrome browsing history you’ve synced with your Google Account, your views and interactions with content and ads, and your activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services. You can review and control activity data stored in your Google Account in
My Activity
.
Location information
, such as may be determined by GPS, IP address, and other data from sensors on or around your device, depending in part on your device and account settings.
Information from publicly accessible sources
, such as information that’s publicly available online (like if your name appears in a local newspaper article) or from other public sources.
Information from our trusted partners
, such as from directory services who provide us with business information to be displayed on Google’s services, or security partners who provide us with information to protect against abuse.
The legal grounds for processing this information will depend on how you use Google services and your settings but could include the following:
When necessary for our
legitimate interests
and those of third parties, including to:
Enforce legal claims, including investigation of potential violations of applicable Terms of Service.
For example, analyzing content to help us detect abuse such as spam, malware, and illegal content.
Detect, prevent, or otherwise address fraud, abuse, security, or technical issues with our services.
For example, collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse.
Protect against harm to the rights, property or safety of Google, our users, or the public, including disclosing information to government authorities.
For example, responding to legal process or enforceable requests from governments and courts to disclose data, after carefully reviewing each request to make sure it satisfies applicable laws.
Perform research that improves our services for our users and benefits the public.
For example, processing information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
When necessary to protect the
vital interests
of you or another person. For example, processing data to detect and combat online child sexual abuse.
When we have a
legal obligation
to do so, such as retaining certain information for purposes like financial record-keeping, or processing and retaining information to help ensure that users are old enough to use our services.
Linking your Google services
If you’re a user in the EU, we offer you the choice to keep certain Google services linked. You can learn more about your linked services and how to manage your choices at
About DMA & Your Linked Services
.
About this policy
When this policy applies
This Privacy Policy applies to all of the services offered by Google LLC and its
affiliates
, including YouTube, Android, and services offered on third-party sites, such as advertising services. This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to services that have separate privacy policies that do not incorporate this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy doesn’t apply to:
The information practices of other companies and organizations that advertise our services
Services offered by other companies or individuals, including products or sites they offer that may include Google services to which the policy applies, or products or sites displayed to you in search results, or linked from our services
Changes to this policy
We change this Privacy Policy from time to time. We will not reduce your rights under this Privacy Policy without your explicit consent. We always indicate the date the last changes were published and we offer access to
archived versions
for your review. If changes are significant, we’ll provide a more prominent notice (including, for certain services, email notification of Privacy Policy changes).
Related privacy practices
Specific Google services
The following privacy notices provide additional information about some Google services:
Payments
Fiber
Gemini Apps
Google Fi
Google Workspace for Education
Read Along
YouTube Kids
Google Accounts Managed with Family Link, for Children under 13 (or applicable age in your country)
Family Link privacy guide for children & teens
Voice and Audio Collection from Children’s Features on the Google Assistant
If you’re a member of an organization that uses Google Workspace or Google Cloud Platform, learn how these services collect and use your personal information in the
Google Cloud Privacy Notice
.
Other useful resources
The following links highlight useful resources for you to learn more about our practices and privacy settings.
Your Google Account
is home to many of the settings you can use to manage your account
Privacy Checkup
guides you through key privacy settings for your Google Account
Google’s safety center
helps you learn more about our built-in security, privacy controls, and tools to help set digital ground rules for your family online
Google’s Teen Privacy Guide
provides answers to some of the top questions we get asked about privacy
Privacy & Terms
provides more context regarding this Privacy Policy and our Terms of Service
Technologies
includes more information about:
How Google uses cookies
Technologies used for
Advertising
How Google uses information from sites or apps that use our services
Key terms
Affiliates
An affiliate is an entity that belongs to the Google group of companies, including the following companies that provide consumer services in the EU: Google Ireland Limited, Google Commerce Ltd, Google Payment Corp, and Google Dialer Inc. Learn more about the
companies providing business services in the EU
.
Algorithm
A process or set of rules followed by a computer in performing problem-solving operations.
Application data cache
An application data cache is a data repository on a device. It can, for example, enable a web application to run without an internet connection and improve the performance of the application by enabling faster loading of content.
Browser web storage
Browser web storage enables websites to store data in a browser on a device. When used in "local storage" mode, it enables data to be stored across sessions. This makes data retrievable even after a browser has been closed and reopened. One technology that facilitates web storage is HTML 5.
Cookies
A cookie is a small file containing a string of characters that is sent to your computer when you visit a website. When you visit the site again, the cookie allows that site to recognize your browser. Cookies may store user preferences and other information. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. However, some website features or services may not function properly without cookies. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
and how Google uses data, including cookies,
when you use our partners' sites or apps
.
Device
A device is a computer that can be used to access Google services. For example, desktop computers, tablets, smart speakers, and smartphones are all considered devices.
Google Account
You may access some of our services by signing up for a
Google Account
and providing us with some personal information (typically your name, email address, and a password). This account information is used to authenticate you when you access Google services and protect your account from unauthorized access by others. You can edit or delete your account at any time through your Google Account settings.
IP address
Every device connected to the Internet is assigned a number known as an Internet protocol (IP) address. These numbers are usually assigned in geographic blocks. An IP address can often be used to identify the location from which a device is connecting to the Internet. Learn more about
how we use location information.
Non-personally identifiable information
This is information that is recorded about users so that it no longer reflects or references an individually-identifiable user.
Personal information
This is information that you provide to us which personally identifies you, such as your name, email address, or billing information, or other data that can be reasonably linked to such information by Google, such as information we associate with your Google Account.
Pixel tag
A pixel tag is a type of technology placed on a website or within the body of an email for the purpose of tracking certain activity, such as views of a website or when an email is opened. Pixel tags are often used in combination with cookies.
Referrer URL
A Referrer URL (Uniform Resource Locator) is information transmitted to a destination webpage by a web browser, typically when you click a link to that page. The Referrer URL contains the URL of the last webpage the browser visited.
Sensitive personal information
This is a particular category of personal information relating to topics such as confidential medical facts, racial or ethnic origins, political or religious beliefs, or sexuality.
Server logs
Like most websites, our servers automatically record the page requests made when you visit our sites. These “server logs” typically include your web request, Internet Protocol address, browser type, browser language, the date and time of your request, and one or more cookies that may uniquely identify your browser.
A typical log entry for a search for “cars” looks like this:
123.45.67.89 - 25/Mar/2003 10:15:32 -
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars -
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7 -
740674ce2123e969
123.45.67.89
is the Internet Protocol address assigned to the user by the user’s ISP. Depending on the user’s service, a different address may be assigned to the user by their service provider each time they connect to the Internet.
25/Mar/2003 10:15:32
is the date and time of the query.
http://www.google.com/search?q=cars
is the requested URL, including the search query.
Chrome 112; OS X 10.15.7
is the browser and operating system being used.
740674ce2123a969
is the unique cookie ID assigned to this particular computer the first time it visited Google. (Cookies can be deleted by users. If the user has deleted the cookie from the computer since the last time they’ve visited Google, then it will be the unique cookie ID assigned to their device the next time they visit Google from that particular device).
Unique identifiers
A unique identifier is a string of characters that can be used to uniquely identify a browser, app, or device. Different identifiers vary in how permanent they are, whether they can be reset by users, and how they can be accessed.
Unique identifiers can be used for various purposes, including security and fraud detection, syncing services such as your email inbox, remembering your preferences, and providing personalized advertising. For example, unique identifiers stored in cookies help sites display content in your browser in your preferred language. You can configure your browser to refuse all cookies or to indicate when a cookie is being sent. Learn more about
how Google uses cookies
.
On other platforms besides browsers, unique identifiers are used to recognize a specific device or app on that device. For example, a unique identifier such as the Advertising ID is used to provide relevant advertising on Android devices, and can be
managed
in your device’s settings. Unique identifiers may also be incorporated into a device by its manufacturer (sometimes called a universally unique ID or UUID), such as the IMEI-number of a mobile phone. For example, a device’s unique identifier can be used to customize our service to your device or analyze device issues related to our services.
Additional Context
Activity on Google Services
If you’re signed in to your Google Account and have Web & App Activity turned on, your activity data on Google sites, apps, and services may be saved in your account’s Web & App Activity. Some activity may include information about the general area you were in when using the Google service. When you search for something using a general area, your search will use an area of at least 3 sq km, or expand until the area represents the locations of at least 1,000 people. This helps protect your privacy.
In some cases, areas that you have searched from in the past may be used to estimate a relevant location for your search. For example, if you search for coffee shops while in Chelsea, Google might show results for Chelsea in future searches.
You can view and control your Web & App Activity at
My Activity
.
activity on third-party sites and apps that use our services
Websites and apps that integrate Google services like ads and analytics share information with us.
This information is collected regardless of which browser or browser mode you use. For example, although Incognito mode in Chrome can help keep your browsing private from other people who use your device, third party sites and apps that integrate our services may still share information with Google when you visit them.
You can
learn more
about some of the ways you can control the information that is shared when you visit or interact with sites and apps that use Google services.
ads you’ll find most useful
For example, if you watch videos about baking on YouTube, you may see more ads that relate to baking as you browse the web. We also may use your IP address to determine your approximate location, so that we can serve you ads for a nearby pizza delivery service if you search for “pizza.” Learn more
about Google ads
and
why you may see particular ads
.
advertising and research services on their behalf
For example, merchants may upload data from their loyalty-card programs so that they can include loyalty information in search or shopping results, or better understand the performance of their ad campaigns. We only provide aggregated reports to advertisers that don’t reveal information about individual people.
Android device with Google apps
Android devices with Google apps include devices sold by Google or one of our partners and include phones, cameras, vehicles, wearables, and televisions. These devices use Google Play Services and other pre-installed apps that include services like Gmail, Maps, your phone’s camera and phone dialer, text-to-speech conversion, keyboard input, and security features. Learn more about
Google Play Services
.
appropriate safeguards
For example, we may anonymize data, or encrypt data to ensure it can’t be linked to other information about you.
Learn more
benefits the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services to educate the public, facilitate research, and provide transparency about these requests.
customized search results
For example, when you’re signed in to your Google Account and have the Web & App Activity control enabled, you can get more relevant search results that are based on your previous searches and activity from other Google services. You can
learn more here
. You may also get customized search results even when you’re signed out. If you don’t want this level of search customization, you can
search and browse privately
or turn off
signed-out search personalization
.
Customizing our services
For example, we may display a Google Doodle on the Search homepage to celebrate an event specific to your country.
data controller responsible for processing your information
This means the Google affiliate that is responsible for processing your information and for complying with applicable privacy laws.
deliver our services
Examples of how we use your information to deliver our services include:
We use the IP address assigned to your device to send you the data you requested, such as loading a YouTube video
We use unique identifiers stored in cookies on your device to help us authenticate you as the person who should have access to your Google Account
Photos and videos you upload to Google Photos are used to help you create albums, collages, and other creations that you can share.
Learn more
A flight confirmation email you receive may be used to create a “check-in” button that appears in your Gmail
When you purchase services or physical goods from us, you may provide us information like your shipping address or delivery instructions. We use this information for things like processing, fulfilling, and delivering your order, and to provide support in connection with the product or service you purchase.
detect abuse
When we detect spam, malware, illegal content (including
child sexual abuse and exploitation material
), and other forms of abuse on our systems in violation of our policies, we may disable your account or take other appropriate action. In certain circumstances, we may also report the violation to appropriate authorities.
devices
For example, we can use information from your devices to help you decide which device you’d like to use to install an app or view a movie you buy from Google Play. We also use this information to help protect your account.
ensure and improve
For example, we analyze how people interact with advertising to improve the performance of our ads.
ensure our services are working as intended
For example, we continuously monitor our systems to look for problems. And if we find something wrong with a specific feature, reviewing activity information collected before the problem started allows us to fix things more quickly.
Information about things near your device
If you use Google’s Location services on Android, we can improve the performance of apps that rely on your location, like Google Maps. If you use Google’s Location services, your device sends information to Google about its location, sensors (like accelerometer), and nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi access points (like MAC address and signal strength). All these things help to determine your location. You can use your device settings to enable Google Location services.
Learn more
legal process, or enforceable governmental request
Like other technology and communications companies, Google regularly receives requests from governments and courts around the world to disclose user data. Respect for the privacy and security of data you store with Google underpins our approach to complying with these legal requests. Our legal team reviews each and every request, regardless of type, and we frequently push back when a request appears to be overly broad or doesn’t follow the correct process. Learn more in our
Transparency Report
.
make improvements
For example, we use cookies to analyze how people interact with our services. And that analysis can help us build better products. For example, it may help us discover that it’s taking people too long to complete a certain task or that they have trouble finishing steps at all. We can then redesign that feature and improve the product for everyone.
may link information
Google Analytics relies on first-party cookies, which means the cookies are set by the Google Analytics customer. Using our systems, data generated through Google Analytics can be linked by the Google Analytics customer and by Google to third-party cookies that are related to visits to other websites. For example, an advertiser may want to use its Google Analytics data to create more relevant ads, or to further analyze its traffic.
Learn more
our users
For example, to prevent abuse and increase transparency and accountability over our online content moderation practices, Google shares data about requests for removal of content from our services with Lumen, which collects and analyzes these requests to facilitate research to help Internet users understand their rights.
Learn more
.
partner with Google
There are over 2 million non-Google websites and apps that partner with Google to show ads.
Learn more
payment information
For example, if you add a credit card or other payment method to your Google Account, you can use it to buy things across our services, like apps in the Play Store. We may also ask for other information, like a business tax ID, to help process your payment. In some cases, we may also need to verify your identity and may ask you for information to do this.
We may also use payment information to verify that you meet age requirements, if, for example, you enter an incorrect birthday indicating you’re not old enough to have a Google Account.
Learn more
personalized ads
You may also see personalized ads based on information from the advertiser. If you shopped on an advertiser's website, for example, they can use that visit information to show you ads.
Learn more
phone number
If you add your phone number to your account, it can be used for different purposes across Google services, depending on your settings. For example, your phone number can be used to help you access your account if you forget your password, help people find and connect with you, and make the ads you see more relevant to you.
Learn more
Places you label like home and work
You might choose to save places to your Google Account that are important to you, such as your home or your work. If you set your home or work addresses, they can be used to help you do things more easily, such as getting directions or finding results closer to your home or work, and for more useful ads.
You can edit or delete your home or work addresses anytime in your
Google Account.
protect against abuse
For example, information about security threats can help us notify you if we think your account has been compromised (at which point we can help you take steps to protect your account).
publicly accessible sources
For example, we may collect information that’s publicly available online or from other public sources to help train Google’s AI models and build products and features like Google Translate, Gemini Apps, and Cloud AI capabilities. Or, if your business’s information appears on a website, we may index and display it on Google services.
rely on cookies to function properly
For example, we use a cookie called ‘lbcs’ that makes it possible for you to open many Google Docs in one browser. Blocking this cookie would prevent Google Docs from working as expected.
Learn more
remove
For example, as described above, you can
request to remove content
, including content that may contain your information, from specific Google services, based on applicable law (including data protection law) and our policies.
safety and reliability
Some examples of how we use your information to help keep our services safe and reliable include:
Collecting and analyzing IP addresses and cookie data to protect against automated abuse. This abuse takes many forms, such as sending spam to Gmail users, stealing money from advertisers by fraudulently clicking on ads, or censoring content by launching a Distributed Denial of Service (DDoS) attack.
The “last account activity” feature in Gmail can help you find out if and when someone accessed your email without your knowledge. This feature shows you information about recent activity in Gmail, such as the IP addresses that accessed your mail, the associated location, and the date and time of access.
Learn more
sensitive categories
When showing you personalized ads, we use topics that we think might be of interest to you based on your activity. For example, you may see ads for things like "Cooking and Recipes" or "Air Travel.” We don’t use topics or show personalized ads based on sensitive categories like race, religion, sexual orientation, or health. And we
require the same from advertisers
that use our services.
Sensor data from your device
Your device may have sensors that can be used to better understand your location and movement. For example, an accelerometer can be used to determine your speed and a gyroscope to figure out your direction of travel. Learn more about
how we use location information.
servers around the world
For example, we operate data centers located
around the world
to help keep our products continuously available for users.
services to make and receive calls or send and receive messages
Examples of these services include:
Google Voice, for making and receiving calls, sending text messages, and managing voicemail
Google Meet, for making and receiving video calls
Gmail, for sending and receiving emails
Google Chat, for sending and receiving messages
Google Duo, for making and receiving video calls and sending and receiving messages
Google Fi, for a phone plan
show trends
When lots of people start searching for something, it can provide useful information about particular trends at that time. Google Trends samples Google web searches to estimate the popularity of searches over a certain period of time and shares those results publicly in aggregated terms.
Learn more
similar information related to your physical or mental health
If you use fitness products and apps we offer, such as Fitbit, Pixel Watch, Nest or Google Fit, we collect data you provide, like your height and weight. We also collect information from these apps and devices, such as your sleep patterns, heart rate, skin temperature, calories burned, and steps taken.
specific Google services
For example, you can delete
your blog
from Blogger or
a Google Site you own
from Google Sites. You can also delete
reviews
you’ve left on apps, games, and other content in the Play Store.
specific partners
For example, we allow YouTube creators and advertisers to work with measurement companies to learn about the audience of their YouTube videos or ads, using cookies or similar technologies. Another example is merchants on our shopping pages, who use cookies to understand how many different people see their product listings.
Learn more
about these partners and how they use your information.
synced with your Google Account
Your Chrome browsing history is only saved to your account if you’ve enabled Chrome synchronization with your Google Account.
Learn more
the people who matter most to you online
For example, when you type an address in the To, Cc, or Bcc field of an email you're composing, Gmail will suggest addresses based on the people you
contact most frequently
.
the public
For example, we process information about
requests to remove content
from our services under Google's content removal policies or applicable law to assess the request, and to ensure transparency, improve accountability and prevent abuse and fraud in these practices.
third parties
For example, we process your information to report use statistics to rights holders about how their content was used in our services. We may also process your information if people search for your name and we display search results for sites containing publicly available information about you.
use the information we collect across our services
Depending on your available settings, some examples of how we use the information we collect across our services include:
When you’re signed in to your Google Account and search on Google, you can see search results from the public web, along with relevant information from the content you have in other Google products, like Gmail or Google Calendar. This can include things like the status of your upcoming flights, restaurant, and hotel reservations, or your photos.
Learn more
If you have communicated with someone via Gmail and want to add them to a Google Doc or an event in Google Calendar, Google makes it easy to do so by autocompleting their email address when you start to type in their name. This feature makes it easier to share things with people you know.
Learn more
The Google app can use data that you have stored in other Google products to show you personalized content, depending on your settings. For example, if you have searches stored in your Web & App Activity, the Google app can show you news articles and other information about your interests, like sports scores, based on your activity.
If you connect your Google Account to your Google Home, you can manage your information and get things done through the Google Assistant. For example, you can add events to your Google Calendar or get your schedule for the day, ask for status updates on your upcoming flight, or send information like driving directions to your phone.
Learn more
If you’re a user in the EU, the decisions you make on linking services will affect how certain Google services can use the data across our services.
Views and interactions with content and ads
For example, we collect information about views and interactions with ads so we can provide aggregated reports to advertisers, like telling them whether we served their ad on a page and whether the ad was likely seen by a viewer. We may also measure other interactions, such as how you move your mouse over an ad or if you interact with the page on which the ad appears.
Voice and audio information
For example, you can choose whether you want Google to save an audio recording to your Google Account when you interact with Google Search, Assistant, and Maps. When your device detects an audio activation command, like “Hey Google,” Google records your voice and audio plus a few seconds before the activation.
Learn more
your activity on other sites and apps
This activity might come from your use of Google services, like from syncing your account with Chrome or your visits to sites and apps that partner with Google. Many websites and apps partner with Google to improve their content and services. For example, a website might use our advertising services (like AdSense) or analytics tools (like Google Analytics), or it might embed other content (such as videos from YouTube). These services may share information about your activity with Google and, depending on your
account settings
and the products in use (for instance, when a partner uses Google Analytics in conjunction with our advertising services), this data may be associated with your personal information.
Learn more
about how Google uses data when you use our partners' sites or apps.
Google
About Google
Privacy
Terms
Transparency Center
A drop down list to change the language of the site. Each option is a language name. There are 65 language options.
Afrikaans
Bahasa Indonesia
Bahasa Melayu
Català
Čeština
Dansk
Deutsch
Eesti
English
English (India)
English (United Kingdom)
Español
Español (Latinoamérica)
Euskara
Filipino
Français
Français (Canada)
Gaeilge
Galego
Hrvatski
Isizulu
Íslenska
Italiano
Kiswahili
Latviešu
Lietuvių
Magyar
Malti
Nederlands
Norsk
Polski
Português (Brasil)
Português (Portugal)
Română
Slovenčina
Slovenščina
Srpski
Suomi
Svenska
Tiếng Việt
Türkçe
অসমীয়া
Ελληνικά
Български
ଓଡିଆ
Русский
Српски
Українська
‫עברית‬
‫اردو‬
‫العربية‬
‫فارسی‬
አማርኛ
मराठी
हिन्दी
বাংলা
ગુજરાતી
தமிழ்
తెలుగు
ಕನ್ನಡ
മലയാളം
ไทย
한국어
中文 (香港)
中文（简体中文）
中文（繁體中文）
日本語
Main menu
Google apps
Sub-policy 13
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-gb/privacystatement:
This is the Trace Id: abb1f1e409319508dcb2405fae3b6e26
Microsoft Privacy Statement
Last Updated: March 2025
What's new?
Print
Expand All
Collapse All
Microsoft Privacy Statement
Personal data we collect
How we use personal data
Reasons we share personal data
How to access and control your personal data
Cookies and similar technologies
Products provided by your organisation – notice to end users
Microsoft account
Collection of data from children
Other important privacy information
Security of personal data
Where we store and process personal data
Our retention of personal data
U.S. State Data Privacy
Advertising
Speech recognition technologies
Preview or free-of-charge releases
Changes to this privacy statement
How to contact us
Product-specific details:
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
Enterprise and developer products
Enterprise online services
Enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances
Productivity and communications products
Microsoft 365, Office, and other productivity apps
Microsoft Family
Microsoft Launcher
Microsoft Teams
OneDrive
Outlook
Skype
Surface
Surface Duo
LinkedIn
Search and browse
Bing
Microsoft Edge
Microsoft Translator
SwiftKey
Windows
Activation
Activity history
Advertising ID
Diagnostics
Personalised offers
Feedback Hub
Get Help
Live captions
Location services and recording
Narrator
Phone Link - Link to Windows
Cross-device experiences
Security and safety features
Speech, Voice Activation, Inking, and Typing
Sync and backup settings
Update Services
Web browsers—Microsoft Edge Legacy and Internet Explorer
Windows AI Features
Windows apps
Windows Hello
Windows Search
Entertainment and related services
Xbox
Microsoft Store
Microsoft Start
Silverlight
Windows Mixed Reality
Cookies
Most Microsoft sites use cookies, small text files placed on your device which web servers utilise and, in the domain that placed the cookie, can retrieve later. We use cookies to store your preferences and settings, help with sign-in, provide personalised ads and analyse site operations. For more information, see the
Cookies and similar technologies
section of this privacy statement.
EU-U.S., UK Extension, and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks
Microsoft complies with the EU-U.S., UK Extension to the EU-U.S., and Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Frameworks. To learn more, see the
Where we store and process personal data
section, and
visit the U.S. Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework website
.
Contact us
If you have a privacy concern, complaint, or question for the Microsoft Chief Privacy Officer or EU Data Protection Officer, please contact us by using our
web form
. For more information about contacting Microsoft, including Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, see the
How to contact us
section of this privacy statement.
Your privacy is important to us. This privacy statement explains the personal data Microsoft processes, how Microsoft processes it, and for what purposes.
Microsoft offers a wide range of products, including server products used to help operate enterprises worldwide, devices you use in your home, software that students use at school, and services developers use to create and host what’s next. References to Microsoft products in this statement include Microsoft services, websites, apps, software, servers, and devices.
Please read the product-specific details in this privacy statement, which provide additional relevant information. This statement applies to the interactions Microsoft has with you and the Microsoft products listed below, as well as other Microsoft products that display this statement.
Young people may prefer starting with the
Privacy for young people
page. That page highlights information that may be helpful for young people.
For individuals in the United States, please refer to our
U.S. State Data Privacy Notice
and the
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for additional information about the processing of your personal data, and your rights under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws.
Personal data we collect
Microsoft collects data from you, through our interactions with you and through our products. You provide some of this data directly, and we get some of it by collecting data about your interactions, use, and experiences with our products. The data we collect depends on the context of your interactions with Microsoft and the choices you make, including your privacy settings and the products and features you use. We also obtain data about you from Microsoft affiliates, subsidiaries, and third parties.
If you represent an organisation, such as a business or school, that utilises Enterprise and Developer Products from Microsoft, please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement to learn how we process your data. If you are an end user of a Microsoft product or a Microsoft account provided by your organisation, please see the
Products provided by your organisation
and the
Microsoft account
sections for more information.
You have choices when it comes to the technology you use and the data you share. When we ask you to provide personal data, you can decline. Many of our products require some personal data to provide you with a service. If you choose not to provide data -required to provide you with a product or feature, you cannot use that product or feature. Likewise, where we need to collect personal data by law or to enter into or carry out a contract with you, and you do not provide the data, we will not be able to enter into the contract; or if this relates to an existing product you are using, we may have to suspend or cancel it. We will notify you if this is the case at the time. Where providing the data is optional, and you choose not to share personal data, features such as personalisation that use such data will not work for you.
Microsoft collects data from you, through our interactions with you and through our products for a variety of purposes described below, including to operate effectively and provide you with the best experiences with our products. You provide some of this data directly, such as when you create a Microsoft account, administer your organisation’s licensing account, submit a search query to Bing, register for a Microsoft event, upload a document to OneDrive, sign up for Microsoft 365 or contact us for support. We get some of it by collecting data about your interactions, use, and experience with our products and communications. In addition, we receive data from Microsoft affiliates, subsidiaries, and third parties.
We rely on a variety of legal reasons and permissions (sometimes called “legal bases”) to process data, including with your consent, a balancing of legitimate interests, necessity to enter into and perform contracts, and compliance with legal obligations, for a variety of purposes described below.
We also obtain data from third parties. We protect data obtained from third parties according to the practices described in this statement, plus any additional restrictions imposed by the source of the data. These third-party sources vary over time and include:
Data brokers from which we purchase demographic data to supplement the data we collect.
Services that make user-generated content from their service available to others, such as local business reviews or public social media posts.
Communication services, including email providers and social networks, when you give us permission to access your data on such third-party services or networks.
Service providers that help us determine your device’s location.
Partners with which we offer co-branded services or engage in joint marketing activities.
Developers who create experiences through or for Microsoft products.
Third parties that deliver experiences through Microsoft products.
Publicly-available sources, such as open public sector, academic, and commercial data sets and other data sources.
If you represent an organisation, such as a business or school, that utilises Enterprise and Developer Products from Microsoft, please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement to learn how we process your data. If you are an end user of a Microsoft product or a Microsoft account provided by your organisation, please see the
Products provided by your organisation
and the
Microsoft account
sections for more information.
You have choices when it comes to the technology you use and the data you share. When you are asked to provide personal data, you can decline. Many of our products require some personal data to operate and provide you with a service. If you choose not to provide data required to operate and provide you with a product or feature, you cannot use that product or feature. Likewise, where we need to collect personal data by law or to enter into or carry out a contract with you, and you do not provide the data, we will not be able to enter into the contract; or if this relates to an existing product you’re using, we may have to suspend or cancel it. We will notify you if this is the case at the time. Where providing the data is optional, and you choose not to share personal data, features such as personalisation that use the data will not work for you.
The data we collect depends on the context of your interactions with Microsoft and the choices you make (including your privacy settings), the products and features you use, your location, and applicable law
.
The data we collect can include the following:
Name and contact data
. Your first name and surname, email address, postal address, phone number and other similar contact data.
Credentials
. Passwords, password hints, and similar security information used for authentication and account access.
Demographic data
. Data about you such as your age, gender, country, and preferred language.
Payment data
. Data to process payments, such as your payment instrument number (such as a credit card number) and the security code associated with your payment instrument.
Subscription and licensing data
. Information about your subscriptions, licences and other entitlements.
Interactions
. Data about your use of Microsoft products. In some cases, such as search queries, this is data you provide in order to make use of the products. In other cases, such as error reports, this is data we generate. Other examples of interactions data include:
Device and usage data
. Data about your device and the product and features you use, including information about your hardware and software, how our products perform, as well as your settings. For example:
Payment and account history
. Data about the items you purchase and activities associated with your account.
Browse history
. Data about the webpages you visit.
Device, connectivity, and configuration data
. Data about your device, your device configuration, and nearby networks. For example, data about the operating systems and other software installed on your device, including product keys. In addition, IP address, device identifiers (such as the IMEI number for phones), regional and language settings, and information about WLAN access points near your device.
Error reports and performance data
. Data about the performance of the products and any problems you experience, including error reports. Error reports (sometimes called “crash dumps”) can include details of the software or hardware related to an error, contents of files opened when an error occurred, and data about other software on your device.
Troubleshooting and help data
. Data you provide when you contact Microsoft for help, such as the products you use, and other details that help us provide support. For example, contact or authentication data, the content of your chats and other communications with Microsoft, data about the condition of your device and the products you use related to your help enquiry. When you contact us, such as for customer support, phone conversations or chat sessions with our representatives may be monitored and recorded.
Bot usage data
. Interactions with bots and skills available through Microsoft products, including bots and skills provided by third parties.
Interests and favourites
. Data about your interests and favourites, such as the sports teams you follow, the programming languages you prefer, the stocks you track or cities you add to track things such as weather or traffic. In addition to those you explicitly provide, your interests and favourites can also be inferred or derived from other data we collect, such as your interactions on websites where our technology is used to show or measure ads.
Content consumption data
. Information about media content (e.g., TV, video, music, audio, text books, apps, and games) you access through our products.
Searches and commands
. Search queries and commands when you use Microsoft products with search or related productivity functionality, such as interactions with a chat bot.
Voice data
. Your voice data, sometimes referred to as “voice clips”, such as search queries, commands, or dictation you speak, which may include background sounds.
Text, inking, and typing data
. Text, inking, and typing data and related information. For example, when we collect inking data, we collect information about the placement of your inking instrument on your device.
Images
. Images and related information, such as picture metadata. For example, we collect the image you provide when you use a Bing image-enabled service.
Contacts and relationships
. Data about your contacts and relationships if you use a product to share information with others, manage contacts, communicate with others, or improve your productivity.
Social data
. Information about your relationships and interactions between you, other people and organisations, such as types of engagement (e.g. likes, dislikes, events) related to people and organisations.
Location data
. Data about your device’s location, which can be either precise or imprecise. For example, we collect location data using Global Navigation Satellite System (GNSS) (e.g., GPS) and data about nearby cell towers and Wi-Fi hotspots. Location can also be inferred from a device’s IP address or data in your account profile that indicates where it is located with less precision, such as at a city or postcode level.
Other input
. Other inputs provided when you use our products. For example, data such as the buttons you press on an Xbox wireless controller using the Xbox network, skeletal tracking data when you use Kinect, and other sensor data, like the number of steps you take, when you use devices that have applicable sensors. If you attend an in-store event, we collect the data you provide to us when registering for or during the event and if you enter into a prize promotion, we collect the data you input into the entry form.
Content
. Content of your files and communications you input, upload, receive, create, and control. For example, if you transmit a file using Skype to another Skype user, we need to collect the content of that file to display it to you and the other user. If you receive an email using Outlook.com, we need to collect the content of that email to deliver it to your inbox, display it to you, enable you to reply to it, and store it for you until you choose to delete it. Other content we collect when providing products to you include:
Communications, including audio, video, text (typed, inked, dictated, or otherwise), in a message, email, call, meeting request, or chat.
Photos, images, songs, movies, software, and other media or documents you store, retrieve, or otherwise process with our cloud.
Video or recordings
. Recordings of events and activities at Microsoft buildings, retail spaces, and other locations. If you enter Microsoft Store locations or other facilities, or attend a Microsoft event that is recorded, we may process your image and voice data.
Feedback and ratings
. Information you provide to us and the content of messages you send to us, such as feedback, survey data, and product reviews you write.
Traffic data
. Data generated through your use of Microsoft’s communications services. Traffic data indicates with whom you have communicated and when your communications occurred. We will process your traffic data only as required to provide, maintain, and improve our communications services and we do so with your consent.
Product-specific sections below describe data collection practices applicable to use of those products.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
How we use personal data
Microsoft uses the data we collect to provide you with rich, interactive experiences. In particular, we use data to:
Provide our products, which includes updating, securing, and troubleshooting, as well as providing support. It also includes sharing data, when it is required to provide the service or carry out the transactions you request.
Improve and develop our products.
Personalise our products and make recommendations.
Advertise and market to you, which includes sending promotional communications, targeting advertising, and presenting you with relevant offers.
We also use the data to operate our business, which includes analysing our performance, meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce and doing research.
In carrying out these purposes, we combine data we collect from different contexts (for example, from your use of two Microsoft products) or obtain from third parties to give you a more seamless, consistent and personalised experience, to make informed business decisions, and for other legitimate purposes.
Our processing of personal data for these purposes includes both automated and manual (human) methods of processing. Our automated methods often are related to and supported by our manual methods. For example, to build, train, and improve the accuracy of our automated methods of processing (including artificial intelligence or AI), we manually review some of the output produced by the automated methods against the underlying data.
As part of our efforts to improve and develop our products, we may use your data to develop and train our AI models. Learn more
here
.
Microsoft uses the data we collect to provide you rich, interactive experiences. In particular, we use data to:
Provide our products, which includes updating, securing, and troubleshooting, as well as providing support. It also includes sharing data, when it is required to provide the service or carry out the transactions you request.
Improve and develop our products.
Personalise our products and make recommendations.
Advertise and market to you, which includes sending promotional communications, targeting advertising, and presenting you relevant offers.
We also use the data to operate our business, which includes analysing our performance, meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce and doing research.
For these purposes, we combine data we collect from different contexts (for example, from your use of two Microsoft products). For example, Microsoft Store uses information about the apps and services you use to make personalised app recommendations. However, we have built in technological and procedural safeguards designed to prevent certain data combinations where required by law. For example, where required by law, we store data we collect from you when you are unauthenticated (not signed in) separately from any account information that directly identifies you, such as your name, email address, or phone number.
Our processing of personal data for these purposes includes both automated and manual (human) methods of processing. Our automated methods often are related to and supported by our manual methods. For example, to build, train, and improve the accuracy of our automated methods of processing (including artificial intelligence or AI), we manually review some of the output produced by the automated methods against the underlying data.
As part of our efforts to improve and develop our products, we may use your data to develop and train our AI models. Learn more
here
.
Purposes and legal bases for processing
When we process personal data about you, we do so with your consent and/or as required to provide the products you use, operate our business, meet our contractual and legal obligations, protect the security and safety of our systems and our customers, or fulfil other legitimate interests of Microsoft or third parties as described in this section and in the
Reasons we share personal data
section of this privacy statement. Our bases for processing your personal data may vary depending on how and across what products and services we process your data.
When we process personal data based on our or a third party’s legitimate interests, we consider and balance those interests against your rights and freedoms, and we will only process your personal data where the legitimate interests we have in processing are not outweighed by your interests.
When we transfer personal data from the European Economic Area, we do so based on a variety of legal mechanisms, as described in the
Where we store and process personal data
section of this privacy statement.
More on the purposes of processing:
Provide our products
. We use data to operate our products and provide you with rich, interactive experiences. For example, if you use OneDrive, we process the documents you upload to OneDrive to enable you to retrieve, delete, edit, forward, or otherwise process it, at your direction as part of the service. Or, for example, if you enter a search query in the Bing search engine, we use that query to display search results to you. Additionally, as communications are a feature of various products, programmes and activities, we use data to contact you. For example, we may contact you by phone or email or other means to inform you when a subscription is ending or discuss your licensing account. We also communicate with you to secure our products, for example by letting you know when product updates are available.
Product improvement
. We use data to continually improve our products, including adding new features or capabilities. For example, we use error reports to improve security features, search queries and clicks in Bing to improve the relevancy of the search results, usage data to determine what new features to prioritise, and voice data to develop and improve speech recognition accuracy.
Personalisation
. Many products include personalised features, such as recommendations that enhance your productivity and enjoyment. These features use automated processes to tailor your product experiences based on the data we have about you, such as inferences we make about you and your use of the product, activities, interests, and location. For example, depending on your settings, if you stream movies in a browser on your Windows device, you may see a recommendation for an app from the Microsoft Store that streams more efficiently. If you have a Microsoft account, with your permission, we can sync your settings on several devices. Many of our products provide controls to disable personalised features.
Product activation
. We use data—such as device and application type, location, and unique device, application, network, and subscription identifiers—to activate products that require activation.
Product development
. We use data to develop new products. For example, we use data, often de-identified, to better understand our customers’ computing and productivity needs, and to train and fine-tune AI models, which can shape the development of new products.
Customer support
. We use data to troubleshoot and diagnose product problems, repair customers’ devices, and provide other customer care and support services, including to help us provide, improve, and secure the quality of our products, services, and training, and to investigate security incidents. Call recording data may also be used to authenticate or identify you based on your voice to enable Microsoft to provide support services and investigate security incidents.
Help secure and troubleshoot
. We use data to help secure and troubleshoot our products. This includes using data to protect the security and safety of our products and customers, detecting malware and malicious activities, troubleshooting performance and compatibility issues to help customers get the most out of their experiences, and notifying customers of updates to our products. This may include using automated systems to detect security and safety issues.
Safety
. We use data to protect the safety of our products and our customers. Our security features and products can disrupt the operation of malicious software and notify users if malicious software is found on their devices. For example, some of our products, such as Outlook.com or OneDrive, systematically scan content in an automated manner to identify suspected spam, viruses, abusive actions, or URLs that have been flagged as fraud, phishing, or malware links; and we reserve the right to block delivery of a communication or remove content if it violates our terms.
In accordance with European Union Regulation (EU) 2021/1232, we have invoked the derogation permitted by that Regulation from Articles 5(1) and 6(1) of EU Directive 2002/58/EC. We use scanning technologies to create digital signatures (known as “hashes”) of certain images and video content on our systems. These technologies then compare the hashes they generate with hashes of reported child sexual exploitation and abuse imagery (known as a “hash set”), in a process called “hash matching”. Microsoft obtains hash sets from organisations that act in the public interest against child sex abuse. This can result in sharing information with the US National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC) and law enforcement authorities.
Updates
. We use data we collect to develop product updates and security patches. For example, we may use information about your device’s capabilities, such as available memory, to provide you a software update or security patch. Updates and patches are intended to maximise your experience with our products, help you protect the privacy and security of your data, provide new features and evaluate whether your device is ready to process such updates.
Promotional communications
. We use data we collect to deliver promotional communications. You can sign up for email subscriptions and choose whether you wish to receive promotional communications from Microsoft by email, SMS, post and telephone. For information about managing your contact data, email subscriptions, and promotional communications, see the
How to access and control your personal data
section of this privacy statement.
Relevant offers
. Microsoft uses data to provide you with relevant and valuable information regarding our products. We analyse data from a variety of sources to predict the information that will be most interesting and relevant to you and deliver such information to you in a variety of ways. For example, we may predict your interest in gaming and communicate with you about new games you may like.
Advertising
. Microsoft does not use what you say in email, human-to-human chat, video calls or voicemail, or your documents, photos or other personal files to target ads to you. We use data we collect through our interactions with you, through some of our first-party products, services, apps, and web properties (Microsoft properties), and on third-party web properties, for advertising on our Microsoft properties and on third-party properties. We may use automated processes to help make advertising more relevant to you. For more information about how your data is used for advertising, see the
Advertising
section of this privacy statement.
Prize promotions and events
. We use your data to administer prize promotions and events available in our physical Microsoft Stores. For example, if you enter into a prize promotion, we may use your data to select a winner and provide the prize to you if you win. Or, if you register for a coding workshop or gaming event, we will add your name to the list of expected attendees.
Transacting commerce
. We use data to carry out your transactions with us. For example, we process payment information to provide customers with product subscriptions and use contact information to deliver goods purchased from the Microsoft Store.
Reporting and business operations
. We use data to analyse our operations and perform business intelligence. This enables us to make informed decisions and report on the performance of our business.
Protecting rights and property
. We use data to detect and prevent fraud, resolve disputes, enforce agreements, and protect our property. For example, we use data to confirm the validity of software licences to reduce piracy. We may use automated processes to detect and prevent activities that violate our rights and the rights of others, such as fraud.
Legal compliance
. We process data to comply with applicable laws. For example, we use the age of our customers to assist us in meeting our obligations to protect children’s privacy. We also process contact information and credentials to help customers exercise their data protection rights.
Research.
With appropriate technical and organisational measures to safeguard individuals’ rights and freedoms, we use data to conduct research, including advanced machine learning and artificial intelligence capabilities for the benefit of the public interest and scientific purposes.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Reasons we share personal data
We share your personal data with your consent or to complete any transaction or provide any product you have requested or authorised. We also share data with Microsoft-controlled affiliates and subsidiaries; with vendors working on our behalf; when required by law or to respond to legal process; to protect our customers; to protect lives; to maintain the security of our products; and to protect the rights and property of Microsoft and its customers.
Please note that, as defined under certain US state data privacy laws, “sharing” also relates to providing personal data to third parties for personalised advertising purposes. Please see the
U.S. State Data Privacy
section below and our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
for more information.
We share your personal data with your consent or as necessary to complete any transaction or provide any product you have requested or authorised. For example, we share your content with third parties when you tell us to do so, such as when you send an email to a friend, share photos and documents on OneDrive, or link accounts with another service. If you use a Microsoft product provided by an organisation you are affiliated with, such as an employer or school, or use an email address provided by such organisation to access Microsoft products, we share certain data, such as interaction data and diagnostic data to enable your organisation to manage the products. When you provide payment data to make a purchase, we will share payment data with banks and other entities that process payment transactions or provide other financial services, and for fraud prevention and credit risk reduction. Additionally, when you save a payment method (such as a card) to your account that you and other Microsoft account holders use to make purchases from Microsoft or its affiliates, your purchase receipts may be shared with anyone else who uses and has access to the same payment method to make a purchase from Microsoft, including the payment method’s named accountholder. When you permit push notifications for Microsoft products or applications on a non-Windows device, the operating system of that device will process some personal data to provide push notifications. Accordingly, Microsoft may send data to an external, third-party notification provider to deliver push notifications. Your device’s push notification services are governed by their own service-specific terms and privacy statements.
We also share personal data for digital advertising purposes. When you visit a website or use an app that wants to show you ads, the digital property may allow Microsoft to access or receive device data or certain other data identified in the Personal data we collect section above. We may then share this information with third party advertising platforms and advertisers to facilitate the delivery and measurement of ads on such digital properties.  Please see the Advertising and U.S. State Data Privacy sections below for more information about how your data is used for advertising.
In addition, we share personal data among Microsoft-controlled affiliates and subsidiaries. We also share personal data with vendors or agents working on our behalf for the purposes described in this statement. For example, companies we've hired to provide customer service support or assist in protecting and securing our systems and services may need access to personal data to provide those functions. In such cases, these companies must abide by our data privacy and security requirements and are not allowed to use personal data they receive from us for any other purpose. We may also disclose personal data as part of a corporate transaction such as a merger or sale of assets.
Finally, we will retain, access, transfer, disclose, and preserve personal data, including your content (such as the content of your emails in Outlook.com, or files in private folders on OneDrive), when we have a good faith belief that doing so is necessary to do any of the following:
Comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process, including from law enforcement or other government agencies.
Protect the safety of our customers, organisations and the public – for example, to prevent spam or attempts to defraud or otherwise cause harm, or to detect, prevent and combat harmful or illegal behaviour, including the creation and sharing of harmful or illegal content.
Operate and maintain the security of our products, including to prevent or stop an attack on our computer systems or networks.
Protect the rights or property of Microsoft, including enforcing the terms governing the use of the services—however, if we receive information indicating that someone is using our services to traffic in stolen intellectual or physical property of Microsoft, we will not inspect a customer's private content ourselves, but we may refer the matter to law enforcement.
For more information about data we disclose in response to requests from law enforcement and other government agencies, please see our
Law Enforcement Requests Report
.
Please note that some of our products include links to or otherwise enable you to access products of third parties whose privacy practices differ from those of Microsoft. If you provide personal data to any of those products, your data is governed by their privacy policies.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
How to access and control your personal data
You can also make choices about the collection and use of your data by Microsoft. You can control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and exercise your data protection rights, by contacting Microsoft or using various tools we provide. In some cases, your ability to access or control your personal data will be limited, as required or permitted by applicable law. How you can access or control your personal data will also depend on which products you use. For example, you can:
Control the use of your data for personalised advertising from Microsoft, including Xandr, by visiting our
opt-out page
.
Choose whether you wish to receive promotional emails, SMS messages, telephone calls and postal mail from Microsoft.
Access and clear some of your data through the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
.
Not all personal data processed by Microsoft can be accessed or controlled via the tools above. If you want to access or control personal data processed by Microsoft that is not available via the tools above or directly through the Microsoft products you use, you can always contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section or by using our
web form
.
We provide aggregate metrics about user requests to exercise their data protection rights via the
Microsoft Privacy Report
.
You can also make choices about the collection and use of your data by Microsoft. You can control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and exercise your data protection rights, by contacting Microsoft or using various tools we provide. In some cases, your ability to access or control your personal data will be limited, as required or permitted by applicable law. How you can access or control your personal data will also depend on which products you use. For example, you can:
Control the use of your data for personalised advertising from Microsoft by visiting our
opt-out page
.
Choose whether you wish to receive promotional emails, SMS messages, telephone calls and post from Microsoft.
Access and clear some of your data through the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
.
Not all personal data processed by Microsoft can be accessed or controlled via the tools above. If you want to access or control personal data processed by Microsoft that is not available via the tools above or directly through the Microsoft products you use, you can always contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section or by using our
web form
.
We provide aggregate metrics about user requests to exercise their data protection rights via the
Microsoft Privacy Report
.
You can access and control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained with tools Microsoft provides to you, which are described below, or by contacting Microsoft. For instance:
If Microsoft obtained your consent to use your personal data, you can withdraw that consent at any time.
You can request access to, erasure of, and updates to your personal data.
If you’d like to port your data elsewhere, you can use tools Microsoft provides to do so, or if none are available, you can contact Microsoft for assistance.
You can also object to or restrict the use of your personal data by Microsoft. For example, you can object at any time to our use of your personal data:
For direct marketing purposes.
Where we are performing a task in the public interest or pursuing our legitimate interests or those of a third party.
You may have these rights under applicable laws, including the EU General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), but we offer them regardless of your location. In some cases, your ability to access or control your personal data will be limited, as required or permitted by applicable law.
If your organisation, such as your employer, school or service provider, provides you with access to and is administering your use of Microsoft products, contact your organisation to learn more about how to access and control your personal data.
You can access and control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and exercise your data protection rights, using various tools we provide. The tools most useful to you will depend on our interactions with you and your use of our products. Here is a general list of tools we provide to help you control your personal data; specific products may provide additional controls.
Bing.
If you are signed into Bing, you can view and clear your stored search and chat history on your
privacy dashboard
. If you are not signed into Bing, you can view and clear stored search history associated to your device in your
Bing settings
.
Microsoft account.
If you wish to access, edit, or remove the profile information and payment information in your Microsoft account, change your password, add security information or close your account, you can do so by visiting the
Microsoft account website
.
If you have a
Microsoft Developer Network
(MSDN) public profile, you can access and edit your data by signing in at
MSDN forum
.
Microsoft privacy dashboard
. You can control some of the data Microsoft processes through your use of a Microsoft account on the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
. From here, for example, you can view and clear the browsing, search, and location data associated with your Microsoft account.
Microsoft Store.
You can access your Microsoft Store profile and account information by visiting
Microsoft Store
and selecting
View account
or
Order history.
Microsoft Teams for personal use.
You can find out how to export or delete Teams data relating to your personal Microsoft account by visiting this
page
.
OneDrive.
You can view, download, and delete your files and photos in OneDrive by signing into your
OneDrive
.
Outlook.com.
You can download your emails in
Outlook.com
by signing into your account and navigating to your
Privacy and data
settings.
Skype
. If you wish to access, edit, or remove some profile and payment information for Skype or change your password,
sign in to your account
. If you wish to export your Skype chat history and files shared on Skype, you can
request a copy
.
Volume Licensing Service Centre (VLSC).
If you are a Volume Licensing customer, you can control your contact information and subscription and licensing data in one location by visiting the
Volume Licensing Service Centre website
.
Xbox
. If you use the Xbox network or Xbox.com, you can view or edit your personal data, including billing and account information, privacy settings, and online safety and data sharing preferences by accessing
My Xbox
on the Xbox console or on the Xbox.com website.
Not all personal data processed by Microsoft can be accessed or controlled via the tools above. If you want to access or control personal data processed by Microsoft that is not available via the tools above or directly through the Microsoft products you use, you can always contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section or by using our
web form
. We will respond to requests to control your personal data as required by applicable law.
Your communications preferences
You can choose whether you wish to receive promotional communications from Microsoft by email, SMS, post and telephone. If you receive promotional email or SMS messages from us and would like to opt out, you can do so by following the directions in that message. You can also make choices about the receipt of promotional emails, telephone calls and post by signing in with your personal Microsoft account and viewing your
communication permissions,
where you can update contact information, manage Microsoft-wide contact preferences, opt out of email subscriptions and choose whether to share your contact information with Microsoft partners. If you do not have a personal Microsoft account, you can manage your Microsoft email contact preferences by using this
web form
. These choices do not apply to mandatory service communications that are part of certain Microsoft products, programmes and activities, or to surveys or other informational communications that have their own unsubscribe method.
Your advertising choices
To opt out of receiving personalised advertising from Microsoft, including Xandr, visit our
opt-out page
. When you opt out, your preference is stored in a cookie that is specific to the web browser you are using. The opt-out cookie has an expiration date of five years. If you delete the cookies on your device, you need to opt out again.
You can also link your opt-out choice with your personal Microsoft account. It will then apply on any device where you use that account and will continue to apply until someone signs in with a different personal Microsoft account on that device. If you delete the cookies on your device, you will need to sign in again for the settings to apply. You can view
our third party ad partners
on the
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
, and opt-out of data sharing with third parties at our opt-out
page
.
For Microsoft-controlled advertising that appears in apps on Windows, you may use the opt-out linked to your personal Microsoft account, or opt out of interest-based advertising by turning off the advertising ID in Windows settings.
Because the data used for interest-based advertising is also used for other required purposes (including providing our products, analytics, and fraud detection), opting out of interest-based advertising does not stop that data collection. You will continue to get ads, although they may be less relevant to you.
You can opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from third parties we partner with by visiting their sites (see above).
Browser-based controls
When you use a browser, you can control your personal data using certain features. For example:
Cookie controls
. You can control the data stored by cookies and withdraw consent to cookies by using the browser-based cookie controls described in the
Cookies
section of this privacy statement.
Tracking protections
. You can control the data third-party sites can collect about you using Tracking Protection in Internet Explorer (versions 9 and up) and Microsoft Edge. This feature will block third-party content, including cookies, from any site that is listed in a Tracking Protection List you add.
Browser controls for "Do Not Track."
Some browsers have incorporated "Do Not Track" (DNT) features that can send a signal to the websites you visit indicating you do not wish to be tracked. Because there is not yet a common understanding of how to interpret the DNT signal, Microsoft services do not currently respond to browser DNT signals. We continue to work with the online industry to define a common understanding of how to treat DNT signals. In the meantime, you can use the range of other tools we provide to control data collection and use, including the ability to opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from Microsoft as described above.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Cookies and similar technologies
Cookies are small text files placed on your device to store data that can be recalled by a web server in the domain that placed the cookie. We use cookies and similar technologies for storing and honouring your preferences and settings, enabling you to sign-in, providing interest-based advertising, combating fraud, analysing how our products perform and fulfilling other legitimate purposes. Microsoft apps use additional identifiers, such as the advertising ID in Windows described in the
Advertising ID
section of this privacy statement, for similar purposes.
We also use “web beacons” to help deliver cookies and gather usage and performance data. Our websites may include web beacons, cookies, or similar technologies from Microsoft affiliates and partners as well as third parties, such as service providers acting on our behalf.
Third party cookies may include: Social Media cookies designed to show you ads and content based on your social media profiles and activities on our websites; Analytics cookies to better understand how you and others use our websites so that we can make them better, and so the third parties can improve their own products and services; Advertising cookies to show you ads that are relevant to you; and Required cookies used to perform essential website functions. Where required, we obtain your consent prior to placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication.
Please see the Learn more section below for information about our use of third party cookies, web beacons and analytics services, and other similar technologies on our websites and services. For a list of the third parties that set cookies on our websites, including service providers acting on our behalf, please visit our
third party cookie
inventory. On some of our websites, a list of third parties is available directly on the site. The third parties on these sites may not be included in the list on our
third party cookie inventory
.
You have a variety of tools to control the data collected by cookies, web beacons, and similar technologies. For example, you can use controls in your internet browser to limit how the websites you visit are able to use cookies and to withdraw your consent by clearing or blocking cookies.
Cookies are small text files placed on your device to store data that can be recalled by a web server in the domain that placed the cookie. This data often consists of a string of numbers and letters that uniquely identifies your computer, but it can contain other information as well. Some cookies are placed by third parties acting on our behalf. We use cookies and similar technologies to store and honour your preferences and settings, enable you to sign-in, provide interest-based advertising, combat fraud, analyse how our products perform and fulfil other legitimate purposes described below. Microsoft apps use additional identifiers, such as the advertising ID in Windows, for similar purposes, and many of our websites and applications also contain web beacons or other similar technologies, as described below.
Our use of cookies and similar technologies
Microsoft uses cookies and similar technologies for several purposes, depending on the context or product, including:
Storing your preferences and settings
. We use cookies to store your preferences and settings on your device, and to enhance your experiences. For example, depending on your settings, if you enter your city or postcode to get local news or weather information on a Microsoft website, we store that data in a cookie so that you will see the relevant local information when you return to the site. Saving your preferences with cookies, such as your preferred language, prevents you from having to set your preferences repeatedly. If you opt out of interest-based advertising, we store your opt-out preference in a cookie on your device. Similarly, in scenarios where we obtain your consent to place cookies on your device, we store your choice in a cookie.
Sign-in and authentication
. We use cookies to authenticate you. When you sign in to a website using your personal Microsoft account, we store a unique ID number, and the time you signed in, in an encrypted cookie on your device. This cookie allows you to move from page to page within the site without having to sign in again on each page. You can also save your sign-in information so you do not have to sign in each time you return to the site.
Security
. We use cookies to process information that helps us secure our products, as well as detect fraud and abuse.
Storing information you provide to a website
. We use cookies to remember information you shared. When you provide information to Microsoft, such as when you add products to a shopping cart on Microsoft websites, we store the data in a cookie for the purpose of remembering the information.
Social media
. Some of our websites include social media cookies, including those that enable users who are signed in to the social media service to share content via that service.
Feedback
. Microsoft uses cookies to enable you to provide feedback on a website.
Interest-based advertising
. Microsoft uses cookies to collect data about your online activity and identify your interests so that we can provide advertising that is most relevant to you. You can opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from Microsoft as described in the
How to access and control your personal data
section of this privacy statement.
Showing advertising
. Microsoft uses cookies to record how many visitors have clicked on an advertisement and to record which advertisements you have seen, for example, so you do not see the same one repeatedly.
Analytics
. We use first- and third-party cookies and other identifiers to gather usage and performance data. For example, we use cookies to count the number of unique visitors to a web page or service and to develop other statistics about the operations of our products.
Performance
. Microsoft uses cookies to understand and improve how our products perform. For example, we use cookies to gather data that helps with load balancing; this helps us keep our websites remain up and running.
Where required, we obtain your consent prior to placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication. Please see the “How to Control Cookies” section below for more information.
Some of the cookies we commonly use are listed below. This list is not exhaustive, but it is intended to illustrate the primary purposes for which we typically set cookies. If you visit one of our websites, the site will set some or all of the following cookies:
MSCC
. Contains user choices for most Microsoft properties.
MUID, MC1, MSFPC, and MSPTC
. Identifies unique web browsers visiting Microsoft sites. These cookies are used for advertising, site analytics, and other operational purposes.
ANON
. Contains the ANID, a unique identifier derived from your Microsoft account, which is used for advertising, personalisation and operational purposes. It is also used to preserve your choice to opt out of interest-based advertising from Microsoft if you have chosen to associate the opt-out with your Microsoft account.
CC
. Contains a country code as determined from your IP address.
PPAuth, MSPAuth, MSNRPSAuth, KievRPSAuth, WLSSC, MSPProf
. Helps to authenticate you when you sign in with your Microsoft account.
MC0
. Detects whether cookies are enabled in the browser.
MS0
. Identifies a specific session.
NAP
. Contains an encrypted version of your country, postcode, age, gender, language and occupation, if known, based on your Microsoft account profile.
MH
. Appears on co-branded sites where Microsoft is partnering with an advertiser. This cookie identifies the advertiser, so the right ad is selected.
childinfo, kcdob, kcrelid, kcru, pcfm
. Contains information that Microsoft account uses within its pages in relation to child accounts.
MR
. This cookie is used by Microsoft to reset or refresh the MUID cookie.
x-ms-gateway-slice
. Identifies a gateway for load balancing.
TOptOut
. Records your decision not to receive interest-based advertising delivered by Microsoft. Where required, we place this cookie by default and remove it when you consent to interest-based advertising.
ApplicationGatewayAffinity
and
ApplicationGatewayAffinityCORS
.  These session cookies are used for load balancing purposes and to ensure requests for a user session are handled by the same server.
We may also use the cookies of other Microsoft affiliates, companies, and partners, such as LinkedIn and Xandr.
Third Party Cookies
In addition to the cookies Microsoft sets when you visit our websites, we also use cookies from third parties to enhance the services on our sites. Some third parties can also set cookies when you visit Microsoft sites. For example:
Companies we hire to provide services on our behalf, such as site analytics, place cookies when you visit our sites.
Companies that deliver content on Microsoft sites, such as videos or news, or ads, place cookies on their own.
These companies use the data they process in accordance with their privacy policies, which may enable these companies to collect and combine information about your activities across websites, apps, or online services.
The following types of third-party cookies may be used, depending on the context, service or product, as well as your settings and permissions:
Social Media cookies.
We and third parties use social media cookies to show you ads and content based on your social media profiles and activity on our websites. They’re used to connect your activity on our websites to your social media profiles so the ads and content you see on our websites and on social media will better reflect your interests.
Analytics cookies.
We allow third parties to use analytics cookies to understand how you use our websites so we can make them better and the third parties can develop and improve their products, which they may use on websites that are not owned or operated by Microsoft. For example, analytics cookies are used to gather information about the pages you visit and how many clicks you need to accomplish a task. These cookies may also be used for advertising purposes.
Advertising cookies.
We and third parties use advertising cookies to show you new ads by recording which ads you've already seen. They're also used to track which ads you click on or purchases you make after clicking on an ad for payment purposes, and to show you ads that are more relevant to you. For example, they're used to detect when you click on an ad and show you ads based on your social media interests and website browsing history.
Required cookies.
We use required cookies to perform essential website functions. For example, to log you in, save your language preferences, provide a shopping cart experience, improve performance, route traffic between web servers, detect the size of your screen, determine page load times, and measure audiences. These cookies are necessary for our websites to work.
Where required, we obtain your consent prior to placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication.
For a list of the third parties that set cookies on our websites, including service providers acting on our behalf, please visit our
third party cookie inventory
. The third party cookie inventory also includes links to those third parties’ websites or privacy notices. Please consult the third-party websites or privacy notices for more information on their privacy practices with respect to their cookies that may be set on our websites. On some of our websites, a list of third parties is available directly on the site. The third parties on these sites may not be included in the list on our
third party cookie inventory
.
How to control cookies
Most web browsers automatically accept cookies but provide controls that allow you to block or delete them. For example, in Microsoft Edge, you can block or delete cookies by selecting
Settings
>
Privacy and services
>
Clear Browsing data
>
Cookies and other site data
. For more information about how to delete your cookies in Microsoft browsers, see
Microsoft Edge
,
Microsoft Edge Legacy
, or
Internet Explorer
. If you use a different browser, refer to that browser’s instructions.
As mentioned above, where required, we obtain your consent before placing or using optional cookies that are not (i) strictly necessary to provide the website; or (ii) for the purpose of facilitating a communication. We separate these optional cookies by purpose, such as for advertising and social media purposes. You may consent to certain categories of optional cookies and not others. You also may adjust your choices by clicking “Manage cookies” in the footer of the website or through the settings made available on the website. Certain features of Microsoft products depend on cookies. If you choose to block cookies, you cannot sign in or use some of those features, and preferences that are dependent on cookies will be lost. If you choose to delete cookies, any settings and preferences controlled by those cookies, including advertising preferences, are deleted and will need to be recreated.
Additional privacy controls that can impact cookies, including the tracking protections feature of Microsoft browsers, are described in the
How to access and control your personal data
section of this privacy statement.
Our use of web beacons and analytics services
Some Microsoft webpages contain electronic tags known as web beacons that we use to help deliver cookies on our websites, count users who have visited those websites, and deliver co-branded products. We also include web beacons or similar technologies in our electronic communications to determine whether you open and act on them.
In addition to placing web beacons on our own websites, we sometimes work with other companies to place our web beacons on their websites or in their advertisements. This helps us to, for example, develop statistics on how often clicking on an advertisement on a Microsoft website results in a purchase or other action on the advertiser's website. It also allows us to understand your activity on the website of a Microsoft partner in connection with your use of a Microsoft product or service.
Finally, Microsoft products often contain web beacons or similar technologies from third-party analytics providers, which help us compile aggregated statistics about the effectiveness of our promotional campaigns or other operations. These technologies enable the analytics providers to set or read their own cookies or other identifiers on your device, through which they can collect information about your online activities across applications, websites, or other products. However, we prohibit these analytics providers from using web beacons on our sites to collect or access information that directly identifies you (such as your name or email address). You can opt out of data collection or use by some of these analytics providers by visiting any of the following sites:
Adjust
,
AppsFlyer
,
Clicktale
,
Flurry Analytics
,
Google Analytics
(requires you to install a browser add-on),
Kissmetrics
,
Mixpanel
,
Nielsen
,
Acuity Ads
,
WebTrends
, or
Optimizely
.
Other similar technologies
In addition to standard cookies and web beacons, our products can also use other similar technologies to store and read data files on your computer. This is typically done to maintain your preferences or to improve speed and performance by storing certain files locally. But, like standard cookies, these technologies can also store a unique identifier for your computer, which can then track behaviour. These technologies include Local Shared Objects (or "Flash cookies") and Silverlight Application Storage.
Local Shared Objects or "Flash cookies."
Websites that use Adobe Flash technologies can use Local Shared Objects or "Flash cookies" to store data on your computer. To learn how to manage or block Flash cookies, go to the
Flash Player help page
.
Silverlight Application Storage
. Websites or applications that use Microsoft Silverlight technology also have the ability to store data by using Silverlight Application Storage. To learn how to manage or block such storage, see the
Silverlight
section of this privacy statement.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Products provided by your organisation – notice to end users
If you use a Microsoft product with an account provided by an organisation you are affiliated with, such as your work or school account, that organisation can:
Control and administer your Microsoft product and product account, including controlling privacy-related settings of the product or product account.
Access and process your data, including the interaction data, diagnostic data, and the contents of your communications and files associated with your Microsoft product and product accounts.
If you lose access to your work or school account (in event of change of employment, for example), you may lose access to products and the content associated with those products, including those you acquired on your own behalf, if you used your work or school account to sign in to such products.
Many Microsoft products are intended for use by organisations, such as schools and businesses. Please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement. If your organisation provides you with access to Microsoft products, your use of the Microsoft products is subject to your organisation’s policies, if any. You should direct your privacy enquiries, including any requests to exercise your data protection rights, to your organisation’s administrator. When you use social features in Microsoft products, other users in your network may see some of your activity. To learn more about the social features and other functionality, please review documentation or help content specific to the Microsoft product. Microsoft is not responsible for the privacy or security practices of our customers, which may differ from those set forth in this privacy statement.
When you use a Microsoft product provided by your organisation, Microsoft’s processing of your personal data in connection with that product is governed by a contract between Microsoft and your organisation. Microsoft processes your personal data to provide the product to your organisation and you, and in some cases for Microsoft’s business operations related to providing the product as described in the
Enterprise and developer products
section. As mentioned above, if you have questions about Microsoft’s processing of your personal data in connection with providing products to your organisation, please contact your organisation. If you have questions about Microsoft’s business operations in connection with providing products to your organisation as provided in the Product Terms, please contact Microsoft as described in the
How to contact us
section. For more information on our business operations, please see the
Enterprise and developer products
section.
For Microsoft products provided by your K-12 school, including Microsoft 365 Education, Microsoft will:
not collect or use student personal data beyond that needed for authorised educational or school purposes;
not sell or rent student personal data;
not use or share student personal data for advertising or similar commercial purposes, such as behavioural targeting of advertisements to students;
not build a personal profile of a student, other than for supporting authorised educational or school purposes or as authorised by the parent, guardian or student of appropriate age; and
require that our vendors with whom student personal data is shared to deliver the educational service, if any, are obligated to implement these same commitments for student personal data.
Back to top
Microsoft account
With a Microsoft account, you can sign in to Microsoft products, as well as those of select Microsoft partners. Personal data associated with your Microsoft account includes credentials, name and contact data, payment data, device and usage data, your contacts, information about your activities, and your interests and favourites. Signing in to your Microsoft account enables personalisation and consistent experiences across products and devices, permits you to use cloud data storage, allows you to make payments using payment instruments stored in your Microsoft account and enables other features.
There are three types of Microsoft account:
When you create your own Microsoft account tied to your personal email address, we refer to that account as a
personal Microsoft account
.
When you or your organisation (such as an employer or your school) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address provided by that organisation, we refer to that account as a
work or school account
.
When you or your service provider (such as a cable or internet service provider) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address with your service provider’s domain, we refer to that account as a
third-party account
.
If you sign into a service offered by a third party with your Microsoft account, you will share with that third party the account data required by that service.
With a Microsoft account, you can sign into Microsoft products, as well as those of select Microsoft partners. Personal data associated with your Microsoft account includes credentials, name and contact data, payment data, device and usage data, your contacts, information about your activities, and your interests and favourites. Signing into your Microsoft account enables personalisation, consistent experiences across products and devices, permits you to use cloud data storage, allows you to make payments using payment instruments stored in your Microsoft account, and enables other features. There are three types of Microsoft account:
When you create your own Microsoft account tied to your personal email address, we refer to that account as a
personal Microsoft account
.
When you or your organisation (such as an employer or your school) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address provided by that organisation, we refer to that account as a
work or school account
.
When you or your service provider (such as a cable or internet service provider) create your Microsoft account tied to your email address with your service provider’s domain, we refer to that account as a
third-party account
.
Personal Microsoft accounts
. The data associated with your personal Microsoft account, and how that data is used, depends on how you use the account.
Creating your Microsoft account
. When you create a personal Microsoft account, you will be asked to provide certain personal data and we will assign a unique ID number to identify your account and associated information. While some products, such as those involving payment, require a real name, you can sign in to and use other Microsoft products without providing your real name. Some data you provide, such as your display name, email address, and phone number, can be used to help others find and connect with you within Microsoft products. For example, people who know your display name, email address, or phone number can use it to search for you on Skype or Microsoft Teams for personal use and send you an invite to connect with them. Note that if you use a work or school email address to create a personal Microsoft account, your employer or school may gain access to your data. In some cases, you will need to change the email address to a personal email address in order to continue accessing consumer-oriented products (such as the Xbox network).
Signing in to Microsoft account
. When you sign in to your Microsoft account, we create a record of your sign-in, which includes the date and time, information about the product you signed in to, your sign-in name, the unique number assigned to your account, a unique identifier assigned to your device, your IP address, and your operating system and browser version.
Signing in to Microsoft products
. Signing in to your account enables improved personalisation, provides seamless and consistent experiences across products and devices, permits you to access and use cloud data storage, allows you to make payments using payment instruments stored in your Microsoft account and enables other enhanced features and settings. For example, when you sign in, Microsoft makes information saved to your account available across Microsoft products so important things are right where you need them. When you sign in to your account, you will stay signed in until you sign out. If you add your Microsoft account to a Windows device (version 8 or higher), Windows will automatically sign you in to products that use Microsoft account when you access those products on that device. When you are signed in, some products will display your name or username and your profile photo (if you have added one to your profile) as part of your use of Microsoft products, including in your communications, social interactions, and public posts.
Learn more about your Microsoft account, your data, and your choices
.
Signing in to third-party products
. If you sign in to a third-party product with your Microsoft account, you will share data with the third party in accordance with the third party’s privacy policy. The third party will also receive the version number assigned to your account (a new version number is assigned each time you change your sign-in data); and information that describes whether your account has been deactivated. If you share your profile data, the third-party can display your name or username and your profile photo (if you have added one to your profile) when you are signed in to that third-party product. If you chose to make payments to third-party merchants using your Microsoft account, Microsoft will pass information stored in your Microsoft account to the third-party or its vendors (e.g. payment processors) as necessary to process your payment and fulfil your order (such as name, credit card number, billing and shipping addresses and relevant contact information). The third-party can use or share the data it receives when you sign-in or make a purchase according to its own practices and policies.
You should carefully review the privacy statement for each product you sign in to and each merchant you purchase from to determine how it will use the data it collects
.
Work or school accounts
. The data associated with a work or school account, and how it will be used, is generally similar to the use and collection of data associated with a personal Microsoft account.
If your employer or school uses Microsoft Entra ID to manage the account it provides you, you can use your work or school account to sign in to Microsoft products, such as Microsoft 365 and Office 365, and third-party products provided to you by your organisation. If required by your organisation, you will also be asked to provide a phone number or an alternative email address for additional security verification. And, if allowed by your organisation, you may also use your work or school account to sign-in to Microsoft or third-party products that you acquire for yourself.
If you sign in to Microsoft products with a work or school account, note:
The owner of the domain associated with your email address may control and administer your account, and access and process your data, including the contents of your communications and files, including data stored in products provided to you by your organisation and products you acquire by yourself.
Your use of the products is subject to your organisation’s policies, if any. You should consider both your organisation’s policies and whether you are comfortable enabling your organisation to access your data before you choose to use your work or school account to sign-in to products you acquire for yourself.
If you lose access to your work or school account (if you change employers, for example), you may lose access to products, including content associated with those products, you acquired on your own behalf if you used your work or school account to sign in to such products.
Microsoft is not responsible for the privacy or security practices of your organisation, which may differ from those of Microsoft.
If your organisation is administering your use of Microsoft products, please direct your privacy enquiries, including any requests to exercise your data subject rights, to your administrator. See also the
Notice to end users
section of this privacy statement.
If you are uncertain whether your account is a work or school account, please contact your organisation.
Third-party accounts
. The data associated with a third-party Microsoft account, and how it will be used, is generally similar to the use and collection of data associated with a personal Microsoft account. Your service provider has control over your account, including the ability to access or delete your account.
You should carefully review the terms the third party provided you to understand what it can do with your account
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Collection of data from children
For users under the age of 13, or as specified by law in their jurisdiction, certain Microsoft products and services will either block users under that age or will ask them to obtain consent or authorisation from a parent or guardian before they can use it, including when creating an account to access Microsoft services. We will not knowingly ask children under that age to provide more data than is required to provide for the product.
Once parental consent or authorisation has been granted, the child’s account is treated much like any other account. Learn more about personal and school accounts in the
Microsoft account section
of the Privacy Statement and
Microsoft Family Safety
in the product-specific section. The child can access communication services, like Outlook and Skype, and can freely communicate and share data with other users of all ages. Parents or guardians can change or revoke the consent choices previously made.
Learn more about parental consent and Microsoft child accounts
. As the organiser of a Microsoft family group, the parent or guardian can manage their child’s information and settings on their
Family Safety
page and view and delete a child’s data on their
privacy dashboard
. Accounts that require parental consent to be created are automatically included as part of the family group of the individual who provided the consent for account creation. For child accounts that do not require parental consent to be created, (e.g., for children who are over the age at which parental consent is legally required), the parent or guardian may still use a family group, but must add the child account to their family group after the account is created. Select Learn more below for more information about how to access and delete child data and information about children and Xbox profiles.
For users under the age of 13, or as specified by law in their jurisdiction, certain Microsoft products and services will either block users under that age or will ask them to obtain consent or authorisation from a parent or guardian before they can use it, including when creating an account to access Microsoft services. We will not knowingly ask children under that age to provide more data than is required to provide for the product.
Once parental consent or authorisation has been granted, the child’s account is treated much like any other account. The child can access communication services, like Outlook and Skype, and can freely communicate and share data with other users of all ages.
Learn more about parental consent and Microsoft child accounts
.
Parents or guardians can change or revoke the consent choices previously made. As the organiser of a Microsoft family group, the parent or guardian can manage their child’s information and settings on their
Family Safety
page and view and delete a child’s data on their
privacy dashboard
. Accounts that require parental consent to be created are automatically included as part of the family group of the individual who provided the consent for account creation. For child accounts that do not require parental consent to be created (e.g., for children who are over the age at which parental consent is legally required), the parent or guardian may still use a family group, but must add the child account to their family group after the account is created. See below for more information about how to access and delete child data.
Below is additional information about the collection of data from children, including more details as related to Xbox.
Accessing and deleting child data.
For Microsoft products and services that require parental consent, a parent can view and delete certain data belonging to their child from the parent’s
privacy dashboard
: browsing history, search history, location activity, media activity, apps and service activity, and product and service performance data. To delete this data, a parent can sign in to their
privacy dashboard
and manage their child’s activities. Please note that a parent’s ability to access and/or delete a child’s personal information on their privacy dashboard will vary depending on the laws where you are located.
Additionally, a parent can contact our
privacy support team
through the
privacy support form
and, following authentication, request that the data types on the privacy dashboard together with the following data be deleted: software, setup, and inventory; device connectivity and configuration; feedback and ratings; fitness and activity; support content; support interactions; and environmental sensor. We process authenticated deletion requests within 30 days of receipt.
Please note that content like emails, contacts, and chats are accessible through in-product experiences. You can find more information about data you are able to control within Microsoft products by visiting our
Privacy Frequently Asked Questions (FAQs)
.
If your child’s account is not a part of your Microsoft family group and you do not have access to your child’s activity on your privacy dashboard, then you need to submit a request related to your child’s data through the
privacy support form
. The privacy team will ask for account verification before fulfilling the request.
To delete all of your child’s personal information, you must request deletion of the child’s account through the
close your account form
. This link will prompt you to sign in with your child’s account credentials. Check that the page shows the correct Microsoft account, and then follow the instructions to request that your child’s account be deleted.
Learn more about how to close a Microsoft account
.
After you submit the request to close your child’s account, we will wait 60 days before permanently deleting the account in case you change your mind or need to access something on the account before it is permanently closed and deleted. During the waiting period, the account is marked for closure and permanent deletion, but it still exists. If you want to reopen your child’s Microsoft account, just sign in again within that 60-day period. We will cancel the account closure, and the account will be reinstated.
What is Xbox?
Xbox is the gaming and entertainment division of Microsoft. Xbox hosts an online network that consists of software and enables online experiences crossing multiple platforms. This network lets your child find and play games, view content, and connect with friends on Xbox and other gaming and social networks.
When users sign in to Xbox, in apps, games or on an Xbox console, we assign a unique identifier to their device. For instance, when their Xbox console is connected to the internet and they sign in to the console, we identify which console and which version of the console’s operating system they are using.
Xbox continues to provide new experiences in client apps that are connected to and backed by services such as Xbox network and cloud gaming. When signed in to an Xbox experience, we collect required data to help keep these experiences safe, secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Data we collect when you create an Xbox profile
. You as the parent or guardian are required to consent to the collection of personal data from a child under 13 years old or as otherwise specified by your jurisdiction. With your permission, your child can have an Xbox profile and use the online Xbox network. During the child Xbox profile creation, you will sign-in with your own Microsoft account to verify that you are an adult organiser in your Microsoft family group. We collect an alternative email address or phone number to boost account security. If your child needs help accessing their account, they will be able to use one of these alternates to validate they own the Microsoft account.
We collect limited information about children, including name, birthdate, email address, and region. When you sign your child up for an Xbox profile, they get a gamertag (a public nickname) and a unique identifier. When you create your child’s Xbox profile you consent to Microsoft collecting, using, and sharing information based on their privacy and communication settings on the Xbox online network. Your child’s privacy and communication settings are defaulted to the most restrictive.
Data we collect
. We collect information about your child’s use of Xbox services, games, apps, and devices including:
When they sign in and sign out of Xbox, purchase history, and content they obtain.
Which games they play and apps they use, their game progress, achievements, play time per game, and other play statistics.
Performance data about Xbox consoles, Xbox Game Pass and other Xbox apps, the Xbox network, connected accessories, and network connection, including any software or hardware errors.
Content they add, upload, or share through the Xbox network, including text, pictures, and video they capture in games and apps.
Social activity, including chat data and interactions with other gamers, and connections they make (friends they add and people who follow them) on the Xbox network.
If your child uses an Xbox console or Xbox app on another device capable of accessing the Xbox network, and that device includes a storage device (hard drive or memory unit), usage data will be stored on the storage device and sent to Microsoft the next time they sign in to Xbox, even if they have been playing offline.
Xbox diagnostic data
. If your child uses Xbox console, Xbox will send required data to Microsoft. Required data is the minimum data necessary to help keep Xbox safe, secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Game captures
. Any player in a multiplayer game session can record video (game clips) and capture screenshots of their view of the game play. Other players’ game clips and screenshots can capture your child’s in-game character and gamertag during that session. If a player captures game clips and screenshots on a PC, the resulting game clips might also capture audio chat if your child’s privacy and communication settings on the Xbox online network allow it.
Captioning
. During Xbox real-time (“party”) chat, players may activate a voice-to-text feature that lets them view that chat as text. If a player activates this feature, Microsoft uses the resulting text data to provide captioning of chat for players who need it. This data may also be used to provide a safe gaming environment and enforce the
Community Standards for Xbox
.
Data use
. Microsoft uses the data we collect when your child uses Xbox to improve gaming products and experiences— making it safer and more fun over time. Data we collect also enables us to provide your child with curated experiences. This includes connecting them to games, content, services, and recommendations.
Xbox data viewable by others
. When your child is using the Xbox network, their online presence (which can be set to “appear offline” or “blocked”), gamertag, game play statistics, and achievements are visible to other players on the network. Depending on how you set your child’s Xbox safety settings, they might share information when playing or communicating with others on the Xbox network.
Safety
. In order to help make the Xbox network a safe gaming environment and enforce the Community Standards for Xbox, we may collect and review voice, text, images, videos and in-game content (such as game clips your child uploads, conversations they have, and things they post in clubs and games).
Anti-cheat and fraud prevention
. Providing a fair gameplay environment is important to us. We prohibit cheating, hacking, account stealing, and any other unauthorised or fraudulent activity when your child uses an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on their Xbox console, PC or mobile device. In order to detect and prevent fraud and cheating, we may use anti-cheat and fraud prevention tools, applications, and other technologies. Such technologies may create digital signatures (known as “hashes”) using certain information collected from their Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, and how they use that device. This can include information about the browser, device, activities, game identifiers, and operating system.
Xbox data shared with game and apps publishers
. When your child uses an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on their Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, the publisher of that game or app has access to data about their usage to help the publisher deliver, support, and improve its product. This data may include: your child’s Xbox user identifier, gamertag, limited account info such as country and age range, data about your child’s in-game communications, any Xbox enforcement activity, game-play sessions (for example, moves made in-game or types of vehicles used in-game), your child’s presence on the Xbox network, the time they spend playing the game or app, rankings, statistics, gamer profiles, avatars, or gamerpics, friends lists, activity feeds for official clubs they belong to, official club memberships, and any content they create or submit in the game or app.
Third-party publishers and developers of games and apps have their own distinct and independent relationship with users and their collection and usage of personal data is subject to their specific privacy policies. You should carefully review their policies to determine how they use your child’s data. For example, publishers may choose to disclose or display game data (such as on leaderboards) through their own services. You may find their policies linked from the game or app detail pages in our stores.
Learn more at
Data Sharing with Games and Apps
.
To stop sharing game or app data with a publisher, remove its games or app from all devices where they have been installed. Some publisher access to your child’s data may be revoked at
microsoft.com/consent
.
Managing child settings
. As the organiser of a Microsoft family group, you can manage a child’s information and settings on their
Family Safety
page, as well as their Xbox profile privacy settings from their
Xbox Privacy & online safety page
.
You can also use the
Xbox Family Settings
app to manage your child’s experience on the Xbox Network including: spending for Microsoft and Xbox stores, viewing your child’s Xbox activity, and setting age ratings and the amount of screen time. Xbox-specific Family Safety settings will apply on Xbox console or via Xbox on PC or mobile device but may not be applied on other platforms.
Learn more about managing Xbox profiles at
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
.
Learn more about Microsoft family groups at
Simplify your family’s life
.
Legacy
.
Xbox 360
. This Xbox console collects limited required diagnostic data. This data helps keep your child’s console functioning as expected.
Kinect
. The Kinect sensor is a combination of camera, microphone, and infrared sensor that can enable motions and voice to be used to control game play. For example:
If you choose, the camera can be used to sign in to the Xbox network automatically using facial recognition. This data stays on the console, is not shared with anyone, and can be deleted at any time.
For game play, Kinect will map distances between the joints on your child’s body to create a stick figure representation to enable play.
The Kinect microphone can enable voice chat between players during play. The microphone also enables voice commands for control of the console, game, or app, or to enter search terms.
The Kinect sensor can also be used for audio and video communications through services such as Skype.
Learn more about Kinect at
Xbox Kinect and Privacy
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Other important privacy information
Below you will find additional privacy information, such as how we secure your data, where we process your data, and how long we retain your data. You can find more information on Microsoft and our commitment to protecting your privacy at
Microsoft Privacy
.
Below you will find additional privacy information, such as how we secure your data, where we process your data, and how long we retain your data. You can find more information on Microsoft and our commitment to protecting your privacy at
Microsoft Privacy
.
Security of personal data
Microsoft is committed to protecting the security of your personal data. We use a variety of security technologies and procedures to help protect your personal data from unauthorised access, use or disclosure. For example, we store the personal data you provide on computer systems that have limited access and are in controlled facilities. When we transmit highly confidential data (such as a credit card number or password) over the internet, we protect it through the use of encryption. Microsoft complies with applicable data protection laws, including applicable security breach notification laws.
Back to top
Where we store and process personal data
Personal data collected by Microsoft may be stored and processed in your region, in the United States, and in any other jurisdiction where Microsoft or its affiliates, subsidiaries, or service providers operate facilities. Microsoft maintains major data centres in Australia, Austria, Brazil, Canada, Finland, France, Germany, Hong Kong, India, Ireland, Japan, Korea, Luxembourg, Malaysia, the Netherlands, Singapore, South Africa, the United Kingdom and the United States. Typically, the primary storage location is in the customer’s region or in the United States, often with a backup to a data centre in another region. The storage location(s) are chosen in order to operate and provide our services efficiently, improve performance, and create redundancies in order to protect the data in the event of an outage or other problem. We take steps to process the data that we collect under this privacy statement according to this statement’s provisions and the requirements of applicable law.
We transfer personal data from the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland to other countries, some of which have not yet been determined by the European Commission to have an adequate level of data protection. For example, their laws may not guarantee you the same rights, or there may not be a privacy supervisory authority there that is capable of addressing your complaints. When we engage in such transfers, we use a variety of legal mechanisms, including contracts such as the standard contractual clauses published by the European Commission under Commission Implementing Decision 2021/914, to help protect your rights and enable these protections to travel with your data. To learn more about the European Commission’s decisions on the adequacy of the protection of personal data in the countries where Microsoft processes personal data, see this article on
the European Commission website
.
Microsoft Corporation complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce. Microsoft Corporation has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF. Microsoft Corporation has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) with regard to the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF. In the context of an onward transfer, Microsoft Corporation has responsibility for the processing of personal data it receives under the DPF and subsequently transfers to a third party acting as an agent on our behalf. Microsoft Corporation remains liable under the DPF if our agent processes such personal information in a manner inconsistent with the DPF, unless Microsoft Corporation can prove that we are not responsible for the event giving rise to the damage. If there is any conflict between the terms in this privacy statement and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) programme, and to view our certification, please
visit the US Department of Commerce’s Data Privacy Framework website
. The controlled U.S. subsidiaries of Microsoft Corporation, as identified in our self-certification submission, also adhere to the DPF Principles—for more info, see the list of
Microsoft U.S. Entities Covered by Data Privacy Framework Certification
.
If you have a question or complaint related to participation by Microsoft in the DPF Frameworks, we encourage you to contact us via our
web form
. For any complaints related to the DPF Frameworks that Microsoft cannot resolve directly, we have chosen to co-operate with the relevant EU Data Protection Authority, or a panel established by the European data protection authorities, for resolving disputes with EU individuals, the UK Information Commissioner (for UK individuals) and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) for resolving disputes with Swiss individuals. Please contact us if you’d like us to direct you to your data protection authority contacts. As further explained in the DPF Principles, binding arbitration is available to address residual complaints not resolved by other means. Microsoft is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the U.S. Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
Individuals whose personal data is protected by Japan's Act on the Protection of Personal Information should refer to the article on the
Japanese Personal Information Protection Commission’s website
(only published in Japanese) for more information on the commission’s review of certain countries’ personal data protection systems. For individuals in Japan, please click
here
for additional information on the processing of information under the Telecommunications Business Act (in Japanese only).
Back to top
Our retention of personal data
Microsoft retains personal data for as long as necessary to provide the products and fulfil the transactions you have requested, or for other legitimate purposes such as complying with our legal obligations, resolving disputes, and enforcing our agreements. Because these needs can vary for different data types, the context of our interactions with you or your use of products, actual retention periods can vary significantly.
Other criteria used to determine the retention periods include:
Do customers provide, create, or maintain the data with the expectation we will retain it until they affirmatively remove it?
Examples include a document you store in OneDrive, or an email message you keep in your Outlook.com inbox. In such cases, we would aim to maintain the data until you actively delete it, such as by moving an email from your Outlook.com inbox to the Deleted Items folder, and then emptying that folder (when your Deleted Items folder is emptied, those emptied items remain in our system for up to 30 days before final deletion). (Note that there may be other reasons why the data has to be deleted sooner, for example if you exceed limits on how much data can be stored in your account.)
Is there an automated control, such as in the Microsoft privacy dashboard, that enables the customer to access and delete the personal data at any time?
If there is not, a shortened data retention time will generally be adopted.
Is the personal data of a sensitive type?
If so, a shortened retention time would generally be adopted.
Has Microsoft adopted and announced a specific retention period for a certain data type?
For example, for Bing search queries, we de-identify stored queries by removing the entirety of the IP address after 6 months, and cookie IDs and other cross-session identifiers that are used to identify a particular account or device after 18 months.
Has the user provided consent for a longer retention period?
If so, we will retain data in accordance with your consent.
Is Microsoft subject to a legal, contractual, or similar obligation to retain or delete the data?
Examples can include mandatory data retention laws in the applicable jurisdiction, government orders to preserve data relevant to an investigation, or data retained for the purposes of litigation. Conversely, if we are required by law to remove unlawful content, we will do so.
Back to top
U.S. State Data Privacy
If you are a U.S. resident, we process your personal data in accordance with applicable U.S. state data privacy laws, including the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA). This section of our privacy statement contains information required by the CCPA and other U.S. state data privacy laws and supplements our privacy statement.
Please note that rules implementing some of these laws have not yet been finalised. We will update our processes, disclosures and this notice as these implementing rules are finalised, and as otherwise necessary.
Please also see our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
and our
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for additional information about the data we collect, process, share and disclose, and your rights under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws.
Sale
. We do not sell your personal data. So, we do not offer an opt-out to the sale of personal data.
Profiling
.  We do not engage in “profiling” that utilises your personal data for automated decision-making that produces legal or similarly significant effects.  So, we do not offer an opt-out for this type of profiling.
Share
. We may “share” your personal data, as defined under California and other applicable US state laws, for personalised advertising purposes. As noted in our
Advertising
section, we do not deliver personalised advertising to children whose birthdate in their Microsoft account identifies them as being under 18 years of age.
In the bulleted list below, we outline the categories of data we share for personalised advertising purposes, the recipients of the personal data and our purposes of processing. For a description of the data included in each category, please see the
Personal data we collect
section.
Categories of Personal Data
Name and contact data
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalised advertising based on your interests
Demographic data
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalised advertising based on your interests
Subscription and licensing data
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalised advertising based on your interests
Interactions
Recipients: Third parties that perform online advertising services for Microsoft or that use Microsoft’s advertising technologies
Purposes of Processing: To deliver personalised advertising based on your interests
Please see the
Advertising
section for more information about our advertising practises, and our
US State Data Privacy Laws Notice
for more information on “sharing” for personalised advertising purposes under applicable US state laws.
Rights.
You have the right to (i) know what personal data we collect, use, disclose, “share” and sell, (ii) delete your personal data, (iii) correct your personal data, (iv) restrict the use and disclosure of your sensitive data, (v) receive a copy of your personal data, and (vi) opt-out of “sharing” your personal data with third parties for personalised advertising purposes on third-party sites. You may make these requests yourself or through an authorised agent. If you use an authorised agent, we provide your agent with
detailed guidance
on how to exercise your privacy rights. Please see our
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
for additional information on how to exercise these rights.
Universal Opt-Outs.
Microsoft receives and responds to the Global Privacy Control (GPC) browser opt-out signal. Microsoft will turn off sharing your data with third parties for personalised ads if we receive a GPC signal from you when you visit our sites.
You may have additional rights related to your consumer health data as defined by applicable state consumer health privacy laws. Please see our
Consumer Health Data Privacy Policy
for information on the rights available under Washington State’s My Health My Data Act (MHMDA) and other applicable U.S. consumer health privacy laws.
If you have a Microsoft account, you can exercise your rights through the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
, which requires you to log in to your Microsoft account. If you have an additional request or questions after using the dashboard, you may contact Microsoft at the address in the
How to contact us
section, use our
web form
, or call our US toll free number +1 (844) 931 2038. If you do not have an account, you may exercise your rights by contacting us as described above. To further protect your personal data, we may ask for additional information, such as your country of residence, email address, and phone number to validate your identity and request before honoring the request.
You may indicate your choice to opt-out of the sharing of your personal data with third parties for personalised advertising on third party sites by visiting our
sharing opt-out page
. You can also control the personalised advertising you see on Microsoft properties by visiting our
opt-out page
.
We do not use or disclose your sensitive data for purposes other than those listed below, without your consent, or as permitted or required under applicable laws. So, we do not offer an ability to limit the use of sensitive data.
If you have made a request to Microsoft to know, delete, correct, or receive your personal information and believe your request was denied by Microsoft, you can exercise your right to appeal the results of your request by contacting our privacy support team via our web form. If your appeal is unsuccessful and depending upon the state where you live, you may have the right to raise a concern or lodge a complaint with your state attorney general.
You have a right not to receive discriminatory treatment if you exercise your privacy rights. We will not discriminate against you if you exercise your privacy rights.
Personal information processing
. In the bulleted list below, we outline the categories of personal data we collect, the sources of the personal data, our purposes of processing, and the categories of third-party recipients with whom we provide the personal data. For a description of the data included in each category, please see the
Personal data we collect
section. Please see the
Our retention of personal data
section for information on personal data retention criteria.
Categories of Personal Data
Name and contact data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and partners with whom we offer co-branded services
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; respond to customer questions; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and marketing
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Credentials
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and organisations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; authentication and account access; and help, secure and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Demographic data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and purchases from data brokers
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide and personalise our products; product development; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and marketing
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Payment data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and financial institutions
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Transact commerce; process transactions; fulfil orders; help, secure and troubleshoot; and detect and prevent fraud
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Subscription and licensing data
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and organisations that represent users; third-party storefronts and platforms on which our products are purchased
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide, personalise and activate our products; customer support; help, secure and troubleshoot; marketing; and accounting
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Interactions
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users including data Microsoft generates through those interactions
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide and personalise our products; product improvement; product development; marketing; and help, secure and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Content
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and organisations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; safety; and help, secure, and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Video or recordings
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users and publicly available sources
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; product improvement; product development; marketing; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and safety
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
Feedback and ratings
Sources of personal data: Interactions with users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; product improvement; product development; customer support; and help, secure, and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities
While the bulleted list above contains the primary sources and purposes of processing for each category of personal data, we also collect personal data from the sources listed in the
Personal data we collect
section, such as developers who create experiences through or for Microsoft products. Similarly, we process all categories of personal data for the purposes described in the
How we use personal data
section, such as meeting our legal obligations, developing our workforce, and doing research.
Subject to your
privacy settings
, your consent, and depending on the products you use and your choices, we may collect, process, or disclose certain personal data that qualifies as “sensitive data” under applicable U.S. state data privacy laws. Sensitive data is a subset of personal data. In the list below, we outline the categories of sensitive data we collect, the sources of the sensitive data, our purposes of processing, and the categories of third party recipients with whom we share the sensitive data. Please see the
Personal data we collect
section for more information about the sensitive data we may collect.
Categories of Sensitive Data
Account log-in, financial account, debit or credit card number, and the means to access the account (security or access code, password, credentials, etc.)
Sources of sensitive data: Interactions with users and organisations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide the product and fulfil requested financial transactions
Recipients: Service providers and payment processing providers
Precise geo-location information
Sources of sensitive data: Users’ interactions with the products
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide the service requested; product improvement; some attributes may be disclosed to third parties to provide the service
Recipients: Users and service providers (please see the
Windows Location Services and Recording
section of our privacy statement for more information)
Racial or ethnic origin, religious or philosophical beliefs, or union membership
Sources of sensitive data: Communications with users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Conduct research studies to better understand how our products are used and perceived and for the purposes of improving the product experiences
Recipients: Service providers
Medical or mental health, sex life, or sexual orientation
Sources of sensitive data: Communications with users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Conduct research studies to better understand how our products are used and perceived and for the purposes of improving the product experiences and accessibility
Recipients: Service providers
Contents of your mail, email or text messages (where Microsoft is not the intended recipient of the communication)
Sources of sensitive data: Users’ interactions with the products
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; improve the product experience; safety; and help, secure, and troubleshoot
Recipients: Service providers
Personal data collected from a known child under 13 years of age
Sources of sensitive data: Interactions with users and organisations that represent users
Purposes of Processing (Collection and Disclosure to Third Parties): Provide our products; product improvement; product development; recommendations; help, secure, and troubleshoot; and safety
Recipients: Service providers and user-directed entities (in accordance with your Microsoft Family Safety
settings
)
While the bulleted list above contains the primary sources and purposes of processing for personal data collected from children under 13, we also collect personal data from the sources listed in the
Collection of Data from Children
section.
We do not use or disclose your sensitive data for purposes other than the following:
Perform the services or provide the goods you reasonably expect
Help ensure the security and integrity of our services, systems, and data, to combat malicious deceptive, fraudulent or illegal acts, and to protect the physical safety of individuals, to the extent the processing is reasonably necessary and proportionate
For short-term transient use (including non-personalised advertising), so long as the personal data is not disclosed to a third party, is not used for profiling, and is not used to alter an individual’s experience outside the current interaction with Microsoft
Perform services on behalf of Microsoft, such as maintaining accounts, providing customer service, processing, or fulfilling orders/transactions, verifying customer information, processing payments, providing financing, providing analytics, providing storage, and similar services
Undertake activities to verify or maintain the quality or safety of, or improve, upgrade, or enhance a service or device owned or controlled by Microsoft
Collect or process sensitive data where the collection or processing is not for inferring characteristics about the individual
Any other activities in accordance with any future regulations that are issued pursuant to U.S. state data privacy laws
De-Identified Data
. In some situations, Microsoft may process de-identified data. Data is in this state when we are not able to link data to an individual to whom such data may relate without taking additional steps. In those instances, and unless allowed under applicable law, we will maintain such information in a de-identified state, and will not try to re-identify the individual to whom the de-identified data relates.
Disclosures of personal data for business or commercial purposes
. As indicated in the
Reasons we share personal data
section, we share personal data with third parties for various business and commercial purposes. The primary business and commercial purposes for which we share personal data are the purposes of processing listed in the table above. However, we share all categories of personal data for the business and commercial purposes in the
Reasons we share personal data
section.
Parties that control collection of personal data
. In certain situations, we may allow a third party to control the collection of your personal data. For example, third party applications or extensions that run on Windows or Edge browser may collect personal data based on their own practices.
Microsoft allows advertising companies to collect information about your interactions with our websites in order to deliver personalised ads on Microsoft’s behalf.  You can view
our third party ad partners
on the
U.S. State Data Privacy Laws Notice
, and opt-out of data sharing with third parties at our opt-out
page
.
Back to top
Advertising
Advertising allows us to provide, support, and improve some of our products. Microsoft does not use what you say in email, human-to-human chat, video calls or voicemail, or your documents, photos or other personal files to target ads to you. We use other data, detailed below, for advertising on our Microsoft properties and on third-party properties. For example:
Microsoft may use data we collect to select and deliver some of the ads you see on Microsoft web properties, such as
Microsoft.com
, Microsoft Start, and Bing. We may also use such data to select and deliver ads on third party digital properties.
When the advertising ID is enabled in Windows as part of your privacy settings, third parties can access and use the advertising ID (much the same way that websites can access and use a unique identifier stored in a cookie) to select and deliver ads in such apps.
We may share data we collect with internal and external partners, such as Xandr, Yahoo, or Facebook (see below), so that the ads you see in our products and their products are more relevant and valuable to you.
Advertisers may choose to place our web beacons on their sites, or use similar technologies, in order to allow Microsoft to collect information on their sites such as activities, purchases, and visits; we use this data on behalf of our advertising customers to provide ads.
The ads that you see may be selected based on data we process about you, such as your interests and favourites, your location, your transactions, how you use our products, your search queries or the content you view. For example, if you view content on Microsoft Start about cars, we may show advertisements about cars; if you search “pizza places in Seattle” on Bing, you may see advertisements in your search results for restaurants in Seattle.
The ads that you see may also be selected based on other information learnt about you over time using demographic data, location data, search queries, interests and favourites, usage data from our products and sites, and the information we collect about you from the sites and apps of our advertisers and partners. We refer to these ads as "personalised advertising" in this statement. For example, if you view gaming content on
xbox.com
, you may see ads for games on Microsoft Start. To provide personalised advertising, we combine cookies placed on your device using information that we collect (such as IP address) when your browser interacts with our websites. If you opt out of receiving personalised advertising, data associated with these cookies will not be used.
We may use information about you to serve you with personalised advertising when you use Microsoft services. If you are logged in with your Microsoft account and have consented to allow Microsoft Edge to use your online activity for personalised advertising, you will see ads for products and services based on your online activity while using Microsoft Edge. To configure your privacy settings for Edge, go to Microsoft Edge > Settings > Privacy and Services. To configure your privacy and ad settings for your Microsoft account with respect to your online activity across browsers, including Microsoft Edge, or when visiting third-party websites or apps, go to your dashboard at
privacy.microsoft.com
.
Further details regarding our advertising-related uses of data include:
Advertising industry best practises and commitments
. Microsoft is a member of the
Network Advertising Initiative
(NAI) and adheres to the NAI Code of Conduct. We also adhere to the following self-regulatory programmes:
In the US:
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
In Europe:
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
In Canada:
Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)
/
Choix de Pub: l'Alliance de la publicité numérique du Canada (DAAC)
Health-related ad targeting
. In the United States, we provide personalised advertising based on a limited number of standard, non-sensitive health-related interest categories, including allergies, arthritis, cholesterol, cold and flu, diabetes, gastrointestinal health, headache/migraine, healthy eating, healthy heart, men’s health, oral health, osteoporosis, skin health, sleep and vision/eye care. We will also personalise ads based on customised, non-sensitive health-related interest categories as requested by advertisers.
Children and advertising
. We do not deliver personalised advertising to children whose birthdate in their Microsoft account identifies them as under 18 years of age.
Data retention
. For personalised advertising, we retain data for no more than 13 months, unless we obtain your consent to retain the data longer.
Sensitive Data
. Microsoft Advertising does not collect, process or disclose personal data that qualifies as “sensitive data” under applicable US state data privacy laws for the purposes of providing personalised advertising.
Data sharing
. In some cases, we share with advertisers reports about the data we have collected on their sites or ads.
Data collected by other advertising companies
. Advertisers sometimes include their own web beacons (or those of their other advertising partners) within their advertisements that we display, enabling them to set and read their own cookie. Additionally, Microsoft partners with
Xandr
, a Microsoft company, and third-party ad companies to help provide some of our advertising services, and we also allow other third-party ad companies to display advertisements on our sites. These third parties may place cookies on your computer and collect data about your online activities across websites or online services. These companies currently include, but are not limited to:
Facebook
,
Media.ne
t
,
Outb
rain
,
Taboola
and
Yah
oo
. Select any of the preceding links to find more information on each company’s practices, including the choices it offers. Many of these companies are also members of the
NAI
or
DAA
, which each provide a simple way to opt out of ad targeting from participating companies.
To opt out of receiving personalised advertising from Microsoft, visit our
opt-out
page. When you opt out, your preference is stored in a cookie that is specific to the web browser you are using. The opt-out cookie has an expiration date of five years. If you delete the cookies on your device, you need to opt out again.
Back to top
Speech recognition technologies
Speech recognition technologies are integrated into many Microsoft products and services. Microsoft provides both device-based speech recognition features and cloud-based (online) speech recognition features. Microsoft’s speech recognition technology transcribes voice data into text. With your permission, Microsoft employees and vendors working on behalf of Microsoft, will be able to review snippets of your voice data or voice clips in order to build and improve our speech recognition technologies. These improvements allow us to build better voice-enabled capabilities that benefit users across all our consumer and enterprise products and services. Prior to employee or vendor review of voice data, we protect users’ privacy by taking steps to de-identify the data, requiring non-disclosure agreements with relevant vendors and their employees, and requiring that employees and vendors meet high privacy standards.
Learn more about Microsoft and your voice data
.
Back to top
Preview or free-of-charge releases
Microsoft offers preview, insider, beta or other free-of-charge products and features ("previews") to enable you to evaluate them while providing Microsoft with data about your use of the product, including feedback and device and usage data. As a result, previews can automatically collect additional data, provide fewer controls, and otherwise employ different privacy and security measures than those typically present in our products. If you participate in previews, we may contact you about your feedback or your interest in continuing to use the product after general release.
Back to top
Changes to this privacy statement
We update this privacy statement when necessary to provide greater transparency or in response to:
Feedback from customer, regulators, industry, or other stakeholders.
Changes in our products.
Changes in our data processing activities or policies.
When we post changes to this statement, we will revise the "last updated" date at the top of the statement and describe the changes on the
Change history
page. If there are material changes to the statement, such as a change to the purposes of processing of personal data that is not consistent with the purpose for which it was originally collected, we will notify you either by prominently posting a notice of such changes before they take effect or by directly sending you a notification. We encourage you to periodically review this privacy statement to learn how Microsoft is protecting your information.
Back to top
How to contact us
If you have a privacy concern, complaint, or question for the Microsoft Chief Privacy Officer or the Data Protection Officer for your region, please contact us by using our
web form
. We will respond to questions or concerns as required by law and within a period no longer than 30 days. You can also raise a concern or lodge a complaint with a data protection authority or other official with jurisdiction.
When Microsoft is a controller, unless otherwise stated, Microsoft Corporation and, for those in the European Economic Area, the United Kingdom, and Switzerland, Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited are the data controllers for personal data we collect through the products subject to this statement. Our addresses are:
Microsoft Privacy, Microsoft Corporation, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, Washington 98052, USA. Telephone: +1 (425) 882 8080.
Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, Attn: Data Protection Officer, One Microsoft Place, South County Business Park, Leopardstown, Dublin 18, Ireland. Telephone: +353 1 706 3117.
To find the Microsoft subsidiary in your country or region, see the list of
Microsoft office locations around the world
.
The representative of Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited within the meaning of Art. 14 of the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection is Microsoft Schweiz GmbH, The Circle 02, 8058 Zürich-Flughafen, Switzerland.
If you would like to exercise your rights under applicable U.S. state data privacy law, you may contact Microsoft at the U.S. address listed above, use our
web form
, or call our U.S. toll free number +1 (844) 931 2038.
If you are a resident of Canada and its provinces you may contact the Microsoft Data Protection Officer for Canada at Microsoft Canada Head Office, 4400-81 Bay St, Toronto, ON, M5J 0E7, at +1 (416) 349 2506, or by using our
web form
.
Where French law applies, you can also send us specific instructions regarding the use of your personal data after your death, by using our
web form
.
If you have a technical or support question, please visit
Microsoft Support
to learn more about Microsoft Support offerings. If you have a personal Microsoft account password question, please visit
Microsoft account support
.
We offer various means for you to control your personal data that Microsoft has obtained, and to exercise your data protection rights. You can do so by contacting Microsoft at our
web form
or the information above, or by using the various tools we provide. Please see the
How to access and control your personal data
section for additional details.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
Microsoft leverages the power of artificial intelligence (AI) in many of our products and services, including by incorporating generative AI features such as Microsoft Copilot capabilities. Microsoft’s deployment and use of AI is subject to Microsoft’s
AI Principles
and Microsoft’s
Responsible AI Standard
, and Microsoft’s collection and use of personal data in developing and deploying AI features is consistent with commitments outlined in this privacy statement. Product-specific details provide additional relevant information. You can find out more about how Microsoft uses AI
here
.
Microsoft Copilot capabilities.
Microsoft Copilot
is Microsoft’s everyday AI companion, and is designed to help you achieve more through a single experience that runs across devices, understanding relevant context on the web, on your PC and across apps to bring you the right skills at the right time. With the help of Copilot, users can start a draft of a new Word document; or generate a PowerPoint presentation when accessing Copilot in M365 apps, quickly find the answers to complex search queries online, find relevant documents or other personal content, or be inspired to create new songs, stories, images or other content, among other tasks. Copilot is a family of services, and Microsoft’s collection and use of data may differ depending on the service and the intended functionality in a given scenario.
The Copilot
website
and app (available on iOS and Android) is the core of the consumer Copilot experience. Within this core experience, users can search the web, create text, images, songs, or other outputs, or engage with other features, such as plugins. On the website and in the app, users enter “prompts” that provide instructions to Copilot (e.g. “Give me recommendations for a restaurant that accommodates parties of 10 near me”). In order to provide a relevant response, Copilot will use this prompt, along with the user’s location, language and similar settings, to formulate a helpful response. In some markets, authenticated users can choose to allow Copilot to have access to prior prompt history to better personalise the product. The consumer Copilot product uses the data collected to provide and improve the Copilot services, including to provide relevant advertising. Users who are signed-in to their account can manage their prompt history in product and on the Microsoft Privacy Dashboard, and can adjust their location, language, and other settings in the product.
Copilot also appears as an assistant within other Microsoft consumer products, such as Bing and Microsoft Edge. In those situations, data processing activities generally align with those products’ primary uses. For example, Copilot in Bing’s use and collection of personal data is consistent with Bing’s core web search offering as described in the Search and Browse section of this privacy statement. More information about Copilot in Bing is available at
Copilot in Bing: Our approach to Responsible AI
. In Microsoft Edge, Copilot appears in the sidebar experience and can help the user complete tasks related to the webpages they visit (e.g. “summarise this page”). This data is used consistent with the Microsoft Edge section of this privacy statement.
Copilot Pro
is another consumer Copilot offering, and offers subscribers priority access to the very latest models, improved image creation abilities and access to Copilot in Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, OneNote, Excel and Outlook. The main Copilot Pro website and app has similar data collection, use and controls as consumer Copilot, as described above. Similar Copilot functionality is also included in Microsoft 365 Family and Microsoft 365 Personal subscriptions. When Copilot is integrated with Microsoft 365 products, Copilot data collection is consistent with how data collection and use is described in the Productivity and Communications section of this privacy statement.
There are also Copilot offerings designed for enterprise users. When enabled by an eligible enterprise, users logged in with their Entra ID who want to access consumer Copilot services are offered Copilot with Commercial Data Protection, which minimises data collection and use consistent with the expectations of enterprise users. More information on Copilot with Commercial Data Protection is available
here
.
Microsoft 365 Copilot, available for Microsoft 365 enterprise offerings, provides enterprise-grade data protection along with access to the corporate graph, Copilot within Microsoft 365 and Teams, and additional customisation features. Data collection and use in Microsoft 365 Copilot is consistent with the practices described in the Enterprise and Developer Products section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Enterprise and developer products
Enterprise and Developer Products are Microsoft products and related software offered to and designed primarily for use by organisations and developers. They include:
Cloud services, referred to as Online Services in the Product Terms, such as Microsoft 365 and Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365 and Microsoft Intune for which an organisation (our customer) contracts with Microsoft for the services (“Enterprise Online Services”).
Other enterprise and developer tools and cloud-based services, such as Azure PlayFab Services (to learn more see
Azure PlayFab Terms of Service
).
Server, developer and hybrid cloud platform products, such as Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio, System Centre, Azure Stack and open source software such as Bot Framework solutions (“Enterprise and Developer Software”).
Appliances and hardware used for storage infrastructure, such as StorSimple (“Enterprise Appliances”).
Professional services referred to in the Product Terms that are available with Enterprise Online Services, such as onboarding services, data migration services, data science services, or services to supplement existing features in the Enterprise Online Services.
In the event of a conflict between this Microsoft privacy statement and the terms of any agreement(s) between a customer and Microsoft for Enterprise and Developer Products, the terms of those agreement(s) will control.
You can also learn more about our Enterprise and Developer Products’ features and settings, including choices that impact your privacy or your end users’ privacy, in product documentation.
If any of the terms below are not defined in this Privacy Statement or the
Product Terms
, they have the definitions below.
General
. When a customer tries, purchases, uses, or subscribes to Enterprise and Developer Products, or obtains support for or professional services with such products, Microsoft receives data from you and collects and generates data to provide the service (including improving, securing, and updating the service), conduct our business operations, and communicate with the customer. For example:
When a customer engages with a Microsoft sales representative, we collect the customer’s name and contact data, along with information about the customer’s organisation, to support that engagement.
When a customer interacts with a Microsoft support professional, we collect device and usage data or error reports to diagnose and resolve problems.
When a customer pays for products, we collect contact and payment data to process the payment.
When Microsoft sends communications to a customer, we use data to personalise the content of the communication.
When a customer engages with Microsoft for professional services, we collect the name and contact data of the customer’s designated point of contact and use information provided by the customer to perform the services that the customer has requested.
The Enterprise and Developer Products enable you to purchase, subscribe to, or use other products and online services from Microsoft or third parties with different privacy practices, and those other products and online services are governed by their respective privacy statements and policies.
Enterprise and Developer Products are Microsoft products and related software offered to and designed primarily for use by organisations and developers. They include:
Cloud services, referred to as Online Services in the Product Terms, such as Microsoft 365 and Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365 and Microsoft Intune for which an organisation (our customer) contracts with Microsoft for the services (“Enterprise Online Services”).
Other enterprise and developer tools and cloud-based services, such as Azure PlayFab Services (to learn more see
Azure PlayFab Terms of Service
).
Server, developer and hybrid cloud platform products, such as Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio, System Centre, Azure Stack and open source software such as Bot Framework solutions (“Enterprise and Developer Software”).
Appliances and hardware used for storage infrastructure, such as StorSimple (“Enterprise Appliances”).
Professional services referred to in the Product Terms that are available with Enterprise Online Services, such as onboarding services, data migration services, data science services, or services to supplement existing features in the Enterprise Online Services.
In the event of a conflict between this Microsoft privacy statement and the terms of any agreement(s) between a customer and Microsoft for Enterprise and Developer Products, the terms of those agreement(s) will control.
You can also learn more about our Enterprise and Developer Products’ features and settings, including choices that impact your privacy or your end users’ privacy, in product documentation.
If any of the terms below are not defined in this Privacy Statement or the
Product Terms
, they have the definitions below.
General
. When a customer tries, purchases, uses, or subscribes to Enterprise and Developer Products, or obtains support for or professional services with such products, Microsoft receives data from you and collects and generates data to provide the service (including improving, securing, and updating the service), conduct our business operations, and communicate with the customer. For example:
When a customer engages with a Microsoft sales representative, we collect the customer’s name and contact data, along with information about the customer’s organisation, to support that engagement.
When a customer interacts with a Microsoft support professional, we collect device and usage data or error reports to diagnose and resolve problems.
When a customer pays for products, we collect contact and payment data to process the payment.
When Microsoft sends communications to a customer, we use data to personalise the content of the communication.
When a customer engages with Microsoft for professional services, we collect the name and contact data of the customer’s designated point of contact and use information provided by the customer to perform the services that the customer has requested.
The Enterprise and Developer Products enable you to purchase, subscribe to, or use other products and online services from Microsoft or third parties with different privacy practices, and those other products and online services are governed by their respective privacy statements and policies.
Enterprise online services
To provide the Enterprise Online Services, Microsoft uses data you provide (including Customer Data, Personal Data, Administrator Data, Payment Data, and Support Data) and data Microsoft collects or generates associated with your use of the Enterprise Online Services. We process data as described in the
Product Terms
,
Microsoft Products and Services Data Protection Addendum (Products and Services DPA)
and the
Microsoft Trust Center
.
Personal Data
. Customer is the controller of Personal Data and Microsoft is the processor of such data, except when (a) Customer acts as a processor of Personal Data, in which case Microsoft is a subprocessor or (b) as stated otherwise in the standard
Products and Services DPA
. In addition, as provided in the standard
Products and Services DPA
, Microsoft has taken on the added responsibilities of a data controller under GDPR when processing Personal Data in connection with its business operations incident to providing its services to Microsoft’s commercial customers, such as billing and account management; compensation; internal reporting and business modelling; and financial reporting. We use Personal Data in the least identifiable form that will support processing necessary for these business operations. We rely on statistical data and aggregate pseudonymized Personal Data before using it for our business operations, removing the ability to identify specific individuals.
Administrator Data
. Administrator Data is the information provided to Microsoft during sign-up, purchase, or administration of Enterprise Online Services. We use Administrator Data to provide the Enterprise Online Services, complete transactions, service the account, detect and prevent fraud, and comply with our legal obligations. Administrator Data includes the name, address, phone number, and email address you provide, as well as aggregated usage data related to your account, such as the controls you select. Administrator Data also includes contact information of your colleagues and friends if you agree to provide it to Microsoft for the limited purpose of sending them an invitation to use the Enterprise Online Services; we contact those individuals with communications that include information about you, such as your name and profile photo.
As needed, we use Administrator Data to contact you to provide information about your account, subscriptions, billing, and updates to the Enterprise Online Services, including information about new features, security, or other technical issues. We also contact you regarding third-party enquiries we receive regarding use of the Enterprise Online Services, as described in your agreement. You cannot unsubscribe from these non-promotional communications. We may also contact you regarding information and offers about other products and services, or share your contact information with Microsoft's partners. When such a partner has specific services or solutions to meet your needs, or to optimise your use of the Enterprise Online Services, we may share limited, aggregated information about your organisation’s account with the partner. Microsoft will not share your confidential information or contact information with the authorised partner unless we have sufficient rights to do so. You can manage your contact preferences or update your information in your account profile.
Payment Data
. We use payment data to complete transactions, as well as to detect and prevent fraud.
Support Data
. Customers provide or authorise Microsoft to collect data in connection with obtaining technical support for the Enterprise Online Services. We process Support Data to provide technical support and as described in the
Products and Services DPA
.
Local Software and Diagnostic Data
. Some Online Services may require, or may be enhanced by, the installation of local software (e.g., agents, device management applications). The local software may collect Diagnostic Data (as defined in the
Products and Services DPA
) about the use and performance of that software. That data may be transmitted to Microsoft and used for the purposes described in the
Products and Services DPA
.
Bing Search Services Data
. Bing Search Services, as defined in the Product Terms, use data such as search queries as described in the
Bing
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances
Enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances collect data to operate effectively and provide you the best experiences. The data we collect depends on the features you use, as well as your configuration and settings, but it is generally limited to device and usage data. Customers have choices about the data they provide. Here are examples of the data we collect:
During installation or when you upgrade an enterprise and developer software, we may collect device and usage data to learn whether you experience any difficulties.
When you use enterprise software or enterprise appliances, we may collect device and usage data to learn about your operating environment to improve security features.
When you experience a crash using enterprise software or enterprise appliances, you may choose to send Microsoft an error report to help us diagnose the problem and deliver customer support.
Microsoft uses the data we collect from enterprise and developer software and enterprise appliances to provide and improve our products, to deliver customer support, to activate the product, to communicate with you, and to operate our business.
Microsoft SQL Server is a relational database management platform and includes products that can be installed separately (such as SQL Server Management Studio). For detailed information about what data we collect, how we use it, and how to manage your privacy options, visit the
SQL Server privacy page
. If you work in an organisation, your administrator can set certain telemetry settings in SQL Server via Group Policy.
HoloLens
. HoloLens headsets are self-contained Windows computers with Wi-Fi connectivity that enable a mixed reality experience for apps and solutions. Microsoft collects diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Windows running on HoloLens up to date, secure, and operating properly. Diagnostic data also helps us improve HoloLens and related Microsoft products and services depending on the diagnostic data settings you’ve chosen for your device.
Learn more about Windows diagnostic data
.
HoloLens also processes and collects data related to the HoloLens experience and device, which include cameras, microphones, and infrared sensors that enable motions and voice to navigate.
If you choose, cameras can be used to sign you in automatically using your iris. To do this, HoloLens takes an image of your iris and measures distances between key points to create and store a numeric value that represents only you. This data stays on the HoloLens and is not shared with anyone, and you can choose to delete this data from your HoloLens at any time.
HoloLens also detects hand gestures intended for system interactions (such as menu navigation, pan/zoom, and scroll). This data is processed on your HoloLens device and is not stored.
HoloLens derives tracking points based on your environment which allows it to understand surfaces in space and allows you to place digital assets on them. There are no images associated with this environmental data and it is stored locally on the HoloLens device. You can choose to delete this data from your HoloLens at any time.
The headset's microphones enable voice commands for navigation, controlling apps, or to enter search terms.
Learn more about voice data collection
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Productivity and communications products
Productivity and communications products are applications, software, and services you can use to create, store, and share documents, as well as communicate with others.
Productivity and communications products are applications, software, and services you can use to create, store, and share documents, as well as communicate with others.
Microsoft 365, Office, and other productivity apps
Microsoft 365, previous versions called Office 365, is a collection of subscription productivity services and applications including Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and OneNote, among others. Office is the one-time purchase version of these applications available on PC or Mac and includes Access and Publisher. Both Microsoft 365 and Office are comprised of client software applications and connected online services (or web apps in the case of Microsoft 365 for the web) that span many platforms and have numerous interdependent experiences. For more details about Outlook, see the
Outlook
section of this privacy statement.
Various cloud-based Microsoft 365 services enable you to use your file content for designs and recommendations, collaborate with others within your documents, and provide you functionality from other Microsoft products, such as Bing, and third-party connected products. If you work in an organisation, your administrator may turn off or disable these connected services. You can access the privacy controls within your Microsoft 365 and Office apps. For more information, see
Account Privacy Settings
.
Office Roaming Service
. The Office Roaming Service helps keep your settings, including your privacy settings, up to date across your devices running Microsoft 365 or Office apps. When you sign in to your apps with either your Microsoft account or an account issued by your organisation, the service syncs some of your customised settings to Microsoft servers. For example, the service syncs a list of most recently used documents or the last location viewed within a document. When you sign in to another device with the same account, the Office Roaming Service downloads your settings from Microsoft servers and applies them to the additional device. When you sign out of your apps, the service removes your settings from your device. Any changes you make to your customised settings are sent to Microsoft servers.
Updates from Microsoft
. Microsoft uses services such as Click-to-Run, Microsoft AutoUpdate (for Mac), or Microsoft Update (for some versions of Office) to provide you with security and other important updates.
These services can automatically detect the availability of online updates for Microsoft 365 or Office apps on your device and download and install them automatically.
Diagnostic Data
. Diagnostic data is used to (i) keep your Microsoft 365 or Office apps secure and up to date; (ii) detect, diagnose, and remediate problems; and (iii) make product improvements. This data does not include a user’s name or email address, the content of the user’s files, or information about apps unrelated to Microsoft 365 or Office. Users have a choice between two different levels of diagnostic data collection, Required and Optional.
Required
. The minimum data necessary to help keep apps secure, up to date, and performing as expected on the device it’s installed on.
Optional
. Additional data that helps us make product improvements and provides enhanced information to help us detect, diagnose, and remediate issues.
See
Diagnostic Data
for more information.
Connected Experiences
. Microsoft 365 continues to provide more experiences in client applications that are connected to and backed by cloud-based services. A subset of these connected experiences is also available in Office. If you choose to use connected experiences, required service data will be collected to help keep these connected experiences reliable, up to date, secure, and performing as expected. See below for additional information about required service data.
Working with others on a document stored on OneDrive or translating the contents of a Word document into a different language are examples of connected experiences. There are two types of connected experiences.
Experiences that analyse your content
. Experiences that use your file content to provide you with design recommendations, editing suggestions, data insights, and similar features. For example, PowerPoint Designer or Editor in Word.
Experiences that download online content
. Experiences that allow you to search and download online content including templates, images, 3D models, videos, and reference materials to enhance your documents. For example, templates or PowerPoint QuickStarter.
You can access the privacy controls within your Microsoft 365 and Office client apps. These privacy settings allow you to configure your connected experiences. For example, you can choose to enable connected experiences that download online content, but not connected experiences that analyse content. Turning off connected experiences will also turn off additional experiences, such as document co-authoring and online file storage. But even if you use this privacy setting to turn off connected experiences, certain functionality will remain available, such as syncing your mailbox in Outlook, as well as essential services described below. These controls are not available when using Microsoft 365 for the web, since you will already be cloud-connected. For more information about accessing these controls, see
Account Privacy Settings.
If you choose to disable certain types of connected experiences, either the ribbon or menu command for those connected experiences will be greyed out, or you will get an error message when you try to use those connected experiences.
Essential services
. There are a set of services that are essential to how Microsoft 365 and Office functions and cannot be disabled. For example, the licensing service that confirms that you are properly licensed to use Microsoft 365 is essential. Required service data about these services is collected and sent to Microsoft, regardless of any other settings that you have configured. See
Essential Services
for more information.
Required service data for connected experiences
. As you use a connected experience, data is sent to and processed by Microsoft to provide you that connected experience. This data is necessary because this information enables us to deliver these cloud-based connected experiences. We refer to this data as required service data.
Required service data can include information related to the operation of the connected experience that is needed to keep the underlying service secure, up to date, and performing as expected. If you choose to use a connected experience that analyses your content, for example Translate in Word, the text you typed and selected to translate is also sent and processed to provide you the connected experience. Your text and the translation are not stored by our service. Required service data can also include information needed by a connected experience to perform its task, such as configuration information about the Microsoft 365 or Office app.
See
Required service data
for more information.
Copilot in Microsoft 365 and Copilot Pro
. Available as a separate subscription service in select countries, the Copilot features that appear in Microsoft 365 apps as part of a Microsoft 365 Personal, Microsoft 365 Family, or Copilot Pro subscription provide AI-powered productivity capabilities through real-time conversational experiences by applying large language model (LLM) processing on the content you choose to provide in Microsoft 365 apps including Word, Excel, OneNote, Outlook and PowerPoint. Copilot in Microsoft 365 and Copilot Pro are not available for use in Office desktop licences. When used with available Microsoft 365 apps, Copilot will use the content in your files only when you ask it to perform a specific action on that specific content – for example, when you ask Copilot to help you rewrite a paragraph in a Word document or ask Copilot to generate a to-do list from your notes in OneNote. Similar to connected experiences, required service data is collected during your use of Copilot that includes information related to its operation that is needed to keep the underlying service secure, up to date and performing as expected.
See
Copilot Pro: Microsoft 365 apps and your privacy
and
Frequently asked questions about Copilot in Microsoft 365 Family and Personal subscriptions
for more information.
Other Productivity Apps
. Microsoft provides several productivity apps separate from Microsoft 365 and Office, including Whiteboard (a free form digital canvas using touch, type, and pen), To Do (a cloud-based task management app), and Sticky Notes (a desktop notes app).
The apps use various cloud-based services to provide you with functionality from other Microsoft products, such as providing images from Bing in Whiteboard, recommending suggested tasks to add to My Day in To Do, and taking advantage of Sticky Notes' integration with Outlook.
Using device capabilities
. Some Microsoft 365 applications make use of your device capabilities using certain features. In PowerPoint, the presentation recording feature can access your device microphone and camera to record presentations with audio and video. Your device microphone is also accessed via the Record audio feature and when using Speaker Coach. As you speak, Speaker Coach gives you on-screen guidance about pacing, inclusive language, use of profanity, filler words, and whether you’re reading the slide text. When creating a PowerPoint presentation, you can also use the Screenshot and Screen clipping features to capture screen contents. Some Microsoft 365 applications, PowerPoint, Word, and OneNote, provide Dictate, a connected experience which lets you use speech-to-text to author content using your microphone. In Word and OneNote, the Transcribe connected experience converts speech recorded directly in the app using your microphone or using a speech audio recording to a text transcript with each speaker individually separated. OneNote can insert photos or record video using your camera. All Microsoft 365 apps along with To Do and Whiteboard have sharing functionality that accesses your contacts to allow you to share your documents with others in your contacts list. Applications will not access your device capabilities until you begin using the feature.
You can manage your microphone and camera access settings in the Windows Privacy Settings menu. Go to
Start > Settings > Privacy or Privacy & Security
. To learn more about how to control your privacy settings in apps, see
Windows privacy settings that apps use
.
Back to top
Microsoft Family
This section applies to the Microsoft Family Safety M365 product, which allows a family group to connect through the Microsoft Family Safety app on their Windows, Xbox, or mobile devices. Please carefully review the information at
Microsoft Family Safety
if choosing to create or join a family group.
Microsoft Family Safety can help parents and guardians to create a safer environment for their family group with digital content filtering, screen time limits, spending for Microsoft and Xbox stores, setting age ratings for apps and games, and location sharing. To learn about how Microsoft collects and uses children’s data, see the
Collection of data from children section
of the Privacy Statement. If you are using Microsoft Family Safety in Windows, see the
Windows security and safety features section
of the Privacy Statement for additional information.
To enable Family Safety controls on a child account, the child account must be part of a family group. Accounts that require parental consent to be created are automatically included as part of the family group of the individual who consented to the child account’s creation. For accounts that do not require parental consent to be created, the parent or guardian must add the account to their family group in order to use Family Safety controls.
When you have enabled family activity reporting for a child, Microsoft will collect details about how the child uses their devices, such as search, web, app, and game activity, and provide parents with reports of that child's online activities. Activity reports are routinely deleted from Microsoft servers.
Certain Family Safety features, such as Location Sharing, Drive Safety, Share Drives, Places, and Location Alerts will use your location information when enabled. When you have enabled Location Sharing, for instance, your device will upload location data to the cloud and share it with others in your family group. Microsoft retains only your last known location as part of the Location Sharing feature (each new location replaces the previous one). When you enable Drive Safety, your location will be used to record your drive habits such as whether you are driving within the speed limits, if you’re using your phone while driving, and if you accelerate or brake suddenly. These reports will be uploaded to the cloud, and you can choose to share your drive reports with your family group. You can turn off these location features at any time in the Family Safety settings. You can manage your device’s location data at the Microsoft Privacy Dashboard. Learn more about
Family Safety and your location data
.
Back to top
Microsoft Launcher
Microsoft Launcher is an Android app that offers a highly customisable app launcher experience on Android devices.
Microsoft Launcher lets you log in with your personal Microsoft account or work account, or use it without any account. However, some functions may be limited if you do not grant certain permissions.
To use Microsoft Launcher, the application must be installed on your Android device, and optional permissions are required to enable the following features:
Microsoft Copilot
. When signed in with your personal Microsoft account, you can seamlessly use Copilot features such as chat, web search, voice search and image search. Certain Copilot features require access to your device capabilities, such as your device camera, microphone, photos and videos. Please see our Artificial Intelligence and Copilot capabilities section for more information. Learn more about Copilot terms of use
here
.
Glance Feed
. Glance helps you organise daily activities, such as Outlook calendar, To Do list, Sticky Notes and recent documents in your M365 apps. After signing-in with your personal Microsoft account or your work account, the data will be synced across devices signed into the same account to give you personalised experiences. It also enables you to review recent activities, like recent photos and app usage, which require permissions to access device photos, files, and app usage data.
News Feed
. When you sign in with your Microsoft account, you can enjoy a personalised news feed and advertisements in Launcher’s News Feed, synchronised across all your devices. You can also receive local curated news when you grant Microsoft Launcher permission to access your location information. You can manage your ad preferences through the Microsoft privacy dashboard to tailor your experience.
Weather Notifications
. Microsoft Launcher allows you to receive the latest and most important weather changes on your home screen with MSN Weather. You can receive up-to-date local weather information when you allow Launcher to access your location or provide your postcode.
Backup and Restore
: Easily transfer between phones or try different home screen set-ups with Microsoft Launcher’s back-up and restore feature. Backups can be stored locally on your device or saved to your OneDrive account associated with your Microsoft Account for easy access.
Microsoft Launcher supports Android work profile features, enabling you to maintain a clear boundary between personal and work data on your device. This means you can securely access work resources without mixing them with your personal apps and data.
To learn more about Microsoft Launcher and its supported features, please visit
here
.
Back to top
Microsoft Teams
This section applies to the consumer offering of Teams; if you are using Teams with a school or work account, see the
Enterprise and developer products
of this privacy statement.
Teams is an all-in-one collaboration and communication hub. Teams lets you stay organised and connected across your entire life. Teams allows you to call people with voice or video calling. Teams allows you to easily find people, files, photos, conversations, tasks, and calendars in one convenient and secure place. Teams allows you to store confidential information like passwords, rewards numbers or login information, and share it with others within Teams. With your consent, you can share your location with friends and family.
As part of providing these features, Microsoft collects data about the usage of the features as well as information about your communications, including the time and date of the communication and users that are part of the communication. Microsoft may share this information with Enterprise customers when you interact through meetings and chats with end users who are using their school or work account. For instance, if you engage in a Teams chat with a user who is using Teams associated with their school account, Microsoft may share your information with that user's school as part of providing the Teams service.
Compatibility with Skype
. As a Teams user, you can also log into Skype using your Teams account. If you log into Skype via your Teams credentials, you can use Skype to chat with and call other Skype and Teams users, and you can access your Teams chat history through Skype. Skype users will be able to contact you on Teams and see your Teams presence status. For more information about Skype, see the
Skype section
of this privacy statement.
Finding Teams and Skype Contacts
. Your Teams profile includes information you provided when you set up a Microsoft account. To enable other people to find you on Teams (or products that interact with Teams for personal use, including Teams for enterprise and Skype), your Teams profile is included in the Teams and Skype public search directories, and may be displayed on Skype and Teams. Depending on your settings, Skype and Teams users can find you by your name, email, and/or phone number. Your profile includes your username, avatar, and any other data you choose to add to your profile or display to others. Your Teams profile may be visible to Enterprise customers and their end users when you engage with an end user of an organisation in chats and meetings.
Teams contacts
. With your permission, Teams will sync your device, Outlook, and Skype contacts periodically and check for other Teams users that match contacts in your device, Outlook, or Skype address books. You are always in control of your contacts and can stop syncing at any time. If you choose to stop syncing your device, Outlook or Skype contacts, or you are inactive on your device, any contacts that have not been matched during the synchronisation process will be deleted from Teams. If you wish to invite any of your device, Outlook, or Skype contacts to join a conversation, you can invite users to a 1:1 directly, or Microsoft can send an invitation on your behalf via SMS or email for invitations to group conversations. You can block users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Notice to non-user contacts.
If your information appears in the device, Outlook, or Skype address books of a Teams user who chooses to sync their device, Outlook, or Skype contacts with their Teams contacts, Microsoft may process your data in order to determine whether you are a current Teams user and to allow Teams users to invite you to the service, including via SMS and email. As long as the Teams user continues to be active on Teams on their device and continues to enable contact syncing with the applicable device or service, your information will be stored on our servers, and we will periodically process your information as a part of the Teams user’s contact syncing experience to check whether you have subsequently joined Teams.
Learn more about how we process your information in connection with the contact syncing feature offered to Teams users
.
If you do choose to join Teams, you will appear as a suggested new Teams contact for any Teams or Skype users with your information in their device, Outlook, or Skype address books. As a Teams user, you will be able to block other Teams and Skype users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Third-party contacts.
You can also choose to sync contacts from third-party providers. If you choose to unsync your third-party contacts on Teams, all third-party contacts are deleted from Teams. If you gave your consent to use those third-party contacts on other Microsoft apps and services, these contacts will still be available to those other Microsoft apps and services.
You can remove third-party contacts from all Microsoft apps and services by removing third-party accounts from Teams. Please note that removing a third-party account from Teams may impact your experiences on other Microsoft apps and services that also use that third-party account.
Teams calendar.
You can also choose to sync your Teams calendar with calendars from third-party providers. You can stop syncing your Teams calendar anytime by removing a third-party account from Teams. If you have consented to use third-party data on other Microsoft apps and services, please note that removing this third-party account data in Teams may impact your experiences on other Microsoft apps and services.
Location sharing
. You can share your static or live location with individuals or groups within Teams. You are in control and can stop sharing at any time. Sharing location for children is permitted with parental consent and in groups where an adult from the Microsoft family group is present.
Push notifications
. To let you know of incoming calls, chats, and other messages, Teams uses the notification service on your device. For many devices, these services are provided by another company. To tell you who is calling, for example, or to give you the first few words of the new chat, Teams has to tell the notification service so that they can provide the notification to you. The company providing the notification service on your device will use this information in accordance with their own terms and privacy policy. Microsoft is not responsible for the data collected by the company providing the notification service.
If you do not want to use the notification services for incoming Teams calls and messages, turn it off in the settings found on your device.
Chats and meetings with Enterprise customer end users
. Many Microsoft products are intended for use by organisations, such as schools and businesses, as well as individual users. Please see the
Enterprise and developer products section
of this privacy statement if you are using Teams with a work or school account. If you engage in Teams meetings or chats with end users of organisations, the data you share with the end users is subject to their organisation’s policies, if any. You should direct your privacy enquiries related to your data shared through chats and meetings with an organisation’s end users, including any requests to exercise your data protection rights, to the organisation’s administrator. Microsoft is not responsible for the privacy or security practices of our customers, which may differ from those set forth in this privacy statement.
Back to top
OneDrive
OneDrive lets you store and access your files on virtually any device. You can also share and collaborate on your files with others. Some versions of the OneDrive application enable you to access both your personal OneDrive by signing in with your personal Microsoft account and your OneDrive for Business by signing in with your work or school Microsoft account as part of your organisation's use of Microsoft 365 or Office 365.
When you use OneDrive, we collect data about your usage of the service, as well as the content you store, to provide, improve, and protect the services. Examples include indexing the contents of your OneDrive documents so that you can search for them later and using location information to enable you to search for photos based on where the photo was taken. We also collect device information so we can deliver personalised experiences, such as enabling you to sync content across devices and customise roaming settings.
When you store content in OneDrive, that content will inherit the sharing permissions of the folder in which you store it. For example, if you decide to store content in the public folder, the content will be public and available to anyone on the internet who can find the folder. If you store content in a private folder, the content will be private.
When you share content to a social network like Facebook from a device that you have synced with your OneDrive account, your content is either uploaded to that social network, or a link to that content is posted to that social network. Doing this makes the content accessible to anyone on that social network. To delete the content, you need to delete it from the social network (if it was uploaded there, rather than a link to it) and from OneDrive.
When you share your OneDrive content with your friends via a link, an email with the link is sent to those friends. The link contains an authorisation code that allows anyone with the link to access your content. If one of your friends sends the link to other people, they will also be able to access your content, even if you did not choose to share the content with them. To revoke permissions for your content on OneDrive, sign in to your account and then select the specific content to manage the permission levels. Revoking permissions for a link effectively deactivates the link. No one will be able to use the link to access the content unless you decide to share the link again.
Files managed with OneDrive for Business are stored separately from files stored with your personal OneDrive. OneDrive for Business collects and transmits personal data for authentication, such as your email address and password, which will be transmitted to Microsoft and/or to the provider of your Microsoft 365 or Office 365 service.
Back to top
Outlook
Outlook products are designed to improve your productivity through improved communications and include Outlook.com, Outlook applications, and related services.
Outlook.com
. Outlook.com is the primary consumer email service from Microsoft and includes email accounts with addresses that end in outlook.com, live.com, hotmail.com, and msn.com. Outlook.com provides features that let you connect with your friends on social networks. You will need to create a Microsoft account to use Outlook.com.
When you delete an email or item from a mailbox in Outlook.com, the item generally goes into your Deleted Items folder where it remains for approximately 7 days unless you move it back to your inbox, you empty the folder, or the service empties the folder automatically, whichever comes first. When the Deleted Items folder is emptied, those emptied items remain in our system for up to 30 days before final deletion, unless we are legally required to retain the data for longer.
Outlook applications
. Outlook client applications are software you install on your device that permits you to manage email, calendar items, files, contacts, and other data from email, file storage, and other services, like Exchange Online or Outlook.com, or servers, like Microsoft Exchange. You can use multiple accounts from different providers, including third-party providers, with Outlook applications,
including the new Outlook for Windows app
.
To add an account, you must provide permission for Outlook to access data from the email or file storage services.
When you add an account to Outlook, your email, calendar items, files, contacts, settings and other data from that account will automatically sync to your device. If you are using the mobile Outlook application, that data will also sync to Microsoft servers to enable additional features such as faster search, personalised filtering of less important email, and an ability to add email attachments from linked file storage providers without leaving the Outlook application. If you are using the desktop Outlook application, you can choose whether to allow the data to sync to our servers. At any time, you can remove an account or make changes to the data that is synced from your account.
If you add an account provided by an organisation (such as your employer or school), the owner of the organisational domain can implement policies and controls (for example, requiring multi-factor authentication or the ability to remotely wipe data from your device) that can affect your use of Outlook.
Using device capabilities
. For Outlook clients that support it, the user can dictate the contents of an email and send using the Dictate feature. The Dictate feature may be configured to use the device’s microphone or any other microphone that a user may connect to their device, like a microphone-enabled pair of headphones. Outlook may also use your device location information to provide you with weather information for your current location as well as provide the ability to search for nearby locations.
To learn more about the data the Outlook applications collect and process, please see the
Microsoft 365
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Skype
Skype lets you send and receive voice, video, SMS, and instant message communications. This section applies to the consumer version of Skype; if you are using Skype for Business, see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement.
As part of providing these features, Microsoft collects usage data about your communications that includes the time and date of the communication and the numbers or user names that are part of the communication.
Compatibility with Teams.
As a Skype user, you can also log into Teams using your Skype account. If you log into Teams via your Skype credentials, you can use Teams to chat with and call other Skype and Teams users, and you can access your Skype missed calls and chat history through Teams. Teams users will be able to contact you on Skype and see your Skype presence status. For more information about Teams, see the
Microsoft Teams section
of this privacy statement.
Finding Teams and Skype Contacts.
Your Skype profile includes information you provided when you set up a Microsoft or Skype account. To enable other people to find you on Skype (or products that interact with Skype, such as Skype for Business or Microsoft Teams), your Skype profile is included in Skype and Teams public search directories and may be visible on both Skype and Teams. Depending on your profile settings, Skype and Teams users can find you by your name, email, and/or phone number. Your profile includes your username, avatar and any other data you choose to add to your profile or display to others.
Emergency calling in the United States.
If you enable location sharing for emergency calling, your location will be periodically collected to enable Microsoft to share your location with emergency calling service providers if you dial 911. Your location information is only shared if you enable location sharing for emergency calling and you initiate a 911 call.
Skype contacts.
If you use Outlook.com to manage contacts, Skype will automatically add the people you know to your Skype contact list until you tell the application to stop. With your permission, Skype will sync your device contacts periodically and check for other Skype users that match contacts in your device or Outlook address books. You are always in control of your contacts and can stop syncing at any time. You can block users if you do not want to receive their communications. If you choose to stop syncing your device contacts, or you are inactive on your device, any contacts that have not been matched during the synchronisation process will be deleted from Skype. If you wish to invite any of your device or Outlook contacts to join a conversation, you can invite users to a 1:1 directly, or Microsoft can send an invitation on your behalf via SMS or email for invitations to group conversations. You can block users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Notice to non-user contacts.
If your information appears in the device or Outlook address book of a Skype user who chooses to sync their device or Outlook contacts with their Skype contacts, Microsoft may process your data in order to determine whether you are a current Skype user and to allow Skype users to invite you to the service, including via SMS and email. As long as the Skype user continues to be active on Skype on their device and continues to enable contact syncing, your information will be stored on our servers and we will periodically process your information as a part of the Skype user’s contact synching experience to check whether you have subsequently joined Skype.
Learn more about how we process your information in connection with the contact syncing feature offered to Skype users
.
If you do choose to join Skype, you will appear as a suggested new Skype contact for any Skype and Teams users with your information in their device or Outlook address books. As a Skype user, you will be able to block other Skype and Teams users if you do not want to receive their communications; additionally, you can report a concern to Microsoft.
Partner companies
. To make Skype available to more people, we partner with other companies to allow Skype to be offered via those companies’ services. If you use Skype through a company other than Microsoft, that company’s privacy policy governs how it handles your data. To comply with applicable law or respond to valid legal process, or to help our partner company or local operator comply or respond, we may access, transfer, disclose, and preserve your data. That data could include, for example, your private content, such as the content of your instant messages, stored video messages, voicemails, or file transfers.
Skype Manager
. Skype Manager lets you manage a group’s (such as your family’s) Skype usage from one central place. When you set up a group, you will be the Skype Manager Administrator and can see the patterns of usage, including detailed information, like traffic data and details of purchases, of other members of the group who have consented to such access. If you add information like your name, other people in the group will be able to see it. Members of the group can withdraw consent for Skype Manager by visiting their
Skype account page
.
Push notifications
. To let you know of incoming calls, chats, and other messages, Skype apps use the notification service on your device. For many devices, these services are provided by another company. To tell you who is calling, for example, or to give you the first few words of the new chat, Skype has to tell the notification service so that they can provide the notification to you. The company providing the notification service on your device will use this information in accordance with their own terms and privacy policy. Microsoft is not responsible for the data collected by the company providing the notification service. If you do not want to use the notification services for incoming Skype calls and messages, turn it off in the settings found in the Skype application or your device.
Translation features
. When you use Skype’s translation features, Skype collects and uses your conversation to provide the translation service. With your permission, your data may be used to help improve Microsoft products and services. To help the translation and speech recognition technology learn and grow, sentences and automatic transcripts are analysed and any corrections are entered into our system, to build better performing services. This data may include manual transcription of your voice clips. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
.
Recording features
. Some versions of Skype have a recording feature that allows you to capture and share all or part of your audio / video call. The recording will be stored and shared as part of your conversation history with the person or group with whom the call occurred.
You should understand your legal responsibilities before recording any communication. This may include obtaining the prior consent of everyone participating in the conversation or any other authorisations as required.
Microsoft is not responsible for how you use your recordings or the recording features.
Skype bots
. Bots are programs offered by Microsoft or third parties that can do many useful things, such as search for news, play games and more. Depending on their capabilities, bots may have access to your display name, Skype ID, country, region, language, and any messages, audio, video, or content that you share with the bot. Please review the bot profile and its privacy statement before engaging in a one-to-one or group conversation with a bot. You can delete a bot that you no longer wish to engage with. Prior to adding a bot to a group, please ensure that your group participants have consented to their information being shared with the bot.
Captioning
. Certain Skype features include accessibility functionality such as captioning. During Skype calls, a call participant can activate a voice-to-text feature, which allows the user to view the audio chat as text. If a user activates this feature, other call participants will not receive a notification. Microsoft uses this voice and text data to provide captioning of audio for users.
Camera Features
. When you use the camera feature in Skype, you can choose to enhance your video and images with third party lens services. Lens is a feature that uses Augmented Reality (AR) to transform your selfies in a fun way, such as making you look like your favorite animal. Using the camera in Skype, you can select the lens feature that is incorporated in the Skype to transform your face and hands. Depending on which lens you choose, your video and images may be processed to extract information about the location of different areas on your face and hands. The extracted data is used for the sole purpose of applying AR effects to your face and hands. None of this data is used to personally identify you. This data is processed for the duration of the session on your device only, and then deleted immediately. This data is not sent to Skype or any third party.
Back to top
Surface
Microsoft offers its family of Surface devices and accessories to provide a great computing experience, including surfing the web, watching and streaming videos, playing games, running apps like Excel, Word, and OneNote, and more. These include devices and accessories like Surface Laptops, Surface Studios, Surface Book, Surface Pro, Surface Headphones, Surface Earbuds, Surface Dock, Surface Keyboard, and more. As part of that experience, Microsoft collects certain diagnostic data, as described below.
Diagnostic data
. Microsoft collects diagnostic data as you use your Surface devices, Surface accessories, and Surface applications. Diagnostic data can include information about crashes, performance, and usage of Surface products. The data that is sent to Microsoft is used to help keep Surface secure, up to date, and performing as expected and can help us make other improvements to Surface.
There are two levels of diagnostic and activity data: Required diagnostic data and Optional diagnostic data.
Required diagnostic data
is the minimum amount of data that we need to help keep Surface devices, Surface accessories, and the Surface application secure, up-to-date, and performing as expected.
Optional diagnostic data
is additional diagnostic and usage data about your Surface devices, Surface accessories, and the Surface application. If you choose to send optional diagnostic data to Microsoft, required diagnostic data is also included.
Required diagnostic data is always sent to Microsoft for all Surface devices, Surface accessories, and the Surface application. But you can choose whether to allow Surface to collect optional diagnostic data and send it to Microsoft. You can make that choice when you first set up your Surface device or change the setting at any time in the Surface app.
For more information, see
Diagnostic data for Surface products
and
Diagnostic data in the Surface app
. For a list of Surface required diagnostic data collected, see
Required diagnostic data for Surface products
.
Back to top
Surface Duo
The Surface Duo is a device featuring two screens that fits in your pocket for productivity on the go. Powered by the Google Android operating system, Surface Duo supports mobile and Wi-Fi connectivity and can be used for email, internet browsing, games and business connectivity.
Microsoft provides a core Surface Duo experience that runs on the Android operating system. The core Surface Duo experience includes apps such as the Microsoft Launcher, Setup Wizard, and Your Phone Companion. You can sign in with a Google ID and enable various Google services; you can then also sign in with your Microsoft account (MSA) and enable Microsoft’s services. Microsoft apps and services may rely on information provided by Google. Some features, such as location, require that you enable this functionality for Google and separately allow Microsoft to leverage this information.
Diagnostic data
. Surface Duo collects diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep the core Surface Duo experience up to date, secure, and operating properly. This data also helps us improve Surface Duo and related Microsoft products and services. The data does not include your username, email address or the content of your files. There are two levels of diagnostic data: Required diagnostic data and Optional diagnostic data.
Required
. The minimum data necessary to help keep the core Surface Duo experience secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Optional
. Additional data that helps us make product improvements and provides enhanced information to help Microsoft detect, diagnose, and remediate issues.
Learn more in Surface Duo Privacy Settings
.
Surface Duo location settings
. Surface Duo relies on Google location services to determine the device’s precise geographic location to display the local weather. The location of your Surface Duo can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy and may in some cases be determined precisely. If you want Microsoft apps to be able to reference or display weather or other location related information, you need to enable Google location services and Microsoft location access. Some apps may require these settings be enabled independently for the app and can be set or changed in the Surface Duo’s Settings. The
Google Privacy Policy
provides details about Google’s location service and related data privacy practises. See
Surface Duo Location Settings
for more information.
Microsoft apps included with the Surface Duo
. The diagnostic data options for the core Surface Duo experience are configured when you initially set up your Surface Duo and can be changed in the Surface Duo’s Settings under the Diagnostic Data section.
The other Microsoft apps on your Surface Duo may prompt you to enable functionality to enable the full experience of the app or you may be asked to allow optional diagnostic data collection. You can change the settings for these apps in the Surface Duo Settings under the app name. More information about these apps is available in the
Productivity and communications products
and
Search and Browse
sections of this Privacy Statement.
Back to top
LinkedIn
To learn about the data LinkedIn collects and how it is used and shared, please see LinkedIn’s
Privacy Policy
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Search and browse
Search and browse products connect you with information and intelligently sense, process, and act on information—learning and adapting over time. For more information on artificial intelligence and Copilot capabilities in Microsoft’s search products, please see
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
section above.
Search and browse products connect you with information and intelligently sense, process, and act on information—learning and adapting over time. For more information on artificial intelligence and Copilot capabilities in Microsoft’s search products, please see
Artificial Intelligence and Microsoft Copilot capabilities
section above.
Bing
Bing services include search and mapping services, as well as other apps and programmes described in this section. Bing services collect and process data in many forms, including text that has been inked or typed, voice data, and images. Bing services are also included within other Microsoft services, such as Microsoft 365, and certain features in Windows (which we refer to as Bing-powered experiences).
When you conduct a search, or use a feature of a Bing-powered experience that involves conducting a search or entering a command on your behalf, Microsoft will collect the searches or commands you provide (which may be in the form of text, voice data, or an image), along with your IP address, location, the unique identifiers contained in our cookies or similar technologies, the time and date of your search, and your browser configuration. For example, if you use Bing voice-enabled services, your voice input and performance data associated with the speech functionality will be sent to Microsoft. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
. And, if you use Bing image-enabled services, the image you provide will be sent to Microsoft. When you use Bing-powered experiences, such as Bing Lookup to search a particular word or phrase within a webpage or document, that word or phrase is sent to Bing along with some surrounding content in order to provide contextually relevant search results.
AI-enhanced Bing search
. Bing search now includes an AI-enhanced web search functionality using Microsoft Copilot in Bing, which supports users by providing relevant search results, reviewing and summarising from across the web, refining research queries through the chat experience and sparking creativity by helping users create content. Copilot in Bing’s use and collection of personal data is consistent with Bing’s core web search offering as described in this section. More information about Copilot in Bing is available at
Copilot in Bing: Our approach to Responsible AI
.
Search suggestions
. For the search suggestions feature, the characters that you type into a Bing-powered experience (such as search and site suggestions in the Microsoft Edge browser) to conduct a search and what you click on will be sent to Microsoft. This allows us to provide you with relevant suggestions as you type your searches. To turn this feature on or off, while using Bing Search, go to
Bing Settings
. There are other methods to control this feature in other Bing-powered experiences, such as the Microsoft Edge browser. Search Suggestions cannot be turned off in the search box in Windows 10 and Windows 11. If you choose, you can always hide the search box or icon on the taskbar.
Bing experience improvement programme for Bing Desktop and Bing Toolbar
. If you are using Bing Desktop or Bing Toolbar and choose to participate in the Bing Experience Improvement Programme, we also collect additional data about how you use these specific Bing apps, such as the addresses of the websites you visit, to help improve search ranking and relevance. To help protect your privacy, we do not use the data collected through the Bing Experience Improvement Programme to identify or contact you or target advertising to you. You can turn off the Bing Experience Improvement Programme at any time in the Bing Desktop or Bing Toolbar settings. Finally, we delete the information collected through the Bing Experience Improvement Programme after 18 months.
Retention and de-identification
. We de-identify stored search queries by removing the entirety of the IP address after 6 months, and cookie IDs and other cross-session identifiers that are used to identify a particular account or device after 18 months.
Personalisation through Microsoft account
. Some Bing services provide you with an enhanced experience when you sign in with your personal Microsoft account, for example, syncing your search history across devices. You can use these personalisation features to customise your interests, favourites and settings, and to connect your account with third-party services. Visit
Bing Settings
to manage your personalisation settings, or the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
to manage your data.
Managing search history
. When you’re signed-in to a personal Microsoft account, you can erase your search and chat history on the
Microsoft privacy dashboard
. The Search History service from Bing, located in Bing Settings, provides another method of revisiting the search terms you've entered and results you've clicked when using Bing search through your browser. You may clear your search history on a device through this service. The conversations you have with Microsoft Copilot in Bing are also remembered as “Recent activity”. The history of previous Recent activities is saved, with the names of chats based by default on the first query of the chat. Your Recent activity is displayed on the right-hand side of the chat window when you are using the service. Clearing your history prevents that history from being displayed in your Search History or chat history, but does not delete information from our search logs, which are retained and de-identified as described above or as you have instructed through the privacy dashboard. If you are signed-in to a work or school Microsoft account using Microsoft Search in Bing, you can export your Microsoft Search in Bing search history, but you cannot delete it. Your Microsoft Search in Bing service administrator can see aggregated search history across all enterprise users but cannot see specific searches by user.
Third-party services that use Bing
. You may access Bing-powered experiences when using third-party services, such as those from Yahoo!. In order to provide these services, Bing receives data from these and other partners, including your search query and related data (such as date, time, IP address, and a unique identifier). This data will be sent to Microsoft to provide the search service. Microsoft will use this data as described in this statement or as further limited by our contractual obligations with our partners. You should refer to the privacy policies of the third-party services for any questions about how they collect and use data.
Data passed to destination website
. When you select a search result or advertisement from a Bing search results page and go to the destination website, the destination website will receive the standard data your browser sends to every web site you visit—such as your IP address, browser type and language, and the host name of the site you came from (in this case,
https://www.bing.com/
).
Sharing data from Bing and Bing-powered experiences with third parties
. We share some de-identified data (data where the identity of a specific person is not known) from Bing and Bing-powered experiences with selected third parties. Before we do so, we run the data through a process designed to remove certain sensitive data that users may have included in the search terms themselves (such as social security numbers or credit card numbers). Additionally, we require these third parties to keep the data secure and to not use the data for purposes other than for which it is provided.
Back to top
Microsoft Edge
Whenever you use a web browser to access the internet, data about your device ("standard device data") is sent to the websites you visit and online services you use. Standard device data includes your device's IP address, browser type and language, access times, and referring website addresses. This data might be logged on those websites' or online services’ web servers. Which data is logged and how that data is used depends on the privacy practices of the websites you visit and web services you use. Certain features in Microsoft Edge, such as when you open a new tab in the browser, connect you to Microsoft Start Content and your experiences with such content is covered by the Microsoft Start section of this privacy statement. Additionally, Microsoft Edge sends a unique browser ID to certain websites to enable us to develop aggregate data used to improve browser features and services.
Microsoft Edge for Windows, Linux, and macOS
. Microsoft Edge is the default web browser for Windows 10 and later and is also available on other supported versions of Windows and macOS.
Data about how you use your browser, such as your browsing history, web form data, temporary internet files, and cookies, is stored on your device. You can delete this data from your device using Clear Browsing History.
Microsoft Edge allows you to capture and save content on your device, such as:
Settings and More
. Allows you to manage your favourites, downloads, history, extensions and collections.
Collections
. Allows you to collect text, images, videos, and other content in a note page in your browser. When you drag content into your collection, it is cached on your device and can be deleted through your collection.
Website Pin to Taskbar
. Allows you to pin your favorite websites to the Windows taskbar. Websites will be able to see which of their webpages you have pinned, so they can provide you a notification badge letting you know there is something new for you to check out on their websites.
Microsoft collects data necessary to provide features you request in Microsoft Edge. When signed into Microsoft Edge using your Microsoft personal account or work or school account, Microsoft Edge will sync your browser data saved on your device across other signed-in devices. You may choose which browser data to sync, including your favourites, browsing history, extensions and associated data, settings, open tabs, autofill form entries (such as your name, address and phone number), passwords, payment information and other data types as they become available. If you choose to sync extensions that you acquired from third-party web stores, a copy of those extensions will be downloaded directly from those web stores on your synced device(s). If you have turned on Password Monitor, your saved credentials are hashed, encrypted and sent to Microsoft’s Password Monitor service to warn you if your credentials were detected as part of a malicious attack or a breach. Microsoft does not retain this data after the check is complete. You can disable or configure syncing in the Microsoft Edge settings.
When you sign into Microsoft Edge with your Microsoft personal account or work or school account, Microsoft Edge will store your account’s privacy preferences. Microsoft Edge will use the stored preferences to migrate your account’s privacy choices across your signed-in devices, including during Windows device set up or when you sign into Microsoft Edge with your account on a new device.
Microsoft Edge’s
Search and site suggestions
uses your search queries and browsing history to provide you with faster browsing and more relevant search recommendations. Microsoft Edge sends the information you type into the browser address bar to the default search provider configured in the address bar to offer search recommendations as you type each character. You can turn off these features at any time in the browser settings. In order to provide search results, Microsoft Edge sends your search queries, standard device information, and location (if you have location enabled) to your default search provider. If Bing is your default search provider, we use this data as described in the Bing section of this privacy statement.
Microsoft Edge collects and uses data from your search activity across the web, including websites Microsoft does not own or operate, to improve Microsoft services, such as Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing and Microsoft News. This data may include the search query, the search results that are displayed to you, demographic information that is part of the search results, and the interaction you have with those search results, such as the links you click. Microsoft Edge takes steps to de-identify the data it collects by removing data that identifies the person or device from which it was collected and retains this data for one year from when it is collected. Microsoft does not use this collected data to personalise or provide ads to you. You can turn off the collection of this data at any time in the browser settings.
Microsoft Edge downloads content from Microsoft services to enhance your browsing experiences; for example, when data is downloaded to prerender site content for faster browsing or to provide content required to power features you choose to use, such as providing templates for Collections.
You may also choose to share your Microsoft Edge browsing activity to allow us to personalise Microsoft Edge and Microsoft services such as ads, search, shopping and news. Microsoft Edge browsing activity includes your history, favourites, usage data, web content and other browsing data. For more information about our
advertising privacy policies
see the Advertising section of the privacy statement. In the Microsoft privacy dashboard you can control the use of your browsing activity for personalised ads in the
See ads that interest you
setting. If you disable this setting in the Microsoft privacy dashboard, you will continue to receive personalised web experiences such as search and news based on your browsing activity. You may stop sharing your Microsoft Edge browsing activity by disabling
Allow Microsoft to use your browsing activity including history, favourites, usage and other browsing data to personalise Microsoft Edge and Microsoft services such as ads, search, shopping and news
within Edge settings. When using Copilot features in the Microsoft Edge sidebar, you can choose to allow Microsoft Copilot in Edge to access the content of the webpage you are viewing in order to provide further insights, such as page summaries. Use of data connected with Copilot experiences is consistent with the Copilot data use described in the Bing section of this privacy statement.
Microsoft Edge collects required diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Microsoft Edge up to date, secure, and operating properly. Required diagnostic data also helps us improve Microsoft Edge and Windows.
Separate from your search activity data mentioned above, you can choose to send optional diagnostic data about how you use Microsoft Edge and information about your browser activity, including browsing history and search terms to Microsoft to help us improve Microsoft Edge and other Microsoft products and services. For Microsoft Edge on Windows 10 and later, this information is provided when you have enabled optional diagnostic data. For details, see the Windows Diagnostics section of the privacy statement. For Microsoft Edge on other operating systems, optional diagnostic information is provided when you enable
Improve Microsoft products by sending data about how you use the browser
or
Make searches and Microsoft products better by sending info about websites you visit in Microsoft Edge
in the browser settings.
The diagnostic data collected by Microsoft Edge is transmitted to Microsoft and is stored with one or more unique identifiers that help us recognise an individual browser installation on a device and understand the browser’s service issues and use patterns.
Learn more about Microsoft Edge, browsing data, and privacy
.
Microsoft Edge on iOS and Android
. Microsoft Edge on iOS and Android devices collects data necessary to provide features you request in Microsoft Edge. Microsoft also collects required diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Microsoft Edge up to date, secure, and operating properly. Required diagnostic data also helps us improve Microsoft Edge.
Additionally, you may share optional diagnostic data about how you use Microsoft Edge and information about websites you visit (browsing history) for personalised experiences on your browser, Windows, and other Microsoft products and services. This information also helps us improve Microsoft Edge and other Microsoft products and services. This optional diagnostic data is sent to us when you enable
Share usage data for personalisation
or
Share info about websites that you visit
in the browser settings.
The diagnostic data collected by Microsoft Edge is transmitted to Microsoft and is stored with one or more unique identifiers that help us recognise an individual user on a device and understand the browser’s service issues and use patterns.
Microsoft Edge uses data from your search activity across the web, including search activity on websites Microsoft does not own or operate, to improve Microsoft services like Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing, and Microsoft News. The data Microsoft Edge collects may include personal data; however, Microsoft Edge takes steps to scrub and de-identify the data. Microsoft Edge does not use this data to personalise or provide ads for you. You can turn off the collection of this data at any time in the browser settings.
Learn more about Search results data for product improvement
.
For information about the privacy practices of legacy versions Microsoft Edge (versions 44 and below), see the Web browsers – Microsoft Edge Legacy and Internet Explorer section of the privacy statement.
Back to top
Microsoft Translator
Microsoft Translator is a machine translation system and service designed to automatically translate text and voice input between numerous supported languages. Microsoft Translator is made available as a stand-alone consumer app for Android, iOS, and Windows and its service capabilities are also integrated in a variety of Microsoft products and services, such as Translator Hub, Translator for Bing, and Translator for Microsoft Edge. Microsoft Translator processes the text, image, and voice data you submit, as well as device and usage data. We use this data to provide Microsoft Translator, personalise your experiences, and improve our products and services. Microsoft has implemented business and technical measures designed to help de-identify the data you submit to Microsoft Translator. For example, when we randomly sample text and audio to improve Microsoft Translator and Microsoft’s speech recognition technologies, we delete identifiers and certain text, such as email addresses and some number sequences, detected in the sample that could contain personal data. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
.
Separate from Microsoft Translator, Microsoft translation services are available as features in other Microsoft products and services that have different privacy practices than Microsoft Translator. For more information on the Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services Translator Text API, Customised Translator and Translator Speech API, see the
Enterprise and developer products
section of this privacy statement. For the Translate feature in Microsoft 365 apps and Skype, see the
Productivity and communications products
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
SwiftKey
The Microsoft SwiftKey keyboard and related cloud-based services (collectively, the “SwiftKey Services”) process data about words you use and how you type and use this data to learn your writing style and provide personalised auto-correction and predictive text that adapts to you. We also use this data to offer a range of other features, such as emoji predictions.
SwiftKey prediction technology learns from the way you use language to build a personalised language model. This model is an optimised view of the words and phrases that you use most often in context and reflects your unique writing style. The model itself contains the words you commonly type arranged in a way that enables SwiftKey’s algorithms to make predictions, based on text you have already entered. The model draws from all scenarios in which you use your keyboard, including when you type while using apps or visiting websites. The SwiftKey keyboard and model attempt to avoid collecting sensitive data, by not collecting data from certain fields such as those recognised as containing password or payment data. SwiftKey Services do not log or store, the data contained in your model, unless you choose to share your data with us (as described further below). When you use SwiftKey Services, we also collect device and usage data. When you sign in to your SwiftKey account and agree to share the following data, we will use de-identified device data, usage data and model data to analyse service performance and help improve our products.
The SwiftKey Services also include an optional cloud component called a SwiftKey Account. If you choose to create a SwiftKey Account, your language model will be synchronised with the SwiftKey Account cloud service, so you can benefit from that model on the different devices you use and access additional services such as prediction synchronisation and back up. When you create a SwiftKey Account, Microsoft will also collect your email address and basic demographic data. All data collected is transferred to our servers over encrypted channels. If you are signed in to your SwiftKey account, you can control your personal data and SwiftKey account preferences at
data.swiftkey.com
.
As part of your SwiftKey account, you may also opt in to share your language and/or typing data for the purposes of improving Microsoft products and services. If you opt-in, SwiftKey may send short snippets of data about what and how you type and related correction data to our servers for processing. These text snippets are used in various automated processes to validate that our prediction services are working correctly and to make product improvements. To preserve your privacy, SwiftKey Services de-identify these text snippets, and even if you have a SwiftKey Account, these text snippets will not be linked to it.
If you sign into your SwiftKey Account and opt-in to share your language and typing data, Microsoft will process your shared data to look for new patterns of language usage across our user base. This allows us to improve our basic models for individual languages. Language and typing data used in this process is aggregated and any words or combinations of words that might be personal to individuals or small groups of users are filtered out.
You can withdraw your consent to share your language and typing data for product improvement at any time in SwiftKey Settings. You can also withdraw your consent for SwiftKey Services to retain your personal data in SwiftKey Settings. When you withdraw consent for SwiftKey to retain your personal data, all personal data collected through your use of the SwiftKey Services will be deleted.
You may receive occasional notifications on your device alerting you to product updates and features that may be of interest to you. You can disable these notifications at any time in the SwiftKey Settings.
When you use the camera feature in SwiftKey, you can choose to enhance your video and images with third party lens services. Lens is a feature that uses Augmented Reality (AR) to transform your selfies in a fun way, such as making you look like your favorite animal. Using the camera in SwiftKey keyboard, you can select the lens feature that is incorporated in the keyboard to transform your face and hands. Depending on which lens you choose, your video and images may be processed to extract information about the location of different areas on your face and hands. The extracted data is used for the sole purpose of applying AR effects to your face and hands. None of this data is used to personally identify you. This data is processed for the duration of the session on your device only, and then deleted immediately. This data is not sent to SwiftKey or any third party.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Windows
Windows is a personalised computing environment that enables you to seamlessly roam and access services, preferences and content across your computing devices from phones to tablets to the Surface Hub. Rather than residing as a static software programme on your device, key components of Windows are cloud-based, and both cloud and local elements of Windows are updated regularly, providing you with the latest improvements and features. In order to provide this computing experience, we collect data about you, your device, and the way you use Windows. And because Windows is personal to you, we give you choices about the personal data we collect and how we use it. Note that if your Windows device is managed by your organisation (such as your employer or school), your organisation may use centralised management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data and to control device settings (including privacy settings), device policies, software updates, data collection by us or the organisation or other aspects of your device. Additionally, your organisation may use management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data from that device, including your interaction data, diagnostic data and the contents of your communications and files.
The Windows Settings
, formerly known as PC Settings, is an essential component of Microsoft Windows. It provides a convenient interface for adjusting user preferences, configuring the operating system and managing connected devices so that you can manage user accounts, adjust network settings and personalise various aspects of Windows. Windows provides a mechanism for apps to access various device capabilities such as the device’s camera, microphone, location, calendar, contacts, call history, messages and more, while controlling access to your personal data. Each capability has its own privacy settings page in Windows settings, so you can control which apps can use each capability. Here are some key features of Settings:
Customisation: You can personalise various aspects of Windows, including the look and feel, language settings and privacy options. Windows settings uses your microphone when controlling the volume, camera when using integrated camera and location to change brightness at night time to help you customise your Windows.
Peripheral Management: Install and manage peripherals such as printers, monitors, and external drives.
Network Configuration: Adjust networking settings, including WiFi, Ethernet, mobile and VPN connections and will use physical MAC address, IMEI and mobile number if device supports mobile.
Account Management: Add or remove user accounts, change account settings, and manage sign-in options.
System-Level Options: Configure display settings, notifications, power options, manage list of installed apps and more.
Privacy & security management: configure your privacy preferences such as location, collection of diagnostic data etc. Fine-tune which individual apps and services can access device capabilities by turning them on or off.
For more information about data collection in Windows, see
Data collection summary for Windows
. This statement discusses Windows 10 and Windows 11 and references to Windows in this section relate to those product versions. Earlier versions of Windows (including Windows Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, and Windows 8.1) are subject to their own privacy statements.
Windows is a personalised computing environment that enables you to seamlessly roam and access services, preferences and content across your computing devices from phones to tablets to the Surface Hub. Rather than residing as a static software programme on your device, key components of Windows are cloud-based, and both cloud and local elements of Windows are updated regularly, providing you with the latest improvements and features. In order to provide this computing experience, we collect data about you, your device, and the way you use Windows. And because Windows is personal to you, we give you choices about the personal data we collect and how we use it. Note that if your Windows device is managed by your organisation (such as your employer or school), your organisation may use centralised management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data and to control device settings (including privacy settings), device policies, software updates, data collection by us or the organisation or other aspects of your device. Additionally, your organisation may use management tools provided by Microsoft or others to access and process your data from that device, including your interaction data, diagnostic data and the contents of your communications and files.
The Windows Settings
, formerly known as PC Settings, is an essential component of Microsoft Windows. It provides a convenient interface for adjusting user preferences, configuring the operating system and managing connected devices so that you can manage user accounts, adjust network settings and personalise various aspects of Windows. Windows provides a mechanism for apps to access various device capabilities such as the device’s camera, microphone, location, calendar, contacts, call history, messages and more, while controlling access to your personal data. Each capability has its own privacy settings page in Windows settings, so you can control which apps can use each capability. Here are some key features of Settings:
Customisation: You can personalise various aspects of Windows, including the look and feel, language settings and privacy options. Windows settings uses your microphone when controlling the volume, camera when using integrated camera and location to change brightness at night time to help you customise your Windows.
Peripheral Management: Install and manage peripherals such as printers, monitors, and external drives.
Network Configuration: Adjust networking settings, including WiFi, Ethernet, mobile and VPN connections and will use physical MAC address, IMEI and mobile number if device supports mobile.
Account Management: Add or remove user accounts, change account settings, and manage sign-in options.
System-Level Options: Configure display settings, notifications, power options, manage list of installed apps and more.
Privacy & security management: configure your privacy preferences such as location, collection of diagnostic data etc. Fine-tune which individual apps and services can access device capabilities by turning them on or off.
For more information about data collection in Windows, see
Data collection summary for Windows
. This statement discusses Windows 10 and Windows 11 and references to Windows in this section relate to those product versions. Earlier versions of Windows (including Windows Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, and Windows 8.1) are subject to their own privacy statements.
Activation
When you activate Windows, a specific product key is associated with the device on which your software is installed. The product key and data about the software and your device is sent to Microsoft to help validate your licence to the software. This data may be sent again if there is a need to re-activate or validate your licence. On phones running Windows, device and network identifiers, as well as device location at the time of the first power-up of the device, are also sent to Microsoft for the purpose of warranty registration, stock replenishment, and fraud prevention.
Back to top
Activity history
Activity history helps keep track of the things you do on your device, such as the apps and services you use, the files you open, and the websites you browse. Your activity history is created when using different apps and features such as Microsoft Edge Legacy, some Microsoft Store apps, and Microsoft 365 apps and is stored locally on your device.
You can turn settings off or on for storing activity history locally on your device, and you can also clear your device’s activity history at any time by going to
Privacy > Activity history
in the Windows settings app.
Learn more about activity history in Windows
.
Back to top
Advertising ID
Windows generates a unique advertising ID for each person using a device, which app developers and advertising networks can then use for their own purposes, including providing relevant advertising in apps. When the advertising ID is enabled, both Microsoft apps and third-party apps can access and use the advertising ID in much the same way that websites can access and use a unique identifier stored in a cookie. Thus, your advertising ID can be used by app developers and advertising networks to provide more relevant advertising and other personalised experiences across their apps and on the web. Microsoft collects the advertising ID for the uses described here only when you choose to enable the advertising ID as part of your privacy setting.
The advertising ID setting applies to Windows apps using the Windows advertising identifier. You can turn off access to this identifier at any time by turning off the advertising ID in the Windows settings app. If you choose to turn it on again, the advertising ID will be reset and a new identifier will be generated. When a third-party app accesses the advertising ID, its use of the advertising ID will be subject to its own privacy policy.
Learn more about advertising ID in Windows
.
The advertising ID setting does not apply to other methods of interest-based advertising delivered by Microsoft or third parties, such as cookies used to provide interest-based display ads on websites. Third-party products accessed through or installed on Windows may also deliver other forms of interest-based advertising subject to their own privacy policies. Microsoft delivers other forms of interest-based ads in certain Microsoft products, both directly and by partnering with third-party ad providers. For more information on how Microsoft uses data for advertising, see the
How we use personal data
section of this statement.
Back to top
Diagnostics
Microsoft collects Windows diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Windows up to date, secure, and operating properly. It also helps us improve Windows and related Microsoft products and services. While the device is running, diagnostic data is collected and periodically transmitted to Microsoft and stored along with one or more unique identifiers that can help us recognise an individual user on an individual device and understand the device’s service issues and use patterns.
There are two levels of diagnostic and activity data: Required diagnostic data and Optional diagnostic data. Certain product documentation and other materials refer to Required diagnostic data as Basic diagnostic data and to Optional diagnostic data as Full diagnostic data.
If an organisation (such as your employer or school) uses Microsoft Entra ID to manage the account it provides to you and enrols your device in the Windows diagnostic data processor configuration, Microsoft’s processing of diagnostic data in connection with Windows is governed by a contract between Microsoft and the organisation. If an organisation uses Microsoft management tools or engages Microsoft to manage your device, Microsoft and the organisation will use and process diagnostic and error data from your device to allow the management, monitoring and troubleshooting of your devices managed by the organisation, and for other purposes of the organisation.
Required diagnostic data
includes information about your device, its settings and capabilities, and whether it is performing properly. We collect the following Required diagnostic data:
Device, connectivity, and configuration data:
Data about the device such as the processor type, OEM manufacturer, type of battery and capacity, number and type of cameras, firmware, and memory attributes.
Network capabilities and connection data such as the device’s IP address, mobile network (including IMEI and mobile operator), and whether the device is connected to a free or paid network.
Data about the operating system and its configuration such as the OS version and build number, region and language settings, diagnostics data settings, and whether the device is part of the Windows Insider Programme.
Data about connected peripherals such as model, manufacturer, drivers, and compatibility data.
Data about the applications installed on the device such as application name, version, and publisher.
Whether a device is ready for an update and whether there are factors that may impede the ability to receive updates, such as low battery, limited disk space, or connectivity through a paid network.
Whether updates complete successfully or fail.
Data about the reliability of the diagnostics collection system itself.
Basic error reporting, which is health data about the operating system and applications running on your device. For example, basic error reporting tells us if an application, such as Microsoft Paint or a third-party game, hangs or crashes.
Optional diagnostic data
includes more detailed information about your device and its settings, capabilities, and device health. Optional diagnostic data may also include data about the websites you browse, device activity (also sometimes referred to as usage), and enhanced error reporting that helps Microsoft to fix and improve products and services for all users. When you choose to send Optional diagnostic data, Required diagnostic data will always be included, and we collect the following additional information:
Additional data about the device, connectivity, and configuration, beyond that collected under Required diagnostic data.
Status and logging information about the health of operating system and other system components beyond that collected about the update and diagnostics systems under Required diagnostic data.
App activity, such as which programmes are launched on a device, how long they run and how quickly they respond to input.
Browser activity, including browsing history and search terms, in Microsoft browsers (Microsoft Edge or Internet Explorer).
Enhanced error reporting, including the memory state of the device when a system or app crash occurs (which may unintentionally contain user content, such as parts of a file you were using when the problem occurred).
Some of the data described above may not be collected from your device even if you choose to send Optional diagnostic data. Microsoft minimises the volume of Optional diagnostic data it collects from all devices by collecting some of the data from only a subset of devices (sample). By running the Diagnostic Data Viewer tool, you can see an icon which indicates whether your device is part of a sample and also which specific data is collected from your device. Instructions for how to download the Diagnostic Data Viewer tool can be found in the Windows settings app under Diagnostics & feedback.
Specific data items collected in Windows diagnostics are subject to change to give Microsoft flexibility to collect the data needed for the purposes described. For example, to enable Microsoft to troubleshoot the latest performance issue impacting users’ computing experience or update a Windows device that is new to the market, Microsoft may need to collect data items that were not collected previously. For a current list of data types collected at
Required diagnostic data
and
Optional diagnostic data
, see
Windows Required (Basic level) diagnostic events and fields
or
Windows Optional (Full level) diagnostic data
. We provide limited portions of error report information to partners (such as the device manufacturer) to help them troubleshoot products and services which work with Windows and other Microsoft product and services. They are only permitted to use this information to repair or improve those products and services. We may also share some aggregated, de-identified diagnostic data, such as general usage trends for Windows apps and features, with selected third parties.
Learn more about diagnostic data in Windows
.
Inking and typing Recognition
. You also can choose to help Microsoft improve inking and typing recognition by sending inking and typing diagnostic data. If you choose to do so, Microsoft will collect samples of the content you type or write to improve features such as handwriting recognition, autocompletion, next word prediction, and spelling correction in the many languages used by Microsoft customers. When Microsoft collects inking and typing diagnostic data, it is divided into small samples and processed to remove unique identifiers, sequencing information, and other data (such as email addresses and numeric values) which could be used to reconstruct the original content or associate the input to you. It also includes associated performance data, such as changes you manually make to text, as well as words you've added to the dictionary.
Learn more about improving inking and typing in Windows
.
Back to top
Personalised offers
If you choose to turn on
Personalised offers
, we will use information about your device and how you use it, including Windows diagnostic data, in combination with your account info and data collected by other Microsoft products and services to offer you personalised tips, ads and recommendations to enhance your Windows experiences. Personalised offers include suggestions on how to customise and optimise Windows, as well as ads and recommendations for Microsoft and third-party products and services, features, apps and hardware to enhance your Windows experiences. For example, Windows might tell you about new features to help you get the most out of your device. If you stream movies in your browser, Windows might recommend an app from the Microsoft Store that streams more efficiently. Or, if you are running out of space on your hard drive, Windows might recommend you try OneDrive or purchase hardware to add more storage.
When Personalised offers is on, Windows may use your required diagnostic data to personalise offers. This data may include information about your device, its settings and capabilities, and whether it is performing properly. If you have decided to share optional diagnostic data, the data used to personalise offers may also include information about how you use apps and features, plus additional information about the health of your device. We may also use information about your device and your activity to personalise offers locally on your device, even when the data does not leave your device. We do not use the content of crash dumps, speech, typing or inking input data for personalising offers.
In addition to information about your device and how you use it, including Windows diagnostic data, we may use or combine the following data from other Microsoft products and your account with Windows diagnostic data to personalise offers:
Web activity, if you give Microsoft Edge permission to collect your web activity for personalised search, ads and news.
Info about your use of other Microsoft products and services, including Microsoft Bing, Microsoft 365, Xbox, and Microsoft websites, such as MSN.com.
Subscription and purchase history.
Data from third-party websites which may be shared with Microsoft.
We may also use information about your interactions with tips, recommendations and promotions to provide and improve the personalised offers and similar messages in other Microsoft products.
To manage how data collected by other Microsoft products is used to personalise offers, you can visit your
Personalised ads and offers page
. The data we use to personalise offers may change over time, but this page will always have the latest list of data sources so you can make decisions on how your data is used by Microsoft. In some regions such as the European Economic Area, turning off Personalised offers on Windows also stops the use of data from other Microsoft products to personalise tips, ads and recommendations in Windows. In other regions, you can manage how data collected by other Microsoft products is used to personalise offers by visiting your
Personalised ads and offers page
.
Contextual data from your device and some basic account data are used to show you appropriate messaging in Windows regardless of whether the Personalised offers setting or the use of data from other Microsoft products to personalise offers are turned off. For example, this data is used to make sure content is in the correct language and appropriate for your age group.
Personalised offers applies to tips, offers, ads and recommendations you see in Windows. Changing this setting will not impact the kinds of offers you may see in other Microsoft products. You can change this setting at any time by searching for
Personalised offers
in the Windows Settings app.
Learn more about personalised offers
.
Tailored experiences
Tailored experiences is being replaced by Personalised offers in more recent versions of Windows. If you have not installed the latest Windows Update, you may still see Tailored experiences on your device.
If you choose to turn on Tailored experiences, we will use your Windows diagnostic data (Required or Optional as you have selected) to offer you personalised tips, ads and recommendations to enhance Microsoft experiences. If you have selected Required as your diagnostic data setting, personalisation is based on information about your device, its settings and capabilities and whether it is performing properly. If you have selected Optional, personalisation is also based on information about how you use apps and features, plus additional information about the health of your device. However, we do not use information about the websites you browse, the content of crash dumps, speech, typing or inking input data for personalisation when we receive such data from customers who have selected Optional. Tailored experiences data is transmitted to Microsoft and stored with one or more unique identifiers that can help us recognise an individual user on an individual device and understand the device’s service issues and use patterns.
Tailored experiences include suggestions on how to customise and optimise Windows, as well as ads and recommendations for Microsoft and third-party products and services, features, apps and hardware for your Windows experiences. For example, to help you get the most out of your device, we may tell you about features you may not know about or that are new. If you are having a problem with your Windows device, you may be offered a solution. You may be offered a chance to customise your lock screen with pictures, or to be shown more pictures of the kind you like, or fewer of the ones you do not. If you stream movies in your browser, you may be recommended an app from the Microsoft store that streams more efficiently. Or, if you are running out of space on your hard drive, Windows may recommend you try OneDrive or purchase hardware to gain more space.
Learn more about tailored experiences in Windows
.
Back to top
Feedback Hub
Feedback Hub provides a way to gather feedback on Microsoft products and installed first-party and third-party apps. When you use Feedback Hub, Feedback Hub periodically reads the installed app list to determine apps for which feedback can be sent. Feedback Hub determines the apps installed in your device through public APIs. Additionally, for HoloLens, Feedback Hub uses your camera and microphone when you choose to share surroundings and audio input. It also uses picture and document library to access screenshots and screen recordings that you attach for sending as part of feedback.
You can sign-in to Feedback Hub using either your personal Microsoft account or an account provided by your organisation (such as your employer or school) that you use to sign in to Microsoft products. Signing in with your work or school account allows you to submit feedback to Microsoft in association with your organisation. Any feedback you provide whether using your work or school account or personal Microsoft account may be publicly viewable depending on the settings configured by your organisation’s administrators. Additionally, if feedback is provided using your work or school account, your feedback can be viewed through the Feedback Hub or via admin centre by your organisation’s administrators.
When you submit feedback to Microsoft about a problem or add more details to a problem, diagnostic data will be sent to Microsoft to improve Microsoft products and services. Depending on your Diagnostic data settings in the
Diagnostics & feedback
section of the Windows settings, Feedback Hub will either send diagnostic data automatically or you will have the option to send it to Microsoft at the time you provide feedback. Based on the category chosen when submitting feedback, there may be additional personal data collected that helps to further troubleshoot issues; for example, location related information when submitting feedback about location services or gaze related information when submitting feedback on Mixed Reality. Microsoft may also share your feedback along with the data collected when you submit your feedback with Microsoft partners (such as a device manufacturer, or firmware developer) to help them troubleshoot products and services that work with Windows and other Microsoft products and services.
Learn more about diagnostic data in Windows
.
Back to top
Get Help
Get Help enables Windows users to get technical support on Windows and other Microsoft applications.  It provides self-service support (such as links to help articles or directions on how Windows users can solve problems on their own), Diagnostics, and connecting the customer to a live Microsoft agent as appropriate. You can sign into the Get Help component with your Microsoft account to create a consumer support case. Enterprise account users may also be permitted to create a customer support case depending on their organisation’s support contract, and if enabled by their tenant administrator.
Get Help may suggest you run a Diagnostic. If you consent, diagnostic data is handled in accordance with the
Diagnostics
section.
If permitted by system settings, the system microphone may be used to capture the support question instead of your needing to type. You can control this in the “Microphone Privacy Settings” in the Windows Settings application. Get Help will also access your Application List to aid in opening the Feedback Hub to the correct app if you choose to start the feedback process within Get Help. All feedback will be entered and controlled by the Feedback Hub, as described in the Feedback Hub section of this Privacy Statement. Get Help does not use your location data as part of its services.
Back to top
Live captions
Live captions transcribe audio to help with the comprehension of spoken content. Live captions can generate captions from any audio containing speech, whether the audio is online, audio you have downloaded to your device, or audio received from your microphone. By default, transcribing microphone audio is disabled.
Voice data that is captioned is only processed on your device and is not shared to the cloud or with Microsoft.
Learn more about live captions
.
Back to top
Location services and recording
Windows location service
. Microsoft operates a location service that helps determine the precise geographic location of a specific Windows device. Depending on the capabilities of the device, the device’s location can be determined with varying degrees of accuracy and may in some cases be determined precisely. When you have enabled location on a Windows device, or you have given permission for Microsoft apps to access location information on non-Windows devices, data about cell towers and Wi-Fi access points and their locations is collected by Microsoft and added to the location database after removing any data identifying the person or device from which it was collected. This de-identified location information is used to improve Microsoft's location services.
Windows services and features, apps running on Windows, and websites opened in Windows browsers can access the device’s location through Windows if your settings allow them to do so. Some features and apps request location permission when you first install Windows, some ask the first time you use the app, and others ask every time you access the device’s location. For information about certain Windows apps that use the device’s location, see the
Windows apps
section of this privacy statement.
When an app or feature accesses the device’s location and you are signed in with a Microsoft account, your Windows device will also upload its location to the cloud where it is available across your devices to other apps or services that use your Microsoft account and for which you’ve granted permission. We will retain only the last known location (each new location replaces the previous one). Data about a Windows device's recent location history is also stored on the device even if not using a Microsoft account, and certain apps and Windows features can access this location history. You can clear your device's location history at any time in the Windows settings app.
In the Windows settings app, you can also view which apps have access to the device’s precise location or your device's location history, turn off or on access to the device’s location for particular apps, or turn off access to the device’s location. You can also set a default location, which will be used when the location service can’t detect a more exact location for your device.
There are some exceptions to how your device’s location can be determined that are not directly managed by the location settings.
Desktop apps are a specific type of app that won’t ask for separate permission to discover your device location information and won’t appear in the list that allows you to choose apps that can use your location. They can be downloaded from the Microsoft Store, downloaded from the internet, or installed with some type of media (such as a CD, DVD, or USB storage device). They’re opened using an .EXE, .MSI, or .DLL file, and they typically run on your device, unlike web-based apps (which run in the cloud).
Learn more about third-party desktop apps and how they may still be able to determine your device’s location when the device’s location setting is off
.
Some web-based experiences or third-party apps that surface on Windows could use other technologies (such as Bluetooth, WiFi or mobile modem) or cloud-based location services to determine your device’s location with varying degrees of accuracy, even when you’ve turned off the device location setting.
In addition, to facilitate getting help in an emergency, whenever you make an emergency call, Windows will attempt to determine and share your precise location, regardless of your location settings. If your device has a SIM card or is otherwise using mobile service, your mobile operator will have access to your device’s location.
Learn more about location in Windows
.
General Location
. If you turn on Location services, apps that cannot use your precise location may still have access to your general location, such as your city, postcode or region.
Find my device
. The Find my device feature allows an administrator of a Windows device to find the location of that device from account.microsoft.com/devices. To enable Find my device, an administrator needs to be signed in with a Microsoft account and have the location setting enabled. This feature will work even if other users have denied access to location for all their apps. When the administrator attempts to locate the device, users will see a notification in the notification area.
Learn more about Find my device in Windows
.
Recording
. Some Windows devices have a recording feature that allows you to capture audio and video clips of your activity on the device, including your communications with others. If you choose to record a session, the recording will be saved locally on your device. In some cases, you may have the option to transmit the recording to a Microsoft product or service that broadcasts the recording publicly.
Important: You should understand your legal responsibilities before recording and/or transmitting any communication. This may include obtaining the prior consent of everyone participating in the conversation or any other authorisations as required.
Microsoft is not responsible for how you use recording features or your recordings.
Back to top
Narrator
Narrator is a built-in screen reader tool that helps you use Windows without a screen. Narrator offers intelligent image and page title description and web page summaries when you encounter undescribed images and ambiguous links.
When you choose to get an image description by pressing Narrator + Ctrl + D, the image will be sent to Microsoft to perform analysis of the image and generate a description. Images are used only to generate the description and are not stored by Microsoft.
When you choose to get page title descriptions by pressing Narrator + Ctrl + D, the URL of the site you are visiting will be sent to Microsoft to generate the page title description and to provide and improve Microsoft services, such as Bing services as described in the Bing section above.
When you choose to get a list of popular links for a web page by pressing Narrator + double press of S, the URL of the site you are visiting will be sent to Microsoft to generate the summary of popular links and to provide and improve Microsoft services, such as Bing.
You can disable these features at any time by going to
Narrator>Get image descriptions, page titles and popular links
in Settings in Windows.
You can also send feedback about Narrator to help Microsoft diagnose and resolve problems with Narrator and improve Microsoft products and services, such as Windows. Verbal feedback can be submitted at any time in Narrator by using Narrator Key + Alt + F. When you use this command, the Feedback Hub app will launch, giving you the opportunity to submit verbal feedback. If you enable the setting “Help Make Narrator Better” in the Windows settings app and submit verbal feedback through Feedback Hub, recent device and usage data, including event trace log (ETL) data, will be submitted along with your verbal feedback to improve Microsoft products and services, such as Windows.
Back to top
Phone Link - Link to Windows
The Phone Link feature lets you link your Android phone with your Microsoft Account and your iPhone via Bluetooth to connect to your Windows PC. Your Android device will link with your Microsoft Account and your iPhone will link via Bluetooth, enabling a variety of cross-device experiences across all your Windows devices where you are signed in or connected via Bluetooth. You can use Phone Link to see recent photos from your Android phone on your Windows device; make and receive live calls from your Android phone on your Windows device; view and send text messages from your Windows device; view, dismiss, or perform other actions to your Android phone notifications from your Windows device; share your phone screen on your Windows device through Phone Link’s mirroring function; and instantly access Android apps installed on your Android phone on your Windows device. You can use Phone Link to make and receive calls from your iPhone, view and send text messages, and view, dismiss, or perform other actions on your iPhone notification from your Windows device.
To use Phone Link, Link to Windows must be installed on your Android device. You may also optionally download Phone Link to your iPhone.
To use Phone Link, you must log into your Microsoft account on the Phone Link feature on your Windows device and on Link to Windows on your Android phone or Bluetooth enabled on your iPhone. Your Android phone and your Windows device must be connected to the internet. Some features will require you to enable Bluetooth and pair your phone with your PC. To use the Calls feature, your Android phone must also have Bluetooth enabled.
During setting up your Windows device, you can choose to link your phone with your Microsoft account. This is done by signing into Link to Windows on your Android phone, granting permissions and completing the onboarding experience. Once complete, Link to Windows will sync your data to all your Windows PCs where you have signed into your Microsoft account. See below for details on how your data is used.
As part of providing Phone Link’s features to you, Microsoft collects performance, usage and device data that includes, for example, the hardware capabilities of your device and Windows device, the number and duration of your sessions on Phone Link, and the amount of time you spent during setup.
You can unlink your Android phone from your Windows device at any time by going into your Phone Link settings and choosing to remove your Android phone. You can do the same from the settings in Link to Windows on your Android phone. For detailed information, see
our support page
.
You can unlink your iPhone from your Windows device at any time by going into Phone Link settings and choosing to remove your iPhone. You can do the same from your iPhone by going into
Settings > Bluetooth > Selecting your PC name > click on the (i) icon >
and choosing
Forget This Device
. All users can remove the Bluetooth pairing by disabling the experiences.
Text Messages – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to view text messages delivered to your Android phone on your Windows device and send text messages from your Windows device. Only text messages received and sent within the last 30 days are visible on your Windows device. These text messages are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We never store your text messages on our servers or change or delete any text messages on your Android phone. You can see messages sent via SMS (Short Message Service), MMS (Multimedia Messaging Service) on Android devices, and messages sent via RCS (Rich Communication Services) on select Samsung devices on select mobile operator networks. To provide this functionality, Phone Link accesses the content of your text messages and the contact information of the individuals or businesses from whom you are receiving or sending text messages.
Text Messages – iPhones.
Phone Link allows you to view text messages delivered to your iPhone on your Windows devices and send text messages from your Windows device. Only text messages received and sent within your Bluetooth session or iMessage are visible on your Windows devices. These text messages are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We never store your text messages on our servers or change or delete any text messages on your iPhone. You can see messages sent via SMS (Short Message Service). To provide this functionality, Phone Link accesses the content of your text messages and the contact information of the individuals or businesses from whom you are receiving or sending text messages.
Calls – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to make and receive calls from your Android phone on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can also view your recent calls on your Windows device. To activate this feature, you must enable certain permissions on both your Windows device and Android phone, such as call logs access and permission to make phone calls from your PC. These permissions can be revoked at any time under the Phone Link Settings page on your Windows device and your Android phone's settings. Only calls received and dialled within the last 30 days are visible under call logs on your Windows device. These call details are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We do not change or delete your call history on your Android phone.
Calls – iPhones.
Phone Link allows you to make and receive calls from your iPhone on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can also view your recent calls on your Windows device. To activate this feature, you must enable Sync Contacts feature under Bluetooth settings on your iPhone. These call details are temporarily stored on your Windows device. We do not change or delete your call history on your iPhone.
Photos – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to copy, share, edit, save, or delete photos from your Android phone on your Windows device. Only a limited number of your most recent photos from the Camera Roll and Screenshots folders on your Android phone will be visible on your Windows device at any given time. These photos are temporarily stored on your Windows device and as you take more photos on your Android phone, we remove the temporary copies of the older photos from your Windows device. We never store your photos on our servers or change or delete any photos on your Android phone.
Notifications – Android devices.
Phone Link allows you to view your Android phone’s notifications on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can read and dismiss your Android phone’s notifications from your Windows device or perform other actions related to the notifications. To activate this Phone Link feature, you must enable certain permissions, such as sync notifications, on both your Windows device and Android phone. These permissions can be revoked at any time under the Phone Link Settings page on your Windows device and your Android phone’s settings. For detailed information, see
our support page
.
Notifications – iPhones.
Phone Link allows you to view your iPhone’s notifications on your Windows device. Through Phone Link, you can read and dismiss your iPhone’s notifications from your Windows device or perform other actions related to the notifications. To activate this Phone Link feature, you must enable certain permissions such as sync notifications, on both your Windows device and iPhone. These permissions can be revoked at any time under the Phone Link Settings page on your Windows device and your iPhone’s Bluetooth settings.
Phone Screen Mirroring – Android devices.
On supported devices
, Phone Link allows you to view your Android phone’s screen on your Windows device. Your Android phone screen will be visible on your Windows device as a pixel stream and any audio that you enable on your Android phone screen while it is linked to your Windows device through Phone Link will play through your Android phone.
Apps mirroring – Android devices.
On supported devices, Phone Link allows you to use your Android apps that are installed on your Android phone on your Windows device. For example, you can launch a music app in your Windows session and listen to audio from that app on your PC speakers. Microsoft collects a list of your installed Android apps and recent activity to provide the service and show you your most recently used apps. Microsoft does not store what apps you have installed or any of the information displayed by the app in your experience with it.
Content transfer – Android devices.
On supported devices, Phone Link allows you to copy and paste contents such as files, documents, photos, etc. between your Android phone and your Windows device. You can transfer content from your Android phone to your Windows device and from your Windows device to your Android phone by drag and drop contents between the devices.
Instant Hotspot – Android devices.
On supported devices, Link to Windows enables users to share mobile hotspot information with their paired PC over secure Bluetooth communication. Your PC can then be connected to the internet through the Windows network flyout. Please note mobile data charges may apply depending on the mobile data plan you have.
Contacts sync – Android devices.
Link to Windows allows you to sync your Android contacts into the Microsoft cloud to access them in other Microsoft products and services. You can enable this feature by going into Link to Windows settings and enabling “Contacts sync” feature. Your contacts information is stored online and associated with your Microsoft account. You may choose to disable sync and delete these contacts at any time.
Learn more
.
Contacts sync – iPhone.
Phone Link allows you to sync your contacts from your iPhone to access them for messaging and calling. You can enable this feature by going into Bluetooth settings on your iPhone and toggle on Sync Contacts under your PC name after connecting your iPhone to Phone Link. You may choose to disable syncing at any time by toggling off Sync Contacts.
Text-to-voice.
Phone Link features include accessibility functionality such as text-to-voice. You can activate a text-to-voice feature, which allows you to hear the contents of a text message or notification as audio. If you activate this feature, your text messages and notifications will be read out loud as they are received.
Office Enterprise – Android Devices.
Link to Windows allows you to insert photos into web and desktop versions of select Microsoft 365 apps, such as PowerPoint, Excel and Word directly from your device. This requires your IT Administrator to have enabled Optional Connected Experiences for Microsoft Office applications and you will need to associate your mobile device with your work or school account and provide Photos permission to your account. After onboarding, your session will last 15 minutes to enable you to transfer your Photos from your mobile device. To use this feature again, you will need to scan your QR code. Link to Windows does not collect your work or school account information or information about your Enterprise. In order to provide this service, Microsoft uses a cloud service to relay your files for the purpose of inserting the photos into web and desktop version of select Microsoft 365 apps, such as PowerPoint, Excel, and Word files.
Back to top
Cross-device experiences
Cross-device experiences in Windows allow you to access your mobile device from your PC using your Microsoft Account. These can be managed under “Mobile Devices” in the Bluetooth & Devices section in your Windows PC Settings. As part of providing these features, Microsoft collects performance usage and device data, including information about the hardware capabilities of your mobile and Windows devices. You can turn this feature on or off at any time in your Windows PC Settings.
Use your mobile device as a connected camera.
This feature allows you to use your mobile device’s camera in apps or products on Windows that support camera functionality. You can enable this feature under “Mobile Devices” in the Bluetooth & Devices section in the Settings on your PC. Microsoft does not record or store your camera sessions or any of the information displayed by your camera in any of the applications or products.
Get new photo notifications from your mobile device.
This feature allows you to receive notifications from your linked mobile device on your Windows PC. These photos are temporarily stored on your Windows PC while you are editing or opening those photos. You will need to initiate saving to your PC to store those photos until you decide to delete them. We never store your photos on our servers or change or delete any photos on your mobile device.
Show your mobile device in File Explorer
. This feature allows you to access your mobile device’s files in File Explorer. You can enable this feature under “Mobile Devices” in the Bluetooth & Devices section in the Settings on your PC. Microsoft will not store your file contents in its services.
Back to top
Security and safety features
Device encryption
. Device encryption helps protect the data stored on your device by encrypting it using BitLocker Drive Encryption technology. When device encryption is on, Windows automatically encrypts the drive Windows is installed on and generates a recovery key. The BitLocker recovery key for your personal device is automatically backed up online in your personal Microsoft OneDrive account. Microsoft doesn't use your individual recovery keys for any purpose.
Malicious Software Removal Tool
. The Malicious Software Removal Tool (MSRT) runs on your device at least once per month as part of Windows Update. MSRT checks devices for infections by specific, prevalent malicious software ("malware") and helps remove any infections found. When the MSRT runs, it will remove the malware listed on the Microsoft Support website if the malware is on your device. During a malware check, a report will be sent to Microsoft with specific data about malware detected, errors, and other data about your device. If you do not want MSRT to send this data to Microsoft, you can disable MSRT's reporting component.
Microsoft Family
. Parents can use Microsoft Family Safety to understand and set boundaries on how their child is using their device. Please carefully review the information at
Microsoft Family Safety
if choosing to create or join a family group. If you live in a region that requires permission to create an account to access Microsoft services, you may be prompted to request or give parental consent. If a user is under the statutory age in your region, during the registration process they will be prompted to request consent from a parent or guardian by entering an adult’s email. When Family activity reporting is turned on for a child, Microsoft will collect details about how the child uses their device and provide parents with reports of that child's activities. Activity reports are routinely deleted from Microsoft servers.
Microsoft Defender SmartScreen and Smart App Control
. Microsoft strives to help protect your device and passwords from unsafe apps, files, and web content.
Microsoft Defender SmartScreen helps protect you when using our services by identifying threats to you, your device, and your passwords. These threats might include potentially unsafe apps or web content that Microsoft Defender SmartScreen discovers while checking websites you visit, files you download, and apps you install and run. When Microsoft Defender SmartScreen checks web and app content, data about the content and your device is sent to Microsoft, including the full web address of the content. When additional analysis is needed to identify security threats, information about the suspicious website or app—such as content displayed, sounds played, and application memory—may be sent to Microsoft. This data will only be used for security purposes in detecting, protecting against, and responding to security incidents, identity theft, fraud, or other malicious, deceptive, or illegal activities. If Microsoft Defender SmartScreen detects that content is potentially unsafe, you will see a warning in place of the content. Microsoft Defender SmartScreen can be turned on or off in the Windows Security app.
Where supported, Smart App Control helps check software that is installed and runs on your device to determine if it is malicious, potentially unwanted, or poses other threats to you and your device. On a supported device, Smart App Control starts in evaluation mode and the data we collect for Microsoft Defender SmartScreen such as file name, a hash of the file’s contents, the download location, and the file’s digital certificates, is used to help determine whether your device is a good candidate to use Smart App Control for additional security protection. Smart App Control is not enabled and will not block during evaluation mode. Some devices may not be good candidates if Smart App Control would otherwise get in the way and interfere with a user’s otherwise intended and legitimate tasks – for instance, developers who use a lot of unsigned files. If you are a good candidate for Smart App Control, then it will automatically be turned on, and will provide additional protection to your device beyond Microsoft Defender SmartScreen. Otherwise, Smart App Control will be unavailable and permanently turned off. If your device is unsupported or not a good candidate for Smart App Control, Microsoft Defender SmartScreen will continue to help protect your device. When Smart App Control is enabled and identifies an app as malicious, potentially unwanted, or unknown and unsigned, it will block and notify you prior to opening, running, or installing the app.
Learn more about Smart App Control
.
When either Microsoft Defender SmartScreen or Smart App Control checks a file, data about that file is sent to Microsoft, including the file name, a hash of the file’s contents, the download location, and the file’s digital certificates.
Smart App Control can be turned on or off in the Windows Security app.
Microsoft Defender Antivirus
. Microsoft Defender Antivirus looks for malware and other unwanted software, potentially unwanted apps, and other malicious content on your device. Microsoft Defender Antivirus is automatically turned on to help protect your device if no other antimalware software is actively protecting your device. If Microsoft Defender Antivirus is turned on, it will monitor the security status of your device. When Microsoft Defender Antivirus is turned on, or is running because Limited Periodic Scanning is enabled, it will automatically send reports to Microsoft that contain data about suspected malware and other unwanted software, potentially unwanted apps, and other malicious content, and it may also send files that could contain malicious content, such as malware or unknown files for further inspection. If a report is likely to contain personal data, the report is not sent automatically, and you'll be prompted before it is sent. You can configure Microsoft Defender Antivirus not to send reports and suspected malware to Microsoft.
Back to top
Speech, Voice Activation, Inking, and Typing
Speech
. Microsoft provides both a device-based speech recognition feature and cloud-based (online) speech recognition technologies.
Turning on the Online speech recognition setting lets apps use Microsoft cloud-based speech recognition. Additionally, in Windows 10, the Online speech recognition setting enables your ability to use dictation within Windows.
Turning on speech while setting up a HoloLens device or installing Windows Mixed Reality allows you to use your voice for commands, dictation, and app interactions. Both device-based speech recognition and online speech recognition settings will be enabled. With both settings enabled, while your headset is turned on the device will always be listening to your voice input and will send your voice data to Microsoft’s cloud-based speech recognition technologies.
When you use cloud-based speech recognition technologies from Microsoft, whether enabled by the Online speech recognition setting or when you interact with HoloLens or voice typing, Microsoft collects and uses your voice recordings to provide the speech recognition service by creating a text transcription of the spoken words in the voice data. Microsoft will not store, sample, or listen to your voice recordings without your permission. To learn more about how Microsoft manages your voice data, see
Speech recognition technologies
.
You can use device-based speech recognition without sending your voice data to Microsoft. However, Microsoft cloud-based speech recognition technologies provide more accurate recognition than the device-based speech recognition. When the online speech recognition setting is turned off, speech services that do not rely on the cloud and only use device-based recognition—like live captions, Narrator, or voice access—will still work and Microsoft won’t collect any voice data.
You can turn off online speech recognition at any time. This will stop any apps that rely on the Online speech recognition setting from sending your voice data to Microsoft. If you are using a HoloLens or Windows Mixed Reality headset, you can also turn off device-based speech recognition at any time. This will stop the device from listening for your voice input.
Learn more about speech recognition in Windows
.
Voice Activation
. Windows provides supported apps with the ability to respond and take action based on voice keywords that are specific to that app.
If you’ve given permission for an app to listen for voice keywords, Windows will be actively listening to the microphone for these keywords. Once a keyword is recognised, the app will have access to your voice recording, can process the recording, take action and respond, such as with a spoken answer. The app may send the voice recording to its own services in the cloud to process the commands. Each app should ask you for permission before accessing voice recordings.
Additionally, voice activation can be enabled when the device is locked. If enabled, the relevant app will continue listening to the microphone for voice keywords when you have locked your device and can activate for anyone who speaks near the device. When the device is locked, the app will have access to the same set of capabilities and information as when the device is unlocked.
You can turn off voice activation at any time.
Learn more about voice activation in Windows
.
Even when you’ve turned off voice activation, some third-party desktop apps and services could still be listening to the microphone and collect your voice input.
Learn more about third-party desktop apps and how they may still be able to access your microphone even with these settings turned off
.
Voice typing
. In Windows 11, dictation has been updated and renamed as voice typing. Voice typing may use both device-based and online speech recognition technologies to power its speech-to-text transcription service. You can also choose to contribute voice clips to help improve voice typing. If you choose not to contribute voice clips, you can still use voice typing. You can change your selection anytime in the voice typing settings. Microsoft will not store, sample, or listen to your voice recordings without your permission.
Learn more about Microsoft and your voice data
.
Voice access
. Windows enables everyone, including people with mobility disabilities, to control their PC and author text using their voice. For example, voice access supports scenarios such as opening and switching between apps, browsing the web and reading and authoring email. Voice access leverages modern, on-device speech recognition to accurately recognise speech and is supported without an internet connection. When a user invokes voice access it uses the device microphone.
Learn more about voice access
.
Inking & Typing Personalisation
. Your typed and handwritten words are collected to provide you with a customised word list, better character recognition to help you type and write on your device, and text suggestions that appear as you type or write.
You can turn off inking & typing personalisation at any time. This will delete your customer word list stored on your device. If you turn it back on, you’ll need to recreate your customised word list.
Learn more about inking & typing personalisation in Windows
.
Back to top
Sync and backup settings
When you sign into Windows with your Microsoft account, Windows can store your settings, files, and device configuration data in Microsoft’s servers. Windows will only use the stored settings, files, and device configuration data to make it easier for you to migrate your experience on a different device.
You can turn off this feature and stop Windows from storing your settings, files, and configuration data from the Windows settings. You can delete the data that has been backed up previously to your Microsoft account, by visiting
your Microsoft Account Devices page
.
Learn more about Windows back up and sync settings
.
Back to top
Update Services
Update Services for Windows includes Windows Update and Microsoft Update. Windows Update is a service that provides you with software updates for Windows software and other supporting software, such as drivers and firmware supplied by device manufacturers. Microsoft Update is a service that provides you with software updates for other Microsoft software such as Microsoft 365.
Windows Update automatically downloads Windows software updates to your device. You can configure Windows Update to automatically install these updates as they become available (recommended) or have Windows notify you when a restart is required to finish installing updates. Apps available through the Microsoft Store are automatically updated through the Microsoft Store, as described in the
Microsoft Store
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Web browsers—Microsoft Edge Legacy and Internet Explorer
This section applies to legacy versions of Microsoft Edge (versions 44 and below). See the
Microsoft Edge
section of the Privacy Statement for information about non-legacy versions of Microsoft Edge.
Microsoft Edge is the default web browser for Windows. Internet Explorer, the legacy browser from Microsoft, is also available in Windows. Whenever you use a web browser to access the internet, data about your device ("standard device data") is sent to the websites you visit and online services you use. Standard device data includes your device's IP address, browser type and language, access times, and referring website addresses. This data might be logged on those websites' web servers. Which data is logged and how that data is used depends on the privacy practices of the websites you visit and web services you use. Additionally, Microsoft Edge sends a unique browser ID to certain websites to enable us to develop aggregate data used to improve browser features and services.
Additionally, data about how you use your browser, such as your browsing history, web form data, temporary internet files, and cookies, is stored on your device. You can delete this data from your device using Delete Browsing History.
Microsoft Edge allows you to capture and save content on your device, such as:
Web note
. Allows you to create ink and text annotations on the webpages you visit, and clip, save, or share them.
Active reading
. Allows you to create and manage reading lists, including websites or documents.
Hub
. Allows you to easily manage your reading lists, favourites, downloads and history all in one area.
Website Pin to Taskbar
. Allows you to pin your favorite websites to the Windows taskbar. Websites will be able to see which of their webpages you have pinned, so they can provide you a notification badge letting you know there is something new for you to check out on their websites.
Some Microsoft browser information saved on your device will be synced across other devices when you sign in with your Microsoft account so you can access your data on all your signed-in browsers across your devices. For instance, in Internet Explorer, this information includes your browsing history and favourites; and in Microsoft Edge, it includes your favourites, reading lists, autofill form entries (such as your name, address and phone number) and may include data for extensions that you have installed. As an example, if you sync your Microsoft Edge reading list across devices, copies of the content you choose to save to your reading list will be sent to each synced device for later viewing. You can disable syncing in Internet Explorer by going to
Start
>
Settings
>
Accounts
>
Sync your settings
. (For more information, see the
Sync settings
section of this privacy statement.) You can also disable syncing of Microsoft Edge browser information by turning off the sync option in Microsoft Edge Settings.
Microsoft Edge and Internet Explorer use your search queries and browsing history to provide you with faster browsing and more relevant search results. These features include:
Search suggestions
in Internet Explorer automatically sends the information you type into the browser address bar to your default search provider (such as Bing) to offer search recommendations as you type each character.
Search and site suggestions
in Microsoft Edge automatically sends the information you type into the browser address bar to Bing (even if you have selected another default search provider) to offer search recommendations as you type each character.
You can turn off these features at any time. In order to provide search results, Microsoft Edge and Internet Explorer send your search queries, standard device information, and location (if you have location enabled) to your default search provider when the app is used. If Bing is your default search provider, we use this data as described in the
Bing
section of this privacy statement.
Back to top
Windows AI Features
Click to Do
Click to Do can run in partnership with Recall or as a stand-alone feature. Once started, you can use Click to Do to capture and analyse screenshots and identify the presence of text and images, then allowing you to take relevant actions for each. For instance, Click to Do can give you options to edit a screenshot image, or revise or rework text that it captures. Click to Do is unable to identify the content of the text or images identified within a screenshot, but you can use local AI and other tools to modify the content if you wish. Everything remains on your local device unless you make an explicit choice, like sending an image off to Bing for a search, asking Click to Do to provide a summary of text the user has selected (in which case it will be sent to Microsoft’s Azure AI cloud service), or using another local AI or other tool to modify a Click to Do screenshot.
Click to Do also allows you to use your microphone to search for text within a capture screenshot. When you click on the microphone button, Click to Do starts listening to what’s said, which is entered into the Search box, and will highlight all the matches from the search. The audio captured by the microphone is not transmitted off your device.
Windows Recall
Recall is a Windows feature only available in CoPilot+ PCs that allows users to find things they've seen on their device using the text and visual clues they remember. To use Recall, a user must opt-in to save snapshots on their Copilot+ PC, which are images of everything open and visible on the user’s screen and include associated metadata such as the app name and time-date stamp. All data is stored locally on the device and is protected with Windows Hello Enhanced Sign-in Security (ESS), which provides more secure biometric sign-ins and helps ensure only the customer can have access to their information. Every time a user launches Recall they will be asked to authenticate using Windows Hello biometric sign-in or PIN before the contents of the snapshot folder will decrypt. Click to Do runs on top of snapshots in Recall and helps the user get things done faster by allowing them to take actions with their content, either images or text, on the screen. The analysis of snapshots is always performed locally on the device and the actions available to take change based on what kind of content is detected.
Recall also allows you to use your Copilot+ PC device microphone as a way to search for text within captured snapshots. When you click on the microphone button located inside the Search input box within the Recall window, it starts listening to what’s said and enters it into the Search box. The microphone remains in use until you pause your speech, at which point it is turned off until you explicitly press the microphone button again. All the matches from the search will be highlighted in the results. The audio captured by the microphone is not transmitted off your device.
Data captured by Recall including personal data (e.g. snapshots, metadata, processing results, and user queries) remain local to the device within your signed-in account on the Copilot+ PC, and is not transmitted off the device unless you take certain action. For example, if you copy and paste a snapshot into another app, or choose to include a snapshot when submitting feedback through the Windows Feedback Hub. The only way Recall content can be shared with anyone is by explicit on-device action taken by the user.
You can control your content (such as Snapshots, metadata, search queries, and history) by pausing or deleting snapshots, filtering content, or using a supported browser in privacy mode. Learn more about your privacy and control over your Recall experience
here
.
In addition to the Recall search feature, Recall also has a timeline, in which your snapshots are organised chronologically and visualised in a horizontal scrollbar that you can use to find and leverage your past activities on your PC. In addition to the features available within the timeline, you can delete snapshots from this view, either individually or by all snapshots containing a website domain (e.g., all from www.bing.com) or those from a specific app.
Recall also has a Sensitive Content filter that is on by default to help prevent the retention of information that might be more delicate in nature (e.g., credit card numbers, state issued ID numbers, etc.). Users can turn this filter off if they wish in Windows Settings.
Back to top
Windows apps
A number of Microsoft apps are included with Windows and others are available in Microsoft Store. Some of those apps include:
Maps app
. The Maps app provides location-based services and uses Bing services to process your searches within the Maps app. When the Maps app has access to your location, and you have enabled location-based services in Windows, when you use the “@” key to initiate a search in supported text boxes in Windows apps, Bing services collects the text you type after the “@” key to provide location-based suggestions. To learn more about these Bing-powered experiences, see the
Bing
section of this privacy statement. When the Maps app has access to your location, even when the app is not in use, Microsoft may collect de-identified location data from your device to improve Microsoft services. You can disable the Maps app's access to your location by turning off the location service or turning off the Maps app's access to the location service.
You can keep track of your favorite places and recent map searches in the Maps app. Your favorite places and search history will be included as search suggestions. If you grant the Maps app access to your camera, you’ll be able to capture the location of where your photos took place – for instance, a photo of your car will also tell you where your car is parked. You can also share your location with other people in your contacts. If you're signed in with your Microsoft account, your favorite places, search history, and certain app settings will be synced across other devices and services. For more information, see the
Sync and back up settings
section of this privacy statement.
Camera app
. If you allow the Camera app to use your location, location data is embedded in the photos and videos you take with your device. Other descriptive data, such as camera model and the date that the picture or video was taken, is also embedded in photos and videos. If you choose to share a photo or video, any embedded data will be accessible to the people and services you share with. Once enabled, you can always disable the Camera app's access to your location by turning off all access to the location service in your device's Settings menu or turning off the Camera app's access to the location service.
When the Camera app is open, it shows rectangles detected by the selected camera for areas in the image that are potentially used for image enhancement. The Camera app does not retain any image enhancing data. You can always change your camera access settings in the Windows Settings menu. The Camera app uses various device capabilities such as location, camera, microphone, video, and picture library. Please visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Photos app
. There are two versions of the Photos app available. The updated Photos app includes features like iCloud integration and local and cloud folder views. The previous legacy version of the Photos app includes features like Video Editor, the People tab, and Albums. You are using the updated Photos app if the “About” section in the Photos app settings indicates the app is the “Updated” Photos app. In some cases, a user may have both the updated Photos app and the Photos legacy version downloaded on their device.
The updated Photos app helps you organise, view and share your photos and videos. For example, the Photos app presents different ways to group photos and videos by name, date taken, or date modified, and also in folders where those files are stored, such as stored locally on your device or synced to your device from OneDrive, iCloud, and other cloud services. The app also allows you to move, copy or upload files to different locations on your computer or to OneDrive. The All Photos tab displays your locally stored or synced photos and videos according to the date they are taken. The Favourites tab lets you view photos and videos that you have previously liked or favourited. The Folders tab allows you to view photos or videos by their storage location. There are also tabs where you can see your photos and videos from available cloud services (such as OneDrive and other third-party services) that you have synced to your device.
The Photos legacy app also helps you organise, view and share your photos and videos. However, if you are using the Photos legacy app, you may see other features that are not available in the newer version of the Photos app, including Collections, Albums, Video Editor and the People setting. The Collection tab displays photos and videos according to the date they are taken. The Albums tab helps you organise your photos and videos by location and common tags. The Video Editor allows you to edit, create, and share videos.
The People setting can be enabled on the Photos legacy app's Settings page and in the People tab of the app. When enabled, the Photos legacy app will use face grouping technology to organise your photos and videos into groups. The grouping feature can detect faces in a photo or video and determine whether they are visually similar to faces in other photos and videos in your local photo collection. You can choose to associate a facial grouping with a contact from your People app.
When enabled in the Photos legacy app, your groupings will be stored on your device for as long as you choose to keep the groupings or the photos or videos. If the People setting is turned on, there will be a prompt to allow the Photos legacy app to continue to permit facial groupings after three years of non-interaction with the Photos legacy app. At any time, you can go to the Settings page in the Photos legacy app to turn the People setting on or off. Turning the feature off will remove facial grouping data from the Photos legacy app but will not remove your photos or videos.
Learn more about the Photos legacy app and facial grouping
.
If you choose to share a photo or video using the Photos app or the Photos legacy app, any embedded data (such as location, camera model, and date) will be accessible to the people and services you share the photo or video with.
People app
. The People app lets you see and interact with all your contacts in one place. When you add an account to the People app, your contacts from your account will be automatically added to the People app. You can add other accounts to the People app, including your social networks (such as Facebook and Twitter) and email accounts. When you add an account, we tell you what data the People app can import or sync with the particular service and let you choose what you want to add. Other apps you install may also sync data to the People app, including providing additional details to existing contacts. When you view a contact in the People app, information about your recent interactions with the contact (such as emails and calendar events, including from apps that the People app syncs data from) will be retrieved and displayed to you. You can remove an account from the People app at any time.
Mail and Calendar app
. The Mail and Calendar app allows you to connect all your email, calendars and files in one place, including those from third-party email and file storage providers. The app provides location-based services, such as weather information in your calendar, but you can disable the app’s use of your location. When you add an account to the Mail and Calendar app, your email, calendar items, files, contacts and other settings from your account will automatically sync to your device and to Microsoft servers. At any time, you can remove an account or make changes to the data that’s synced from your account. To configure an account, you must provide the app with the account credentials (such as username and password), which will be sent over the internet to the third-party provider’s server. The app will first attempt to use a secure (SSL) connection to configure your account but will send this information unencrypted if your email provider does not support SSL. If you add an account provided by an organisation (such as a company email address), the owner of the organisational domain can implement certain policies and controls (for example, multi-factor authentication or the ability to remotely wipe data from your device) that may affect your use of the app. This app uses your device capabilities such as location, camera. Please visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Windows Operator Messages (previously Microsoft Messaging) app
. The Windows Operator Messages app receives and shows account-related SMS texts from your mobile operator about your data plan (such as your billing and data limits) on your PC or device. These messages are stored locally on your device. From your device, you can also access, view, and delete these messages. This app uses your device capabilities such as Contacts. Please visit Microsoft Store on Windows to learn more.
The Clock app
is your hub for time management and focus on Windows. When users sign in with their Microsoft account they can enable Microsoft To Do which is a cloud connected experience. When the user turns on Focus Session, session data is stored locally and user can clear it by going to the clock settings page. Additionally, Focus Sessions supports connecting to Spotify accounts to listen to ambient audio to help users focus. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Microsoft Journal
is a Windows application specifically designed for touch-focused, pen-capable devices such as tablets and 2-in-1 devices. It provides users with freeform personal note-taking experience. The app leverages artificial intelligence (AI) and machine learning to better recognise your handwriting that processes data locally on your device. When connected to Microsoft 365 (subscription required), users can seamlessly access their M365 calendar and contacts within the app. All user created content is automatically saved at the default save location in the document library for future reference. Journal lets you access photos library and the device camera and microphone so that you can add them to a workbook. Learn about Journal app
here
or visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
The
Mobile plans
app helps you get online easily and in more places on your Windows 10 PC and 11 LTE devices. Upon signing up for a data plan on your device, it establishes a connection with the mobile operator, enabling you to complete purchases through the mobile operator’s online portal. You will need a supported SIM card in order to use this app. The Mobile Plan App will use your IMEI, IMSI, EID, ICCID and Country (coarse location determined by Mobile Network ID or WiFi Reverse IP) to determine which mobile operators are available in your area. The mobile operator may send notifications to users through the Mobile Plans App. This app uses your device’s capabilities such as its camera and microphone. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Microsoft PC Manager
is available in select regions and is a desktop tool aimed at boosting your PC’s performance. Based on your request, PC Manager will scan your device, and allows you to delete unneeded or temporary documents, optimise cache, stop or recover from unauthorised changes, or use other features such as health check, one-click boost, storage clean-up, file and pop-up management, and protection of your default settings.
PC Manager will block pop-ups based on ad-block rules and the pop-up windows selected by you through customised block. If you agree to join the “Microsoft PC Manager Pop-up Plan”, you can help us optimise the pop-up management feature of Microsoft PC Manager by taking screenshots of the pop-up and sending them to Microsoft when you block pop-up windows using customised block. Microsoft does not collect information other than screenshots, Windows title, and the class of Windows. Screenshots sent are only retained for a short period of time and regularly deleted. You can manage your Pop-Up Plan preferences through the PC Manager settings at anytime. The feedback feature in PC Manager may also process personal data if you include it in the feedback you provide to Microsoft. The feedback from users is regularly deleted after processing. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
The
Snipping Tool
is a handy utility in Windows that uses your microphone and pictures library to capture and store screenshots and screen recordings. The Snipping Tool includes a Text Action feature, which uses built-in optical character recognition (OCR) support. You can select and copy text directly from images using OCR. Additionally, you can use the Text Action feature to redact sensitive information from captured text. With clipboard integration items copied from the Snipping Tool are also copied to your clipboard. If you enable clipboard history across devices, the copied content can be used seamlessly across different devices. Users can manage their clipboard and snipping preferences through the Windows settings. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
The
Sound Recorder app
is a versatile tool designed for capturing audio via your microphone in various scenarios. While recording, you can mark key moments to easily locate important sections later. You can also trim, adjust volume levels, or apply other modifications as needed, and playback your recordings. Your recordings are autosaved and stored in your Documents folder for easy access, and you can share your recorded audio with friends and family. Visit
Microsoft Store
to learn more.
Microsoft Clipchamp
is a video editor designed to make video creation easy. It allows users to combine videos, images, and audio files, as well as add text and effects, and then save the finished video to their device, or store their videos in their personal OneDrive via their Microsoft account. Users can also add stock videos and stock music or sound effects, stickers, graphical elements, backgrounds, and more. Users can choose to allow Clipchamp to access their camera and microphone to record videos directly from their device. To provide a better experience, such as which language to display to you, Clipchamp will collect your imprecise location. Users can access Clipchamp with a personal or family Microsoft account via the Clipchamp app for Windows 10 or Windows 11 and in the Edge or Chrome browser at
https://app.clipchamp.com
.
Media Player
is the default built-in player of multimedia (audio and video) files. When you choose to open a multimedia file, Media Player will read the contents of that file. When you open Media Player, it will read the contents of your Music library and Video library folders to populate its own Music library and Video library pages inside the Media Player to help you organise, view and play multimedia content.
To enrich your experience when playing music, Media Player will automatically attempt to display artist art and album art for the content you play and the content in your music library. To provide this information, Media Player sends an information request to Microsoft containing standard device data, such as your device IP address, device software version, your regional and language settings, and an identifier for the content. If desired, this feature can be disabled on the app’s Settings page.
Movies and TV.
Microsoft Movies & TV allows you to rent or buy movies and TV episodes, and play them on your device.
To help you discover content that may interest you, Movies & TV will collect data about what movies and TV shows you watch, including the length of play and any ratings you give.
Movies & TV can also display and play local video files stored on your PC. To do this, it needs access to the video library on your device.
Windows Media Player Legacy.
When you use Windows Media Player Legacy, it can read media content such as video, audio, and picture files which allows you to play CDs and other digital content (such as video and audio files), rip CDs, and manage your media library. To enrich your experience when you play content in your library, Windows Media Player Legacy displays related media information, such as album title, song titles, album art, artist, and composer. To augment your media information, Windows Media Player Legacy will send a request to Microsoft which contains standard computer information, an identifier for the media content, and the media information already contained in your Windows Media Player Legacy library (including information you may have edited or entered yourself) so that Microsoft can recognise the track and then return additional information that is available.
Windows Media Player Legacy also allows you to play back content that is streamed to you over a network. To provide this service, it is necessary for Windows Media Player Legacy to communicate with a streaming media server. These servers are typically operated by non-Microsoft content providers. During playback of streaming media, Windows Media Player Legacy will send a log to the streaming media server or other web server(s) if the streaming media server requests it. The log includes such details as: connection time, IP address, operating system version, Windows Media Player Legacy version, Player identification number (Player ID), date, and protocol. To protect your privacy, Windows Media Player Legacy defaults to sending a Player ID that is different for each session.
Back to top
Windows Hello
Windows Hello provides instant access to your devices through biometric authentication. If you turn it on, Windows Hello uses your face, fingerprint, or iris to identify you based on a set of unique points or features that are extracted from the image and stored on your device as a template—but it does not store the actual image of your face, fingerprint, or iris. Biometric verification data that's used when you sign in doesn't leave your device. Your biometric verification data will remain on your device until you remove it. However, after a significant period of Windows Hello inactivity, you will be prompted to confirm that you want to continue to store your biometric verification data. You can delete your biometric verification data from within Settings. Learn more about
Windows Hello
.
Back to top
Windows Search
Windows Search lets you search your stuff and the web from one place. If you choose to use Windows Search to search "your stuff," it will provide results for items on your personal OneDrive, your OneDrive for Business if so enabled, other cloud storage providers to the extent supported by those third-party providers, and on your device. If you choose to use Windows Search to search the web, or get search suggestions with Windows Search, your search results will be powered by Bing and we will use your search query as described in the
Bing
section of this privacy statement.
Learn more about search in Windows
.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Entertainment and related services
Entertainment and Related Services power rich experiences and enable you to access a variety of content, applications and games.
Entertainment and Related Services power rich experiences and enable you to access a variety of content, applications and games.
Xbox
The Xbox network is the online gaming and entertainment service from Microsoft that consists of software and enables online experiences across different platforms. This service lets you find and play games, view content, and connect with friends on Xbox and other gaming and social networks.
When you sign up for an Xbox profile, we assign you a gamertag (a public nickname) and a unique identifier. When you sign in on Xbox devices, apps, and services, the data we collect about your use is stored using these unique identifier(s).
Xbox consoles are devices you can use to find and play games, movies, music, and other digital entertainment. When you sign in to Xbox experiences—in apps or on a console—we also assign a unique identifier to your device. When your Xbox console is connected to the internet, for instance, and you sign in to the console, we identify which console and which version of the console’s operating system you’re using.
Data we collect
about your use of Xbox services, games, apps, and consoles includes:
When you sign in and sign out of Xbox, any purchases you make, and content you obtain.
Which games you play and apps you use, your game progress, achievements, play time per game, and other play statistics.
Performance data about Xbox consoles, Xbox Game Pass and other Xbox apps, the Xbox network, connected accessories, and your network connection, including any software or hardware errors.
Content you add, upload, or share through the Xbox network, including text, pictures, and video you capture in games and apps.
Social activity, including chat data and interactions with other gamers, and connections you make (friends you add and people who follow you) on the Xbox network.
If you sign in to use Xbox on another device capable of accessing the Xbox network, and that device includes a storage device (hard drive or memory unit), usage data will be stored on the storage device and sent to Microsoft the next time you sign in to Xbox, even if you’ve been playing offline.
Data we collect enables us to provide you with our services and with curated experiences. This includes connecting you to games, content, and services, as well as presenting you with offers, discounts, and recommendations. To change your settings for these recommendations, visit
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
page.
Camera and Microphone
. While using Xbox, players can use the device’s capabilities such as the microphone, camera and screen recording to improve their gaming experience. When an Xbox game is played in the Windows Game Bar, the camera and microphone may be used, including to read photos and videos and to capture and record screenshots.
Xbox diagnostic data
. Diagnostic data has two categories: required and optional.
Required
. Xbox will send required data to Microsoft. The minimum data necessary to help keep Xbox safe, secure, up to date, and performing as expected.
Optional
. Optional data is additional data that you choose to share with Microsoft. Optional data may include additional details about the operation, usage, and performance of your Xbox products and services, as well as enhanced error reporting.
Learn more at
Manage settings for optional data sharing
.
Game captures
. Any player in a multiplayer game session can record video (game clips) and capture screenshots of their view of the game play. Other players’ game clips and screenshots can capture your in-game character and gamertag during that session. If a player captures game clips and screenshots on a PC, the resulting game clips might also capture audio chat.
Captioning
. During Xbox real-time (“party”) chat, players may activate a voice-to-text feature that lets them view that chat as text. If a player activates this feature, all voice communication in the party is captioned for the player. Microsoft uses the resulting text data to provide captioning of chat for players who need it, as well as the other purposes described in this statement.
Xbox data viewable by others
. Your gamertag, game and play statistics, achievements, presence (whether you are currently signed in to Xbox), content you share, and other data about your activity on Xbox can be seen by:
Other players signed in to Xbox.
Customers of third-party services you’ve linked your profile to, or
Other services associated with Xbox (including those of partner companies).
For example, your gamertag and scores that show on game leaderboards are considered public and cannot be hidden. For other data, you can adjust your privacy settings on consoles and at
Xbox.com
to limit or block what is shared with the public or with friends.
Learn more at
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
.
Xbox data shared with third parties including game and apps publishers
. When you use an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on your Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, the publisher of that game or app has access to data about your usage to help the publisher deliver, support, and improve its product. This data may include: your Xbox user identifier, gamertag, limited account info such as country and age range, data about your in-game communications, any Xbox enforcement activity, game-play sessions (for example, moves made in-game, types of vehicles used in-game), your presence on the Xbox network, the time you spend playing the game or app, rankings, statistics, gamer profiles, avatars, or gamerpics, friends lists, activity feeds for official clubs you belong to, official club memberships, and any content you create or submit in the game or app.
Third-party publishers and developers of games and apps have their own distinct and independent relationship with users and their collection and usage of personal data is subject to their specific privacy policies. You should carefully review their policies to determine how they use the data. For example, publishers may choose to disclose or display game data (such as on leaderboards) through their own services. You may find their policies linked from game or app detail pages in the Microsoft Store.
Learn more at
Data Sharing with Games and Apps
.
To stop sharing game or app data with a publisher, remove its games or app from all devices where you have installed them. Some publisher access to your data may be revoked at
https://microsoft.com/consent
.
Children and family
. If you have kids who want to use the Xbox network, you can set up child and teen profiles for them once they have Microsoft accounts. Adult organisers in your Microsoft family group can change consent choices and online safety settings for child and teen profiles on
Xbox.com
.
Learn more about Microsoft family groups at
Simplify your family’s life
.
Learn more about managing Xbox profiles, at
Xbox online safety and privacy settings
.
For more information about Microsoft’s collection of data from children, including Xbox, please see the
Collection of data from children
section of this privacy statement.
Safety
. In order to help make the Xbox network a safe gaming environment and enforce the Community Standards for Xbox, we may collect and review voice, text, images, videos and in-game content (such as game clips you upload, conversations you have, and things you post in clubs and games).
Anti-cheat and fraud prevention
. Providing a fair gameplay environment is important to us. We prohibit cheating, hacking, account stealing, and any other unauthorised or fraudulent activity when you use an Xbox online game or any network-connected app on your Xbox console, PC or mobile device. In order to detect and prevent fraud and cheating, we may use anti-cheat and fraud prevention tools, applications, and other technologies. Such technologies may create digital signatures (known as “hashes”) using certain information collected from your Xbox console, PC, or mobile device, and how you use that device. This can include information about the browser, device, activities, game identifiers, and operating system.
Legacy
.
Xbox 360
. This Xbox console collects limited required diagnostic data to keep your console functioning as expected while using a console connected to the Xbox network.
Kinect
. The Kinect sensor is a combination of camera, microphone, and infrared sensor that can enable motions and voice to be used to control gameplay. For example:
If you choose, the camera can be used to sign you in to the Xbox network automatically using facial recognition. This data stays on the console and is not shared with anyone, and you can choose to delete this data from your console at any time.
For game play, Kinect will map distances between your body's joints to create a stick figure representation of you that helps Kinect enable play.
The Kinect microphone can enable voice chat between players during play. The microphone also enables voice commands for control of the console, game, or app, or to enter search terms.
The Kinect sensor can also be used for audio and video communications through services such as Skype.
Learn more about Kinect at
Xbox Kinect and Privacy
.
Back to top
Microsoft Store
Microsoft Store is an online service, accessible via PC, the Xbox Console and the Xbox App, that allows you to browse, download, purchase, rate, and review applications and other digital content. It includes:
Apps and content for Windows devices such as phones, PCs, and tablets.
Games, subscriptions and other apps for Xbox consoles and other devices.
Products and apps for Microsoft 365, SharePoint, Exchange, Access, and Project (2013 versions or later).
We collect data about how you access and use Microsoft Store; the products you've viewed, purchased, or installed; the preferences you set for viewing apps in Microsoft Store; and any ratings, reviews, or problem reports you submit. Your Microsoft account is associated with your ratings and reviews; and if you write a review, the name and picture from your Microsoft account will be published with your review. Microsoft Store uses the region configured on your device to show relevant and eligible content and merchandising. Microsoft Store uses your device identifier to manage product rights tied to a specific device.
Permission for Microsoft Store apps
. Many apps you install from the Microsoft Store are designed to take advantage of specific hardware and software features of your device. An app's use of certain hardware and software features may give the app or its related service access to your data. For example, a photo editing app might access your device's camera to let you take a new photo or access photos or videos stored on your device for editing, and a restaurant guide might use your location to provide nearby recommendations. Information about the features that an app uses is provided on the app's product description page in Microsoft Store. Many of the features that Microsoft Store apps use can be turned on or off through your device’s privacy settings. In Windows, in many cases, you can choose which apps can use a particular feature. Go to
Start > Settings > Privacy or Privacy & Security
, select the feature (for example, Calendar), and then select which app permissions are on or off. The lists of apps in Windows privacy settings that can use hardware and software features will not include "Classic Windows" applications, and these applications are not affected by these settings.
App updates
. Unless you have turned off automatic app updates in the relevant Microsoft Store settings or have acquired an app provided and updated by the app developer, Microsoft Store will automatically check for, download, and install app updates to verify that you have the latest versions. Updated apps might use different Windows hardware and software features from the previous versions, which could give them access to different data on your device. You will be prompted for consent if an updated app accesses certain features, such as location. You can also review the hardware and software features an app uses by viewing its product description page in Microsoft Store.
Each app's use of your data collected through any of these features is subject to the app developer's privacy policies. If an app available through Microsoft Store collects and uses any of your personal data, the app developer is required to provide a privacy policy, and a link to the privacy policy is available on the app's product description page in Microsoft Store.
Sideloaded apps and developer mode
. Developer features such as the "developer mode" setting are intended for development use only. If you enable developer features, your device may become unreliable or unusable, and expose you to security risks. Downloading or otherwise acquiring apps from sources other than Microsoft Store, also known as "sideloading" apps, may make your device and personal data more vulnerable to attack or unexpected use by apps. Windows policies, notifications, permissions, and other features intended to help protect your privacy when apps access your data may not function as described in this statement for sideloaded apps or when developer features are enabled.
Back to top
Microsoft Start
Microsoft Start (formerly known as MSN or Microsoft News) is a content service that includes news, weather, sports, and finance. The Microsoft Start app is available on various platforms, including iOS and Android. The Microsoft Start service is also included within other Microsoft services, including the Microsoft Edge browser and widgets on Windows.
When you install the Microsoft Start, MSN Weather, or Microsoft News apps, we collect data that tells us if the app was installed properly, the installation date, the app version, and other data about your device such as the operating system and browser. This data is collected on a regular basis to help us determine the number of app users and identify performance issues associated with different app versions, operating systems, and browsers. When you use the weather app, we use your location to provide you with relevant weather content.
We also collect data about how you interact with Microsoft Start content, such as usage frequency and articles viewed, to provide you with relevant content. Microsoft Start provides an enhanced experience when you sign in with your Microsoft account, including allowing you to customise your interests and favourites. We use your location to provide you with relevant content such as local weather and news. You can manage personalisation through Microsoft Start and Bing settings, as well as through settings in other Microsoft services that include Microsoft Start services. We also use the data we collect to provide you with advertisements that may be of interest to you. You can opt out of interest-based advertising through the advertising links within Microsoft Start services, or by visiting the Microsoft
opt-out page
.
Previous versions of MSN Money allow you to access personal finance information from third-party financial institutions. MSN Money only displays this information and does not store it on our servers. Your sign-in credentials used to access your financial information from third parties are encrypted on your device and are not sent to Microsoft. These financial institutions, as well as any other third-party services you access through MSN services, are subject to their own terms and privacy policies.
Back to top
Silverlight
Microsoft Silverlight helps you to access and enjoy rich content on the Web. Silverlight enables websites and services to store data on your device. Other Silverlight features involve connecting to Microsoft to obtain updates, or to Microsoft or third-party servers to play protected digital content.
Silverlight Configuration tool
. You can make choices about these features in the Silverlight Configuration tool. To access the Silverlight Configuration tool, right click on content that is currently being displayed by Silverlight and select
Silverlight
. You can also run the Silverlight Configuration tool directly. In Windows, for example, you can access the tool by searching for "Microsoft Silverlight."
Silverlight application storage
. Silverlight-based applications can store data files locally on your computer for a variety of purposes, including saving your customised settings, storing large files for graphically intensive features (such as games, maps and images), and storing content that you create within certain applications. You can turn off or configure application storage in the Silverlight Configuration tool.
Silverlight updates
. Silverlight will periodically check a Microsoft server for updates to provide you with the latest features and improvements. A small file containing information about the latest Silverlight version will be downloaded to your computer and compared to your currently installed version. If a newer version is available, it will be downloaded and installed on your computer. You can turn off or configure updates in the Silverlight Configuration tool.
Digital Rights Management
. Silverlight uses Microsoft Digital Rights Management (DRM) technology to help protect the rights of content owners. If you access DRM-protected content (such as music or video) with Silverlight, it will request media usage rights from a rights server on the Internet. In order to provide a seamless playback experience, you will not be prompted before Silverlight sends the request to the rights server. When requesting media usage rights, Silverlight will provide the rights server with an ID for the DRM-protected content file and basic data about your device, including data about the DRM components on your device such as their revision and security levels, and a unique identifier for your device.
DRM updates
. In some cases, accessing DRM-protected content will require an update to Silverlight or to the DRM components on your device. When you attempt to play content that requires a DRM update, Silverlight will send a request to a Microsoft server containing basic data about your device, including information about the DRM components on your computer such as their revision and security levels, troubleshooting data, and a unique identifier for your device. The Microsoft server uses this identifier to return a unique DRM update for your device, which will then be installed by Silverlight. You can turn off or configure DRM component updates on the
Playback
tab in the Silverlight Configuration tool.
Back to top
Windows Mixed Reality
Windows Mixed Reality allows you to enable a virtual reality experience that immerses you in apps and games. Mixed Reality uses a compatible headset’s camera, microphone, and infrared sensors to enable motions and voice to be used to control gameplay and to navigate apps and games.
Microsoft collects diagnostic data to solve problems and to keep Mixed Reality running on Windows up to date, secure, and operating properly. Diagnostic data also helps us improve Mixed Reality and related Microsoft products and services depending on the diagnostic data settings you’ve chosen for your device.
Learn more about Windows diagnostic data
.
Mixed Reality also processes and collects data specifically related to the Mixed Reality experiences, such as:
Mixed Reality maps distances between your body's joints to create a stick figure representation of you. If you are connected to the Internet, we collect those numeric values to enable and improve your experience.
Mixed Reality detects specific hand gestures intended to perform simple system interactions (such as menu navigation, pan/zoom, and scroll). This data is processed on your PC and is not stored.
The headset's microphones enable voice commands to control games, apps, or to enter search terms.
Learn more about voice data collection
.
Windows Mixed Reality can also be used for audio and video communications through services such as Skype.
View Summary
Learn more
Back to top
Back To Top
Sub-policy 14
https://www.xero.com/nz/legal/privacy/:
Legal centre
Privacy notice
We’ve updated our privacy notice and data processing terms. These changes are effective immediately for new customers or visitors to our websites, and from 14 April 2025 for current Xero users.
See Xero Central for more details.
Dismiss
Last updated: 11 February 2025
Download PDF
|
See archived versions
Table of contents
Who are we
What does this notice cover
What this notice doesn’t cover
Personal data we collect and how we get it
How we use your personal data
Cookies and similar tracking technologies
How we share your personal data
Personal data retention
Security
International transfers
Your rights
Updates to this notice
How to contact us
Additional information if you’re in the EEA or UK
1. Who are we?
When we say “Xero”, “we”, “our” or “us”, we mean the Xero group of companies. Our headquarters are in New Zealand, but we operate and have offices all over the world. See our
contact us
page for more information.
We provide an easy-to-use global online platform for small businesses and their advisors. At the core of our platform is our beautiful cloud accounting software. To find out more about what we do, see our
about us
page.
2. What does this notice cover?
This notice describes how we process personal data. When we say “personal data” we mean information that relates to you, and from which you can be identified. Personal data includes your name, email, address, telephone number, bank account details, payment information, support queries, community comments and so on. In some countries, personal data can also include information about your device, such as your IP address and device type.
This notice applies to personal data we collect across all our websites and apps, in connection with any services we provide. It also applies to personal data we collect from third party data sources, and through surveys, events, customer support, competitions, promotional programmes and training. For this notice, we’ll just call them our “services”.
3. What this notice doesn’t cover
This notice doesn’t apply to personal data that our subscribers (people who create and pay for subscriptions to our services) or their invited users (people other than subscribers who have been invited to use our services by a subscriber) enter into our services about their own customers, suppliers, employees or other third parties. In those cases, our subscribers control that personal data and we process it only as a service provider (or “processor”) on their behalf. If you’re not a subscriber and have questions about this type of personal data, you’ll need to contact the subscriber that controls it.
If you provide us with any personal data about other people, you should make sure you are permitted to do so before sharing it with us.
4. Personal data we collect and how we get it
The personal data we collect depends on how you interact with us. We collect personal data:
When you provide it to us directly.
This includes when you visit our websites, use our services, or provide personal data directly through other interactions with us. For example, we ask for your billing information when you sign up for a subscription or trial, and collect your contact information and any other details you share when you ask for support, or take part in training and events. You don’t have to provide us with personal data, but if you don’t it might mean you can’t use parts of our services.
Automatically.
We collect some personal data about you automatically when you visit our websites or use our apps and services. For example, we collect data about the pages you look at and the links you click on.
From third parties.
Although we collect the majority of personal data about you directly or automatically, sometimes we might collect it from other sources. For example, from trusted third parties and service providers that help us deliver our services (such as providers of email, marketing, analytics, financial, credit and payment services) and from social media platforms.
Personal data categories and sources
We’ve summarised the categories of personal data we collect and their sources, below.
Identity and contact data
such as your name, email address, telephone number, address or social-media handle. We source this directly from you, automatically or from third parties.
Account data
such as your login and profile information, including your password, and subscription details. We source this directly from you or from third parties.
Payment data
such as truncated credit or debit card details, bank account details, payment method, billing address and other details of services that you have received from us. We source this directly from you, automatically or from third parties.
Communications data
such as feedback on our services and other communications with us or with our service providers, competition and survey entries, chat, email or call history, and call recordings if you consent to them. We source this directly from you, automatically, or from third parties.
Marketing and advertising data
such as interests based on your use of our services, survey responses, promotions you enter, communication preferences, preferences for particular services, and subscription details. We source this directly from you, automatically or from third parties.
Device data
such as data collected using tags and pixels, including your IP address, ISP, the browser you use to visit our websites, device type and location, operating system, device identifiers and advertising identifiers. We source this automatically.
Service usage data
such as information about your use of and interaction with our services, including third party services you have integrated. This includes page views and searches, login information, clicks, content interaction, length of visits, and other functional information on service performance. It also includes service utilisation, such as features you buy and use, as well as (if you are a subscriber) how you manage organisations and invited users within your subscription. We source this automatically.
Uploaded content
such as any personal data in photographs, videos or audio recordings that you upload on our websites, apps, services or social media (where you allow us). We source this directly from you or from third parties.
Sensitive personal information
such as health data, or trade union membership details that you may provide to us. Note that we don’t generally require or request sensitive personal information to operate our services. We source this directly from you.
5. How we use your personal data
We use your personal data to operate our services, and to manage our relationship with you. We’ll otherwise only use your personal data for:
The purposes in this notice or that we explain to you when we collect your personal data.
Other purposes that are related to the ones in the first dot-point where permitted by law.
Purposes for using personal data
We’ve set out more information about the specific purposes for which we use your personal data below.
To deliver our services.
For example, to sign you up to our services, manage your trial or subscription, facilitate purchases of services, and provide, maintain and deliver our services (including using AI/ML) in accordance with our terms of use. This includes monitoring, troubleshooting, data analysis, testing, system maintenance, reporting and hosting of data.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, device data, and service usage data.
To communicate with you about our services.
For example, we may send you service updates, invoices, technical notices, security alerts, support messages and responses to your enquiries. We may contact you through a variety of channels, for example, by email, telephone, SMS and in-product communications.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, device data, service usage data, and uploaded content.
For quality assurance, training and record-keeping.
For example, we may review communications with you for customer support, quality assurance and training purposes, and related record-keeping.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: Identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, device data, service usage data, and uploaded content.
For security management.
For example, to address threats and fraud, and protect you, our business and people, we may use malware and other monitoring tools to detect suspicious activity and block unauthorised access.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, device data, location data, service usage data, and uploaded content.
For compliance management.
For example, to ensure compliance with our terms of use and related internal reporting.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, service usage data, device data, and uploaded content.
To improve our services.
For example, we analyse collected data to improve our websites, apps and services, to develop new products and services, and inform other business decisions by understanding customer behaviour (including using AI/ML).
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, marketing and advertising data, device data, service usage data, and uploaded content.
For marketing communications.
For example, to contact you about services, promotions, competitions and events we think may be of interest, including those of our affiliates and partners. We may contact you through a variety of channels, for example, by email, telephone, SMS and in-product communications.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, communications data, marketing and advertising data, device data, service usage data, and uploaded content.
To personalise content.
For example, we may provide local or otherwise targeted content and information for customers, and to tailor the content served on our websites and apps, and via our services.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, marketing and advertising data, device data, and service usage data.
For personalised advertising.
For example, we may personalise, target, and deliver advertising on our websites and apps, and via third party websites and other online services. We may also identify audiences and individuals like you to better tailor our marketing campaigns and communications, and measure the effectiveness of our campaigns and adjust our methods.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, marketing and advertising data, device data, and service usage data.
To run competitions, sweepstakes or surveys.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, communications data, marketing and advertising data, and uploaded content.
For legal and regulatory compliance.
For example, to comply with any legal and regulatory obligations which apply to us, including responding to requests under data protection or other applicable laws.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, device data, service usage data, and uploaded content.
To manage legal claims.
For example, to preserve our legal rights, and defend and bring claims to protect our interests.
The categories of personal data we use for this purpose are: identity and contact data, account data, payment data, communications data, device data, and service usage data.
6. Cookies and similar tracking technology
We use cookies and similar tracking technology (“cookies”) to collect and use personal data about you, including to serve interest-based advertising. For more information about the types of cookies we use and why, and how you can control them, please see our
cookie notice
.
7. How we share your personal data
There will be times when we need to share your personal data with third parties. We’ll only share your personal data with:
Other companies in the Xero group of companies
who enable us to provide you with our services or who otherwise use personal data for the purposes in this notice.
Third party service providers and partners
who also enable us to provide you with our services or who otherwise use personal data for the purposes in this notice. For example, we may share your personal data with service providers that assist us with billing, customer support, hosting and storage, data analytics, security, marketing and email services. We won’t share your mobile telephone number or SMS opt-in consent status with these third parties for their own marketing purposes without your explicit consent.
Third party services that you integrate with
on our websites and apps, or through our services, for example, an app on the Xero App Store. Note that your personal data will be managed by the provider of those services according to their own terms and privacy policy.
Regulators, law enforcement bodies, government agencies, courts or other third parties
where we think it's necessary to comply with applicable laws or regulations, to exercise, establish or defend our legal rights, or to protect your interests or those of any other person. Where possible and appropriate, we'll notify you of this type of sharing.
Actual or potential buyer
(and its agents and advisers) in connection with any proposed purchase, merger or acquisition of any part of our business.
Other people
where we have your consent or where permitted by law.
Also, if you’ve been invited to use our services by a subscriber, we may share data relating to your use of our services with that subscriber.
8. Personal data retention
We'll retain your personal data for as long as we've a relationship with you and for a period of time afterwards where we have an ongoing business or legal need to keep it. For example, to comply with legal, tax, or accounting requirements. After that, we'll make sure it’s deleted or anonymised.
9. Security
Security is a priority for us when it comes to your personal data. We’re committed to protecting your personal data and have appropriate technical and organisational measures in place to make sure that happens. For more information, check out Xero’s
security pages
.
If you want more detailed information, we’ve produced a Service Organisation Control (SOC 2) report, which is available on request. The SOC 2 report was produced after an independent auditor’s examination of our service controls.
To keep up to date on known phishing and other scams targeting our community, and for information on how to protect yourself from them, sign up to our
security noticeboard.
10. International transfers
When we share personal data, it may be transferred to and processed in countries other than the country you live in—such as Australia, New Zealand and the United States—due to the location of our teams and data hosting locations. These countries may have laws different to the ones that apply in your country. Rest assured, when we transfer personal data to another country, we put safeguards in place to protect your personal data.
11. Your rights
It’s your personal data and you have certain rights relating to it. When it comes to marketing communications, you can ask us not to send you these at any time. Just follow the unsubscribe instructions in the marketing communication or make your request using the details in the ‘How to contact us’ section.
You also have rights to:
Know whether and what personal data we hold about you, and to correct it if it’s inaccurate or out-of-date.
Request a copy of your personal data, or ask us to restrict processing your personal data or delete it.
Object to our continued processing of your personal data.
Not be subject to wholly automated decisions that have legal or significant effects upon you, and to challenge the decision and request a human review.
You can exercise these rights at any time by making a request using the details in the ‘How to contact us’ section.
If you’re not happy with how we are processing your personal data, please get in touch with us using the ‘How to contact us’ section. We’ll review and investigate your complaint, and get back to you within a reasonable time frame. You can also complain to your local data protection authority. They will be able to advise you how to submit a complaint.
12. Updates to this notice
We may update this notice from time to time. If we make a material change, we’ll make sure we let you know, usually by sending you an email or posting a notice on our websites and in our apps.
13. How to contact us
We’re always keen to hear from you. If you’re a current user of our services, you can get in touch via our
privacy at Xero
page. For everyone else, you can contact us at
legalnotices@xero.com
.
14. Additional information if you’re in the EEA or UK
If you’re in the European Economic Area (“EEA”) or United Kingdom (“UK”), this section applies to you in relation to the personal data we process under this notice.
Controllers and representative
UK Controller.
If you’re in the UK, Xero (UK) Limited is the controller of your personal data. Xero (UK) Limited’s address is 5th Floor 100 Avebury Boulevard, Milton Keynes, MK9 1FH, United Kingdom.
EEA Controller.
If you’re in the EEA, Xero (NZ) Limited is the controller of your personal data. Xero (NZ) Limited’s address is 19-23 Taranaki Street, Te Aro, Wellington, 6011, New Zealand.
EU Representative.
Xero (NZ) Limited’s EU representative is Xero Denmark A/S. Xero Denmark A/S’s address is Kuglegårdsvej 7, 1434, Copenhagen K, Denmark.
Legal bases for processing personal data
Below, we’ve set out the legal bases we rely on to process your personal data for the purposes in this notice (for a description of each purpose, see the ‘
How we use your personal data
’ section):
Contractual necessity.
We need certain personal data to provide and support the services we provide under our terms of use.
We rely on this legal basis: to deliver our services, and to communicate with you about our services.
Consent.
We may ask for your consent (separately from any contract between us) before we process your personal data, in which case you can voluntarily choose to give or deny your consent.
We rely on this legal basis: to improve our services, for marketing communications, to personalise content, for personalised advertising, and to run competitions, sweepstakes or surveys.
Legitimate interest.
We may process your personal data for our or a third party’s legitimate business interests. We’ll only do this when we’re confident that a legitimate interest exists and the processing is needed to achieve it. We’ll also make sure your privacy rights are appropriately protected and don’t override the legitimate interest we’ve identified.
We rely on this legal basis: for quality assurance, training and record-keeping, for security management, for compliance management, to improve our services, for marketing communications, to personalise content, for personalised advertising, and to manage legal claims.
Legal obligation.
There may be cases when we must use your personal data to comply with laws or to fulfil certain legal obligations.
We rely on this legal basis: for security management, for compliance management, for legal and regulatory compliance, and to manage legal claims.
International transfers of personal data from the EEA and UK
If you’re in the EEA or UK, we’ll only transfer your personal data to countries that provide adequate protection for EEA and UK personal data (like New Zealand), or to countries where we have appropriate safeguards in place with the recipient to protect your personal data, for example, by entering into “standard contractual clauses” or equivalent terms approved by the relevant authorities. For more information, please contact us using the details in the ‘How to contact us’ section.
Sub-policy 15
https://www.snowflake.com/privacy-policy:
Error loading chunks!
Sub-policy 16
https://www.gooddata.com/legal/#privacy-policy:
Business email address
*
GACID
ReCaptcha Fingerprint
HSGDPRState
Lead Source
Lead Source Detail - OLD
I agree that GoodData may contact me regarding products & promotions.
We collect your personal information here to be able to identify and contact you. Learn more in our Privacy Policy or contact us at privacy@gooddata.com.
You are subscribed now.
Business email address
*
GACID
ReCaptcha Fingerprint
HSGDPRState
Lead Source
Lead Source Detail - OLD
Country/Region
I agree that GoodData may contact me regarding products & promotions.
We collect your personal information here to be able to identify and contact you. Learn more in our Privacy Policy or contact us at privacy@gooddata.com.
Thank you
You are now subscribed to
GoodData’s Updates
.
Cookies help us to improve this website
In order to get the best experience on our website, including its functionality, content relevance and effective advertisement, please accept all cookies, by clicking the “OK” button. See more details in our
Cookie Policy
and manage your Cookie preferences. Thank you.
Manage cookies
Deny all
OK
Manage cookies
GoodData categorizes three types of cookies according to the area they address: Necessary, Website related, and Communications related.
Necessary
(always on)
These cookies are strictly necessary to provide you with services available through our Websites, to analyze traffic and to use some of its features, such as access to secure areas.
Website and content experience
These cookies provide us with information on how our websites are being used, to help us improve the quality and relevance of content we place on them. Additionally, they also allow us to show you embedded videos and remember your preferences and actions, so that the websites do not bother you with the same request repeatedly (e.g. filling a form to download a PDF file and provide feedback about such actions to our affiliated entities).
Communications
These cookies remember what content you visited on our websites, to help us share with you only relevant marketing content that addresses your needs and interests. Our marketing content (i.e. banners) will appear on other websites.
Accept all
Accept only selected
Read cookie policy
Sub-policy 17
https://www.gong.io/privacy-policy/:
Stop losing winnable deals
Boost win rates, increase average deal size, and increase revenue per rep with Gong, the #1 revenue AI platform.
I agree to the
privacy policy
including to Gong using my contact details to contact me for marketing purposes.
Book a demo
This Privacy Policy describes how Gong.io Ltd. and its affiliated companies (collectively, “
Gong
”, “
we
”, “
our
” or “
us
”) collects, stores, uses and discloses the following categories of personal data:
Customer Data
: personal data (as defined in
Section 1
) that we collect, process and manage on behalf of our business customers (each, a “
Customer
”; collectively, “
Customers
”), as part of the Gong products and services described on one or more applicable order forms (“
Platform
”).
We process such Customer Data on behalf of and under the instruction of the respective Customer, in accordance with our
Data Processing Addendum
with them. Accordingly, this Privacy Policy (which describes Gong’s privacy and data processing practices) does not apply to the privacy and data processing practices of our Customers. To learn about the privacy policy and practices of our Customers, please contact them directly.
User Data
: personal data concerning individuals acting on behalf of our Customers in respect of their engagement with Gong, and users of the Platform on behalf of such Customers, e.g., the account administrators and users, billing contacts and authorized signatories on behalf of the Customer (collectively, “
Users
”); as well as the Customer’s business needs and preferences, as identified to us or recognized through our engagement with them;
Prospect Data
: data relating to visitors of our website (www.gong.io), participants at our events, and any other prospective customer, user or partner (collectively, “
Prospects
”) who visits or otherwise interacts with our website, online ads and content, emails, integrations or communications under our control (the “
Sites
”, and collectively with the Platform, the “
Services
”).
Specifically, this Privacy Policy describes our practices regarding:
Data Collection & Processing
Data Uses
Data Location
Data Retention
Data Disclosure
Cookies and Data Collection Technologies
Communications
Data Security
Data Subject Rights
Data Controller/Processor
Opt-Out of Sale/Sharing
Additional Notice & Contact Details
If you are a
Customer
,
User
or
Prospect
, please read this Privacy Policy carefully and make sure that you fully understand it.
Our Services are designed for businesses and are not intended for personal or household use. Accordingly, we treat all personal data covered by this Privacy Policy, including information about any visitors to our Sites, as pertaining to individuals acting as business representatives, rather than in their personal capacity.
You are not legally required to provide us with any personal data. If you do not wish to provide us with your personal data, or to have it processed by us or any of our Service Providers (as defined below), please do not provide it to us and avoid any interaction with us or with our Sites, or use our Services.
1. Data Collection & Processing
When we use the terms “
personal data
” or “
personal information
” in this Privacy Policy, we mean information that identifies, relates to, describes, is reasonably capable of being associated with, or could reasonably be linked, directly or indirectly, to an individual. It does not include aggregated or deidentified information that is maintained in a form that is not reasonably capable of being associated with or linked to an individual.
Sometimes we collect personal data automatically when an individual interacts with our Services  or Sites (such as through our website chat feature) and sometimes we collect personal data directly from an individual. At times, we may collect personal data about an individual from other sources and third parties (such as our Customers and Service Providers), even before our first direct interaction. Gong does not collect, use, or disclose sensitive personal data.
We may collect or generate the following types of personal data about individuals through the Services:
Usage, login credentials, and device information
concerning Users and Prospects (connectivity, technical and aggregated usage data, such as user agent, IP addresses and approximate location based upon such IP addresses, device data (like type, OS, device id, browser version, locale and language settings used), activity logs, session recordings, log-in credentials to the Services, the cookies and pixels installed or utilized on their device, and inferred or presumed data generated from their use of the Services);
Information concerning our Customers, Users and Prospects
contact and business details such as name, email, phone number, position, workplace and related business insights, our communications with such individuals (correspondences, sensory information including call and video recordings, and transcriptions and analyses thereof), feedback and testimonials received, contractual and billing details, as well as any expressed, presumed or identified needs, preferences, attributes and insights relevant to our potential or existing engagement);
Personal data contained in Customer Data
which is provided by our Customers or processed on their behalf and under their instruction. This may include any of the types of personal data described above (with respect to Users or other individuals whose data is contained in the Customer Data), in accordance with our
Data Processing Addendum
with them.
For the purposes of the California Consumer Privacy Act (“CCPA”), in the last 12 months, we may have collected the following categories of Personal Information, as defined in the CCPA: identifiers; customer record information; internet or other electronic network activity information; professional or employment-related information; geolocation data; commercial information; inferences; and audio, electronic, and visual information.
2. Data Uses
We use personal data as necessary for the performance of our Services (“
Performance of Contract
”); to comply with our legal and contractual obligations (“
Legal Obligation
”); and to support our legitimate interests in maintaining and improving our Services, e.g., in understanding how our Services are used and how our campaigns are performing, and gaining insights which help us dedicate our resources and efforts more efficiently; in marketing, advertising and selling our Services; providing customer service and technical support; and protecting and securing our Customers, Users, Prospects, ourselves and our Services (“
Legitimate Interests
”).
If you reside or are using the Services in a territory governed by privacy laws under which “consent” is the only or most appropriate legal basis for the processing of personal data as described herein (in general, or specifically with respect to the types of personal data you expect or elect to process or have processed by us or via the Services, or due to nature of such processing) (“
Consent
”), your acceptance of our
Terms and Conditions
and this Privacy Policy will be deemed as your consent to the processing of your personal data for all purposes detailed in this Policy, unless applicable law requires a different form of consent. If you wish to revoke such consent, please contact us at privacy@gong.io.
Specifically, we use personal data for the following business and commercial purposes (and in reliance on the legal bases for processing noted next to them, as appropriate):
Customer and User personal data
To facilitate, operate, enhance, and provide our Services (
Performance of Contract; Legitimate Interests
);
To provide our Customers and Users with assistance and support, to test and monitor the Services, or diagnose or fix technology problems, and to train our Customers and Customer-facing staff (
Performance of Contract; Legitimate Interests
);
To personalize our Services, including by recognizing an individual and remembering their information when they return to our Services, and to provide further localization and personalization capabilities to make our Services easier to use (
Performance of Contract; Legitimate Interests
);
Where a Customer has enabled the optional ‘voice identification’ feature within the Platform, and their User(s) then specifically opt-in and consent to the activation of this feature in their own calls and meetings recorded through the Platform (through the designated opt-in process following the Customer-level enabling of this feature), then such recordings may be used to identify and note such Users’ participation on such recorded calls and meetings, until the feature is deactivated by the User or the Customer’s account administrator (
Consent
);
To facilitate and optimize our marketing campaigns, ad management and sales operations, and to manage and deliver advertisements for our products and services more effectively, including on other websites and applications. Such activities allow us to highlight the benefits of using our Services, and thereby increase your engagement and overall satisfaction with our Services. This includes contextual, behavioral and interests-based advertising based on your activity, preferences or other data available to us or to our business partners (
Legitimate Interests; Consent
);
To facilitate, sponsor and offer certain events, contests and promotions (
Legitimate Interests
).
Customer, User and Prospect personal data
To gain a better understanding on how individuals use and interact with our Services, which content and data they have processed through our Services, and how we could improve their and others’ user experience and the value they can generate from using the Services, so we could continue improving our products, offerings and the overall performance of our Services, including through the utilization and optimization of Artificial Intelligence and Machine Learning capabilities (
Legitimate Interests
);
To contact our Customers, Users and Prospects with general or personalized service-related messages, as well as promotional messages that may be of specific interest to them (
Performance of Contract; Legitimate Interests; Consent
);
To support and enhance our data security measures, including for the purposes of preventing and mitigating the risks of fraud, error or any illegal, criminal or prohibited activity (
Performance of Contract; Legitimate Interests; Legal Obligation
);
To create aggregated statistical data, inferred non-personal data, or anonymized or pseudonymized data (rendered non-personal and non-identifiable), which we or our business partners may use to provide and improve our respective services, or for any other purpose (
Legitimate Interests
);
To enforce our
Terms and Conditions
, to resolve disputes, to carry out our obligations and enforce our rights, and to protect our business interests and the interests and rights of third parties (
Legitimate Interests
);
To comply with our contractual and legal obligations and requirements, and maintain our compliance with applicable laws, regulations and standards (
Performance of Contract; Legitimate Interests; Legal Obligation
); and
For any other lawful purpose, or other purpose that you consent to (
Legal Obligation; Consent
).
3. Data Location
We and our authorized Service Providers (defined below) maintain, store and process personal data in the United States of America, Europe, Israel and other locations, as reasonably necessary for the proper performance and delivery of our Services, or as may be required by law.
While privacy laws may vary between jurisdictions, Gong is committed to protect personal data in accordance with this Privacy Policy and customary industry standards, and such appropriate lawful mechanisms and contractual terms requiring adequate data protection, regardless of any lesser legal requirements that may apply in the jurisdiction to which such data is transferred.
Gong.io Ltd. is headquartered in Israel, a jurisdiction which is considered by the European Commission, the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC), and the UK Secretary of State to be offering an adequate level of protection for the personal data of residents of the European Economic Area (“EEA”), Switzerland and the UK, respectively. We transfer personal data from the EEA, Switzerland and the UK to Israel on this basis.
Gong.io Inc., our US subsidiary, complies with the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (EU-U.S. DPF), the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF, and the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework (Swiss-U.S. DPF) as set forth by the U.S. Department of Commerce and will be further liable in cases of onward transfers of your personal data to third parties (including our Service Providers).
Gong.io Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the EU-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (EU-U.S. DPF Principles) regarding the processing of personal data received from the European Union in reliance on the EU-U.S. DPF, and from the United Kingdom (and Gibraltar) in reliance on the UK Extension to the EU-U.S. DPF.
Gong.io Inc. has certified to the U.S. Department of Commerce that it adheres to the Swiss-U.S. Data Privacy Framework Principles (Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles) regarding the processing of personal data received from Switzerland in reliance on the Swiss-U.S. DPF.
If there is any conflict between the terms in this policy and the EU-U.S. DPF Principles and/or the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, the Principles shall govern for personal data transferred under the DPF. To learn more about the Data Privacy Framework (DPF) program, and to view our certification, please visit https://www.dataprivacyframework.gov/.
For data transfers from the EEA, Switzerland or the UK to countries which are not considered to be offering an adequate level of data protection, we and the relevant data exporters and importers have entered into Standard Contractual Clauses as approved by the European Commission, FDPIC and UK Information Commissioner’s Office (ICO). You can obtain a copy of these clauses by contacting us as indicated in
Section ‎11
below.
4. Data Retention
We retain personal data for as long as we deem it as reasonably necessary in order to maintain and expand our relationship and provide you with our Services and offerings; in order to comply with our legal and contractual obligations; or to protect ourselves from any potential disputes (i.e., as required by laws applicable to log-keeping, records and bookkeeping, and in order to have proof and evidence concerning our relationship, should any legal issues arise following your discontinuance of use), all in accordance with our data retention policy.
To determine the appropriate retention period for personal data, we consider the amount, nature, and sensitivity of the personal data, the potential risk of harm from unauthorized use or disclosure of your personal data, the purposes for which we process your personal data and the applicable legal requirements.
If you have any questions about our data retention policy, please contact us by e-mail at
privacy@gong.io
.
5. Data Disclosure
We disclose personal data in the following ways:
Service Providers
: We engage selected third-party companies and individuals to perform services on our behalf or complementary to our own. Such service providers may include hosting and server co-location services, communications and content delivery networks (CDNs), data security services, billing and payment processing services, fraud detection and prevention services, web and product analytics, e-mail distribution and monitoring services, session or activity recording services, remote access services, content transcription and analysis services, our website chat feature, performance measurement, data optimization and marketing services, social and advertising networks, content and data enrichment providers, event production and hosting services, e-mail, voicemails, support, enablement and customer relation management systems, and our legal, financial and compliance advisors (collectively, “
Service Providers
“). Our Service Providers may have access to personal information, depending on each of their specific roles and purposes in facilitating and enhancing our Services, and may only use the data as determined in our agreements with them.
Partnerships
: We engage selected business and channel partners, resellers, distributors and providers of professional services related to our Services, which allow us to explore and pursue growth opportunities by facilitating a stronger local presence and tailored experiences for our Customers, Users and Prospects. In such instances, we may share relevant contact, business and usage details with the respective partner, to allow them to engage with those entities and individuals for such purposes. If you directly engage with any of our partners, please note that any aspect of that engagement which is not directly related to the Services and directed by Gong is beyond the scope of Gong’s Terms and Conditions and Privacy Policy, and may therefore be covered by the partner’s terms and privacy policy.
Service Integrations
: You may choose to use a third-party service to integrate with our Services, for example in order to upload or retrieve personal data to or from the Services, or to enrich the data you have processed on either service or enhance your usage thereof (provided that such integration is supported by our Services). The provider of this integrated third-party service may receive certain relevant data about or from your account on the Services, or share certain relevant data from your account on the third-party provider’s service with our Services, depending on the nature and purpose of such integration. This could include your Customer Data and/or User Data. Note that we do not receive or store your passwords for any of these third-party services (but do typically require your API key in order to integrate with them).
Event Sponsors
: If you attend an event or webinar organized by us, or download or access an asset on our Sites related to such an event, webinar or other activity involving third-party sponsors or presenters, we may share your personal data with them. If required by applicable law, you may consent to such sharing via the registration form or by allowing your attendee badge to be scanned at a sponsor booth. In these circumstances, your personal data will be subject to the sponsors’ privacy statements. If you do not wish for your personal data to be shared, you may choose to not opt-in via event/webinar registration or elect to not have your badge scanned, or you can opt-out in accordance with
Section
‎
9
below;
Business Customers
: Our Customers have access to any personal data we process on their behalf in our capacity as a “processor” or a “service provider.”
Legal Compliance
: We may disclose or allow government and law enforcement officials access to your personal data, in response to a subpoena, search warrant or court order (or similar requirement), or in compliance with applicable laws and regulations. Such disclosure or access may occur if we believe in good faith that: (a) we are legally compelled to do so; (b) disclosure is appropriate in connection with efforts to investigate, prevent, or take action regarding actual or suspected illegal activity, fraud, or other wrongdoing; or (c) such disclosure is required to protect our legitimate business interests, including the security or integrity of our products and services.
Protecting Rights and Safety
: We may share personal data with others if we believe in good faith that this will help protect the rights, property or personal safety of Gong, any of our Users or Customers, or any members of the general public.
Gong Subsidiaries and Affiliated Companies
: We may share personal data internally within our group, for the purposes described in this Privacy Policy. In addition, should Gong or any of its subsidiaries or affiliates undergo any change in control or ownership, including by means of merger, acquisition or purchase of substantially all or part of its assets, personal data may be shared with or transferred to the parties involved in such an event. We may disclose personal data to a third party during negotiation of, in connection with or as an asset in such a corporate business transaction. Personal data may also be disclosed in the event of insolvency, bankruptcy or receivership.
For the avoidance of doubt, Gong may share personal data in additional manners, pursuant to your explicit approval, or if we are legally obligated to do so, or if we have successfully rendered such data non-personal, non-identifiable and anonymous. We may transfer, share or otherwise use non-personal and non-identifiable data at our sole discretion and without the need for further approval.
For the purposes of the CCPA, in the past 12 months, we may have disclosed the following categories of Personal Information, as defined in the CCPA: identifiers; customer record information; internet or other electronic network activity information; professional or employment-related information; geolocation data; commercial information; inferences; and audio, electronic and visual information to Service Providers, partnerships, service integrations, Gong subsidiaries and affiliated companies, for legal compliance, or to protect rights and safety. We may have disclosed identifiers and customer record information to event sponsors. We do so in pursuit of the business and commercial purposes described in
Section 2
above.
6. Cookies and Data Collection Technologies
We and our Service Providers use cookies, pixels and other technologies to enable and improve the Services we provide, to track the performance of our Sites, perform analytics and gain insights on the use of our Services and the performance of our activities, and for personalization purposes.
Cookies are packets of information sent to your web browser and then sent back by the browser each time it accesses the server that sent the cookie. Some cookies are removed when you close your browser session. These are the “Session Cookies”. Some last for longer periods and are called “Persistent Cookies”. We use both types.
We use “Persistent Cookies” to remember your log-in details and make it easier for you to log-in the next time you access the Platform. We may use this type of cookies and Session Cookies for additional purposes, to facilitate the use of the Services’ features and tools.
Some cookies are necessary for the Services to function properly, and cannot be declined or disabled unless you delete and block them through your web browser settings. Other cookies, which are used for functional, performance, analytics and marketing purposes, are optional. These include web analytics tools, including Google Analytics, Mixpanel and Mouseflow. These tools help us understand Users’ behavior on our Services, including by tracking page content, and click/touch, movements, scrolls and keystroke activities. Further information about the privacy practices of our analytics service providers is available at: www.google.com/policies/privacy/partners/; https://mixpanel.com/terms/ and https://mouseflow.com/terms/. Further information about your option to opt-out of these analytics services is available at: https://tools.google.com/dlpage/gaoptout; https://mixpanel.com/optout; and https://mouseflow.com/opt-out/.
You may opt-in or opt-out to the use of such optional cookies through the “
Your Privacy Choices
” feature available on our website. If you choose to opt-out of certain cookies, this will typically generate a new cookie which will preserve your choice, and indicate it to our Services in your next visits so that the cookies you opted-out of will not be utilized. You can also manage your cookies preferences, and accept, remove or entirely block cookies, through your browser settings. Certain web browsers may transmit “Do Not Track” signals to websites with which the browser communicates. However, due to differences in how web browsers interpret this feature and send those signals, and lack of standardization, we currently do not respond to such “Do Not Track” signals.
Please note that if you get a new device, install a new browser, erase or otherwise alter your browser’s cookie file (including upgrading certain browsers), you may also clear the opt-out cookies installed once you opt-out, so an additional opt-out will be necessary to prevent additional tracking.
7. Communications
We engage in service and promotional communications, through e-mail, phone, SMS and notifications.
Service Communications
: We may contact you with important information regarding our Services. For example, we may send you notifications (through any of the means available to us) of changes or updates to our Services, billing issues, log-in attempts or password reset notices, etc. If you are registered as a User to our Services, you can typically control your communications and notifications settings from your profile settings, or otherwise in accordance with the instructions included in the communications sent to you. Please note that you will not be able to opt out of receiving certain service communications which are integral to your use (like password resets or billing notices).
Promotional Communications
: We may also notify you about new features, additional offerings, events, special opportunities or any other information we think you will find valuable, as our Customer, User or Prospect. We may provide such notices through any of the contact means available to us (e.g., phone, mobile or e-mail), through the Services, or through our marketing campaigns on any other sites or platforms.
If you do not wish to receive such promotional communications, you may notify Gong at any time by sending an e-mail to:
privacy@gong.io
, changing your communications preferences in your profile settings whilst being logged as a User to our Services, or by following the “unsubscribe”, “stop”, “opt-out” or “change e-mail preferences” instructions contained in the promotional communications you receive.
8. Data Security
We implement systems, applications and procedures designed to secure your personal data, to minimize the risks of theft, damage, loss of information, or unauthorized access or use of information. However, we cannot guarantee that our Sites or Services will be immune from any wrongdoings, malfunctions, unlawful interceptions or access, or other kinds of abuse and misuse.
To learn more, please visit
https://www.gong.io/trust-center/security/
.
9. Data Subject Rights
Individuals have rights concerning their personal data. Please contact us by e-mail at:
privacy@gong.io
if you wish to exercise your privacy rights under any applicable law, including the EU or UK General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), the Brazilian Data Protection Act (LGPD), the CCPA, or the Swiss Federal Act on Data Protection (FADP) . Such rights may include – to the extent applicable – the right to know/request access to (specific pieces of personal data collected; categories of personal data collected; categories of sources from whom the personal data was collected; purpose of collecting personal data; categories of third parties with whom we have shared personal data), to request rectification or erasure of your personal data held with Gong, or to restrict or object to such personal data processing (including the right to direct us not to sell or share your personal data to third parties now or in the future, as described below), or to port such personal data, or the right to equal services and prices (e.g., freedom from discrimination) (each to the extent available to you under the laws which apply to you). If you are a GDPR-protected individual, you also have the right to lodge a complaint with the relevant supervisory authority in the EU or the UK, as applicable. If you are an LGPD-protected individual, you also have the rights to confirmation of existence of processing; to request review of decisions made solely based on automatic decisions that affect your interests; to lodge a complaint with the supervisory authority and with consumer protection authorities in Brazil.
To the extent applicable to you, you may also designate an authorized agent, in writing or through a power of attorney, to request to exercise your privacy rights on your behalf. The authorized agent may submit a request to exercise these rights by emailing us.
Please note that when you or an authorized agent ask us to exercise any of your rights under this policy or applicable law, we may need to ask you to provide us certain credentials to make sure that you are who you claim you are, to avoid disclosure to you of personal data related to others and to ask you to provide further information to better understand the nature and scope of data that you request to access. If your request relates to personal data that may be processed on our Customer’s behalf, as their “data processor” or “service provider” (as further explained in
Section 10
below), note that such Customer exclusively determines how such data is processed, as well as if and how your request should be handled – so we advise that you submit your request directly to them. We will not fulfill your request unless you have provided sufficient information that enables us to reasonably verify that you are the individual about whom we collected the personal data, or that such data is processed on behalf of one of our Customers, so that we may forward it to such Customer for their further handling. Such additional information may be then retained by us for legal purposes (e.g., as proof of the identity of the person submitting the request, or proof of request fulfillment).
We may redact from the data which we will make available to you, any personal data or confidential information related to others.
In compliance with the EU-U.S. DPF, and the UK Extension of the EU-U.S. DPP and the Swiss-U.S. DPF Principles, we commit to resolve complaints about our collection or use of your Personal Information. EEA, UK and Swiss individuals with inquiries or complaints regarding our Data Privacy Framework compliance should submit inquiries to
dpo@gong.io
. If you do not receive timely acknowledgment of your DPF Principles-related complaint from us, or if we have not addressed your DPF Principles-related complaint to your satisfaction, Gong.io, Inc. has further committed to cooperate with EU Data Protection Authorities (DPAs), the UK Information Commissioner Office (UK ICO), and the Swiss Federal Data Protection and Information Commissioner (FDPIC) to independently address complaints that we have been unable to resolve.
Please note that under certain conditions (as described under the DPF Principles that Gong.io Inc. adheres to), you can invoke a binding arbitration by delivering a notice to us via
dpo@gong.io
. Please also note that Gong.io Inc. is subject to the investigatory and enforcement powers of the Federal Trade Commission (FTC).
10. Data Controller/Processor
Certain data protection laws and regulations, such as the EU GDPR, UK GDPR, Brazilian Data Protection Act, and the CCPA, typically distinguish between two main roles for parties processing personal data: the “data controller” (or under the CCPA, “business”), who determines the purposes and means of processing; and the “data processor” (or under the CCPA, “service provider”), who processes the data on behalf of the data controller (or business). Below we explain how these roles apply to our Services, to the extent that such laws and regulations apply.
Gong is the “data controller” of Prospect Data. With respect to such data, we assume the responsibilities of data controller (solely to the extent applicable under law), as set forth in this Privacy Policy. In such instances, our Service Providers processing such data will assume the role of “data processor”.
Gong is the “data processor” of Customer Data, which we process on behalf of our Customer (who is the “data controller” of such data); and our Service Providers who process such Customer Data on our behalf are the “sub-processors” of such data.
Gong is both a “data controller” and “data processor” of User Data. Such data is processed by Gong for its own purposes (as described in
Section 2
above), as an independent ‘controller’; whilst those certain portions of it which are included in Customer Data will be processed by us on our Customer’s behalf, as a ‘processor’.
Accordingly, Gong processes Customer Data strictly in accordance with our Customer’s reasonable instructions and as further stipulated in our Data Processing Addendum and other commercial agreements with such Customer.
Our Customers are solely responsible for determining whether and how they wish to use our Services, and for ensuring that all individuals using the Services on the Customer’s behalf or at their request, as well as all individuals whose personal data may be included in Customer Data processed through the Services, have been provided with adequate notice and given informed consent to the processing of their personal data, where such consent is necessary or advised, and that all legal requirements applicable to the collection, recording, use or other processing of data through our Services are fully met by the Customer, including specifically in the context of an employment relationship. Our Customers are also responsible for handling data subject rights requests under applicable law, by their Users and other individuals whose data they process through the Services.
11. Opt-Out of Sale/Sharing
Under some US data protection laws, like the CCPA, our disclosure of certain internet activity and device information with third parties through cookies on our website may be considered a “sale” or “sharing” of personal information. We do so in pursuit of the business and commercial purposes described in
Section 2
above.
For the purposes of the CCPA, in the last 12 months we may have “sold” or “shared” Internet or other electronic network activity information, Geolocation data, Commercial information, and Inferences with our analytics and advertising Service Providers. Gong has not knowingly sold or shared the personal information of individuals under the age of 16.
You may opt out of all Cookies that may result in a “sale” and/or “sharing” of your personal information in the following ways:
Click the
“Your Privacy Choices”
button (available in our website’s footer), move the toggle switch next to “Share or Sale of Personal Information” to grey (disabled), then click the “Confirm my Choices” button.
Please note: If you visit us from a different device or browser, or clear cookies, then you need to return to this screen to re-select your preferences.
Set the
Global Privacy Control (GPC)
for each participating browser system that you use to opt out of the use of third-party Advertising or other cookies (instructions on how to download and use GPC are available
here
).
12. Additional Notices & Contact Details
Updates and Amendments
: We may update and amend this Privacy Policy from time to time by posting an amended version on our Services. The amended version will be effective as of the date it is published. We will provide prior notice if we believe that the changes involved materially alter your rights, via any of the communication means available to us or via the Services. After such notice period, all amendments shall be deemed accepted by you.
External Links
: While our Services may contain links to other websites or services, we are not responsible for their privacy practices. We encourage you to pay attention when you leave our Services for the website or application of such third parties, and to read the privacy policies of each and every website and service you visit. This Privacy Policy applies only to our Services.
Children
: Our Services are not designed to attract children under the age of 16. We do not knowingly collect personal data from children and do not wish to do so. If we learn that a person under the age of 16 is using the Services, we will attempt to prohibit and block such use and will make our best efforts to promptly delete any personal data stored with us with regard to such child. If you believe that we might have any such data, please contact us by e-mail at
privacy@gong.io
.
Data Protection Officer
: Gong has appointed Mr. Aner Rabinovitz of PrivacyTeam Ltd. as our Data Protection Officer (DPO), for monitoring and advising on Gong’s ongoing privacy compliance and serving as a point of contact on privacy matters for data subjects and supervisory authorities. If you have any comments or questions regarding our Privacy Policy, if you have any concerns regarding your Privacy, or if you wish to make a complaint about how your personal data is being processed by Gong, you can contact
privacy@gong.io
or our DPO at
dpo@gong.io
.
EU and UK Representative
: Maetzler Rechtsanwalts GmbH & Co KG (Prighter) has been designated as Gong’s representative in the European Union for data protection matters pursuant to Article 27 of the GDPR. Prighter Ltd has been designated as Gong’s representative in the United Kingdom for data protection matters pursuant to Article 27 of the UK GDPR. Inquiries regarding our EU & UK privacy practices may be sent by e-mail to privacy@gong.io or via mail. To make an inquiry by mail, please visit the following page:
https://prighter.com/q/18226468565
.
Contacting Us
: If you have any comments or questions regarding our Privacy Policy, or if you have any concerns regarding your personal data held with us, please contact Gong’s support at
help@gong.io
or our Data Protection Officer at
dpo@gong.io
.
Last updated: March 2024.
Sub-policy 18
https://www.hotjar.com/privacy/:
Are you an agency specialized in UX, digital marketing, or growth? Join our
Partner Program
Close banner
Hotjar Logo
Products
Solutions
Pricing
Case studies
Resources
Contact Sales
Sign in
Get started
English
Language
Get started
Toggle navigation menu
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Company / Privacy
Your privacy & Hotjar
From day one, Hotjar was designed and built with privacy in mind. We wanted to help our customers improve their websites and create better user experiences, while keeping privacy at the core of our software—and we’ve been doing it since 2014.
Today, Hotjar is used on over 900,000 websites in 180+ countries. We believe we have a responsibility to set the example and protect not just the privacy of our customers, but also that of the people who visit their websites—in other words: you.
Improving websites, for you.
Online businesses use Hotjar to create better website experiences.
Nobody wants to waste their time on a website that is confusing and hard to navigate.
You know it, we know it, and website owners know it too—which is why they turn to Hotjar.
Website owners use Hotjar to better understand user behavior: what actions people take on a website, what elements of a page they click or ignore, what they enjoy, where they struggle. With this insight, website owners can then make changes that improve the overall experience for all website users. And that includes you.
Show more
We record interactions, not your sensitive data.
Hotjar is designed for websites to get insights. And respect your privacy.
When you browse a website that has Hotjar installed, we collect data about your interactions (e.g. where you click, scroll your mouse, move in between pages) and use it to create visual representations of the experience. Website owners get these insights without tracking IP/MAC addresses-- the stuff that relates to the device you use.
Some Hotjar tools, like session recordings, reconstruct the individual actions you took during a website visit; others, like heatmaps, aggregate data points from you and hundreds of other visitors in one report.
But in all cases, by default, sensitive data that you might enter on the site (your credit card details or phone numbers) will never reach our servers: we cannot see it, and neither can the website owner. Hotjar customers viewing a session recording will only see asterisks (‘***’ ) instead of numbers.
For more information, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
We will never share or sell your data.
Not to advertisers. Not to third-party services. Not to anyone.
Nobody here at Hotjar likes the idea of tools following us around different websites or companies sharing and selling our data without our permission. We are committed to making sure this doesn’t happen to you, either.
Hotjar is designed to help make websites easier to use, and the data we track about your website visit (for example, what and where you click) is only used for this purpose. We don’t follow you around the Internet: website owners who use Hotjar cannot see or find out about your activity on sites they don’t own. Likewise, we don’t harvest personal data or sell it to anyone, ever, for any reason. Nor do we mine it for profiling or advertising purposes.
To learn more about data privacy, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Request and access your data, anytime.
Your data is stored securely, and you can ask to see it whenever you want.
As a website visitor, you have the right to request access to the personal identifiable information a website owner collected and stored about you. You also have the right to request that this information is deleted.
At any time, you can request a website owner who uses Hotjar to give you access to your data. They can run a search for personal data from inside the Hotjar dashboard; the system will then generate and email you a report that lets you view, and delete, any data connected with you.
To learn more about data privacy and accessing your data, head over to our
Privacy FAQs.
Show more
Tracking: we'll always give you options.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you prefer websites not to track data about your visit, we can help.
If you want to stop a website using Hotjar from collecting data about your visit, you should know that the website owner is responsible for getting your consent to collect and process data about your visit (and must allow you to withdraw that consent as well).
But we understand that you might want Hotjar (and other tools) to not process data about you regardless of whether a site owner asks for permission or not, so we want to give you an extra option. If you put a ‘Do Not Track’ flag on your browser, Hotjar will look for it before we collect any data about your site visit. Not everybody does that, but we do.
For more information about this take a look at our
guide on how ‘Do Not Track’ in your browser works
.
Show more
Compliance commitment: GDPR, CCPA, and more.
Our customers can use Hotjar in a compliant manner, for you.
We have followed a ‘privacy by design’ approach since our very first day, back in 2014, so we’re big supporters of privacy acts and regulations like the General Data Protection Regulation (GDPR), the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA), and the Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados (LGPD) that enhance your privacy rights and protection as a consumer.
We have built the necessary controls around anonymity and consent to make sure website owners who use Hotjar can do it in a compliant manner. Plus, our legal team is fully committed to keeping up-to-date with any changes in the law and making sure they are reflected in our product.
You can read more about GDPR, CCPA, LGPD, and our other commitments over in our
Compliance resources.
Show more
Questions? We’ve got you covered.
From FAQs to in-depth resources - our help center has everything you need to know about Hotjar relating to privacy, compliance, legal, and security.
Take me there
Cookies on hotjar.com website
We use cookies to provide visitors with the best possible experience on our website. These include analytics, functionality, and targeting cookies, which may also be used in our marketing efforts. Click the button to agree to the use of cookies or click ‘Cookie settings’ to manage your preferences.
Cookie Policy
Cookie settings
Reject All
Accept
Manage Consent Preferences for Hotjar.com
Cookies help us understand how visitors use our website so we can provide an enhanced browsing experience. For more information on the cookies we use, see our
Cookie Policy
Allow All
Always Active
These cookies are necessary for the website to function and cannot be switched off in our systems. They are usually only set in response to actions made by you which amount to a request for services, such as setting your privacy preferences, logging in or filling in forms.    You can set your browser to block or alert you about these cookies, but some parts of the site will not then work. These cookies do not store any personally identifiable information.
Cookies Details‎
Functional Cookies
These cookies enable the website to provide enhanced functionality and personalisation. They may be set by us or by third party providers whose services we have added to our pages.    If you do not allow these cookies then some or all of these services may not function properly.
Cookies Details‎
Performance Cookies
These cookies allow us to count visits and traffic sources so we can measure and improve the performance of our site. They help us to know which pages are the most and least popular and see how visitors move around the site.    All information these cookies collect is aggregated and therefore anonymous. If you do not allow these cookies we will not know when you have visited our site, and will not be able to monitor its performance.
Cookies Details‎
Targeting Cookies
These cookies may be set through our site by our advertising partners. They may be used by those companies to build a profile of your interests and show you relevant adverts on other sites.    They do not store directly personal information, but are based on uniquely identifying your browser and internet device. If you do not allow these cookies, you will experience less targeted advertising.
Cookies Details‎
Back Button
Cookie List
Search Icon
Filter Icon
Clear
checkbox label
label
Apply
Cancel
Consent
Leg.Interest
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
checkbox label
label
Sub-policy 19
https://www.facebook.com/about/privacy/:
Notice
You must log in to continue.
Log Into Facebook
You must log in to continue.
Log In
Forgot account?
·
Sign up for Facebook
English (US)
Gaeilge
Polski
Lietuvių
Português (Brasil)
Русский
Română
Español
Français (France)
Deutsch
Italiano
Meta © 2025
Allow the use of cookies from Facebook on this browser?
We use cookies and similar technologies to help provide and improve content on
Meta Products
. We also use them to provide a safer experience by using information we receive from cookies on and off Facebook, and to provide and improve Meta Products for people who have an account.
Essential cookies: These cookies are required to use Meta Products and are necessary for our sites to work as intended.
Cookies from other companies: We use these cookies to show you ads off of Meta Products and to provide features like maps and videos on Meta Products. These cookies are optional.
You have control over the optional cookies we use. Learn more about cookies and how we use them, and review or change your choices at any time in our
Cookies Policy
.
About cookies
What are cookies?
Learn more
Why do we use cookies?
Learn more
What are Meta Products?
Learn more
Your cookie choices
Learn more
Cookies from other companies
We use cookies from
other companies
in order to show you ads off of our Products, and provide features like maps, payment services and video.
Choose cookies by category
How we use these cookies
If you allow these cookies
If you don't allow these cookies
Other ways you can control your information
Manage your ad experience in Accounts Center
More information about online advertising
Controlling cookies with browser settings
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Allow all cookies
Decline optional cookies
Sub-policy 20
https://privacy.microsoft.com/PrivacyStatement:
This is the Trace Id: ada03cd34c222b252fff45f2e2d67099
Ráiteas Príobháideachais Microsoft
An nuashonrú deireanach: Márta 2025
Nuacht
Priontáil
Fairsingigh gach ceann
Leacaigh Uile
Ráiteas Príobháideachais Microsoft
Sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid
Conas a úsáidimid sonraí pearsanta
Na fáthanna a gcomhroinnimid sonraí pearsanta
Conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú
Cuacha agus teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla
Táirgí arna gcur ar fáil ag d'eagraíocht—fógra d'úsáideoirí deiridh
cuntas Microsoft
Sonraí a bhailiú ó leanaí
Faisnéis thábhachtach eile maidir le príobháideacht
Slándáil sonraí pearsanta
An áit a stórálaimid agus a bpróiseálaimid sonraí pearsanta
Sonraí pearsanta a choinneáil
Príobháideacht Sonraí Stáit SAM
Fógraíocht
Teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte
Eisiúintí réamhamhairc nó eisiúintí saor in aisce
Athruithe ar an ráiteas príobháideachais seo
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
Sonraí saintáirge:
Intleacht Shaorga agus cumas Microsoft Copilot
Táirgí fiontraíochta agus forbróra
Seirbhísí fiontair ar líne
Bogearraí fiontraíochta agus forbróra agus feistis fiontraíochta
Táirgí táirgiúlachta agus cumarsáide
Microsoft 365, Office agus feidhmchláir tháirgiúlachta eile
Teaghlach Microsoft
Microsoft Launcher
Microsoft Teams
OneDrive
Outlook
Skype
Surface
Surface Duo
LinkedIn
Cuardaigh agus brabhsáil
Bing
Microsoft Edge
Microsoft Translator
SwiftKey
Windows
Gníomhachtú
Stair gníomhaíochtaí
ID fógraíochta
Diagnóisic
Tairiscintí pearsantaithe
Lárionad Aiseolais
Faigh Cabhair
Foscríbhinní beo
Seirbhísí suímh, brath gluaisne, agus taifeadadh
Reacaire
Nasc fóin - Nasc le Windows
Eispéiris thrasghléis
Gnéithe slándála agus sábháilteachta
Caint, gníomhachtú gutha, breacadh dúigh agus clóscríobh
Socruithe sioncronaithe agus cúltaca
Seirbhísí Nuashonrúcháin
Brabhsálaithe Gréasáin—Oidhreacht Microsoft Edge agus Internet Explorer
Gnéithe AI Windows
Feidhmchláir Windows
Windows Hello
Windows Search
Siamsaíocht agus seirbhísí gaolmhara
Xbox
Microsoft Store
Microsoft Start
Silverlight
Réaltacht mheasctha Windows
Cuacha
Baineann formhór shuíomhanna Microsoft feidhm as fianáin, ar comhaid bheaga téacs iad a chuirtear ar do ghléas a úsáideann do na freastalaithe gréasáin san fhearann a chuir na fianán ann iad a fháil ar ais níos déanaí. Is féidir go mbainfimid feidhm as fianáin chun do shainroghanna agus do shocruithe a stóráil, cuidiú le síniú isteach, fógraí pearsantaithe a sholáthair agus anailís a dhéanamh ar hoibríochtaí suímh. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil, amharc ar an rannán
Fianáin agus teicneolaíochtaí chomhchosúla
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Creataí Príobháideachta Sonraí AE-S.A., síneadh RA, agus hEilvéis-S.A.
Comhlíonann Microsoft Creataí Príobháideachta Sonraí AE-S.A., síneadh RA chuig an AE-S.A., chomh maith le hEilvéis-S.A. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil, féach an rannán
Cá stórálaimid agus próiseálaimid sonraí pearsanta
, agus
tabhair cuairt ar láithreán gréasáin Chreat Príobháideachais Sonraí na Roinne Tráchtála sna Stáit Aontaithe.
Sonraí teagmhála
Má tá údar imní agat maidir le príobháideacht, gearán, nó ceist le cur ar Phríomhoifigeach Phríobháideachais Microsoft nó Oifigeach Cosanta Sonraí an AE, úsáid an nasc
foirm ghréasáin
chun teagmháil a dhéanamh linn. Le tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi theagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft, Microsoft Ireland Operations Teoranta san áireamh, amharc ar an rannán
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
den ráiteas príobháideachta seo.
Tá do chuid príobháideachta tábhachtach dúinn. Mínítear sa ráiteas príobháideachais seo próisis sonraí pearsanta Microsoft, an tslí a phróiseálann Microsoft iad, agus na cúiseanna leis.
Cuireann Microsoft raon leathan táirgí ar fáil, lena n-áirítear táirgí freastalaí a úsáidtear chun cabhrú le hoibriú fiontar ar fud an domhain, ghléasanna a úsáidtear sa bhaile, bhogearraí a úsáideann mic léinn ar scoil, agus seirbhísí a úsáideann forbróirí chun an chéad rud nua eile a chruthú agus a óstáil. I measc na dtagairtí a dhéantar do tháirgí Microsoft sa ráiteas seo tá seirbhísí, suíomhanna Gréasáin, feidhmchláir, bogearraí, freastalaithe, agus gléasanna Microsoft.
Léigh na sonraí a bhaineann le táirgí ar leith sa ráiteas príobháideachais seo, ina gcuirtear faisnéis bhreise ábhartha ar fáil. Baineann an ráiteas seo leis na hidirghníomhaíochtaí atá ag Microsoft leat agus leis na táirgí sin de chuid Microsoft atá liostaithe thíos, agus le táirgí eile de chuid Microsoft a thaispeánann an ráiteas seo.
Is féidir gur fearr le daoine óga tosú leis an
leathanach
'Príobháideachas do dhaoine óga'. Leagann an leathanach sin béim ar fhaisnéis a d'fhéadfadh a bheith cabhrach do dhaoine óga.
Maidir le daoine aonair sna Stáit Aontaithe, féach ar ár
bhFógra Príobháideachais Sonraí Stáit SAM
agus an
Polasaí Príobháideachais Sonraí Sláinte Tomhaltóra
chun faisnéis bhreise a fháil maidir le próiseáil do shonraí pearsanta, agus do chearta faoi dhlíthe príobháideachais sonraí Stáit SAM is infheidhme.
Sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid
Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí uait, tríd ár n-idirghníomhaíochtaí leat agus tríd ár dtáirgí. Cuireann tú cuid de na sonraí seo ar fáil go díreach, agus faighimid cuid díobh trí shonraí a bhailiú faoi d'idirghníomhaíochtaí, faoin úsáid a bhaineann tú as ár dtáirgí, agus faoi na heispéiris a bhíonn agat leo. Braitheann na sonraí a bhailímid ar chomhthéacs do chuid idirghabhálacha le Microsoft agus ar na roghanna a dhéanann tú, lena n-áirítear do shocruithe príobháideachta agus na táirgí agus gnéithe a úsáideann tú. Faighimid sonraí fút freisin ó chleamhnaithe Microsoft, ó fhochuideachtaí agus ó thríú páirtithe.
Má dhéanann tú ionadaíocht d’eagraíocht, amhail gnó nó scoil, a úsáideann Táirgí Fiontair agus Forbróra ó Microsoft, féach an rannán
táirgí Fiontair agus Forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo chun an tslí a bpróiseálaimid do shonraí a fháil amach. Más úsáideoir deiridh de tháirge Microsoft nó de chuntas Microsoft thú, arna chur ar fáil ag d'eagraíocht, féach na rannáin
Táirgí arna gcur ar fáil ag d’eagraíocht
agus an
cuntas Microsoft
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.
Tá roghanna agat ó thaobh na teicneolaíochta a úsáideann tú agus na sonraí a chomhroinneann tú. Nuair a iarraimid ort sonraí pearsanta a chur ar fáil, is féidir leat an t-iarratas a dhiúltú. Is gá sonraí pearsanta chun seirbhís a chur ar fáil duit, i gcás mórchuid dár dtáirgí. Má roghnaíonn tú gan sonraí a sholáthar - is gá chun táirge nó gné a sholáthar duit, ní féidir leat an táirge nó an ghné sin a úsáid. Mar an gcéanna, nuair is gá dúinn sonraí phearsanta a bhailiú de réir dlí nó dul isteach i gconradh nó conradh a chomhlíonadh leat, agus ní sholáthraíonn tú na sonraí, ní bheimid in ann dul isteach sa chonradh; nó má bhaineann sé le táirge atá in úsáid faoi láthair agat, b´fhéidir go mbeidh orainn é a chur ar fionraí nó a chur ar ceal. Cuirfimid scéala chugat más amhlaidh ag an am sin. I gcás gur gné roghnach é na sonraí a chur ar fáil, agus ina roghnaíonn tú gan sonraí pearsanta a chomhroinnt, ní oibreoidh gnéithe ar nós pearsantú, a úsáideann sonraí den sórt sin.
Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí uait, tríd ár n-idirghníomhaíochtaí leat agus trínár dtáirgí ar chúiseanna éagsúla atá tuairiscithe thíos, lena n-áirítear chun oibriú go héifeachtach agus an t-eispéireas is fearr lenár dtáirgí a chur ar fáil duit. Cuireann tú cuid de na sonraí sin ar fáil go díreach, ar nós nuair a chruthaíonn tú cuntas Microsoft, nuair a dhéanann tú cuntas ceadúnaithe d'eagraíochta a riaradh, nuair a chuireann tú ceist chuardaigh ar aghaidh chuig Bing, nuair a chláraíonn tú le haghaidh imeacht Microsoft, nuair a uaslódálann tú doiciméad chuig OneDrive, nuair a chláraíonn tú le haghaidh Microsoft 365, nó nuair a dhéanann tú teagmháil linn ag iarraidh tacaíochta. Faighimid cuid díobh trí shonraí faoi d'idirghníomhaíochtaí agus d'eispéireas lenár dtáirgí agus míreanna cumarsáide, agus faoin úsáid a bhaineann tú astu, a bhailiú. Ina theannta sin, faighimid sonraí ó chleamhnaithe Microsoft, ó fhochuideachtaí agus ó thríú páirtithe.
Braithimid ar chúiseanna agus ceadanna éagsúla dlí ("boinn dlí" a thugtar orthu uaireanta) chun sonraí a phróiseáil, lena n-áirítear le do thoiliú, cothromaíocht idir leasanna dleathacha, an gá atá le dul isteach i gconarthaí agus iad a chur i bhfeidhm, agus oibleagáidí dlí a chomhlíonadh, ar chúiseanna éagsúla a thuairiscítear thíos.
Faighimid sonraí ó thríú páirtithe chomh maith. Cosnaímid sonraí a fhaightear ó thríú páirtithe de réir na gcleachtas a thuairiscítear sa ráiteas seo, móide aon srianta breise a fhorchuireann foinse na sonraí. Bíonn éagsúlacht ag baint leis na foinsí tríú páirtí seo le himeacht ama, agus áirítear orthu:
Bróicéirí sonraí óna gceannaímid sonraí déimeagrafacha chun na sonraí a bhailímid a fhorlíonadh.
Seirbhísí a chuireann inneachar a ghineann an t-úsáideoir ar fáil do ghrúpaí eile, ar nós athbhreithnithe ar ghnólachtaí áitiúla nó postálacha meán sóisialta.
Seirbhísí cumarsáide, lena n-áirítear soláthraithe ríomhphost agus líonraí sóisialta, nuair a thugann tú rochtain dúinn ar shonraí maidir le seirbhísí nó líonraí tríú páirtí den sórt sin.
Soláthraithe seirbhíse a chabhraíonn linn suíomh do ghléis a dhéanamh amach.
Comhpháirtithe lena dtairgimid seirbhísí comhbhrandáilte nó lena ngabhaimid do chomhghníomhaíochtaí margaíochta.
Forbróirí a chruthaíonn eispéiris trí nó le haghaidh táirgí Microsoft.
Tríú páirtithe a sholáthraíonn eispéiris trí tháirgí Microsoft.
Foinsí atá ar fáil don phobal, ar nós earrach poiblí oscailte, tacair acadúla agus sonraí tráchtála agus foinsí sonraí eile.
Má dhéanann tú ionadaíocht d’eagraíocht, amhail gnó nó scoil, a úsáideann Táirgí Fiontair agus Forbróra ó Microsoft, féach an rannán
táirgí Fiontair agus Forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo chun an tslí a bpróiseálaimid do shonraí a fháil amach. Más úsáideoir deiridh de tháirge Microsoft nó de chuntas Microsoft thú, arna chur ar fáil ag d'eagraíocht, féach na rannáin
Táirgí arna gcur ar fáil ag d’eagraíocht
agus an
cuntas Microsoft
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.
Tá roghanna agat ó thaobh na teicneolaíochta a úsáideann tú agus na sonraí a chomhroinneann tú. Is féidir leat diúltú nuair a iarrtar ort faisnéis phearsanta a sholáthar. Is gá sonraí pearsanta chun seirbhís a oibriú agus a chur ar fáil duit, i gcás mórchuid dár dtáirgí. Má roghnaíonn tú gan na sonraí a thabhairt is gá chun táirge nó gné a oibriú agus a chur ar fáil duit, ní féidir leat an táirge nó an ghné sin a úsáid. Ar an tslí chéanna, i gcás gur gá dúinn do shonraí pearsanta a bhailiú de réir dlí nó dul isteach i gconradh leat nó an conradh sin a chur i ngníomh, agus más amhlaidh nach gcuireann tú na sonraí sin ar fáil, ní bheidh ar ár gcumas dul isteach sa chonradh; nó má bhaineann sé le táirge atá in úsáid agat cheana féin, is féidir go mbeidh orainn é a chur ar fionraí nó a chealú. Cuirfimid scéala chugat más amhlaidh ag an am sin. I gcás gur gné roghnach é na sonraí a chur ar fáil, agus ina roghnaíonn tú gan sonraí pearsanta a chomhroinnt, ní oibreoidh gnéithe ar nós pearsantú, a úsáideann na sonraí sin.
Braitheann na sonraí a bhailímid ar chomhthéacs do chuid idirghníomhaíochtaí le Microsoft agus ar na roghanna a dhéanann tú (lena n-áirítear do shocruithe príobháideachais), na táirgí agus na gnéithe a úsáideann tú, do shuíomh agus an dlí is infheidhme.
.
Is féidir linn na sonraí seo a leanas a bhailiú, i measc sonraí eile:
Ainm agus sonraí teagmhála
. Do chéadainm agus sloinne, seoladh ríomhphoist, seoladh poist, uimhir gutháin agus sonraí teagmhála cosúla eile.
Faisnéis aitheantais
. Pasfhocail, leideanna pasfhocail, agus faisnéis slándála den sórt sin a úsáidtear chun do chuntas a fhíordheimhniú agus a rochtain.
Sonraí déimeagrafacha
. Sonraí fút ar nós d'aoise, inscne, tíre, agus rogha teanga.
Sonraí íocaíochta
. Sonraí chun íocaíochtaí a phróiseáil, ar nós uimhir d'ionstraime íocaíochta (ar nós uimhir chárta creidmheasa) agus an cód slándála a bhaineann leis an ionstraim íocaíochta.
Sonraí faoi shíntiúis agus ceadúnais
. Faisnéis faoi do shíntiúis, ceadúnais, agus teidlíochtaí eile.
Idirghníomhaíochtaí
. Sonraí maidir leis an úsáid a bhaineann tú as táirgí Microsoft. I gcásanna áirithe, cosúil le fiosrúcháin chuardaigh, seo sonraí a chuireann tú ar fáil chun na táirgí a úsáid. I gcásanna eile, cosúil le tuairiscí earráide, seo sonraí a ghinimid. Áirítear ar shamplaí eile d'idirghníomhartha:
Sonraí an ghléis agus sonraí úsáide
. Sonraí faoi do ghléas agus an táirge agus gnéithe a úsáideann tú, lena n-áirítear faisnéis faoi do chrua-earraí agus bogearraí, feidhmiú ár dtáirgí, chomh maith le do shocruithe. Mar shampla:
Stair íocaíochta agus cuntais
. Sonraí faoi na táirgí a cheannaíonn tú agus gníomhaíochtaí a bhaineann le do chuntas.
Brabhsáil stair
. Sonraí faoi leathanaigh gréasáin a thugann tú cuairt orthu.
Sonraí gléis, nascachta agus cumraíochta
. Sonraí faoi do ghléas, do chumraíocht ghléis, agus líonraí i do thimpeall. Mar shampla, sonraí faoi na córais oibriúcháin agus bogearraí eile atá suiteáilte i do ghléas, ar nós eochracha táirgí. Ina theannta sin, seoladh IP, aitheantóirí gléis (amhail an uimhir IMEI do ghutháin póca), socruithe teangacha agus réigiúnacha, agus faisnéis faoi phointí rochtana WLAN in aice le do ghléas.
Tuairiscí earráide agus sonraí feidhmíochta
. Sonraí faoi fheidhmíocht na dtáirgí agus faoi aon fhadhb a bhíonn agat leo, tuairisicí earráide san áireamh. Is féidir a bheith sna tuairiscí earráide (ar a dtugtar "dumpaí tuairteála" uaireanta) sonraí cosúil le mionsonraí faoi na bogearraí nó na crua-earraí a bhaineann leis an earráid, inneachar na gcomhad a bhí oscailte agat nuair a tharla an earráid, agus sonraí maidir le bogearraí eile ar do ghléas.
Sonraí Fabhtcheartaithe agus Cabhrach
. Sonraí a chuireann tú ar fáil nuair a dhéanann tú teagmháil le Microsoft le haghaidh cabhair, amhail na táirgí a úsáideann tú, agus sonraí eile a chabhraíonn linn tacaíocht a sholáthar. Mar shampla, faisnéis teagmhálaí nó fíordheimhnithe, inneachar do chuid chomhrá nó cumarsáide le Microsoft, sonraí faoi choinníoll do ghléis, agus na táirgí a úsáideann tú atá bainteach le d’iarratas ar chabhair. Nuair a dhéanann tú teagmháil linn, chun tacaíocht do chustaiméirí a lorg, mar shampla, is féidir go ndéanfaí monatóireacht agus taifeadadh ar chomhráite nó seisiúin chomhrá a bhíonn agat lenár n-ionadaithe.
Sonraí úsáide bota
. Idir-ghníomhachtaí le botanna agus scileanna ar fáil trí táirgí Microsoft, lena áirítear botanna agus scileanna arna gcur ar fáil ag tríú páirtithe.
Ábhair spéise agus ceanáin
. Sonraí faoi d'ábhair spéise agus ceanáin, ar nós na bhfoirne a leanann tú, na teangacha ríomhchláraithe is fearr leat, na stoic a rianaíonn tú nó na cathracha a chuireann tú leis chun rudaí ar nós aimsir nó trácht a rianú. Chomh maith leo siúd a sholáthraíonn tú go sainráite, is féidir do leasanna agus do cheanáin a thátal nó a dhíorthú ó shonraí eile a bhailímid, mar shampla d'idirghníomhaíochtaí ar láithreáin ghréasáin ina n-úsáidtear ár dteicneolaíocht chun fógraí a thaispeáint nó a thomhas.
Sonraí faoi ídiú inneachair
. Faisnéis faoi ábhar meán (e.g., seónna teilifíse, ceol, fuaim, téacsleabhair, feidhmchláir, agus cluichí) a osclaíonn tú tríd ár dtáirgí.
Cuardach agus orduithe
. Ceisteanna cuardaigh agus orduithe nuair a úsáideann tú táirgí Microsoft a bhfuil feidhmiúlacht chuardaigh nó feidhmiúlacht ghaolmhar táirgiúlachta acu, cosúil le hidirghníomhaíochtaí le bota comhrá
Sonraí gutha
. Do chuid sonraí gutha, ar a dtugtar “gearrthóga gutha” uaireanta, mar shampla ceisteanna cuardaigh, orduithe, nó deachtú a labhraíonn tú, a bhféadfadh fuaimeanna cúlra a bheith iontu.
Sonraí téacs, breactha dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireachta
. Sonraí téacs, breactha dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireachta agus faisnéis ghaolmhar. Mar shampla, nuair a bhailímid sonraí breactha dúigh, bailímid faisnéis maidir le socrú d'uirlise breactha dúigh ar do ghléas.
Íomhánna
. Íomhánna agus faisnéis ghaolmhar, ar nós meiteashonraí pictiúir. Mar shampla, bailímid an íomhá a chuireann tú ar fáil nuair a úsáideann tú seirbhís íomhá-chumasaithe de chuid Bing.
Teagmhálaithe agus caidrimh
. Sonraí faoi do theagmhálaithe agus caidreamh má úsáideann tú táirge chun faisnéis a chomhroinnt le daoine eile, teagmhálaithe a bhainistiú, cumarsáid a dhéanamh le daoine eile, nó do tháirgiúlacht a fheabhsú.
Sonraí sóisialta
. Faisnéis maidir le do chaidreamh agus idirghníomhaíochtaí idir tusa, daoine eile agus eagraíochtaí, ar nós cineálacha caidrimh (m.sh. is maith liom, ní maith liom, imeachtaí, etc.) a bhaineann le daoine agus eagraíochtaí.
Sonraí maidir le suíomh
. Sonraí maidir le suíomh do ghléis, a d'fhéadfadh a bheith cruinn nó neamhchruinn. Mar shampla, bailímid sonraí suímh le Córas Satailíte Loingseoireachta Domhanda (GNSS) (m.sh. GPS) agus sonraí maidir le túir cheallacha agus baill the Wi-Fi in aice láimhe. Is féidir suíomh a dhéanamh amach ó sheoladh IP an ghléis nó ó shonraí i bpróifíl do chuntais a nochtann a shuíomh gan an cruinneas céanna, ar nós ar leibhéal cathrach nó cód poist.
Ionchur eile
. Ionchuir eile a chuirtear ar fáil nuair a úsáideann tú ár dtáirgí. Mar shampla, sonraí ar nós na gcnaipí a bhrúnn tú ar rialaitheoir Xbox gan sreang ag úsáid an líonra Xbox, cnámh-sonraí rianaithe nuair a úsáideann tú Kinect, agus sonraí braiteora eile, ar nós líon na gcéimeanna a thógann tú, nuair a úsáideann tú gléasanna a bhfuil braiteoirí infheidhme orthu. Má fhreastalaíonn tú ar imeacht ar an láthair, bailímid na sonraí a chuireann tú ar fáil dúinn nuair a chláraíonn tú nó i rith an imeachta agus má ghlacann tú páirt i bpromóisean duaiseanna, bailímid na sonraí a chuireann tú ar fáil ar an bhfoirm iontrála.
Inneachar
. A bhfuil sna comhaid agus sna cumarsáidí a dhéanann tú a ionchur, a íoslódáil, a fháil, a chruthú agus a rialú. Mar shampla, má sheolann tú comhad le Skype chuig úsáideoir eile Skype, is gá dúinn a bhfuil sa chomhad sin a bhailiú chun é a thaispeáint duitse agus don úsáideoir eile. Má fhaigheann tú ríomhphost ar Outlook.com, is gá dúinn an t-inneachar atá sa ríomhphost sin a bhailiú chun é a thabhairt chuig do bhosca isteach, é a thaispeáint duit, rogha a thabhairt duit é a fhreagairt, agus é a stóráil go dtí go roghnaíonn tú é a scriosadh. Áirithíonn inneachar a bhailímid nuair a sholáthraíonn muid táirgí duit:
Cumarsáidí, lena n-áirítear fuaim, físeán, téacs (clóscríofa, deachtaithe, nó eile), i dteachtaireacht, ríomhphost, glao, iarratas ar chruinniú, nó comhrá.
Grianghraif, íomhánna, amhráin, scannáin, bogearraí, agus meáin nó doiciméid eile a dhéanann tú a stóráil, a aisghabháil, nó a phróiseáil lenár néal.
Físeán nó taifeadtaí
. Taifeadtaí d'imeachtaí agus de ghníomhaíochtaí ag foirgnimh, spásanna miondíola agus suíomhanna eile de chuid Microsoft. Má théann tú isteach i suíomhanna nó in áiseanna eile Microsoft Store, nó má fhreastalaíonn tú ar ócáid Microsoft a thaifeadtar, is féidir go bpróiseálfaimid d'íomhá agus sonraí do ghutha.
Aiseolas agus rátálacha
. Faisnéis a chuireann tú ar fáil dúinn agus a bhfuil i dteachtaireachtaí a sheolann tú chugainn, ar nós aiseolas, sonraí suirbhéanna, agus léirmheasanna táirgí a scríobhann tú.
Sonraí tráchta
. Sonraí a ghintear trí úsáid a bhainnean tú as seirbhísí cumarsáide Microsoft. Léiríonn sonraí tráchta cé leis a ndearna tú cumarsáid agus cathain a tharla do chumarsáid. Ní phróiseálfaimid do shonraí tráchta ach de réir mar is gá chun ár seirbhísí cumarsáide a sholáthar, a chothabháil agus a fheabhsú agus déanaimid é sin le do thoiliú.
Tá cur síos sna rannáin thíos maidir le táirgí ar leith ar na cleachtais bailithe sonraí a bhaineann le húsáid na dtáirgí sin.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
An úsáid a bhainimid as sonraí pearsanta
Úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí a bhailímid chun eispéiris shaibhre, idirghníomhacha a chur ar fáil duit. Go háirithe, úsáidimid sonraí chun na nithe seo a leanas a dhéanamh:
Ár dtáirgí a sholáthar, lena n-áirítear nuashonrú, slándáil agus fabhtcheartú, chomh maith le tacaíocht a chur ar fáil. Áirítear air sonraí a chomhroinnt, nuair is gá chun an tseirbhís a sholáthar nó na bearta a iarrann tú a dhéanamh.
Ár dtáirgí a fheabhsú agus a fhorbairt.
Ár dtáirgí a phearsantú agus moltaí a dhéanamh.
Fógraí agus margaíocht a dhéanamh leat, lena n-áirítear cumarsáidí fógraíochta, fógraíocht spriocdhírithe, agus tairiscintí ábhartha a sheoladh chugat.
Úsáidimid na sonraí, leis, chun ár ngnó a oibriú, lena n-áirítear ár bhfeidhmíocht a anailísiú, ár n-oibleagáidí dlíthiúla a chomhlíonadh, ár lucht saothair a fhorbairt, agus taighde a dhéanamh.
Agus na cuspóirí seo á gcur i gcrích, comhcheanglaímid sonraí a bhailímid ó chomhthéacsanna difriúla (mar shampla, ón úsáid a bhaineann tú as dhá tháirge Microsoft) nó a fhaighimid ó thríú páirtithe chun eispéireas níos leanúnaí, níos comhsheasmhaí agus níos pearsantaithe a thabhairt duit, chun cinntí eolacha gnó a dhéanamh, agus do chuspóirí dleathacha eile.
Cuimsíonn ár bpróiseáil ar shonraí pearsanta chun na gcríoch seo modhanna uathoibrithe próiseála agus modhanna láimhe (daonna). Is minic a thacaíonn ár modhanna láimhe lenár modhanna uathoibrithe agus go mbíonn gaol eatarthu. Mar shampla, chun cruinneas ár modhanna uathoibrithe próiseála (lena n-áirítear intleacht shaorga nó IS) a thógáil, a fhorbairt, agus a fheabhsú, déanaimid athbhreithniú láimhe ar chuid de na réamh-mheastacháin agus de na tátail a tháirgeann na modhanna uathoibrithe i gcomparáid leis na sonraí bunúsacha.
Mar chuid dár n-iarrachtaí chun ár dtáirgí a fheabhsú agus a fhorbairt, seans go mbainfimid úsáid as do shonraí chun ár samhlacha AI a fhorbairt agus a oiliúint. Tuilleadh eolais
anseo
.
Úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí a bhailímid chun eispéiris shaibhre idirghníomhacha a chur ar fáil duit. Go háirithe, úsáidimid sonraí chun na nithe seo a leanas a dhéanamh:
Ár dtáirgí a sholáthar, lena n-áirítear nuashonrú, slándáil agus fabhtcheartú, chomh maith le tacaíocht a chur ar fáil. Áirítear air sonraí a chomhroinnt, nuair is gá chun an tseirbhís a sholáthar nó na bearta a iarrann tú a dhéanamh.
Ár dtáirgí a fheabhsú agus a fhorbairt.
Ár dtáirgí a phearsantú agus moltaí a dhéanamh.
Fógraí agus margaíocht a dhéanamh leat, lena n-áirítear cumarsáidí fógraíochta, fógraíocht spriocdhírithe, agus tairiscintí ábhartha a sheoladh chugat.
Úsáidimid na sonraí, leis, chun ár ngnó a oibriú, lena n-áirítear ár bhfeidhmíocht a anailísiú, ár n-oibleagáidí dlíthiúla a chomhlíonadh, ár lucht saothair a fhorbairt, agus taighde a dhéanamh.
Chun na gcríoch sin, comhcheanglaímid sonraí a bhailímid ó chomhthéacsanna difriúla (mar shampla, ón úsáid a bhaineann tú as dhá tháirge Microsoft). Mar shampla, úsáideann Microsoft Store eolas maidir le aipeanna agus seirbhísí a úsáideann tú chun moltaí aip pearsantaithe a dhéanamh. Mar sin féin, tá cosaintí teicneolaíochta agus nós imeachta deartha againn chun comhcheangail áirithe sonraí a sheachaint, nuair is gá sin faoin dlí. Mar shampla, stórálaimid sonraí a bhailímid uait mura bhfuil tú fíordheimhnithe (gan a bheith sínithe isteach), ó aon fhaisnéis cuntais trína n-aithnítear thú go díreach, amhail d'ainm, do sheoladh ríomhphoist, nó d'uimhir fóin, nuair a cheanglaítear sin faoin dlí.
Cuimsíonn ár bpróiseáil ar shonraí pearsanta chun na gcríoch seo modhanna uathoibrithe próiseála agus modhanna láimhe (daonna). Is minic a thacaíonn ár modhanna láimhe lenár modhanna uathoibrithe agus go mbíonn gaol eatarthu. Mar shampla, chun cruinneas ár modhanna uathoibrithe próiseála (lena n-áirítear intleacht shaorga nó IS) a thógáil, a fhorbairt, agus a fheabhsú, déanaimid athbhreithniú láimhe ar chuid de na réamh-mheastacháin agus de na tátail a tháirgeann na modhanna uathoibrithe i gcomparáid leis na sonraí bunúsacha.
Mar chuid dár n-iarrachtaí chun ár dtáirgí a fheabhsú agus a fhorbairt, seans go mbainfimid úsáid as do shonraí chun ár samhlacha AI a fhorbairt agus a oiliúint. Tuilleadh eolais
anseo
.
Cuspóirí agus boinn dlí le haghaidh próiseála
Nuair a phróiseálaimid sonraí pearsanta maidir leat, déanaimid amhlaidh le do thoiliú agus/nó faoi mar is gá chun na táirgí a úsáideann tú a sholáthar, ár ngnó a oibriú, ár n-oibleagáidí conarthacha agus dlí a chomhlíonadh, slándáil ár gcóras agus sábháilteacht ár gcustaiméirí a chosaint, nó leasanna dlisteanacha eile de chuid Microsoft nó tríú páirtithe a chomhlíonadh mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán seo agus sa rannán
Na Cúiseanna lena gcmhroinnimid sonraí pearsanta
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo. Seans go n-athróidh ár mboinn le do shonraí pearsanta a phróiseáil ag brath ar conas a próiseálaimid do shonraí agus ar fud cén táirgí agus seirbhísí.
Nuair a phróiseálaimid sonraí pearsanta bunaithe ar ár leasanna dlisteanacha nó iad siúd de thríú páirtí, smaoinímid orthu agus aimsímid cothromaíocht idir iad agus do chearta agus shaoirsí, agus ní phróiseálaimid do shonraí pearsanta ach nuair nár ba mhó do leasa féin ná leasanna dlisteanacha a bhfuil againn iad a phróiseáil.
Nuair a aistrímid sonraí pearsanta ón Limistéar Eorpach Eacnamaíoch, déanaimid amhlaidh bunaithe
ar mheicníochtaí dlí éagsúla, mar a thuairiscítear iad sa rannán Ina stórálaimid agus ina bpróiseálaimid sonraí pearsanta
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Tuilleadh maidir le cuspóirí na próiseála:
Ár dtáirgí a sholáthar
. Úsáidimid sonraí chun ár dtáirgí a oibriú agus eispéiris shaibhre idirghníomhacha a sholáthar duit. Mar shampla, má úsáideann tú OneDrive, próiseálaimid na doiciméid a uaslódálann tú ar OneDrive chun gur féidir leat iad a aisghabháil, a scriosadh, a chur in eagar, a chur ar aghaidh nó a phróiseáil ar shlí ar bith eile, faoi do threoir, mar chuid den tseirbhís. Nó, mar shampla, má iontrálann tú iarratas cuardaigh in inneall cuardaigh Bing, úsáidimid an t-iarratas sin chun torthaí cuardaigh a thaispeáint duit. Lena chois sin, de bhrí gur gné de mhórchuid táirgí, ríomhchlár, agus gníomhaíochtaí iad cumarsáidí, úsáidimid sonraí chun teagmháil a dhéanamh leat. Mar shampla, is féidir go ndéanfaimid teagmháil fóin nó ríomhphoist leat nó teagmháil ar shlí éigin eile le hinsint duit go bhfuil síntiús ag dul in éag nó chun do chuntas ceadúnaithe a phlé. Bímid i dteagmháil leat, leis, chun ár dtáirgí a shlánú, mar shampla, trína insint duit go bhfuil nuashonrú táirge ar fáil.
Feabhsú táirge
. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí chun feabhas leanúnach a chur ar ár dtáirgí, lena n-áirítear gnéithe nó cumais nua a chur leis. Mar shampla, úsáidimid tuairiscí earráide chun gnéithe slándála a fheabhsú, úsáidimid iarratais chuardaigh agus cliceálacha in Bing chun ábharthacht na dtorthaí cuardaigh a fheabhsú, úsáidimid sonraí úsáide chun a fháil amach cad iad na gnéithe ar gá tosaíocht a thabhairt dóibh, agus úsáidimid sonraí gutha chun cruinneas na haitheanta cainte a fheabhsú.
Pearsantú
. Tá gnéithe pearsantaithe san áireamh i mórchuid táirgí, ar nós moltaí a fheabhsaíonn do tháirgiúlacht agus an taitneamh a bhaineann tú as. Úsáideann na gnéithe seo próisis uathoibrithe chun d'eispéiris táirge a shaincheapadh bunaithe ar na sonraí atá againn maidir leat, ar nós tátail mar gheall ort a bhainimid as an úsáid a bhaineann tú as táirgí, gníomhaíochtaí, ábhair spéis agus suíomh. Mar shampla, ag brath ar do shocruithe, má shruthaíonn tú scannáin i mbrabhsálaí ar do ghléas Windows, is féidir go bhfeicfidh tú moladh d'fheidhmchlár ó Microsoft Store a shruthaíonn ar shlí níos éifeachtaí. Má tá cuntas Microsoft agat, le do chead, is féidir linn do shocruithe a shioncronú ar ghléasanna éagsúla. Cuirtear rialuithe chun gnéithe pearsantaithe a dhíchumasú ar fáil i mórchuid dár dtáirgí.
Gníomhachtú táirge
. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí — cosúil le cineál an ghléis agus an fheidhmchláir, suíomh, agus aitheantóirí uathúla gléis, feidhmchláir, líonra agus síntiúis — chun táirgí a ghníomhachtú más gá sin.
Forbairt táirge
. Úsáidimid sonraí chun táirgí nua a fhorbairt. Mar shampla, úsáidimid sonraí, go minic tar éis iad a dhí-aithint, chun tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar riachtanais ríofa agus táirgiúlachta ár gcustaiméirí agus múnlaí AI a mhionchoigeartú, ar féidir leo forbairt táirgí nua a mhúnlú.
Tacaíocht do chustaiméirí
. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí chun fadhbanna táirge a réiteach agus a dhiagnóisiú, gléasanna custaiméirí a dheisiú, agus seirbhísí cúraim agus tacaíochta do chustaiméirí eile a sholáthar, lena n-áirítear chun cabhrú linn cáilíocht ár dtáirgí, ár seirbhísí, agus ár n-oiliúint a sholáthar, a fheabhsú, agus a chinntiú agus chun teagmhais slándála a imscrúdú. Féadfar sonraí taifeadta glaonna a úsáid freisin chun tú a fhíordheimhniú nó a aithint bunaithe ar do ghuth chun gur féidir le Microsoft seirbhísí tacaíochta a sholáthar agus teagmhais slándála a imscrúdú.
Cabhraigh le slándáil agus fabhtcheartú
. Úsáidimid sonraí mar chabhair chun ár dtáirgí a dhéanamh slán agus a fhabhtcheartú. Áirítear ar sin sonraí a úsáid chun slándáil agus sábháilteacht ár dtáirgí agus ár gcustaiméirí a chosaint, gníomhaíochtaí bogearraí mailíseacha agus gníomhaíochtaí mailíseacha a bhrath, fadhbanna feidhmiúlachta agus comhoiriúnachta a fhabhtcheartú chun cabhrú le custaiméirí gach buntáiste a bhaint as a n-eispéireas, agus nuashonruithe ar ár dtáirgí a fhógairt do chustaiméirí. Is féidir go bhfuil córais uathoibrithe chun fadhbanna slándála agus sábháilteachta a bhrath san áireamh ansin.
Sábháilteacht
. Úsáidimid sonraí chun sábháilteacht ár dtáirgí agus ár gcustaiméirí a chosaint. Is féidir lenár ngnéithe agus ár dtáirgí slándála cur isteach ar an oibriú bogearraí mailíseacha agus úsáideoirí a chur ar an eolas má aimsítear bogearraí mailíseacha ar a ngléasanna. Mar shampla, cuid dár dtáirgí, cosúil le Outlook.com nó OneDrive scan, inneachar ar bhealach uathoibríoch chun turscar, víreas, mí-úsáid, nó URLanna amhrasta a aithint ar cuireadh bratach leo mar naisc chalaoise, fioscaireachta nó bogearraí mailíseacha; agus coimeádaimid an ceart chun bac a chur ar sheachadadh cumarsáide nó inneachar a bhaint má sháraíonn sé ár dtéarmaí.
I gcomhair leis an Rialachán Eorpach Aontais (AE) 2021/1232, ghlaogamar an chuma a cheadaítear leis an Rialachán sin ar Airteagail 5(1) agus 6(1) de Threoir 2002/58/CE AN AE. Bainimid úsáid as teicneolaíochtaí scanta chun sínithe digiteacha (a tugtar “haiseanna” orthu) de híomhánna agus inneachar físeáin ar ár gcórais a chruthú. Cuireann na teicneolaíochtaí sin na haiseanna a ghineann siad i gcomparáid le haiseanna dúshrathacht ghnéasach leanaí a tuairiscíodh agus mí-úsáid íomhánna (ar a dtugtar tacar haise ), i bpróiseas ar a dtugtar “meaitseáil haise”. Faigheann Microsoft tacair haiseanna ó heagraíochtaí a ghníomhaíonn ar leas an phobail i gcoinne drochúsáid ghnéasach leanaí. D'fhéadfaí comhroinnt faisnéise leis an Lárionad Idirnáisiúnta do Leanaí ar Iarraidh agus Leanaí a ndéantar Dúshaothrú Orthu (NCMEC) agus leis na húdaráis um fhorfheidhmiú an dlí dá thoradh sin.
Nuashonruithe
. Úsáidimid sonraí a bhailímid chun nuashonruithe táirge agus paistí slándála a fhorbairt. Mar shampla, is féidir go n-úsáidfimid faisnéis faoi chumas do ghléis, ar nós na cuimhne atá ar fáil, chun nuashonrú bogearraí nó paiste slándála a chur ar fáil duit. Tá nuashonruithe agus paiscí ceaptha le d'eispéireas lenár dtáirgí a uasmhéadú, cabhrú leat príobháideacht agus slándáil do shonraí a chosaint, gnéithe nua a sholáthar, agus measúnú a dhéanamh cibé an bhfuil nó nach bhfuil do ghléas réidh chun nuashonruithe dá leithéid a phróiseáil.
Cumarsáidí fógraíochta
. Úsáidimid sonraí a bhailímid chun cumarsáidí fógraíochta a sheachadadh. Is féidir leat clárú le haghaidh síntiúis ríomhphoist agus roghnú cibé an mian leat cumarsáidí fógraíochta a fháil ó Microsoft i ríomhphost, SMS, post fisiceach, agus guthán. Chun faisnéis a fháil faoi do shonraí teagmhála, síntiúis ríomhphoist agus cumarsáid bolscaireachta a bhainistiú, féach ar an rannán
Conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Tairiscintí ábhartha
. Úsáideann Microsoft sonraí chun faisnéis ábhartha agus luachmhar maidir lenár dtáirgí a sholáthar duit. Déanaimid anailís ar shonraí ó fhoinsí éagsúla chun an fhaisnéis is mó a gcuirfidh tú spéis inti agus a bhainfidh leat a thuar agus an fhaisnéis sin a chur ar fáil duit ar shlite éagsúla. Mar shampla, is féidir go dtuarfaimid do spéis i gcluichíocht agus go gcuirfimid cumarsáidí chugat i dtaobh cluichí nua a thaitneodh leat, b'fhéidir.
Fógraíocht
. Ní úsáideann Microsoft an méid a deir tú i ríomhphoist, comhráite duine le duine, glaonna físeáin ná glórphost, ná do dhoiciméid, grianghraif ná comhaid phearsanta eile chun fógraíocht a dhíriú ort. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí a bhailímid trínár n-idirghníomhaíocht leat, trí roinnt dár dtáirgí, ár sheirbhísí, ár bhfeidhmchláir agus ár n-airíonna gréasáin céadpháirtí (airíonna Microsoft), agus ar airíonna Gréasáin tríú páirtí, chun fógraí a thaispeáint inár dtáirgí Microsoft agus ar airíonna tríú páirtí. Is féidir go n-úsáidfimid próisis mar chabhair chun an fhógraíocht a dhéanamh níos ábhartha maidir leat. Tá tuilleadh faisnéise faoin úsáid a bhaintear as do chuid sonraí le haghaidh fógraíocht le fáil sa rannán
Fógraíochta
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Promóisin agus imeachtaí duaiseanna
. Úsáidimid do chuid sonraí chun promóisin agus ócáidí duaiseanna atá ar fáil inár Microsoft Store fisiciúil a riar. Mar shampla, má iontrálann tú promóisean duaiseanna, d’fhéadfaimis do chuid sonraí a úsáid chun buaiteoir a roghnú agus an duais a chur ar fáil duit má bhíonn an bua agat. Nó, má chláraíonn tú le haghaidh ceardlann chódúcháin nó ócáid chluichíochta, cuirfimid d’ainm le liosta an lucht freastail a bhfuil súil leis.
Tráchtáil beartaíochta
. Úsáidimid sonraí chun gur féidir leat bearta a dhéanamh linn. Mar shampla, próiseálaimid faisnéis íocaíocht chun síntiúis táirge a sholáthar do chustaiméirí agus úsáidimid faisnéis teagmhála chun earraí a cheannaítear ó Microsoft Store a sheachadadh.
Tuairisciú agus oibríochtaí gnó
. Úsáidimid sonraí chun ár n-oibríochtaí a anailísiú agus léargais ghnó a fháil. Cuireann sé sin ar ár gcumas cinntí eolacha a dhéanamh agus tuairisciú ar fheidhmíocht ár ngnó.
Cearta agus maoin a chosaint
. Úsáidimid sonraí chun calaois a bhrath agus a chosc, díospóidí a réiteach, comhaontuithe a fheidhmiú agus ár maoin a chosaint. Mar shampla, úsáidimid sonraí chun deimhniú a thabhairt ar bhailíocht ár gceadúnas bogearraí chun píoráideacht a laghdú. Is féidir go n-úsáidfimid uathphróisis chun gníomhaíochtaí a sháraíonn ár gcearta agus cearta daoine eile, ar nós na calaoise, a bhrath agus a chosc.
Comhlíonadh an dlí
. Próiseálaimid sonraí chun an dlí infheidhme a chomhlíonadh. Mar shampla, úsáidimid aois ár gcustaiméirí chun cabhrú linn ár n-oibleagáidí chun príobháideacht leanaí a chosaint. Próiseálaimid, leis, faisnéis teagmhála agus faisnéis aitheantais chun cabhrú le custaiméirí a gcearta cosanta sonraí a fheidhmiú.
Taighde.
Le bearta cuí teicniúla agus eagraíochtúla chun cearta agus saoirsí daoine aonair a chosaint, úsáidimid sonraí chun taighde a dhéanamh, lena n-áirítear cumais meaisínfhoghlama agus intleachta saorga chun críocha leasa pobail agus eolaíocha.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Na fáthanna a gcomhroinnimid sonraí pearsanta
Comhroinnimid d'fhaisnéis phearsanta le do chead nó chun aon bhearta a chríochnú nó chun aon táirge atá iarrtha nó údaraithe agat a sholáthar. Comhroinnimid sonraí, freisin, le fochuideachtaí agus le cleamhnaithe faoi rialú Microsoft; le díoltóirí a oibríonn ar ár son; nuair a cheanglaítear é faoin dlí nó chun freagairt do phróiseas dlí; chun ár gcustaiméirí a chosaint; chun beatha daoine a chosaint; chun slándáil ár dtáirgí a choinneáil; agus chun cearta agus maoin Microsoft agus a chustaiméirí a chosaint.
Tabhair faoi deara, mar a shainmhínítear faoi dhlíthe príobháideachta sonraí stáit áirithe de chuid na S.A., go mbaineann “comhroinnt” le sonraí pearsanta a sholáthar do thríú páirtithe chun críocha fógraíochta pearsantaithe. Féach an rannán
Príobháideachais Sonraí Stáit SAM
thíos agus ár
bhFógra Dlíthe Príobháideachais Stáit SAM
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.
Roinnimid d'fhaisnéis phearsanta má thugann tú an cead sin dúinn, nó más gá chun gnó éigin a chríochnú agus i gcás táirge a d'iarr tú nó a d'údaraigh tú a sholáthar duit. Mar shampla, comhroinnimid d'inneachar le tríú páirtithe nuair a thugann tú ordú dúinn, ar nós nuair a chuireann tú ríomhphost chuig cara, nuair a chomhroinneann tú grianghraif agus doiciméid ar OneDrive, nó nuair a nascann tú cuntais le seirbhís eile. Má úsáideann tú táirge Microsoft curtha ar fáil ag eagraíocht a bhfuil tú comhcheangailte léi, amhail fostóir nó scoil, nó má úsáideann tú seoladh r-phoist atá curtha ar fáil ag eagraíocht dá leithéid chun rochtain a fháil ar tháirgí Microsoft, comhroinnimid sonraí áirithe, cosúil le sonraí idirghníomhaíochta agus sonraí diagnóiseacha chun d'eagraíocht a chumasú chun na táirgí a bhainistiú. Nuair a thugann tú sonraí íocaíochta dúinn le rud éigin a cheannach, d’fhéadfadh le Microsoft do chuid Sonraí íocaíochta a roinnt le bainc agus aonáin eile a phróiseálann idirbhearta íocaíochta nó le seirbhísí airgeadais eile, agus d’fhonn calaois a chosc agus riosca creidmheasa a laghdú. Ina theannta sin, nuair a shábhálann tú modh íocaíochta (cosúil le cárta) chuig do chuntas a úsáideann tú féin agus sealbhóirí cuntais Microsoft eile chun ceannacháin a dhéanamh ó Microsoft nó óna chleamhnaithe, féadfar d’admhálacha ceannacháin a chomhroinnt le haon duine eile a úsáideann agus a bhfuil rochtain aige ar an modh íocaíochta céanna chun ceannachán a dhéanamh ó Microsoft, lena n-áirítear sealbhóir cuntais ainmnithe an mhodha íocaíochta. Nuair a cheadaíonn tú brúfhógraí do tháirgí nó feidhmchláir Microsoft ar gléas nach bhfuil ó Windows, próiseálfaidh córas oibriúcháin an ghléis sin sonraí phearsanta áirithe chun brúfhógraí a sholáthar. Dá réir sin, is féidir le Microsoft sonraí a sheoladh chuig soláthraí fógra tríú-pháirtí seachtrach chun brúfhógraí a sholáthar. Tá seirbhísí brúfhógraí do ghléis faoi réir a dtéarmaí sainseirbhíse agus a bpolasaithe príobháideachais féin.
Lena chois sin, roinnimid sonraí pearsanta chun críocha fógraíochta digití. Nuair a thugann tú cuairt ar shuíomh gréasáin nó nuair a úsáideann tú feidhmchlár ar mian leis fógraí a thaispeáint duit, d'fhéadfadh an mhaoin dhigiteach ligean do Microsoft rochtain a fháil ar shonraí gléis nó ar shonraí áirithe eile a shainaithnítear sa rannán Sonraí Pearsanta a bhailímid thuas. Féadfaimid an fhaisnéis sin a roinnt ansin le hardáin fógraíochta tríú páirtí agus le fógróirí chun seachadadh agus tomhas fógraí ar airíonna digiteacha den sórt sin a éascú.  Féach na rannáin maidir le Príobháideachas Sonraí Fógraíochta agus Stáit na Stát Aontaithe thíos chun tuilleadh eolais a fháil faoin gcaoi a n-úsáidtear do shonraí le haghaidh fógraíochta.
Chomh maith leis, roinnimid sonraí pearsanta le fochuideachtaí agus cleamhnaithe faoi rialú Microsoft. Roinnimid freisin sonraí pearsanta le díoltóirí atá ag obair dúinn leis na cuspóirí atá cur síos orthu sa ráiteas seo. Mar shampla, is féidir go mbeidh d'fhaisnéis phearsanta ag teastáil ó chomhlachtaí atá fostaithe againn chun seirbhís custaiméara a sholáthar nó chun cabhrú chun ár gcórais agus seirbhísí a choinneáil sábháilte, chun na feidhmeanna sin a sholáthar. I gcásanna mar sin, is gá do na comhlachtaí sin cloí leis na riachtanais phríobháideachta agus slándála atá againn agus ní cheadaítear dóibh úsáid eile a bhaint as an bhfaisnéis phearsanta uainn. D'fhéadaimis d'fhaisnéis phearsanta a nochtadh mar chuid d'idirbheart corparáideach ar nós cumasc nó díol sócmhainní.
Ar deireadh, déanfaimid do shonraí pearsanta a choimeád, a rochtain, a aistriú, a nochtadh, agus a chaomhnú, lena n-áirítear d'inneachar (amhail a bhfuil i do ríomhphoist in Outlook.com, nó comhaid i bhfillteáin phríobháideacha ar OneDrive), nuair a chreidimid de mheon maith gur gá sin chun aon cheann díobh seo a leanas a dhéanamh:
Cloí leis an dlí is infheidhme nó freagairt do phróiseas bailí dlí, lena n-áirítear ó ghníomhaireachtaí forfheidhmithe dlí nó gníomhaireachtaí eile rialtais.
Cosain sábháilteachtn ár gcustaiméirí agus an phobail — mar shampla, le coisc a chur ar thurscar nó iarrachtaí chun calaois a dhéanamh nó dochar eile a dhéanamh, nó le iompar neamhdhleathach a aimsiú lena n-áirítear ábhar neamhdhleathach nó dochrach a chruthú nó a roinnt.
Ár dtáirgí a choinneáil ag obair agus iad a choimeád slán, lena n-áirítear ionsaí ar ár ríomhchórais nó líonraí a chosc nó a stopadh.
Cearta nó maoin Microsoft a chosaint, lena n-áirítear na téarmaí a rialaíonn úsáid na seirbhísí a fhorghníomhú—d'ainneoinn sin, má fhaighimid faisnéis a léiríonn go bhfuil ár seirbhísí in úsáid ag duine éigin chun maoin intleachta nó fhisiciúil ghoidte de chuid Microsoft a gháinneáil, ní dhéanfaimid cigireacht ar inneachar príobháideach custaiméara muid féin, ach is féidir go gcuirfimid ar aghaidh chuig lucht fhorfheidhmiú an dlí é.
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi na sonraí a nochtaimid mar fhreagairt ar iarratais ó ghníomhaireachtaí forfheidhmithe dlí agus gníomhaireachtaí rialtais eile, féach ar ár
Tuarascáil ar Iarratais Forfheidhmithe Dlí
.
Tabhair faoi deara go bhfuil naisc i gcuid dár dtáirgí chuig táirgí de chuid tríú páirtithe nó go gcumasaíonn siad duit rochtain a fháil ar tháirgí de chuid tríú páirtithe nach ionann a gcleachtais phríobháideachta agus cleachtais phríobháideachta Microsoft. Má chuireann tú sonraí pearsanta ar fáil d'aon cheann de na táirgí sin, beidh do shonraí faoi réir a bpolasaithe príobháideachais.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú
Is féidir freisin roghanna a dhéanamh faoin tslí a mbailíonn agus a n-úsáideann Microsoft do shonraí. Is féidir do shonraí pearsanta atá ag Microsoft a rialú, agus do chearta cosanta sonraí a chur i bhfeidhm, trí theagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft nó leis na huirlisí éagsúla a chuirimid ar fáil. Beidh do chumas chun do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain nó a rialú srianta i gcásanna áirithe, mar a cheanglaítear nó mar a cheadaítear faoin dlí is infheidhme. Braithfidh an tslí inar féidir leat do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú ar na táirgí a úsáideann tú, leis. Mar shampla, is féidir leat:
Rialaigh úsáid do chuid sonraí le haghaidh fógraíocht phearsantaithe ó Microsoft, lena n-áirítear Xandr, ach cuairt a thabhairt ar an
leathanach díliostála
.
Bíonn rogha agat cibé an mian leat ríomhphoist fhógraíochta, teachtaireachtaí SMS, glaonna teileafóin, agus post a fháil ó Microsoft nó nach mian.
Déan rochtain agus glan cuid de do shonraí trí
phainéal príobháideachais Microsoft
.
Ní féidir gach sonraí pearsanta a phróiseálann Microsoft a rochtain nó a rialú leis na huirlisí thuas. Más mian leat na sonraí pearsanta a phróiseálann Microsoft a rochtain nó a rialú, sonraí nach bhfuil ar fáil trí na huirlisí thuas nó go díreach trí na táirgí Microsoft a úsáideann tú, is féidir leat teagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft i gcónaí ag an seoladh atá luaite sa rannán
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
nó ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
a úsáid.
Cuirimid méadracht chomhthiomsaithe ar fáil faoi iarratais úsáideoirí le gur féidir leo a gcearta cosanta sonraí a fheidhmiú tríd an
Tuarascáil Príobháideachais Microsoft
.
Is féidir freisin roghanna a dhéanamh faoin tslí a mbailíonn agus a n-úsáideann Microsoft do shonraí. Is féidir do shonraí pearsanta atá ag Microsoft a rialú, agus do chearta cosanta sonraí a chur i bhfeidhm, trí theagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft nó leis na huirlisí éagsúla a chuirimid ar fáil. Beidh do chumas chun do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain nó a rialú srianta i gcásanna áirithe, mar a cheanglaítear nó mar a cheadaítear faoin dlí is infheidhme. Braithfidh an tslí inar féidir leat do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú ar na táirgí a úsáideann tú, leis. Mar shampla, is féidir leat:
Rialaigh úsáid do chuid sonraí d’fhógraíocht phearsantaithe ó Microsoft ach cuairt a thabhairt ar ár
leathanach díliostála
.
Bíonn rogha agat cibé an mian leat ríomhphoist fhógraíochta, teachtaireachtaí SMS, glaonna teileafóin, agus post a fháil ó Microsoft nó nach mian.
Déan rochtain agus glan cuid de do shonraí trí
phainéal príobháideachais Microsoft
.
Ní féidir gach sonraí pearsanta a phróiseálann Microsoft a rochtain nó a rialú leis na huirlisí thuas. Más mian leat na sonraí pearsanta a phróiseálann Microsoft a rochtain nó a rialú, sonraí nach bhfuil ar fáil trí na huirlisí thuas nó go díreach trí na táirgí Microsoft a úsáideann tú, is féidir leat teagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft i gcónaí ag an seoladh atá luaite sa rannán
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
nó trí ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
a úsáid.
Cuirimid méadracht chomhthiomsaithe ar fáil faoi iarratais úsáideoirí le gur féidir leo a gcearta cosanta sonraí a fheidhmiú tríd an
dTuarascáil Príobháideachais Microsoft
.
Féadfaidh tú do shonraí pearsanta atá ag Microsoft a rochtain agus a rialú le huirlisí a sholáthraíonn Microsoft duit, a bhfuil cur síos déanta orthu thíos, nó trí theagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft. Mar shampla:
Má fuair Microsoft toiliú uait do shonraí pearsanta a úsáid, féadfaidh tú an toiliú sin a tharraingt siar ag am ar bith.
Is féidir rochtain ar, scriosadh, agus nuashonruithe ar do shonraí pearsanta a iarraidh.
Más mian leat do chuid sonraí a phortáil chuig áit éigin eile, is féidir leat úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí a sholáthraíonn Microsoft chun é sin a dhéanamh, nó mura bhfuil a leithéid ar fáil, féadfaidh tú teagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft le cabhair a fháil.
Féadfaidh tú freisin cur in aghaidh na húsáide a bhaineann Microsoft as do shonraí pearsanta nó í a shrianadh. Mar shampla, féadfaidh tú cur in aghaidh na húsáide a bhainimid as do shonraí pearsanta ag am ar bith:
Chun críocha margaíochta dírí.
Áit a bhfuil tasc á chomhlíonadh againn chun leas an phobail nó a bhfuil ár leasanna dlisteanacha nó leasanna tríú páirtí á saothrú againn.
Féadfaidh na cearta sin a bheith agat faoi na dlíthe is infheidhme, lena n-áirítear an Rialachán Ginearálta maidir le Cosaint Sonraí (GDPR) ón AE, ach cuirimid ar fáil iad beag beann ar do shuíomh. Beidh do chumas chun do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain nó a rialú srianta i gcásanna áirithe, mar a cheanglaítear nó mar a cheadaítear faoin dlí is infheidhme.
Má chuireann d'eagraíocht, amhail d'fhostóir, do scoil, nó do sholáthraí seirbhíse, rochtain ar fáil duit ar tháirgí Microsoft, agus go ndéanann sí an úsáid sin a riar, téigh i dteagmháil le d'eagraíocht chun tuilleadh a fhoghlaim faoi conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú.
Is féidir leat do shonraí pearsanta atá ag Microsoft rochtain agus a rialú, agus do chearta cosanta sonraí a chur i bhfeidhm, leis na huirlisí éagsúla a chuirimid ar fáil. Braithfidh na huirlisí is áisiúla duit ar an idirghníomhaíocht a bheidh againn leatsa agus ar an úsáid a bhaineann tú as ár dtáirgí. Tá liosta ginearálta anseo de na huirlisí a chuirimid ar fáil chun cabhrú leat do shonraí pearsanta a rialú; d'fhéadfadh táirgí áirithe rialtáin bhreise a chur ar fáil chomh maith.
Bing.
Má tá tú sínithe isteach ar Bing, is féidir leat féachaint ar do stair chuardaigh agus chomhrá stóráilte ar do
phainéal príobháideachais agus í a ghlanadh
. Mura bhfuil tú sínithe isteach ar Bing, is féidir leat do stair chuardaigh stóráilte a bhaineann le do ghléas a fheiceáil agus a ghlanadh i do
shocruithe Bing
.
Cuntas Microsoft.
Más mian leat rochtain a fháil ar an bhfaisnéis phróifíle nó ar an bhfaisnéis íocaíochta i do chuntas Microsoft, nó í a chur in eagar nó a bhaint, do phasfhocal a athrú, faisnéis slándála a chur leis nó do chuntas a dhúnadh, is féidir a leithéid a dhéanamh ach cuairt a thabhairt ar shuíomh gréasáin
Microsoft
.
Má tá próifíl phoiblí
Líonra Forbróirí Microsoft (MSDN)
agat, is féidir leat do shonraí a rochtain agus a chur in eagar ach síniú isteach ag
fóram MSDN
.
Painéal príobháideachais Microsoft
. Is féidir leat cuid de na sonraí a phróiseálann Microsoft a rialú trí leas a bhaint as cuntas Microsoft ar
phainéal príobháideachais Microsoft
. As seo, mar shampla, is féidir na sonraí brabhsála, cuardaigh, agus suímh a ghabhann le do chuntas Microsoft a fheiceáil agus a ghlanadh.
Microsoft Store.
Is féidir leat rochtain a fháil ar do phróifíl Microsoft Store agus ar fhaisnéis chuntais trí chuairt a thabhairt ar
Microsoft Store
agus trí roghnú
Féach ar do chuntas
nó
Stair orduithe.
Microsoft Teams d’úsáid phearsanta.
Is féidir leat a fháil amach conas is féidir sonraí Teams a bhaineann le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta a easpórtáil nó a scriosadh ar an
leathanach
seo.
OneDrive.
Is féidir leat do chomhaid a fheiceáil, a íoslódáil agus a scriosadh in OneDrive ach síniú isteach ar do
OneDrive
.
Outlook.com.
Is féidir leat do ríomhphoist a íoslódáil in
Outlook.com
ach síniú isteach ar do chuntas agus nascleanúint a dhéanamh chuig do shocruithe maidir le
Príobháideachas agus sonraí
.
Skype
. Más mian leat roinnt faisnéise próifíle agus íocaíochta do Skype a rochtain, a chur in eagar nó a bhaint, nó do phasfhocal a athrú,
sínigh isteach ar do chuntas
. Más mian leat stair do chomhráite Skype agus comhaid a comhroinneadh ar Skype a easpórtáil, is féidir leat
cóip a iarraidh
.
Ionad Seirbhíse Ceadúnú Ilsuiteálacha (VLSC).
Más custaiméir Ceadúnú Ilsuiteálacha thú, is féidir leat d'fhaisnéis teagmhála agus do shonraí síntiúis agus ceadúnaithe a rialú in áit amháin ach cuairt a thabhairt ar
shuíomh gréasáin Ionad Seirbhíse Ceadúnú Ilsuiteálacha
.
Xbox
. Má úsáideann tú líonra Xbox nó Xbox.com, is féidir leat do shonraí pearsanta, lena n-áirítear sonraí billeála agus cuntais, socruithe príobháideachta agus sainroghanna sábháilteachta agus comhroinnte sonraí ar líne, a fheiceáil agus a chur in eagar ag
My Xbox
ar chonsól an Xbox nó ar shuíomh gréasáin Xbox.com.
Ní féidir gach sonraí pearsanta a phróiseálann Microsoft a rochtain nó a rialú leis na huirlisí thuas. Más mian leat na sonraí pearsanta a phróiseálann Microsoft a rochtain nó a rialú, sonraí nach bhfuil ar fáil trí na huirlisí thuas nó go díreach trí na táirgí Microsoft a úsáideann tú, is féidir leat teagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft i gcónaí ag an seoladh atá luaite sa rannán
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
nó trí ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
a úsáid. Freagróimid ar iarratais chun do shonraí pearsanta a rialú mar a éilítear leis an dlí is infheidhme.
Do shainroghanna cumarsáide
Is féidir leat roghnú más mian leat cumarsáidí fógraíochta a fháil ó Microsoft le ríomhphost, SMS, post fisiceach agus guthán. Má fhaigheann tú ríomhphoist nó SMS fógraíochta uainn agus ba mhaith leat iad a dhiúltú amach anseo, tig leat é sin a dhéanamh trí na treoracha sa teachtaireacht sin. Is féidir leat, freisin, roghanna a dhéanamh faoi cibé an nglacfaidh tú le ríomhphoist fógraíochta, glaonna fóin agus comhfhreagras poist ach síniú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta, agus féachaint ar do
cheadanna cumarsáide
áit is féidir leat d'fhaisnéis teagmhála a nuashonrú, sainroghanna teagmhála ar fud Microsoft a bhainistiú, díliostáil ó do shíntiúis ríomhphoist, agus roghnú cibé an gcomhroinnfidh tú d’fhaisnéis teagmhála le comhpháirtithe Microsoft nó nach gcomhroinnfidh. Mura bhfuil cuntas pearsanta Microsoft agat, is féidir leat do shainroghanna teagmhála ríomhphoist Microsoft a bhainistiú trí úsáid a bhaint as an
bhfoirm ghréasáin
seo. Ní bhaineann na roghanna sin le cumarsáid riachtanach seirbhíse atá mar chuid de tháirgí, chláir nó ghníomhaíochtaí Microsoft, ná le suirbhéanna ná le míreanna cumarsáide faisnéise eile a bhfuil a modh díliostála féin acu.
Do roghanna fógraíochta
Chun díliostáil ó fhógraíocht pearsantaithe ó Microsoft, lena n-áirítear Xandr, a fháil, téigh chuig an leathach
díliostála
dár gcuid. Nuair a dhíliostálann tú, déantar do shainrogha a stóráil i gcuach a bhaineann go sonrach leis an mbrabhsálaí Gréasáin atá in úsáid agat. Gabhann dáta éaga cúig bliana leis an gcuach díliostála. Má scriosann tú na cuacha ar do ghléas, beidh ort díliostáil arís.
Is féidir leat, freisin, do rogha díliostála a nascadh le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta. Beidh feidhm aici ansin ar ghléas ar bith ar a n-úsáideann tú an cuntas sin, agus beidh feidhm aici i gcónaí go dtí go sínítear isteach le cuntas Microsoft pearsanta eile ar an ngléas sin. Má scriosann tú na cuacha ar do ghléas, beidh ort síniú isteach arís leis na socruithe a chur i bhfeidhm. Is féidir leat amharc ar
ár gcomhpháirtithe fógraí tríú páirtí
ar
Fhógra Dlíthe Príobháideachais Sonraí Stáit SAM
, agus díliostáil ó chomhroinnt na sonraí le tríú páirtithe ar an
leathanach díliostála
.
Maidir le fógraíocht faoi rialú Microsoft a fheictear i bhfeidhmchláir ar Windows, is féidir leas a bhaint as an rogha díliostála atá nasctha le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta, nó díliostáil ó fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise tríd an ID fógraíochta i socruithe Windows a chasadh as.
Ós rud é go n-úsáidtear na sonraí a úsáidtear i gcás fógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise le haghaidh cuspóirí riachtanacha eile (lena n-áirítear ár dtáirgí a sholáthar, anailísíocht agus brath calaoise) ní chiallaíonn díliostáil ó fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise nach mbaileofar na sonraí sin. Gheobhaidh tú fógraí, ach seans nach mbeidh siad chomh bainteach leat.
Is féidir leat díliostáil ó fhógraí bunaithe ar ábhair spéise a fháil ónár gcomhpháirtithe tríú páirtí ach dul chuig a suíomhanna Gréasáin (féach thuas).
Rialuithe bunaithe ar bhrabhsálaí
Nuair a úsáideann tú brabhsálaí, is féidir leat do shonraí pearsanta a rialú le gnéithe áirithe. Mar shampla:
Rialuithe fianán
. Is féidir leat na sonraí a stóráiltear le fianáin a rialú agus toiliú le cuacha a aistarraingt trí leas a bhaint as na rialuithe fianáin bunaithe ar bhrabhsálaí a bhfuil cur síos orthu sa rannán
Fianáin
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Cosaintí rianaithe
. Féadfaidh tú na sonraí ar féidir le suíomhanna tríú páirtí a bhailiú fút a rialú trí leas a bhaint as Cosaint ar Rianú in Internet Explorer (leagan 9 agus leaganacha níos déanaí) agus Microsoft Edge. Is féidir bac a chur ar ábhar tríú páirtí leis an ngné sin, lena n-áirítear cuacha, ó aon suíomh atá liostaithe ar Liosta um Chosaint ar Rianú a chuireann tú leis.
Rialuithe brabhsálaí do "Ná Rianaigh."
Tá gnéithe "Ná Rianaigh" (DNT) mar chuid de roinnt brabhsálaithe ar féidir leo comhartha a sheoladh chuig na suíomhanna gréasáin a dtugann tú cuairt orthu ag cur in iúl nach bhfuil fonn ort go rianófar thú. De bhrí nach bhfuil comhthuiscint ann fós ar an tslí leis an gcomhartha Ná Rianaigh a léirmhíniú, ní fhreagraíonn seirbhísí Microsoft comharthaí Ná Rianaigh ó bhrabhsálaithe. Leanfaimid de dhul i mbun oibre leis an tionscal ar líne chun comhthuiscint ar conas caitheamh le comharthaí Ná Rianaigh a shainiú. Idir an dá linn, is féidir úsáid a bhaint as na huirlísí eile a chuirimid ar fáil chun bailiú agus úsáid sonraí a rialú, lena n-áirítear an cumas diúltú d'fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise ó Microsoft, mar a thuairiscítear thuas.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Cuacha agus teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla
Is comhaid téacs bheaga iad cuacha a chuirtear ar do ghléas chun sonraí a stóráil, ar féidir le freastalaí Gréasáin iad a léamh san fhearann a chuir an chuach ann. Úsáidimid cuacha agus teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla chun do shainroghanna agus do shocruithe a stóráil agus chun cloí leo, rud a chuireann ar do chumas síniú isteach, agus a chumasaíonn dúinn fógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéis a sheoladh, dul i ngleic le calaois, anailís a dhéanamh ar fheidhmíocht ár dtáirgí, agus cuspóirí dlisteanacha eile a chomhlíonadh. Baineann feidhmchláir Microsoft úsáid as aitheantóirí breise, amhail an ID fógraíochta i Windows, a ndéantar cur síos air sa rannán
ID fógraíochta
Windows den ráiteas príobháideachais seo, chun críocha comhchosúla.
Bainimid úsáid freisin as “rabhcháin Ghréasáin” chun cuacha a sheoladh agus sonraí úsáide agus feidhmíochta a bhailiú. Is féidir go gcuirfidh ár suíomhanna idirlíne rabhcháin, fianáin, nó teicneolaíochtaí atá cosúil le chéile ó chleamhnaithe agus comhpháirtithe chomh le tríú páirtí, mar shampla soláthraí seirbhísí ag gníomhú ar ár son san áireamh.
D'fhéadfadh na nithe seo a leanas a bheith san áireamh le fianáin tríú páirtí: Deartar fianáin mheán sóisialta chun fógraí agus inneachar bunaithe ar do phróifíl meán sóisialta agus do ghníomhaíocht ar ár suíomhanna a thaispeáint duit; fianáin anailísíochta chun tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar an dóigh a úsáideann tú agus daoine eile ár suíomhanna ionas gur féidir linn iad a fheabhsú, agus ionas gur féidir le tríú páirtithe a gcuid táirgí agus seirbhísí féin a fheabhsú; fianáin Fógraíochta chun fógraí atá ábhartha duit a thaispeáint duit; agus fianáin Riachtanacha a úsáidtear chun feidhmeanna suímh ghréasáin bunriachtanacha a dhéanamh. Nuair is gá, faighimid do thoiliú sula gcuirtear nó úsáidimid fianáin roghnacha nach bhfuil (i) fíor-riachtanach chun an suíomh gréasáin a sholáthar; nó (ii) chun cumarsáid a éascú.
Féach ar an rannán Tuilleadh faisnéise thíos chun faisnéis ar ár úsáid fianáin tríú pháirtí, rabhcháin gréasáin agus seirbhísí anailísíochta, agus teicneolaíochtaí atá cosúil leo ar ár suíomhanna agus seirbhísí. Chun liosta a fháil de na tríú páirtithe a shocraíonn fianáin ar ár suíomhanna gréasáin, soláthraithe seirbhíse atá ag feidhmiú ar ár son san áireamh, tabhair cuairt ar ár bhfardal
fianán tríú páirtithe
. Ar chuid dár suíomhanna gréasáin, tá liosta tríú páirtithe ar fáil go díreach ar an suíomh. Is féidir nach mbeidh na tríú páirtithe ar na suíomhanna seo san áireamh leis an liosta ar ár
bhfardal fianáin tríú páirtí
.
Tá uirlisí éagsúla agat chun na sonraí arna mbailiú ag cuacha, rabhcháin Ghréasáin, agus teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla a rialú. Mar shampla, féadfaidh tú leas a bhaint as na rialtáin i do bhrabhsálaí idirlín chun an bealach ina n-úsáideann na suíomhanna Gréasáin ar a bhféachann tú cuacha agus is féidir leat do thoiliú a aistarraingt trí bhac a chur ar chuacha nó iad a ghlanadh.
Is comhaid téacs bheaga iad cuacha a chuirtear ar do ghléas chun sonraí a stóráil, ar féidir le freastalaí Gréasáin iad a léamh san fhearann a chuir an chuach ann. Is teaghrán uimhreacha agus litreacha a bhíonn sna sonraí sin go minic, lena ndéantar do ríomhaire féin a aithint go huathúil, ach is féidir faisnéis eile a bheith in éineacht leis chomh mhaith. Cuireann tríú páirtithe atá ag gníomhú ar ár son roinnt cuach i bhfeidhm. Úsáidimid cuacha agus teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla chun do shainroghanna agus do shocruithe a stóráil agus chun cloí leo, rud a chuireann ar do chumas síniú isteach, agus a chumasaíonn dúinn fógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéis a sheoladh, dul i ngleic le calaois, anailís a dhéanamh ar fheidhmíocht ár dtáirgí, agus cuspóirí dlisteanacha eile a chomhlíonadh a bhfuil cur síos orthu thíos. Úsáideann feidhmchláir Microsoft aitheantóirí eile, cosúil leis an ID fógraíochta in Windows, le haghaidh cuspóirí comhchosúla, agus tá rabhcháin Ghréasáin nó teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla i mórchuid dár suíomhanna Gréasáin agus dár bhfeidhmchláir, mar a luaitear thíos.
An úsáid a bhainimid as cuacha agus teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla
Baineann Microsoft úsáid as cuacha agus as teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla le haghaidh cuspóirí éagsúla, ag brath ar an gcomhthéacs nó ar an táirge, lena n-áirítear:
Do shainroghanna agus socruithe a stóráil
. Úsáidimid cuacha chun do shainroghanna agus socruithe a stóráil ar do ghléas, agus chun feabhas a chur ar d'eispéiris. Mar shampla, ag brath ar do chuid socruithe, má chuireann tú do chathair nó cód poist isteach chun nuacht áitiúil nó faisnéis faoin aimsir a fháil ar shuíomh gréasáin de chuid Microsoft, déanaimid na sonraí sin a stóráil i gcuach, ionas go bhfeicfidh tú an fhaisnéis áitiúil chuí nuair a fhillfidh tú ar an suíomh. Má dhéantar do shainroghanna a shábháil le cuacha, amhail do theanga shainroghnaithe, ní bheidh ort do shainroghanna a shocrú arís is arís eile. Má dhíliostálann tú ó fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise, stórálaimid do shainrogha díliostála i gcuach ar do ghléas. Mar an gcéanna, i gcásanna ina bhfaighimid cead uait cuacha a chur ar do ghléas, déanaimid an rogha a dhéanann tú a stóráil i gcuach.
Síniú isteach agus fíordheimhniú
. Úsáidimid cuacha le fíordheimhniú gur tusa atá ann. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach i suíomh Gréasáin le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta, déanaimid uimhir ID uathúil, agus an t-am a shínigh tú isteach a stóráil i gcuach criptithe ar do ghléas. Ligeann an fianán seo duit bogadh ó leathanach go leathanach ar an suíomh gan síniú isteach arís ar gach leathanach. Chomh maith leis sin, féadfaidh tú d'fhaisnéis sínithe isteach a shábháil ionas nach mbeidh ort síniú isteach gach uair a fhilleann tú ar an suíomh.
Slándáil
. Féadfaimid cuacha a úsáid chun faisnéis a phróiseáil a chabhraíonn linn ár gcuid táirgí a choimeád slán, mar aon le calaois agus mí-úsáid a bhrath.
Faisnéis a sholáthraíonn tú do shuíomh Gréasáin a stóráil
. Úsáidimid cuacha chun faisnéis a chomhroinn tú a choimeád i gcuimhne. Nuair a sholáthraíonn tú faisnéis do Microsoft, mar shampla nuair a chuireann tú táirgí le cairt siopadóireachta ar shuíomhanna Gréasáin Microsoft, déanaimid na sonraí a stóráil i gcuach le cuimhneamh ar an bhfaisnéis sin.
Meáin shóisialta
. Tá cuacha meán sóisialta ar chuid dár suíomhanna Gréasáin, lena n-áirítear cuacha a chuireann ar chumas úsáideoirí atá sínithe isteach sa tseirbhís meán sóisialta inneachar a chomhroinnt tríd an tseirbhís sin.
Aiseolas
. Baineann Microsoft úsáid as cuacha chun tú a chumasú chun aiseolas a sholáthar ar shuíomh Gréasáin.
Fógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise
. Úsáideann Microsoft cuacha chun do ghníomhaíocht ar líne agus do shuimeanna a aithint ionas gur féidir linn an fhógraíocht is ábhartha duit a sholáthar. Is féidir leat díliostáil ó fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise a fháil ó Microsoft mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán
Conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Fógraíocht a thaispeáint
. Baineann Microsoft úsáid as fianáin chun líon na gcuairteoirí a chliceálann ar fhógra a thaifeadadh agus chun na fógraí atá feicthe agat a thaifeadadh, mar shampla, ionas nach dtaispeántar an ceann céanna duit arís agus arís eile.
Anailísíocht
. Bainimid úsáid as cuacha agus aitheantóirí eile, céad pháirtí agus tríú páirtí, chun sonraí úsáide agus feidhmíochta a bhailiú. Mar shampla, bainimid feidhm as cuacha chun líon na gcuairteoirí uathúla chuig leathanach gréasáin nó seirbhís a áireamh nó chun staidrimh eile a fhorbairt maidir le hoibriú ár dtáirgí.
Feidhmíocht
. Úsáideann Microsoft cuacha le tuiscint a fháil ar fheidhmíocht ár dtáirgí agus le feabhas a chur orthu. Mar shampla, úsáidimid cuacha le sonraí a bhailiú a chabhraíonn le cothromú lóid; cabhraíonn sé sin lena chinntiú go bhfanann ár suíomhanna Gréasáin faoi shiúl.
Nuair is gá, faighimid do thoiliú sula gcuirtear nó úsáidimid fianáin roghnacha nach bhfuil (i) fíor-riachtanach chun an suíomh gréasáin a sholáthar; nó (ii) chun cumarsáid a éascú. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a tháil, féach ar an rannán “Conas fianáin a rialú”.
Tá cuid de na cuacha is coitianta a úsáidimid liostaithe thíos. Ní liosta uileghabhálach é, ach tá sé ann chun na príomhchúiseanna lena socraímid cuacha a léiriú. Má thugann tú cuairt ar cheann dár suíomhanna gréasáin, socróidh an suíomh cuid de na cuacha seo, nó gach ceann díobh:
MSCC
. Sa cheann seo tá roghanna an úsáideora don chuid is mó d’airíonna Microsoft.
MUID, MC1, MSFPC, agus MSPTC
. Aithnítear brabhsálaithe uathúla gréasáin leo a thugann cuairt ar shuíomhanna de chuid Microsoft. Baintear úsáid as na cuacha seo chun críocha fógraíochta, anailísíocht suíomhanna agus cuspóirí oibríochtúla eile.
ANON
. Tá an ANID ann, arb aitheantóir uathúil é ó do chuntas Microsoft, a úsáidtear le haghaidh cuspóirí fógraíochta, pearsantaithe agus oibríochtúla. Aidhm eile atá leis ná do rogha chun diúltú d'fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise ó Microsoft a chaomhnú má roghnaigh tú an diúltú a nascadh le do chuntas Microsoft.
CC
. Tá cód tíre inti a cinneadh ó do sheoladh IP.
PPAuth, MSPAuth, MSNRPSAuth, KievRPSAuth, WLSSC, MSPProf
. Cabhraíonn siad leat a fhíordheimhniú nuair a shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft.
MC0
. Braitear léi cibé an bhfuil cuacha cumasaithe sa bhrabhsálaí.
MS0
. Aithnítear seisiún sainiúil léi.
NAP
. Tá leagan criptithe ann de do thír, cód poist, aois, inscne, teanga agus post, más eol é, bunaithe ar do phróifíl ar do chuntas Microsoft.
MH
. Bíonn sí le feiceáil ar shuíomhanna comhbhrandáilte inar comhpháirtithe iad Microsoft agus fógróir. Aithníonn an chuach seo an fógróir, ionas go roghnaítear an fógra ceart.
childinfo, kcdob, kcrelid, kcru, pcfm
. Tá faisnéis iontu sin a úsáideann cuntas Microsoft laistigh dá leathanaigh maidir le cuntais leanaí.
MR
. Úsáideann Microsoft an fianán seo chun an fianán MUID a athshocrú nó a athnuachan.
x-ms-gateway-slice
. Aithnítear geata ar mhaithe le cothromú lódála léi.
TOptOut
. Taifeadann í seo do chinneadh gan glacadh le fógraíocht spriocaimsithe á soláthar ag Microsoft. Nuair is gá, socraímid an chuach seo de réir réamhshocraithe agus déanaimid í a bhaint nuair a thugann tú cead fógraíocht spriocaimsithe a fháil.
ApplicationGatewayAffinity
agus
ApplicationGatewayAffinityCORS
. Úsáidtear na fianáin seisiúin seo chun críocha cothromú ualaigh agus chun a chinntiú go láimhseálann an freastalaí céanna iarratais ar sheisiún úsáideora.
Tá seans go n-úsáidfimid fianáin chleamhnaí, comhlachtaí, agus comhghleacaí eile, mar shampla LinkedIn agus Xandr.
Fianáin tríú páirtí
Chomh maith leis na fianáin a shocraíonn Microsoft nuair a thugann tú cuairt ar ár suíomhanna, is féidir linn fianáin ó tríú pháirtithe chomh maith chun ár seirbhísí a fheabhsú ar ár suíomhanna. Is féidir le roinnt tríú pháirtí fianáin a shocrú nuair a thugann tú cuairt ar suíomhanna Microsoft. Mar shampla:
Na cuideachtaí a fhostaímid chun seirbhísí a sholáthar ar ár son, amhail anailísíocht ar shuíomh, déanann siad cuacha a shocrú nuair a théann tú chuig ár suíomhanna.
Is féidir le cuideachtaí a dhéanann ábhar a sheachadadh, amhail físeáin, nuacht, nó fógraí, ar shuíomhanna Microsoft fianáin a shocrú ar a suíomhanna féin.
Úsáideann na cuideachtaí sin na sonraí a phróiseálann siad de réir a bpolasaithe príobháideachais, lena gcumasófaí do na cuideachtaí sin faisnéis faoi do ghníomhaíochtaí ar shuíomhanna Gréasáin, feidhmchláir, nó seirbhísí ar líne éagsúla a bhailiú agus a chur le chéile.
B’fhéidir go n-úsáidfear na cineálacha fianán tríú pháirtí a leanas, ag brath ar an gcomhthéacs, ar an seirbhís nó ar an dtáirge, chomh maith le do shocruithe agus ceadanna:
Fianáin Mheáin Shóisialta.
Úsáidimid, agus úsáideann tríú páirtithe, fianáin ó na meáin shóisialta chun fógraí agus inneachar a thaispeáint duit bunaithe ar na próifílí atá agat ar na meáin shóisialta agus do chuid gníomhaíochta ar ár suíomhanna gréasáin. Úsáidtear iad le nasc a dhéanamh idir do chuid gníomhaíochta ar ár suíomhanna gréasáin agus na próifílí atá agat ar na meáin shóisialta sa dóigh is go mbeidh na fógraí agus an t-inneachar a fheiceann tú ar ár suíomhanna gréasáin agus ar na meáin shóisialta ag teacht níos fearr leis an suimeanna atá agat.
Fianáin anailísíochta.
Tugaimid cead do thríú páirtithe fianáin anailísíochta a úsáid chun tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar an gcaoi a úsáideann tú ár suíomhanna gréasáin, ionas gur féidir linn iad a fheabhsú agus gur féidir leis na tríú páirtithe á dtáirgí a fhorbairt agus a fheabhsú, a bhféadfaidís úsáid a bhaint astu ar shuíomhanna gréasáin nach le Microsoft iad agus nach ndéanann Microsoft iad a oibriú. Mar shampla, úsáidtear fianáin anailísíochta chun faisnéis a bhailiú maidir leis na leathanaigh a dtugann tú cuairt orthu agus cá mhéad clic atá de dhíth ort chun tasc a chur i gcrích. D’fhéadfaí na cuacha sin a úsáid fosta chun críocha fógraíochta.
Fianáin fógraíochta.
Úsáidimid agus úsáideann tríú páirtithe fianáin fógraíochta chun fógraí nua a thaispeáint duit ach taifead a dhéanamh de na fógraí atá feicthe agat cheana féin. Úsáidtear iad fosta chun na fógraí a gcliceálann tú orthu - nó na nithe a cheannaíonn tú i ndiaidh cliceáil ar fhógra - a rianú chun críocha íocaíochta, agus le fógraí a thaispeáint duit atá níos feiliúnaí duitse. Mar shampla, úsáidtear iad le brath cén uair a chliceálann tú ar fhógra agus chun fógraí a thaispeáint duit bunaithe ar do chuid suimeanna sna meáin shóisialta agus ar an stair bhrabhsála atá agat ó thaobh suíomhanna gréasáin de.
Fianáin riachtanacha.
Úsáidimid fianáin riachtanacha chun feidhmeanna suímh ghréasáin riachtanacha a dhéanamh. Mar shampla, chun thú a logáil isteach, do chuid sainroghanna teanga a shábháil, eispéireas tralaí siopadóireachta a thabhairt, feidhmíocht a fheabhsú, trácht a ródú idir freastalaithe gréasáin, méid do scáileáin a bhrath, agaí lódála leathanach a mheas, agus luchtanna féachana a thomhas. Tá na cuacha seo riachtanach le go bhfeidhmeoidh ár suíomhanna gréasáin.
Nuair is gá, faighimid do thoiliú sula gcuirtear nó úsáidimid fianáin roghnacha nach bhfuil (i) fíor-riachtanach chun an suíomh gréasáin a sholáthar; nó (ii) chun cumarsáid a éascú.
Chun liosta a fháil de na tríú páirtithe a shocraíonn fianáin ar ár suíomhanna gréasáin, soláthraithe seirbhíse atá ag feidhmiú ar ár son san áireamh, tabhair cuairt ar ár
bhfardal fianán tríú páirtithe
. Tá naisc chuig suíomhanna tríú pháirtí nó fógraí príobháideachais curtha san áireamh sa fardal fianán tríú pháirtí chomh maith. Téigh i gcomhairle leis na suíomhanna tríú pháirtí nó na fógraí príobháideachta le tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil ar a cleachtais príobháideachta maidir lena fianáin arbh fhéidir bheith socruithe ar ár suíomhanna gréasáin. Ar chuid dár suíomhanna gréasáin, tá liosta tríú páirtithe ar fáil go díreach ar an suíomh. Is féidir nach mbeidh na tríú páirtithe ar na suíomhanna seo san áireamh leis an liosta ar ár
bhfardal fianán tríú páirtí
.
Conas cuacha a rialú
Glacfaidh formhór na mbrabhsálaithe Gréasáin le cuacha ach cuireann siad rialuithe ar fáil a cheadaíonn duit iad a bhacadh nó a scriosadh. Mar shampla, in Microsoft Edge, is féidir leat fianáin a bhacadh nó a scriosadh trí
Socruithe
>
Príobháideachais agus seirbhísí
>  a roghnú
Glan sonraí brabhsála
>
Fianáin agus sonraí suímh eile
. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi conas d'fhianáin a scriosadh i mbrabhsálaithe Microsoft, féach
Microsoft Edge
,
Oidhreacht Microsoft Edge
, nó
Internet Explorer
. Más brabhsálaí eile atá in úsáid agat, féach treoracha an bhrabhsálaí sin.
Mar a luadh thuas, nuair is gá, faighimid do thoiliú sula gcuirtear nó úsáidimid fianáin roghnacha nach bhfuil (i) fíor-riachtanach chun an suíomh gréasáin a sholáthar; nó (ii) chun cumarsáid a éascú. Déanann na cuacha roghnacha seo a scaradh de réir feidhme, amhail críocha a bhaineann le fógraíocht nó leis na meáin shóisialta. Is féidir leat cead a thabhairt i gcás catagóirí áirithe de na cuacha roghnacha agus diúltú i gcás catagóirí eile. Is féidir leat do roghanna a athrú chomh maith ach “Bainistigh cuacha” a chliceáil sa bhuntásc den suíomh gréasáin nó sna socruithe a chuirtear ar fáil ar an suíomh gréasáin. Tá gnéithe áirithe de tháirgí Microsoft ag brath ar chuacha. Má roghnaíonn tú bac a chur ar chuacha, ní bheidh tú in ann síniú isteach ná cuid de na gnéithe sin a úsáid, agus caillfear sainroghanna a bhraitheann ar chuacha. Má roghnaíonn tú cuacha a scriosadh, déanfar aon socruithe agus sainroghanna atá á rialú ag na cuacha sin, lena n-áirítear sainroghanna fógraíochta, a scriosadh agus is féidir go mba ghá iad a athchruthú.
Déantar cur síos ar rialuithe príobháideachais eile ar féidir tionchar a bheith acu ar fhianáin, lena n-áirítear an ghné chosaintí rianaithe de bhrabhsálaithe Microsoft, sa rannán
Conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
An úsáid a bhainimid as rabhcháin Ghréasáin agus seirbhísí anailísíochta
D'fhéadfadh clibeanna leictreonacha ar a dtugtar rabhcháin Ghréasáin a bheith i leathanaigh Ghréasáin áirithe Microsoft. Úsáidimid iad sin le cabhrú chun cuacha a sheachadadh ar ár suíomhanna Gréasáin, chun líon na gcuairteoirí na suíomhanna sin a chomhaireamh, agus chun seirbhísí comhbhrandáilte a chur ar fáil. Áirímid rabhcháin Ghréasáin nó teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla inár gcumarsáid leictreonach freisin le fáil amach cibé an osclaíonn tú iad agus an ngníomhaíonn tú dá réir.
Chomh maith le rabhcháin ghréasáin a chur inár suíomhanna Gréasáin féin, uaireanta oibrímid le comhlachtaí eile a chuireann ár rabhcháin ina suíomhanna Gréasáin nó i bhfógraí dá gcuid. Cabhraíonn sé sin linn, mar shampla, staitisticí a fhorbairt ar a mhinice a bhíonn ceannach nó gníomh eile ar shuíomh Gréasáin fógróra ina thoradh ar chliceáil ar fhógra ar shuíomh Gréasáin de chuid Microsoft. Tugann sé tuiscint dúinn ar do ghníomhaíocht ar shuíomh gréasáin de chuid comhpháirtí Microsoft maidir leis an úsáid a bhaineann tú as táirge nó seirbhís Microsoft.
Faoi dheireadh, bíonn rabhcháin nó teicneolaíocht eile ó sholáthraithe anailísíochta tríú páirtí i dtáirgí Microsoft freisin, a chabhraíonn linn staitisticí comhbhailithe a chur le chéile faoi cé chomh héifeachtach is atá ár bhfeachtais promóisin nó oibríochtaí eile. Cuireann na teicneolaíochtaí seo ar chumas sholáthraithe na hanailísíochta a gcuacha féin nó aitheantóirí eile a shocrú nó a léamh ar do ghléas, ar féidir leo iad a úsáid chun faisnéis a bhailiú faoi do ghníomhaíochtaí ar líne thar raon feidhmchlár, suíomhanna Gréasáin nó táirgí eile. D'ainneoin sin, cuirimid cosc ar na soláthraithe anailísíochta siúd rabhchán Gréasáin a úsáid inár suíomhanna chun eolas a bhailiú nó a fheiceáil a chuireann tú in aithne go díreach (ar nós d'ainm agus seoladh ríomhphoist). Is féidir leat dílostáil de bhailiú nó d'úsáid sonraí ag cuid de na soláthraithe anailísíochta seo trí chuairt a thabhairt ar aon cheann de na suíomhanna seo a leanas:
Coigeartaigh
,
AppsFlyer
,
Clicktale
,
Flurry Analytics
,
Google Analytics
(éilítear ort breiseán brabhsálaí a shuiteáil),
Kissmetrics
,
Mixpanel
,
Nielsen
,
Acuity Ads
,
WebTrends
, nó
Optimizely
.
Teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla
Chomh maith le gnáthchuacha agus gnáthrabhcháin Ghréasáin, is féidir lenár dtáirgí teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla eile a úsáid chun comhaid sonraí a stóráil agus a léamh ar do ríomhaire. Déantar é seo de ghnáth chun do shainroghanna a choimeád nó chun luas agus feidhmíocht a fheabhsú trí chomhaid áirithe a stóráil go logánta. Ach, amhail gnáthchuacha, féadfar na teicneolaíochtaí sin a úsáid chun aitheantóir uathúil a stóráil le haghaidh do ríomhaire, ar féidir iad a úsáid ansin chun iompar a rianú. Áirítear ar na teicneolaíochtaí sin Réada Comhroinnte Logánta (nó "fianáin Flash") agus Stóras Feidhmchláir Silverlight.
Réada Comhroinnte Áitiúla nó "Fianáin flash."
Is féidir le suíomhanna Gréasáin a úsáideann teicneolaíochtaí Adobe Flash Réada Comhroinnte Áitiúla nó "fianáin Flash" a úsáid chun sonraí a stóráil ar do ríomhaire. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoin gcaoi fianáin Flash a bhainistiú nó a bhacadh, gabh chuig an
leathanach cabhrach Seinnteora Flash
.
Stóráil feidhmchlár Silverlight
. Tá sé de chumas ag suíomhanna Gréasáin nó feidhmchláir a úsáideann teicneolaíocht Microsoft Silverlight sonraí a stóráil freisin trí leas a bhaint as Stóráil Feidhmchláir Silverlight. Chun foghlaim conas an stóráil sin a bhainistiú nó a bhacadh, féach rannán
Silverlight
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Táirgí arna gcur ar fáil ag d'eagraíocht—fógra d'úsáideoirí deiridh
Má úsáideann tú táirge Microsoft le cuntas atá curtha ar fáil ag eagraíocht lena bhfuil tú cleamhnaithe, cosúil le do chuntas oibre nó scoile, is féidir leis an eagraíocht sin an méid seo a leanas a dhéanamh:
Do tháirge agus cuntas táirge Microsoft a rialú agus a riar, lena n-áirítear socruithe príobháideachais an táirge nó cuntas an táirge a rialú.
Do shonraí a rochtain agus a phróiseáil, lena n-áirítear na sonraí idirghníomhaíochta, sonraí diagnóiseacha, agus inneachar do chuid cumarsáide agus do chomhaid, a bhaineann le do tháirge Microsoft agus le cuntais an táirge.
Mura bhfuil tú in ann do chuntas oibre nó scoile a rochtain (mar shampla, má athraíonn do chúrsaí fostaíochta), seans nach mbeidh rochtain agat ar na táirgí ná an t-inneachar a bhaineann leis na táirgí sin, lena n-áirítear na cinn sin a fuair tú ar do shon féin, má bhain tú leas as do chuntas oibre nó scoile le síniú isteach sna táirgí sin.
Tá a lán táirgí Microsoft atá beartaithe lena n-úsáid ag eagraíochtaí, amhail scoileanna agus gnóthais. Féach ar an rannán
táirgí Fiontraíochta agus forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachta seo. Má chuireann d'eagraíocht rochtain ar fáil duit ar tháirgí Microsoft, tá an úsáid a bhaineann tú as na táirgí Microsoft sin faoi réir pholasaithe d'eagraíochta, más ann dóibh. Ba chóir duit do cheisteanna maidir le príobháideacht, lena n-áirítear aon iarratais ar do chearta cosanta sonraí a chur i bhfeidhm, a sheoladh chuig riarthóir d'eagraíochta. Nuair a úsáideann tú gnéithe sóisialta i dtáirgí Microsoft, is féidir go bhfeicfidh úsáideoirí eile i do líonra cuid de do ghníomhaíochtaí. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi na gnéithe sóisialta agus feidhmiúlachtaí eile, féach na doiciméid nó an t-inneachar cabhrach a bhaineann leis an táirge Microsoft. Níl Microsoft freagrach as cleachtais phríobháideachais nó shlándála ár gcustaiméirí, a d'fhéadfadh a bheith difriúil ó na cinn atá leagtha amach sa ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Nuair a úsáideann tú táirge Microsoft a sholáthraíonn do eagraíocht, bíonn próiseáil a dhéanann Microsoft do shonraí pearsanta i ndáil leis an táirge sin faoi rialú ag conradh idir Microsoft agus d'eagraíocht. Próiseálann Microsoft do shonraí pearsanta chun an táirge a sholáthar do d'eagraíocht agus duitse, agus i gcásanna áirithe ar mhaithe le hoibríochtaí ghnó Microsoft maidir leis an táirge a sholáthar mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán
táirgí Fiontraíochta agus forbróra
. Mar a luadh thuas, má tá ceisteanna agat faoi phróiseáil Microsoft ar do shonraí pearsanta maidir le táirgí a sholáthar do d'eagraíocht, déan teagmháil le d'eagraíocht le do thoil. Má tá ceisteanna agat faoi oibríochtaí gnó Microsoft i dtaca le táirgí a sholáthar do d'eagraíocht faoi mar a fhoráilítear sna Téarmaí Táirge, déan teagmháil le Microsoft mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
. Le tuilleadh faisnéise faoinár n-oibríochtaí gnó, féach ar rannán
táirgí Fiontraíochta agus forbróra
.
I gcás táirgí Microsoft a sholáthraíonn do scoil K-12, lena n-áirítear Microsoft 365 Education, ní dhéanfaidh Microsoft:
sonraí pearsanta mac léinn a bhailiú ná a úsáid thar an méid atá ag teastáil chun críocha oideachais nó scoile údaraithe;
sonraí pearsanta mac léinn a dhíol ná a ligean ar cíos;
sonraí pearsanta mac léinn a úsáid nó a chomhroinnt le haghaidh fógraíochta nó chun críocha tráchtála comhchosúla, ar nós fógráin a dhíriú ar mhic léinn ar bhonn iompair;
próifíl phearsanta dalta a thógáil, seachas chun tacú le cuspóirí údaraithe oideachais nó scoile nó mar atá údaraithe ag an tuismitheoir, an caomhnóir, nó an mac léinn d'aois chuí; agus
faillí ó thaobh ceangal a chur ar ár ndíoltóirí a bhfuil sonraí pearsanta mac léinn acu chun an tseirbhís oideachais a sheachadadh, más ann dóibh, na gealltanais chéanna a chur i bhfeidhm maidir le sonraí pearsanta mac léinn.
Siar go barr
cuntas Microsoft
Le cuntas Microsoft, is féidir leat síniú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft, agus i seirbhísí de chuid chomhpháirtithe áirithe Microsoft. Cuimsítear le sonraí pearsanta a bhaineann le do chuntas Microsoft faisnéis aitheantais, ainm agus sonraí teagmhála, sonraí íocaíochta, sonraí gléis agus úsáide, do theagmhálaithe, faisnéis faoi do ghníomhaíochtaí, d'ábhair spéise agus do cheanáin. Trí shíniú isteach i do chuntas Microsoft is féidir pearsantú a chumasú, mar aon le heispéiris chomhsheasmhacha sna táirgí agus gléasanna ar fad, ceadaítear duit néalstóras sonraí a úsáid, íocaíochtaí a dhéanamh le hionstraimí íocaíochta atá stóráilte i do chuntas Microsoft, agus cumasaítear gnéithe eile chomh maith.
Tá trí chineál de chuntas Microsoft ann:
Nuair a chruthaíonn tú do chuntas Microsoft féin, atá ceangailte le do sheoladh ríomhphoist pearsanta, tugaimid
cuntas Microsoft pearsanta
air sin.
Nuair a chruthaíonn tú nó d'eagraíocht (amhail fostóir nó scoil) cuntas Microsoft duit atá ceangailte le seoladh ríomhphoist arna sholáthar ag an eagraíocht sin duit, tugaimid
cuntas oibre nó scoile
air sin.
Nuair a chruthaíonn tú nó do sholáthraí seirbhíse (amhail soláthraí seirbhíse cábla nó idirlín) do chuntas Microsoft agus go bhfuil sé ceangailte le do sheoladh ríomhphoist le fearann do sholáthraí seirbhíse, tugaimid
cuntas tríú páirtí
air sin.
Má shíníonn tú isteach i seirbhís arna soláthar ag tríú páirtí le do chuntas Microsoft, déanfaidh tú na sonraí cuntais atá riachtanach don tseirbhís sin a chomhroinnt leis an tríú páirtí sin.
Le cuntas Microsoft, is féidir leat síniú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft, agus i seirbhísí de chuid chomhpháirtithe áirithe Microsoft. Cuimsítear le sonraí pearsanta a bhaineann le do chuntas Microsoft faisnéis aitheantais, ainm agus sonraí teagmhála, sonraí íocaíochta, sonraí gléis agus úsáide, do theagmhálaithe, faisnéis faoi do ghníomhaíochtaí, d'ábhair spéise agus do cheanáin. Trí shíniú isteach i do chuntas Microsoft is féidir pearsantú a chumasú, mar aon le heispéiris chomhsheasmhacha sna táirgí agus gléasanna ar fad, ceadaítear duit néalstóráil sonraí a úsáid, íocaíochtaí a dhéanamh le hionstraimí íocaíochta atá stóráilte i do chuntas Microsoft, agus cumasaítear gnéithe eile chomh maith. Tá trí chineál de chuntas Microsoft ann:
Nuair a chruthaíonn tú do chuntas Microsoft féin, atá ceangailte le do sheoladh ríomhphoist phearsanta, tugaimid
cuntas Microsoft pearsanta
air sin.
Nuair a chruthaíonn tú nó d'eagraíocht (amhail fostóir nó scoil) cuntas Microsoft duit atá ceangailte le seoladh ríomhphoist arna sholáthar ag an eagraíocht sin duit, tugaimid
cuntas oibre nó scoile
air sin.
Nuair a chruthaíonn tú nó do sholáthraí seirbhíse (amhail soláthraí seirbhíse cábla nó idirlín) do chuntas Microsoft atá ceangailte le do sheoladh ríomhphoist le fearann do sholáthraí seirbhíse, tugaimid
cuntas tríú páirtí
air sin.
Cuntais Microsoft phearsanta
. Braitheann na sonraí a bhaineann le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta, agus an chaoi ina n-úsáidtear na sonraí sin, ar an mbealach ina n-úsáideann tú an cuntas sin.
Do chuntas Microsoft a chruthú
. Nuair a chruthaíonn tú cuntas Microsoft pearsanta, iarrfar ort sonraí pearsanta áirithe a sholáthar agus sannfar uimhir aitheantais uathúil le do chuntas agus eolas a bhaineann leis a aithint. Cé go gcaithfidh tú fíorainm a sholáthar i gcomhar táirgí áirithe, ar nós nuair atá íocaíocht i gceist, is féidir síniú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft eile, agus iad a úsáid, gan fíorainm a sholáthar. Is féidir sonraí a chuireann tú ar fáil, ar nós d'ainm taispeána, seoladh ríomhphoist, agus uimhir fóin, a úsáid chun cabhrú le daoine eile tú a aimsiú agus dul i dteagmháil leat ar sheirbhísí Microsoft. Mar shampla, daoine arb eol dóibh d’ainm taispeána, do sheoladh ríomhphoist nó d’uimhir fóin, is féidir leo iad a úsáid chun tú a chuardach ar Skype nó ar Microsoft Teams d’úsáid phearsanta agus cuireadh a sheoladh chugat chun nascadh leo. Tabhair faoi deara, má úsáideann tú seoladh ríomhphoist oibre nó scoile chun cuntas Microsoft pearsanta a chruthú féadfaidh d'fhostóir nó do scoil rochtain a fháil ar do shonraí. I gcásanna áirithe, caithfidh tú an seoladh ríomhphoist a athrú go seoladh ríomhphoist pearsanta i dtreo is go mbeidh tú fós in ann rochtain a fháil ar tháirgí atá dírithe ar thomhaltóirí (amhail líonra Xbox).
Síniú isteach ar chuntas Microsoft
. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach i do chuntas Microsoft, cruthaímid taifead den síniú isteach, ina bhfuil an dáta agus an t-am, eolas faoin táirge ar shínigh tú isteach ann, d'ainm sínithe isteach, an uimhir uathúil i do chuntas, aitheantóir uathúil do ghléis, do sheoladh IP, agus do chóras oibriúcháin agus leagan do bhrabhsálaí.
Síniú isteach ar tháirgí Microsoft
. Ach síniú isteach i do chuntas is féidir pearsantú a fheabhsú, eispéiris gan uaim agus comhsheasmhacha a sholáthar trasna táirgí agus gléasanna, do shonraí néalstórais a rochtain agus a úsáid, íocaíochtaí a dhéanamh le hionstraimí íocaíochta atá stóráilte i do chuntas Microsoft, agus gnéithe agus socruithe breisithe eile a chumasú. Mar shampla, nuair a shíníonn tú isteach, cuireann Microsoft faisnéis arna sábháil ar do chuntas ar fáil thar tháirgí Microsoft ionas go mbeidh rudaí tábhachtacha ar fáil nuair a bhíonn siad de dhíth ort. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach i do chuntas, beidh tú sínithe isteach i gcónaí go dtí go síníonn tú amach. Má chuireann tú do chuntas Microsoft le gléas Windows (leagan 8 nó leagan níos déanaí), déanfaidh Windows tú a shíniú isteach go huathoibríoch sna táirgí ar an ngléas sin a úsáideann cuntas Microsoft nuair a théann tú chuig na táirgí sin ar an ngléas. Tar éis duit síniú isteach, taispeánfaidh táirgí áirithe d'ainm nó d'ainm úsáideora agus do ghrianghraf próifíle (má tá ceann curtha agat le do phróifíl) mar chuid den úsáid a bhaineann tú as táirgí Microsoft, lena n-áirítear i do chumarsáidí, idirbhearta sóisialta, agus poist phoiblí.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi do chuntas Microsoft, do shonraí agus do roghanna
.
Síniú isteach ar tháirgí tríú páirtí
. Má shíníonn tú isteach i dtáirge tríú páirtí le do chuntas Microsoft, déanfar do shonraí a chomhroinnt leis an tríú páirtí sin de réir pholasaí príobháideachais an tríú páirtí. Gheobhaidh an tríú páirtí sin an uimhir leagain a sannadh do do chuntas freisin (sanntar uimhir nua leagain gach uair a athraíonn tú do shonraí sínithe isteach), chomh maith le faisnéis faoi cibé an ndearnadh do chuntas a dhíghníomhachtú nó nach ndearnadh. Má dhéanann tú do chuid sonraí próifíle a chomhroinnt, féadfaidh an tríú páirtí d'ainm nó d'ainm úsáideora agus do ghrianghraf próifíle (má tá ceann curtha le do phróifíl agat) a léiriú agus tú sínithe isteach sa táirge tríú páirtí. Má roghnaíonn tú íocaíochtaí a dhéanamh le ceannaithe tríú páirtí trí do chuntas Microsoft, cuirfidh Microsoft faisnéis atá stóráilte i do chuntas Microsoft ar aghaidh chuig an tríú páirtí nó chuig a dhíoltóirí (m.sh. próiseálaithe íocaíochta) de réir mar is gá chun d'íocaíocht a phróiseáil agus d'ordú a chomhlíonadh (amhail ainm, uimhir cárta creidmheasa, seoltaí billeála agus poist, agus faisnéis ábhartha teagmhála). Is féidir leis an tríú páirtí na sonraí a fhaigheann sé nuair a shíníonn tú isteach nó nuair a cheannaíonn tú rud éigin a úsáid nó a chomhroinnt de réir a chleachtais agus a pholasaithe féin.
Ba chóir duit an ráiteas príobháideachais do gach táirge a síníonn tú isteach air agus gach ceannaí a gceannaíonn tú uaidh a léamh go cúramach le fáil amach conas a úsáidfidh sé na sonraí a bhailíonn sé.
Cuntais oibre nó scoile
. De ghnáth, bíonn na sonraí a bhaineann le cuntas oibre nó scoile, agus an bealach ina n-úsáidfear iad, cosúil leis an gcaoi a ndéantar sonraí a bhaineann le cuntas Microsoft pearsanta a bhailiú agus a úsáid.
Má úsáideann d'fhostóir nó do scoil Microsoft Entra ID chun an cuntas a chuireann sé ar fáil duit a bhainistiú, féadfaidh tú do chuntas oibre nó scoile a úsáid chun síniú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft, amhail Microsoft 365 agus Office 365, agus i dtáirgí tríú páirtí arna gcur ar fáil duit ag d'eagraíocht. Má iarrann d'eagraíocht é, beidh ort uimhir gutháin nó seoladh ríomhphoist eile a sholáthar ar son fíorú slándála breise. Agus, má cheadaíonn d'eagraíocht duit, féadfaidh tú úsáid a bhaint as do chuntas oibre nó scoile le síniú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft nó i dtáirgí tríú páirtí a fhaigheann tú duit féin.
Má shíníonn tú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft le cuntas oibre nó scoile, tabhair an méid a leanas faoi deara:
Is féidir le húinéir an fhearainn a bhaineann le do sheoladh ríomhphoist do chuntas a rialú agus a bhainistiú, agus do shonraí a rochtain agus a phróiseáil, lena n-áirítear a bhfuil i do mhíreanna cumarsáide agus i do chomhaid, lena n-áirítear sonraí arna stóráil i dtáirgí a sholáthraíonn d'eagraíocht duit agus i dtáirgí a fhaigheann tú féin.
Tá an úsáid a bhaineann tú as na táirgí faoi réir bheartais d'eagraíochta, más ann dóibh. Ba chóir duit machnamh a dhéanamh ar pholasaithe d'eagraíochta agus ar cibé an bhfuil tú sásta a chur ar chumas d'eagraíochta do chuid sonraí a rochtain sula mbaineann tú úsáid as do chuntas oibre nó scoile le síniú isteach i dtáirgí a fhaigheann tú duit féin.
Mura bhfuil tú in ann do chuntas oibre nó scoile a rochtain (mar shampla, má athraíonn do chúrsaí fostaíochta), seans nach mbeidh rochtain agat ar na táirgí ná an t-inneachar a bhaineann leis na táirgí sin a fuair tú ar do shon féin, má bhain tú leas as do chuntas oibre nó scoile le síniú isteach sna táirgí sin.
Níl Microsoft freagrach as cleachtais phríobháideachais ná slándála d'eagraíochta, a d'fhéadfadh a bheith difriúil ó chleachtais Microsoft.
Má tá d'eagraíocht ag bainistiú na húsáide a bhaineann tú as táirgí Microsoft, iarrtar ort do cheisteanna maidir le príobháideacht, lena n-áirítear aon iarratais ar do chearta cosanta sonraí a chur i bhfeidhm, a sheoladh chuig do riarthóir féin. Féach an rannán
Fógra d'úsáideoirí deiridh
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo freisin.
Mura bhfuil tú cinnte ar cuntas oibre nó scoile é do chuntas, téigh i dteagmháil le d'eagraíocht.
Cuntais tríú páirtí
. De ghnáth, bíonn na sonraí a bhaineann le cuntas Microsoft tríú páirtí, agus an bealach ina n-úsáidfear iad, cosúil leis an gcaoi a ndéantar sonraí a bhaineann le cuntas Microsoft pearsanta a bhailiú agus a úsáid. Tá rialú ag do sholáthraí seirbhíse ar do chuntas, agus tá sé de chumas aige do chuntas a rochtain nó a scriosadh.
Ba chóir duit na téarmaí a chuir an tríú páirtí ar fáil duit a athbhreithniú go cúramach le tuiscint a fháil ar an méid is féidir leis a dhéanamh le do chuntas
.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Sonraí a bhailiú ó leanaí
I gcás úsáideoirí faoi 13 nó faoin aois shonraithe le dlí i do dhlínse, cuirfidh táirgí agus seirbhísí áirithe Microsoft bac ar úsáideoirí faoin aois sin nó iarrfaidh siad orthu toiliú nó údarú a sholáthar ó tuismitheoir nó caomhnóir roimh go mbeidh siad in ann é a úsáid, cuntas a chruthú le rochtain ar seirbhísí Microsoft san áireamh. Ní iarrfaimid go feasach ar leanaí faoi bhun na haoise sin níos mó sonraí a sholáthar ná mar is gá chun an táirge a sholáthar.
Tar éis toiliú nó údarú a fháil ó thuismitheoir, caitear le cuntas an linbh cosúil le haon chuntas eile. Foghlaim a thuilleadh faoi cuntais phearsanta agus scoileanna san
roinn cuntas Microsoft
den Ráiteas Phríobháideachas agus
Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft
san roinn táirge-sonrach. Beidh an leanbh in ann rochtain a fháil ar sheirbhísí cumarsáide, amhail Outlook agus Skype, agus in ann cumarsáid a dhéanamh go héasca agus sonraí a chomhroinnt le húsáideoirí eile de gach aois. Is féidir le tuismitheoirí nó caomhnóirí na roghanna toilithe a rinneadh roimhe seo a athrú nó a chúlghairm.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi thoiliú tuismitheora agus cuntais páistí Microsoft
. Ós rud é go bhfuil an tuismitheoir nó caomhnóir mar eagraí ar ghrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft, is féidir leis an duine sin faisnéis agus socruithe an linbh a bhainistiú ar a leathanach
Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh
agus amharc ar shonraí a linbh agus iad a scriosadh ar a
bpainéal príobháideachta
. Cruthaítear cuntais a bhfuil cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth orthu go huathoibríoch mar chuid de ghrúpa teaghlaigh an duine a thug an cead don chuntas a chruthú. Le haghaidh cuntas linbh nach bhfuil cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth orthu chun cruthú (m.s., do pháistí atá os cionn an aois nuair a bhíonn cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth go dleathach), is féidir leis an tuismitheoir nó an chosantóir an grúpa teaghlaigh a úsáid go fóill agus ní mór an cuntas linbh nó an cuntas teaghlaigh a chur leis nuair a bhíonn an cuntas cruthaithe. Roghnaigh Foghlaim níos mó thíos i gcóir a thuilleadh eolais ar conas a rochtain agus a scrios sonraí linbh agus eolais ar páistí agus próifílí Xbox.
I gcás úsáideoirí faoi 13 nó faoin aois shonraithe le dlí i do dhlínse, cuirfidh táirgí agus seirbhísí áirithe Microsoft bac ar úsáideoirí faoin aois sin nó iarrfaidh siad orthu toiliú nó údarú a sholáthar ó tuismitheoir nó caomhnóir roimh go mbeidh siad in ann é a úsáid, cuntas a chruthú le rochtain ar seirbhísí Microsoft san áireamh. Ní iarrfaimid go feasach ar leanaí faoi bhun na haoise sin níos mó sonraí a sholáthar ná mar is gá chun an táirge a sholáthar.
Tar éis toiliú nó údarú a fháil ó thuismitheoir, caitear le cuntas an linbh cosúil le haon chuntas eile. Beidh an páiste in ann rochtain a fháil ar sheirbhísí cumarsáide, amhail Outlook agus Skype, agus is féidir cumarsáid a dhéanamh go héasca agus sonraí a chomhroinnt le húsáideoirí eile de gach aois.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le toiliú tuismitheora agus cuntais pháistí Microsoft
.
Is féidir le tuismitheoirí nó caomhnóirí na roghanna toilithe a rinneadh roimhe seo a athrú nó a chealú. Ós rud é go bhfuil an tuismitheoir nó caomhnóir mar eagraí ar ghrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft, is féidir leis an duine sin faisnéis agus socruithe an linbh a bhainistiú ar a leathanach
Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh
agus amharc ar shonraí a linbh agus iad a scriosadh ar a
bpainéal príobháideachta
. Cruthaítear cuntais a bhfuil cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth orthu go huathoibríoch mar chuid de ghrúpa teaghlaigh an duine a thug an cead don chuntas a chruthú. Le haghaidh cuntas linbh nach bhfuil cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth orthu chun cruthú (m.s., do pháistí atá os cionn an aois nuair a bhíonn cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth go dleathach), is féidir leis an tuismitheoir nó an chosantóir an grúpa teaghlaigh a úsáid go fóill agus ní mór an cuntas linbh nó an cuntas teaghlaigh a chur leis nuair a bhíonn an cuntas cruthaithe. Féach thíos chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi conas rochtain a fháil ar shonraí leanaí agus iad a scriosadh.
Anseo thíos tá faisnéis bhreise faoi bhailiú sonraí ó leanaí, lena n-áirítear tuilleadh sonraí mar a bhaineann le Xbox.
Sonraí páiste a rochtain agus a scriosadh.
Do tháirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft a éilíonn toiliú tuismitheora, is féidir le tuismitheoir sonraí áirithe ar lena bpáiste iad a fheiceáil agus a scriosadh ó
phainéal príobháideachais
an tuismitheora: stair bhrabhsála, stair chuardaigh, gníomhaíocht suímh, gníomhaíocht na meán, gníomhaíocht feidhmchlár agus seirbhíse, agus sonraí feidhmíochta seirbhíse agus táirge. Chun na sonraí seo a scriosadh, is féidir le tuismitheoir síniú isteach ar a
phainéal príobháideachais
agus gníomhaíochtaí a leanbh a bhainistiú. Tabhair faoi deara go n-athróidh cumas tuismitheora rochtain a fháil ar fhaisnéis phearsanta linbh agus/nó a scriosadh ar a dheais phríobháideachais ag brath ar na dlíthe ina bhfuil tú suite.
Lena chois sin, is féidir le tuismitheoir dul i dteagmháil lenár
bhfoireann tacaíochta príobháideachta
tríd an
bhfoirm tacaíochta príobháideachais
agus, tar éis fíordheimhnithe, iarraidh go scriosfar na cineálacha sonraí ar an bpainéal príobháideachta mar aon leis na sonraí seo a leanas: bogearraí, socrú, agus fardal; nascacht agus cumraíocht an ghléis; aiseolas agus rátálacha; aclaíocht agus gníomhaíocht; inneachar tacaíochta; idirghníomhaíochtaí tacaíochta; agus braiteoir comhshaoil. Déanaimid iarratais ar scriosadh fíordheimhnithe a phróiseáil laistigh de 30 lá tar éis iad a fháil.
Tabhair faoi deara go bhfuil inneachar ar nós ríomhphoist, teagmhálaithe agus comhráite inrochtana trí eispéiris i dtáirge. Is féidir leat tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi shonraí atá tú in ann a rialú laistigh de tháirgí Microsoft ach cuairt a thabhairt ar ár
gCeisteanna Coitianta Príobháideachta (CCanna)
.
Mura cuid de do ghrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft é cuntas do leanbh agus mura bhfuil rochtain agat ar ghníomhaíocht do leanbh ar do phainéal phríobháideachais, ní mór duit iarratas a bhaineann le sonraí do leanbh a chur isteach tríd an
bhfoirm tacaíochta príobháideachais
. Iarrfaidh an fhoireann príobháideachta fíorú cuntais sula gcomhlíonfar an t-iarratas.
Chun faisnéis phearsanta do leanbh go léir a scriosadh, ní mór duit iarraidh ar scriosadh chuntas an linbh tríd an
bhfoirm dúnta do chuntais
. Tabharfaidh an nasc seo leid duit síniú isteach le dintiúir chuntais do leanbh. Seiceáil go dtaispeánann an leathanach an cuntas Microsoft ceart, agus ansin lean na treoracha chun a iarraidh go scriosfar cuntas do pháiste.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le conas cuntas Microsoft a dhúnadh
.
Tar éis duit an t-iarratas a chur isteach chun cuntas do leanbh a dhúnadh, fanfaimid 60 lá roimh an gcuntas a scriosadh go buan ar eagla go n-athróidh tú d'intinn nó go mbeidh ort rochtain a fháil ar rud éigin ar an gcuntas sula ndúntar agus go scriosfar é go buan. Le linn na tréimhse feithimh, tá an cuntas marcáilte le haghaidh dúnadh agus scriosadh buan, ach tá sé ann fós. Más mian leat cuntas Microsoft do leanbh a athoscailt, sínigh isteach arís laistigh den tréimhse 60 lá sin. Cuirfimid dúnadh an chuntais ar ceal agus cuirfear an cuntas ar ais.
Céard is Xbox ann?
Is é Xbox an roinn cluichíochta agus siamsaíochta de Microsoft. Óstálann Xbox líonra ar líne ina bhfuil bogearraí agus eispéiris ar líne a ghabhann trasna iliomad ardáin. Ligeann an líonra seo don leanbh atá agat cluichí a aimsiú agus a imirt, amharc ar inneachar agus ceangal le cairde ar Xbox agus ar líonraí cluichíochta agus sóisialta eile.
Nuair a shíníonn siad isteach in Xbox, in aipeanna, cluichí nó ar chonsól Xbox, tógaimid aitheantóir uathúil dá ngléas. Nuair a bhíonn a gconsól Xbox ceangailte leis an Idirlíon, mar shampla, agus nuair a shíníonn siad isteach ar a gconsól, aithnímid an consól agus an leagan de chóras oibriúcháin an chonsóil atá in úsáid acu.
Tá eispéiris nua á gcur ar fáil i gcónaí ag Xbox i bhfeidhmchláir chliaint atá ceangailte le agus arna dtacú ag seirbhísí, amhail líonra Xbox agus an chluichíocht néil. Nuair a bhíonn tú sínithe isteach in eispéireas Xbox, bailímid sonraí riachtanacha chun cabhrú le hiontaofacht na n-eispéireas seo a choimeád iontaofa, chun dáta, slán agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis.
Sonraí a bhailímid nuair a chruthaíonn tú próifíl Xbox
. Éilítear ortsa mar thuismitheoir nó mar chaomhnóir toiliú le bailiú sonraí pearsanta ó leanbh faoi bhun 13 bliana d'aois nó mar a shonraítear a mhalairt le do dhlínse. Le cead uait, is féidir próifíl Xbox a bheith ag do leanbh agus an líonra Xbox ar líne a úsáid. Le linn chruthú phróifíl Xbox an linbh, síneoidh tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft féin chun a fhíorú gur eagraí fásta thú i do ghrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft. Bailímid seoladh ríomhphoist malartach nó uimhir fóin chun slándáil cuntais a threisiú. Má theastaíonn cabhair ó do leanbh chun rochtain a fháil ar a gcuntas, beidh siad in ann ceann de na malartaigh seo a úsáid chun a bhailíochtú gur leo an cuntas Microsoft.
Bailímid faisnéis theoranta faoi pháistí, lena n-áirítear ainm, dáta breithe, seoladh ríomhphoist, agus réigiún. Nuair a chláraíonn tú do leanbh le haghaidh próifíl Xbox, faigheann siad gamertag (leasainm poiblí) agus aitheantóir uathúil. Nuair a chruthaíonn tú próifíl Xbox do pháiste, toilíonn tú le Microsoft faisnéis a bhailiú, a úsáid agus a chomhroinnt bunaithe ar a socruithe príobháideachais agus cumarsáide ar líonra ar líne Xbox. Réamhshocraítear socruithe príobháideachais agus cumarsáide do pháiste do na socruithe is sriantaí.
Sonraí a bhailímid
. Bailímid faisnéis faoin úsáid a bhaineann do leanbh as seirbhísí Xbox, cluichí, feidhmchláir agus consóil lena n-áirítear:
Nuair a shíníonn siad isteach ar Xbox agus amach as, na cluichí a imríonn siad agus na feidhmchláir a úsáideann siad, dul chun cinn a gcluiche, d’éachtaí agus staidreamh faoina gcluichí, na rudaí a cheannaíonn siad agus an t-inneachar a fhaigheann siad.
Na cluichí a imríonn siad agus na feidhmchláir a úsáideann siad, dul chun cinn a gcluiche, gaisce, am imirt in aghaidh an chluiche, agus staitisticí imirt eile.
Sonraí feidhmíochta faoi chonsóil Xbox, Xbox Game Pass agus feidhmchláir eile Xbox, líonra Xbox, gléasanna nasctha, agus faoi nasc líonra, lena n-áirítear earráidí bogearraí nó crua-earraí.
An t-inneachar arna chur leis, arna uaslódáil nó arna chomhroinnt acu trí líonra Xbox, lena n-áirítear téacs, pictiúir agus an físeán a dhéantar a ghabháil i gcluichí agus i bhfeidhmchláir.
Gníomhaíocht shóisialta, lena n-áirítear sonraí comhrá agus idirghníomhaíochtaí le cluichirí eile, agus na naisc (cairde a chuirtear leis agus daoine a leanann iad) a dhéanann siad ar líonra Xbox.
Má úsáideann do leanbh consól nó feidhmchlár Xbox ar ghléas eile ar féidir leis líonra Xbox a rochtain, agus má chuimsíonn an gléas sin gléas stórála (tiomántán crua nó aonad cuimhne), stórálfar sonraí úsáide ar an ngléas stórála lena seoladh chuig Microsoft an chéad uair eile a shíníonn siad isteach ar Xbox, fiú má bhíonn siad ag imirt as líne.
Sonraí diagnóiseacha Xbox
. Má bhíonn consól Xbox in úsáid ag do leanbh, seolfaidh an consól na sonraí riachtanacha chuig Microsoft. Is iad na sonraí riachtanacha an t-íosmhéid sonraí is gá chun Xbox a choinneáil sábhailte, slán, chun dáta agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis.
Gabhálacha cluiche
. Is féidir le haon imreoir a bhfuil páirt á ghlacadh aige i seisiún cluiche ilimreoirí físeán a thaifeadadh (gearrthóga cluiche) agus gabhálacha scáileáin a dhéanamh den amharc cluiche atá aige. Is féidir carachtar cluiche agus leasainm cluichire do linbh a ghabháil i ngearrthóga cluiche agus gabhálacha scáileáin na n-imreoirí eile le linn an tseisiúin sin. Má ghabhann imreoir gearrthóga cluiche agus gabhálacha scáileáin ar ríomhaire, d'fhéadfadh na gearrthóga cluiche a eascraíonn as sin comhrá fuaime a ghabháil freisin má cheadaíonn socruithe príobháideachta agus cumarsáide do linbh ar líonra ar líne Xbox é.
Fotheidealú
. I gcomhrá fíor-ama (“cóisir”) Xbox, is féidir le himreoirí gné gutha go téacs a ghníomhachtú, a cheadaíonn dóibh amharc ar an gcomhrá sin mar théacs. Má ghníomhachtaíonn imreoir an ghné seo, úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí téacs a eascraíonn as sin chun fotheidealú comhrá a sholáthar do na himreoirí a dteastaíonn sé uathu. D´fhéadfadh na sonraí seo a úsáid freisin chun timpeallacht shábháilte cluichíochta a sholáthar agus chun na
Caighdeáin Phoiblí Xbox
a chur i bhfeidhm.
Úsáid sonraí
. Baineann Microsoft úsáid as na sonraí a bhailímid chun feabhas a chur ar tháirgí agus ar eispéiris cluichíocht— ionas go bhfeabhsaíonn sé agus go bhfuil sé níos sábháilte agus níos spraoi le himeacht ama. Chomh maith leis sin, cuireann na sonraí a bhailímid ar ár gcumas eispéiris phearsantaithe shaincheaptha a sholáthar don leanbh ata agat. Cuimsíonn sé sin iad a nascadh le cluichí, ábhar, seirbhísí, agus moltaí.
Sonraí Xbox ar féidir le daoine eile amharc orthu
. Nuair a bhíonn líonra Xbox á úsáid ag do leanbh, tá a láithreacht ar líne (ar féidir a shocrú chun "as líne de réir cuma" nó "bactha"), leasainm cluichire, staitisticí faoi imirt cluichí, agus éachtaí le feiceáil ag imreoirí eile ar an líonra. Ag brath ar an gcaoi a socraíonn tú socruithe sábháilteachta Xbox do linbh, d'fhéadfaidís faisnéis a roinnt agus iad ag imirt nó ag déanamh cumarsáide le daoine eile ar líonra Xbox.
Sábháilteacht
. D'fhonn cabhrú le timpeallacht shábháilte cluichíocht a dhéanamh den líonra Xbox agus Caighdeáin an Phobail do Xbox a fhorfheidhmiú, féadfaimid guth, téacs, íomhánna, físeáin agus inneachar sa chluiche a bhailiú agus a athbhreithniú (ar nós gearrthóga cluiche a uaslódálann do leanbh, comhráite atá acu agus rudaí post i gcluichí agus cluichí).
Frithchalaois agus cosc caimiléireachta
. Tá sé tábhachtach dúinn timpeallacht chothrom imeartha a sholáthar. Coisctear calaois, haiceáil, goid cuntas agus aon ghníomhaíocht neamhúdaraithe nó chalaoiseach eile nuair a úsáideann do leanbh cluiche Xbox ar líne nó aon fheidhmchlár nasctha leis an líonra ar a c(h)onsól Xbox, ríomhaire nó gléas móibíleach. D'fhonn calaois agus caimiléireacht a bhrath agus a chosc, féadfaimid úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí frith-aicearra agus cosc caimiléireachta, feidhmchláir agus teicneolaíochtaí eile. Féadfaidh teicneolaíochtaí den cineál sin sínithe digiteacha a chruthú (ar a dtugtar “hais”) ag baint úsáide as faisnéis áirithe a bhailítear óna gconsól Xbox, ríomhaire nó gléas móibíleach agus conas a úsáideann siad an gléas sin. D’fhéadfadh faisnéis faoin mbrabhsálaí, gléas, gníomhaíochtaí, aitheantóirí cluiche agus córais oibriúcháin a bheith san áireamh anseo.
Sonraí Xbox a chomhroinntear le foilsitheoirí cluiche agus feidhmchláir
. Nuair a úsáideann do leanbh cluiche ar líne Xbox nó feidhmchlár atá ceangailte leis an líonra ar a gconsól Xbox, ríomhaire nó gléas móibíleach, bíonn rochtain ag foilsitheoir an chluiche nó an fheidhmchláir sin ar shonraí faoin úsáid a bhaineann siad as chun cabhrú leis an bhfoilsitheoir a tháirge a sholáthar chun tacú leis agus a fheabhsú. D’fhéadfadh an méid seo a leanas a bheith san áireamh sna sonraí seo: aitheantóir úsáideora do linbh Xbox leasainm cluichire do linbh, faisnéis theoranta cuntais amhail tír agus raon aoise, sonraí faoi chumarsáid do linbh i gcluichí, gníomhaíocht fhorfheidhmithe Xbox, seisiúin imeartha (mar shampla, rudaí a rinneadh sa chluiche, na cineálacha feithiclí a úsáideadh sa chluiche), láithreacht do linbh ar líonra Xbox, an méid ama a chaitheann siad ag imirt an chluiche nó an fheidhmchláir, rangaithe, staidreamh, próifílí cluichirí, abhatáranna nó pictiúir de chluichirí, liostaí cairde, fothaí gníomhaíochta na gclubanna oifigiúla ina bhfuil siad páirteach, ballraíocht i gclubanna oifigiúla, agus aon inneachar eile a chruthaíonn nó a chuireann siad isteach sa chluiche nó san fheidhmchláir.
Bíonn a gcaidreamh uathúil neamhspleách féin le húsáideoirí ag foilsitheoirí agus forbróirí tríú páirtí na gcluichí agus na bhfeidhmchlár, agus déanann siad sonraí pearsanta a bhailiú agus a úsáid i gcomhréir lena bpolasaithe príobháideachais ar leith. Ba chóir duit athbhreithniú cúramach a dhéanamh ar a bpolasaithe chun an dóigh a n-úsáideann siad sonraí do linbh a fháil amach. Mar shampla, d’fhéadfadh foilsitheoirí a roghnú sonraí cluiche a nochtadh nó a thaispeáint (amhail ar chláir ceann riain) trína seirbhísí féin. D’fhéadfadh nasc lena bpolasaithe a bheith le fáil ar na leathanaigh mionsonraí cluiche nó feidhmchláir inár siopaí.
Foghlaim níos mó ag
Comhroinnt Sonraí le Cluichí agus Aipeanna
.
Chun stop a chur le comhroinnt sonraí cluiche nó feidhmchlár le foilsitheoir, bain cluichí nó feidhmchláir an fhoilsitheora de na gléasanna go léir ar a bhfuil siad suiteáilte. D’fhéadfadh roinnt rochtain foilsitheoir ar shonraí do pháiste a chúlghairm ag
microsoft.com/cead
.
Socruithe páistí a bhainistiú
. Mar eagraí de ghrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft, is féidir leat eolas agus socruithe pháistí a bhainistiú ar an leathanach
Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh
dá chuid, chomh maith lena socruithe príobháideachais phróifíl Xbox óna leathanach sábháilteachta ar líne
Príobháideachais Xbox&
.
Chomh maith leis sin is féidir leat feidhmchlár
Xbox Family Settings
a úsáid chun eispéireas do linbh ar Líonra Xbox a bhainistiú, lena n-áirítear: caiteachas do shiopaí Microsoft agus Xbox, amharc ar ghníomhaíocht Xbox do linbh, agus rátálacha aoise agus an méid ama scáileáin a shocrú. Beidh socruithe teaghlaigh Xbox i bhfeidhm ar chonsól Xbox nó trí Xbox ar ríomhaire pearsanta nó gléas móibíleach ach ní bheidh sé i bhfeidhm ar ardáin eile.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi phróifílí
Xbox a bhainistiú ag socruithe sábháilteachta agus príobháideachta ar líne Xbox
.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi ghrúpaí teaghlaigh Microsoft ag
Déan saol do theaghlaigh a shimpliú
.
Oidhreacht
.
Xbox 360
. Bailíonn an consól Xbox seo sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha teoranta. Cabhraíonn na sonraí seo lena chinntiú go bhfuil consól do linbh ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis.
Kinect
. Tá teaglaim ceamara, micreafóin agus braiteora infridheirg sa bhraiteoir Kinect, agus d’fhéadfaí leis guth agus gluaiseachtaí a chumasú chun an imirt a rialú. Mar shampla:
Más mian leat, is féidir an ceamara a úsáid chun síniú isteach sa Líonra Xbox go huathoibríoch le haithint aghaidhe. Fanann na sonraí ar an gconsól, ní chomhroinntear iad le duine ar bith, agus is féidir iad a scriosadh am ar bith.
Le haghaidh cluichíochta, mapálfaidh Kinect an fad idir ailt corp do linbh chun duine cipíneach díot a chruthú chun cluichíocht a chumasú.
Cumasaíonn micreafóin Kinect comhrá gutha idir imreoirí le linn cluichíochta. Cumasaíonn an micreafóin fosta orduithe gutha chun consól, cluiche, nó feidhmchláir a rialú, nó chun téarmaí cuardaigh a iontráil.
Is féidir braiteoir Kinect a úsáid, leis, le haghaidh cumarsáid fuaime agus físeáin trí sheirbhísí ar nós Skype.
Foghlaim níos mó faoi Kinect ag
Kinect agus Príobháideachas Xbox
.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Faisnéis thábhachtach eile maidir le príobháideacht
Gheobhaidh tú faisnéis bhreise faoi phríobháideacht thíos, amhail an chaoi ina gcoinnímid do chuid sonraí slán, an áit ina ndéanaimid do shonraí a phróiseáil, agus cá fhad a gcoinnímid do shonraí. Is féidir leat tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi Microsoft agus faoinár ngealltanas chun do phríobháideachas a chosaint ag
Príobháideachas Microsoft
.
Gheobhaidh tú faisnéis bhreise faoi phríobháideacht thíos, amhail an chaoi ina gcoinnímid do chuid sonraí slán, an áit ina ndéanaimid do shonraí a phróiseáil, agus cá fhad a gcoinnímid do shonraí. Is féidir leat tuilleadh faisnéise ar Microsoft agus ar ár ngealltanas chun do phríobháideachas a chosaint a fháil ag
Príobháideachas Microsoft
.
Slándáil sonraí pearsanta
Geallann Microsoft slándáil do shonraí pearsanta a chosaint. Úsáidimid cineálacha éagsúla teicneolaíochtaí agus nósanna imeachta chun do shonraí pearsanta a chosaint ar rochtain, úsáid nó nochtadh neamhúdaraithe. Mar shampla, stórálaimid na sonraí phearsanta a chuireann tú ar fáil ar ríomhchórais a bhfuil rochtain theoranta orthu agus atá suite i saoráidí rialaithe. Nuair a tharchuirimid sonraí fíor-rúnda (ar nós uimhir chárta creidmheasa nó pasfhocal) ar an idirlíon, cosnaímid iad trí iad a chriptiú. Comhlíonann Microsoft na dlíthe cosanta sonraí is infheidhme, lena n-áirítear na dlíthe is infheidhme maidir le sárú slándála a fhógairt.
Siar go barr
An áit a stórálaimid agus a bpróiseálaimid sonraí pearsanta
Féadfar sonraí pearsanta a bhailíonn Microsoft a stóráil agus a phróiseáil i do réigiún, sna Stáit Aontaithe nó in aon tír eile ina bhfuil áiseanna oibre ag Microsoft nó ag cleamhnaithe, fochuideachtaí, nó soláthraithe seirbhíse. Coimeádann Microsoft mór-ionaid sonraí sna tíortha seo a leanas: an Astráil, an Ostair, an Bhrasaíl, Ceanada, an Fhionlainn, an Fhrainc, an Ghearmáin, Hong Cong, an India, Éire, an tSeapáin, an Chóiré, Lucsamburg, an Mhalaeisia, an Ísiltír, Singeapór, an Afraic Theas, an Ríocht Aontaithe agus Stáit Aontaithe Mheiriceá. Go tipiciúíl, bíonn an príomhshuíomh stórála suite i réigiún an chustaiméara nó sna Stáit Aontaithe, agus is minic a bhíonn cúltaca aige chuig ionad sonraí i réigiún eile. Roghnaítear an suíomh/na suíomhanna stórais chun oibriú go héifeachtach, chun feidhmiúlacht a fheabhsú, agus chun iomarcaíochtaí a chruthú d'fhonn sonraí a chosaint i gcás éaradh seirbhíse nó fadhb eile. Déanaimid bearta chun na sonraí a bhailímid faoin ráiteas príobháideachais seo a phróiseáil de réir forálacha an ráitis seo agus riachtanais an dlí is infheidhme.
Aistrímid sonraí pearsanta ón Limistéar Eorpach Eacnamaíoch, ón Ríocht Aontaithe agus ón Eilvéis chuig tíortha eile, cuid acu nár chinn an Coimisiún Eorpach go bhfuil leibhéal leordhóthanach cosanta sonraí acu go fóill. Mar shampla, d'fhéadfadh nach féidir na cearta céanna a chinntiú lena ndlíthe, nó b'fhéidir nach bhfuil údarás maoirseachta príobháideachta ann a bheidh in ann plé le do chuid gearán. Nuair a dhéanaimid aistrithe den sórt sin, úsáidimid meicníochtaí dlí éagsúla, lena n-áirítear conarthaí mar na clásail chonarthacha chaighdeánacha a d’fhoilsigh an Coimisiún Eorpach faoi Chinneadh and Choimisiúin 2021/914, chun a chinntiú go dtaistealaíonn do chearta agus cosaintí le do chuid sonraí. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil chinntí an Choimisiúin Eorpaigh ar a leordhóthanaí atá an chosaint sonraí pearsanta sna tíortha ina bpróiseálann Microsoft sonraí pearsanta, féach an t-alt seo ar
shuíomh gréasáin an Choimisiúin Eorpaigh
.
Comhlíonann Microsoft Corporation an AE-S.A. Creat Príobháideachta Sonraí (DPF AE-S.A.), Síneadh na RA chuig an DPF AE-S.A., agus Creat Príobháideachta Sonraí na hEilvéise-S.A. (DPF Eilvéise-S.A.) mar atá leagtha amach ag Roinn Tráchtála na SA. Tá sé deimhnithe ag Microsoft Corporation do Roinn Tráchtála na S.A. go gcloíonn sé leis an AE-S.A. Prionsabail an Chreata Príobháideachta Sonraí (Prionsabail DPF AE-S.A.) maidir le próiseáil sonraí pearsanta a fuarthas ón Aontas Eorpach ag brath ar an AE-S.A. DPF agus ón Ríocht Aontaithe (agus Giobráltar) ag brath ar an Síneadh RA chuig an AE-S.A. DPF. Tá sé deimhnithe ag Microsoft Corporation do Roinn Tráchtála na Stát Aontaithe go gcloíonn sé le Prionsabail an Chreata um Príobháideachas Sonraí na hEilvéise-SAM (Prionsabail DPF na hEilvéise-SAM) maidir le próiseáil sonraí pearsanta a fhaightear ón Eilvéis agus iad ag brath ar DPF na hEilvéise-SAM. I gcomhthéacs aistriú ar aghaidh, tá Microsoft Corporation freagrach as na sonraí pearsanta a fhaigheann sé faoin DPF a phróiseáil agus aistrítear chuig tríú páirtí atá ag gníomhú mar ghníomhaire thar ár gceann ina dhiaidh sin. Tá Microsoft Corporation go fóill freagrach faoin DPF má phróiseálann ár ngníomhaire faisnéis phearsanta ar bhealach atá ag teacht salach leis an DPF, mura bhféidir le Microsoft Corporation cruthúnas a chur ar fáil nach bhfuil muid freagrach as an eachtra a rinne an damáiste. Má tá aon choinbhleacht idir na téarmaí sa ráiteas príobháideachta seo agus na Prionsabail DPF an AE-S.A. agus/nó na Prionsabail Eilvéise-S.A. Prionsabail DPF, is iad na Prionsabail a rialóidh. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoin gclár Creat Príobháideachais Sonraí (DPF), agus chun féachaint ar ár ndeimhniú,
tabhair cuairt ar láithreán gréasáin Chreat Príobháideachais Sonraí na Roinne Tráchtála sna Stáit Aontaithe
. Comhlíonann fochuideachtaí rialaithe de chuid Microsoft Corporation SAM mar a aithníodh inár n-aighneacht féindeimhnithe, prionsabail DPF—chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil, féach an liosta
aonáin nó fochuideachtaí SAM a chloíonn le Prionsabail DPF
.
Má tá ceist nó gearán agat maidir le rannpháirtíocht Microsoft sna Chreataí DPF, molaimid duit teagmháil a dhéanamh linn trínár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
. Le haghaidh aon ghearáin a bhaineann leis na Creataí DPF nach féidir le Microsoft iad a réiteach go díreach, tá cinneadh déanta againn comhoibriú le hÚdarás Cosanta Sonraí ábhartha an AE, chun díospóidí le daoine ón AE agus Coimisinéir Faisnéise na RA (do dhaoine aonair sa RA) a réiteach, agus le Coimisinéir Cónaidhme Cosanta Sonraí agus Faisnéise na hEilvéise (FDPIC) chun díospóidí a réiteach le daoine Eilvéiseacha. Déan teagmháil linn más mian leat treoir a fháil maidir le do theagmhálaithe i d'údarás cosanta sonraí. Mar a mhínítear a thuilleadh sna Prionsabail DPF, tá eadráin cheangailteach ar fáil chun déileáil le gearáin iarmharacha nár réitíodh ar aon slí eile. Tá Microsoft faoi réir chumhachta imscrúdaithe agus forfheidhmithe Choimisiún Feidearálach Trádála na Stát Aontaithe (FTC).
Ba cheart do dhaoine aonair a bhfuil a sonraí pearsanta cosanta ag Acht na Seapáine um Chosaint Faisnéise Pearsanta tagairt a dhéanamh don alt ar
shuíomh gréasáin Choimisiúin Cosanta Sonraí Pearsanta na Seapáine
(foilsithe sa tSeapáinis amháin) chun tuilleadh faisnéise ar athbhreithniú an choimisiúin ar chórais cosanta sonraí pearsanta tíortha áirithe. Do dhaoine aonair sa tSeapáin, cliceáil
anseo
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le próiseáil faisnéise faoin Acht um Ghnó Teileachumarsáide (sa tSeapáinis amháin).
Siar go barr
Sonraí pearsanta a choinneáil
Coinníonn Microsoft sonraí pearsanta cibé fad is gá chun na táirgí a sholáthar agus na hidirbhearta a d'iarr tú a chomhlíonadh, nó le haghaidh cuspóirí dlisteanacha eile ar nós cloí leis na dualgais dlí atá orainn, díospóidí a réiteach agus ár gcomhaontuithe a fhorghníomhú. De bhrí nach ionann na riachtanais sin i gcás cineálacha difriúla sonraí, chomhthéacs ár n-idirghníomhaíochtaí leat nó an úsáid a bhaineann tú as táirgí, is féidir tréimhsí coinneála iarbhír a bheith an-difriúil ó chéile.
Áirítear ar na critéir eile a úsáidtear chun tréimhsí coinneála a chinneadh:
An ndéanann custaiméirí na sonraí a sholáthar, a chruthú nó a chothabháil leis an ionchas go gcoinneoimid iad go dtí go mbainfidh siad go dearfach iad?
I measc na samplaí tá doiciméad a stórálann tú in OneDrive, nó teachtaireacht ríomhphoist a choinníonn tú i do bhosca isteach Outlook.com. I gcásanna mar sin, déanfaimid iarracht na sonraí a choinneáil go dtí go scriosann tú iad go gníomhach, amhail ríomhphost a aistriú ó do bhosca isteach Outlook.com go dtí fillteán na Míreanna Scriosta, agus ansin an fillteán sin a fholmhú (nuair a fholmhaítear d'fhillteán Míreanna Scriosta, fanann na míreanna folmhaithe sin inár gcóras suas le 30 lá sula scriostar den uair dheiridh iad). (Tabhair faoi deara go bhféadfaí na sonraí a scriosadh níos luaithe ar chúis éigin eile, mar shampla má sháraíonn tú na teorainneacha i leith líon na sonraí ar féidir a stóráil i do chuntas.)
An bhfuil rialú uathoibrithe ann, mar shampla i bpainéal príobháideachas Microsoft, a chuireann ar chumas an chustaiméara na sonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a scriosadh ag am ar bith?
Mura bhfuil, is iondúil go nglacfar le ham coinneála sonraí giorraithe.
An bhfuil sonraí pearsanta de chineál íogair?
Más ea, is iondúil go nglacfaí le ham coinneála giorraithe.
Ar ghlac Microsoft agus ar fhógair sé tréimhse choinneála shonrach do chineál áirithe sonraí?
Mar shampla, i gcás fiosruithe cuardaigh Bing, déanaimid ceisteanna stóráilte a dhí-aithint tríd an seoladh IP iomlán a bhaint tar éis 6 mhí, agus IDanna fianán agus aitheantóirí tras-seisiúin eile a úsáidtear chun cuntas nó gléas ar leith a aithint a bhaint tar éis 18 mí.
Ar thug an t-úsáideoir toiliú ar feadh tréimhse choinneála níos faide?
Má thug, coinneoimid sonraí de réir do thoilithe.
An bhfuil Microsoft faoi réir oibleagáid dhlíthiúil, chonarthach nó chomhchosúil na sonraí a choinneáil nó a scriosadh?
I measc na samplaí tá dlíthe éigeantacha coinneála sonraí sa dlínse is infheidhme, orduithe rialtais chun sonraí a bhaineann le himscrúdú a chaomhnú, nó sonraí a choimeádtar chun críocha dlíthíochta. Go contrártha, má tá orainn, de réir an dlí, ábhar neamhdhlíthiúil a bhaint, déanfaimid amhlaidh.
Siar go barr
Príobháideacht Sonraí Stáit SAM
Más cónaitheoir sna SAM thú, déanaimid do shonraí pearsanta a phróiseáil de réir dlíthe príobháideachais sonraí stáit SAM is infheidhme, lena n-áirítear California Consumer Privacy Act (Acht Príobháideachais California na dTomhaltóirí). Tá faisnéis sa chuid seo dár ráiteas príobháideachais a éilíonn an CCPA agus dlíthe príobháideachais sonraí stáit eile de na SAM agus cuireann sé lenár ráiteas príobháideachais.
Tabhair faoi deara nach rialacha a chuireann cuid de na dlíthe seo i bhfeidhm críochnaithe go fóill. Nuashonróimid ár bpróisis, ár bhfoilseacháin, agus an fógra seo de réir mar a thugtar na rialacha cur chun feidhme seo i gcrích.
Ina theannta sin, féach ar ár
bhFógra Dlíthe Príobháideachais Stáit SAM
agus ár
bPolasaí Príobháideachais Sonraí Sláinte Tomhaltóirí
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi na sonraí a bhailímid, a phróiseálaimid, a chomhroinnimid agus a nochtaimid, agus do chearta faoi dhlíthe príobháideachais sonraí stáit SAM is infheidhme.
Díol
. Ní dhíolaimid d'fhaisnéis phearsanta. Mar sin, ní chuirimid rogha díliostála ar fáil maidir le díol sonraí pearsanta.
Próifíliú
.  Ní ghlacaimid le "próifíliú" a úsáideann do shonraí pearsanta le haghaidh cinnteoireacht uathoibrithe a tháirgeann éifeachtaí dlíthiúla nó suntasacha den chineál céanna. Mar sin, ní chuirimid rogha an diúltaithe ar fáil don chineál próifílithe seo.
Comhroinn
. Féadfaimid do chuid sonraí pearsanta a “chomhroinnt”, mar atá sainmhínithe faoi California agus dlíthe stáit eile is infheidhme sna S.A., chun críocha fógraíochta pearsantaithe. Mar a tugadh faoi deara inár rannán
Fógraíochta
, ní sholáthróimid fógraíocht phearsantaithe do pháistí atá 18 mbliana d'aois nó níos óige de réir a gcuntas Microsoft.
Sa liosta le urchair thíos, achoimríonn na catagóirí sonraí a roinnimid chun críocha fógraíochta pearsantaithe, faighteoirí na sonraí pearsanta agus ár gcuspóirí próiseála. Féach an rannán
Sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid
chun síos ar na sonraí atá i ngach catagóir a fháil.
Catagóirí de Shonraí Pearsanta
Ainm agus sonraí teagmhála
Faighteoirí: Tríú páirtithe a dhéanann seirbhísí fógraíochta ar líne do Microsoft nó a úsáideann teicneolaíochtaí fógraíochta Microsoft
Cuspóirí na próiseála: Fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sheachadadh bunaithe ar do spéiseanna
Sonraí déimeagrafacha
Faighteoirí: Tríú páirtithe a dhéanann seirbhísí fógraíochta ar líne do Microsoft nó a úsáideann teicneolaíochtaí fógraíochta Microsoft
Cuspóirí na próiseála: Fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sheachadadh bunaithe ar do spéiseanna
Sonraí faoi shíntiúis agus ceadúnais
Faighteoirí: Tríú páirtithe a dhéanann seirbhísí fógraíochta ar líne do Microsoft nó a úsáideann teicneolaíochtaí fógraíochta Microsoft
Cuspóirí na próiseála: Fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sheachadadh bunaithe ar do spéiseanna
Idirghníomhaíochtaí
Faighteoirí: Tríú páirtithe a dhéanann seirbhísí fógraíochta ar líne do Microsoft nó a úsáideann teicneolaíochtaí fógraíochta Microsoft
Cuspóirí na próiseála: Fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sheachadadh bunaithe ar do spéiseanna
Féach ar an rannán
Fógraíochta
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoinár gcleachtais fógraíochta, agus ar ár
bhFógra Dlíthe Príobháideahcais Stáit SAM
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le “comhroinnt” chun críocha fógraíochta pearsantaithe faoi dhlíthe stáit SAM is infheidhme.
Cearta.
Tá sé de cheart agat a iarraidh go (i) nochtfaimid cad iad na sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid, a úsáidimid, a nochtaimid, a “roinnimid” agus a dhíolaimid, (ii) do shonraí pearsanta a scriosadh, (iii) do shonraí pearsanta a cheartú, (iv) srian a chur le húsáid agus nochtadh do shonraí íogaire, (v) díliostáil as do chuid sonraí pearsanta a “chomhroinnt” le tríú páirtithe chun críocha fógraíochta pearsantaithe ar shuíomhanna tríú páirtí. Féadfaidh tú na hiarratais seo a dhéanamh tú féin nó trí ghníomhaire údaraithe. Má úsáideann tú gníomhaire údaraithe, cuirimid
treoir mhionshonraithe
ar fáil don ghníomhaire maidir leis an gcaoi do chearta príobháideachais a fheidhmiú. Féach ar ár
bhFógra um Dhlíthe Príobháideachais Sonraí Stáit na Stát Aontaithe
chun tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le conas na cearta seo a fheidhmiú.
Roghanna diúltaithe uilíocha.
Faigheann agus freagraíonn Microsoft comhartha díliostála bhrabhsálaí de chuid Rialú Príobháideachais Domhanda (GPC). Casfaidh Microsoft as comhroinnt do chuid sonraí le tríú páirtithe le haghaidh fógraí pearsantaithe má fhaighimid comhartha GPC uait nuair a thugann tú cuairt ar shuíomhanna dár gcuid.
Seans go mbeidh cearta breise agat maidir le do shonraí sláinte tomhaltóra mar atá sonraithe faoi dhlíthe príobháideachais sláinte tomhaltóra stáit infheidhme. Féach ar ár
bPolasaí Príobháideachais Sonraí Sláinte Tomhaltóirí
chun faisnéis a fháil ar na cearta atá ar fáil faoin Acht Mo Shláinte Mo Shonraí (MHMDA) agus dlíthe príobháideachais sláinte tomhaltóirí eile is infheidhme sna Stáit Aontaithe.
Má tá cuntas Microsoft agat, is féidir leat do chearta a fheidhmiú tríd an
bpainéal príobháideachais Microsoft
, a cheanglaíonn ort logáil isteach i do chuntas Microsoft. Má tá iarratas breise nó ceist bhreise agat tar éis an painéal a úsáid, is féidir leat teagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft ag an seoladh sa rannán
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
, bain úsáid as ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
, nó cuir glao ar ár n-uimhir shaor in aisce sna Stát Aontaithe +1 (844) 931 2038. Mura bhfuil cuntas agat, is féidir leat do chearta a fheidhmiú trí theagmháil a dhéanamh linn mar a thuairiscítear thuas. Chun do shonraí pearsanta a chosaint níos fearr, d’fhéadfaimis faisnéis bhreise a iarraidh ort, amhail do thír chónaithe, seoladh ríomhphoist, agus uimhir fóin chun d’aitheantas agus d'iarratas a bhailíochtú sula ndéanann tú an t-iarratas a urramú.
Is féidir leat a chur in iúl do rogha chun díliostáil as do shonraí pearsanta a chomhroinnt le tríú páirtithe le haghaidh fógraíocht phearsantaithe ar shuíomhanna tríú páirtí trí chuairt a thabhairt ar ár
leathanach díliostála ó chomhroinnt
. Is féidir leat an fhógraíocht phearsantaithe a fheiceann tú ar airíonna Microsoft a rialú freisin ach cuairt a thabhairt ar ár
leathanach díliostála
.
Ní úsáidimid ná ní nochtaimid do shonraí íogaire chun críocha seachas na cinn atá liostaithe thíos, gan do thoiliú, nó mar a cheadaítear nó a cheanglaítear faoi dhlíthe infheidhme. Mar sin, ní thairgimid cumas teorainn a chur le húsáid sonraí íogaire.
Má tá iarratas déanta agat chun iarr ar Microsoft do shonraí pearsanta a bheith eolas aige faoi, a scriosadh, a cheartú nó a fháil, agus creideann tú gur dhiúltaigh Microsoft d’iarratas, is féidir leat do chearta a achomharc a fheidhmiú trí dul i dteagmháil lenár bhfoireann tacaíocht príobháideachais trí ár bhfoirm Gréasáin. Má theipeann ar d’achomharc agus ag brath ar an stát ina bhfuil i do chónaí, seans go mbeidh tú in ann údar imní a chur in iúl nó gearán a dhéanamh le d’Ard-Aighne Stáit.
Tá sé de cheart agat nach gcaithfí ar shlí idirdhealaitheach leat má fheidhmíonn tú do chearta príobháideachta. Ní dhéanfaidh muid idirdhealú maidir leat má fheidhmíonn tú do chearta príobháideachta.
Próiseáil faisnéise pearsanta
. Sa liosta le hurchair thíos, achoimríonn na catagóirí sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid, foinsí na sonraí pearsanta, ár gcuspóirí próiseála agus catagóirí na bhfaighteoirí tríú páirtí a roinnimid na sonraí pearsanta leo. Féach an rannán
Sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid
chun cur síos ar na sonraí atá i ngach catagóir a fháil. Féach an  rannán
Coinneáil sonraí pearsanta againn
chun faisnéis a fháil faoi chritéir choinneála sonraí pearsanta.
Catagóirí de Shonraí Pearsanta
Ainm agus sonraí teagmhála
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus le comhpháirtithe lena gcuirimid seirbhísí comhbhrandáilte ar fáil
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Soláthar ár dtáirgí; freagairt ceisteanna chustaiméirí; cabhraigh, cosain, agus fabhtcheartaigh; agus margaíocht
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Faisnéis aitheantais
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idir-ghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus eagraíochtaí a dhéanann ionadaíocht ar úsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar; fíordheimhniú agus rochtain chuntais; agus cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Sonraí déimeagrafacha
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus ceannacháin ó bhróicéirí sonraí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar agus a phearsanú; forbairt táirgí; cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh; agus margaíocht
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Sonraí íocaíochta
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus le hinstitiúidí airgeadais
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Tráchtáil Idirbheart; idirbhearta próisis; orduithe a chomhlíonadh; cabhraigh, cosain, agus fabhtcheartaigh; agus calaois a bhrath agus a chosc
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Sonraí faoi shíntiúis agus ceadúnais
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus le heagraíochtaí a dhéanann ionadaíocht ar úsáideoirí; siopaí agus ardáin tríú páirtí ar a gceannaítear ár dtáirgí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar, a phearsanú agus a ghníomhachtú; tacaíocht do chustaiméirí; cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh; margaíocht; agus cuntasaíocht
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Idirghníomhaíochtaí
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí lena n-áirítear sonraí a ghineann Microsoft trí na hidirghníomhaíocht sin
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar agus a phearsanú; feabhsú táirgí; forbairt táirgí agus cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Inneachar
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idir-ghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus eagraíochtaí a dhéanann ionadaíocht ar úsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar; sábháilteacht; agus cabhair, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Físeáin nó taifeadtaí
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíocht le húsáideoirí agus foinsí atá ar fáil go poiblí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar; feabhsú táirgí; forbairt táirgí; margaíocht; cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh: agus sábháilteacht
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáín atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Aiseolas agus rátálacha
Foinsí Shonraí Pearsanta: Idirghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar; feabhsú táirgí; forbairt táirgí; tacaíocht chustaiméirí agus cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáin atá dírithe ar úsáideoirí
Cé go bhfuil na príomhfhoinsí agus na cuspóirí maidir le próiseáil gach catagóir de shonraí pearsanta sa liosta le hurchair thuas, bailímid sonraí pearsanta freisin ó na foinsí atá liostaithe sa rannán
Sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid
, amhail forbróirí a chruthaíonn eispéiris trí nó le haghaidh táirgí Microsoft. Ar an tslí chéanna, próiseálaimid gach catagóir sonraí pearsanta chun na gcríoch a gcuirtear síos orthu sa rannán
Conas a úsáidimid sonraí pearsanta
, amhail ár ndualgais dhlíthiúla a chomhlíonadh, ár lucht saothair a fhorbairt, agus taighde a dhéanamh.
Faoi réir do
shocruithe príobháideachais
, do thoilithe, agus ag brath ar na táirgí a úsáideann tú agus do roghanna, féadfaimid sonraí pearsanta áirithe a cháilíonn mar “sonraí íogaire” faoi dhlíthe príobháideachais sonraí stáit SAM a bhailiú, a phróiseáil nó a nochtadh. Is fo-thacar de shonraí pearsanta iad sonraí íogaire. Sa liosta thíos,achoimríonn na catagóirí sonraí íogaire a thiomsaímid, foinsí na sonraí íogaire, ár gcuspóirí próiseála, agus catagóirí na bhfaighteoirí tríú páirtí a gcomhroinnimid na sonraí íogaire leo. Féach an rannán
Sonraí pearsanta a mbailímid
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi na sonraí íogaire a d’fhéadfaimis a bhailiú.
Catagóirí sonraí íogaire
Logáil isteach an chuntais, cuntas airgeadais, uimhir chárta dochair nó creidmheasa agus na modhanna chun rochtain a fháil ar an gcuntas (cód slándála nó rochtana, pasfhocal, dintiúir, srl.)
Foinsí sonraí íogaire: Idir-ghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus eagraíochtaí a dhéanann ionadaíocht ar úsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): An táirge a sholáthar agus idirbhearta airgeadais iarrtha a chomhlíonadh
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus soláthraithe próiseála íocaíochta
Eolas beacht ar shuíomh geografach
Foinsí sonraí íogaire: Idirghníomhaíochtaí úsáideoir leis an táirgí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): An tseirbhís iarrtha a sholáthar; feabhsú táirgí; féadfar roinnt tréithe a nochtadh do thríú páirtithe chun an tseirbhís a sholáthar
Faighteoirí: Úsáideoirí agus soláthraithe seirbhíse (féach an rannán
Seirbhísí agus Taifeadadh Suímh Windows
dár ráiteas príobháideachais chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil)
Bunús cine nó eitneach, creidimh reiligiúnacha nó fealsúnachta nó ballraíocht ceardchumainn
Foinsí sonraí íogaire: Cumarsáid le húsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Déan staidéir thaighde chun tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar an gcaoi a n-úsáidtear agus a bhraitear ár gcuid táirgí agus chun críocha eispéiris táirgí a fheabhsú
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse
Sláinte leighis nó meabhrach, saol gnéis nó gnéaschlaonadh
Foinsí sonraí íogaire: Cumarsáid le húsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Déan staidéir thaighde chun tuiscint níos fearr a fháil ar an gcaoi a n-úsáidtear agus a bhraitear ár gcuid táirgí agus chun críocha eispéiris táirgí agus inrochtaineacht a fheabhsú
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse
Inneachar do phoist, ríomhphoist nó teachtaireachtaí téacs (nuair nach é Microsoft faighteoir beartaithe na cumarsáide)
Foinsí sonraí íogaire: Idirghníomhaíochtaí úsáideoir leis an táirgí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar; an eispéireas táirgí a fheabhsú; sábháilteacht; agus cabhair, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse
Sonraí pearsanta a bhailítear ó leanbh aitheanta faoi 13 bliana d’aois
Foinsí sonraí íogaire: Idir-ghníomhaíochtaí le húsáideoirí agus eagraíochtaí a dhéanann ionadaíocht ar úsáideoirí
Cuspóirí Próiseála (Bailiúchán agus Nochtadh do Thríú Páirtithe): Ár gcuid táirgí a sholáthar; feabhsú táirgí; forbairt táirgí; moltaí; cabhraigh, cosain agus fabhtcheartaigh: and sábháilteacht
Faighteoirí: Soláthraithe seirbhíse agus aonáin atá treoraithe ag úsáideoirí (de réir do
shocruithe
um Shábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft)
Cé go bhfuil na príomhfhoinsí agus na cuspóirí próiseála sonraí pearsanta a bhailítear ó leanaí faoi 13 bliana d’aois sa liosta le hurchair thuas, bailímid sonraí pearsanta freisin ó na foinsí atá liostaithe sa rannán
Bailiúchán Sonraí ó Leanaí
.
Ní úsáidimid ná ní nochtaimid do shonraí íogaire chun críocha seachas na cinn seo a leanas:
Déan na seirbhísí nó cuir na hearraí a bhfuil tú ag súil leo le réasún ar fáil
Cabhrú le slándáil agus sláine ár seirbhísí, ár gcóras, agus ár sonraí a chinntiú, chun gníomhartha mailíseacha, calaoiseacha nó neamhdhleathacha a chomhrac, chomh maith le sábháilteacht fhisiciúil daoine aonair a chosaint, sa mhéid go bhfuil an phróiseáil riachtanach agus comhréireach
Maidir le húsáid ghearrthéarmach sealadach (lena n-áirítear fógraíocht neamhphearsanta), chomh fada agus nach nochtar na sonraí pearsanta do thríú páirtí, ní úsáidtear iad le haghaidh próifílithe, agus ní úsáidtear iad chun taithí duine a athrú lasmuigh den idirghníomhaíocht reatha le Microsoft
Seirbhísí a dhéanamh thar ceann Microsoft, amhail cuntais a choinneáil, seirbhís do chustaiméirí a sholáthar, orduithe/idirbhearta a phróiseáil, nó orduithe/idirbhearta a chomhlíonadh, faisnéis chustaiméara a fhíorú, íocaíochtaí a phróiseáil, maoiniú a sholáthar, anailís a dhéanamh, stóras a sholáthar, agus seirbhísí comhchosúla
Gníomhaíochtaí a dhéanamh chun cáilíocht nó sábháilteacht a fhíorú nó a chothabháil, nó chun seirbhís nó gléas atá faoi úinéireacht nó faoi rialú Microsoft a fheabhsú nó a uasghrádú.
Sonraí íogaire a bhailiú nó a phróiseáil nuair nach bhfuil an bailiú nó an phróiseáil chun tréithe an duine aonair a bhaint amach
Aon ghníomhaíochtaí eile de réir aon rialacháin amach anseo a eisítear de bhun dhlíthe príobháideachta sonraí stáit SAM
Sonraí dí-aitheanta
. I gcásanna áirithe, féadfaidh Microsoft sonraí dí-aitheanta a phróiseáil. Tá sonraí sa riocht seo nuair nach bhfuilimid ábalta sonraí a nascadh le duine aonair lena mbaineann sonraí den cineál sin gan bearta breise a dhéanamh. Sna cásanna sin, agus mura gceadaítear é faoin dlí is infheidhme, coimeádann muid faisnéis den cineál sin i stát dí-aitheanta agus ní dhéanfaimid iarracht an duine aonair lena mbaineann sonraí dí-aitheanta a aithint arís.
Sonraí pearsanta a nochtadh chun críocha gnó nó tráchtála
. Mar a léirítear sa rannán
Cúiseanna lena gcomhroinnimid sonraí pearsanta
, comhroinnimid sonraí pearsanta le tríú páirtithe chun críocha éagsúla gnó agus tráchtála. Is iad na príomhchuspóirí gnó agus tráchtála a roinnimid sonraí pearsanta ina leith na críocha próiseála atá liostaithe sa tábla thuas. Mar sin féin, comhroinnimid gach catagóir de shonraí pearsanta chun críocha gnó agus tráchtála sa rannán
Cúiseanna lena gcomhroinnimid sonraí pearsanta
.
Páirtithe a rialaíonn bailiú sonraí pearsanta
. I gcásanna áirithe, féadfaimid cead a thabhairt do thríú páirtí bailiú do shonraí pearsanta a rialú. Mar shampla, féadfaidh feidhmchláir tríú páirtí nó breiseáin a ritheann ar bhrabhsálaí Windows nó Edge sonraí pearsanta a bhailiú bunaithe ar a gcleachtais féin.
Ligeann Microsoft do chuideachtaí fógraíochta faisnéis a bhailiú faoi d’idirghníomhaíocht lenár suíomhanna gréasáin chun fógraí pearsantaithe a sheachadadh thar ceann Microsoft.  Is féidir leat amharc ar
ár gcomhpháirtithe fógraí tríú páirtí
ar
Fhógra Dlíthe Príobháideachais Sonraí Stáit SAM
, agus díliostáil ó chomhroinnt na sonraí le tríú páirtithe ar an
leathanach díliostála
.
Siar go barr
Fógraíocht
Cuireann fógraíocht ar ár gcumas cuid dár dtáirgí a sholáthar, tacaíocht a chur ar fáil ina leith agus feabhas a chur orthu. Ní úsáideann Microsoft an méid a deir tú i ríomhphoist, comhráite duine le duine, glaonna físeáin ná glórphost ná do dhoiciméid, grianghraif ná comhaid phearsanta eile chun fógraíocht a dhíriú ort. Bainimid leas as sonraí eile, a bhfuil cur síos orthu thíos, le haghaidh fógraíochta inár airíonna Microsoft agus ar airíonna tríú páirtí. Mar shampla:
D'fhéadfadh Microsoft na sonraí a bhailímid a úsáid chun cuid de na fógraí a fheiceann tú ar airíonna gréasáin Microsoft, amhail
Microsoft.com
, Microsoft Start agus Bing, a roghnú agus a sholáthar. Féadfaimid sonraí den sórt sin a úsáid freisin chun fógraí a roghnú agus a sheachadadh ar airíonna digiteacha tríú páirtí.
Nuair a dhéantar ID fógraíochta a chumasú in Windows 10 mar chuid de do shocruithe príobháideachta, is féidir le tríú páirtithe an ID fógraíochta a rochtain agus a úsáid (ar an gcaoi chéanna is a dhéanann suíomhanna Gréasáin aitheantóir uathúil a stóráiltear i gcuach a rochtain agus a úsáid) chun fógraí a roghnú agus a chur ar fáil ina leithéid d'fheidhmchláir.
B´fhéidir go roinnfimid sonraí a bhailíomar lenár gcomhpháirtithe inmheánach agus seachtrach, ar nós Xandr, Yahoo, nó Facebook (féach thíos), ionas go mbeidh na fógraí a fheiceann tú inár dtáirgí agus ina dtáirgí siúd níos ábhartha agus luachmhar duit.
Féadfaidh fógróirí rogha a dhéanamh ár rabhcháin Ghréasáin a chur ar a suíomhanna, nó leas a bhaint as teicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla, lena chur ar chumas Microsoft faisnéis a bhailiú ar a suíomhanna, amhail gníomhaíochtaí, ceannacháin, agus cuairteanna; úsáidimid na sonraí sin ar son ár gcustaiméirí fógraíochta chun fógraí a sholáthar.
D'fhéadfadh na fógraí a fheiceann tú a bheith roghnaithe bunaithe ar na sonraí a phróiseálaimid fút, cosúil le d'ábhair spéise agus ceanáin, do shuíomh, d'idirbhearta, conas a úsáideann tú ár dtáirgí, d'iarratais chuardaigh, nó an t-inneachar a fhéachann tú air. Mar shampla, má fhéachann tú ar inneachar faoi ghluaisteáin ar Microsoft Start, féadfaimid fógraí faoi ghluaisteáin a thaispeáint duit; má cuardaíonn tú "áiteanna píotsa i Seattle" i Bing, féadfar fógraí a thaispeáint sna torthaí cuardaigh do bhialanna i Seattle.
D'fhéadfadh na fógraí a fheiceann tú a bheith bunaithe freisin ar fhaisnéis eile atá foghlamtha againn fút le himeacht ama ó shonraí déimeagrafacha, sonraí suímh, iarratais chuardaigh, ábhair spéise agus ceanáin, sonraí úsáide ónár dtáirgí agus suíomhanna féin, agus an t-eolas a bhailímid fút ó shuíomhanna agus ó fheidhmchláir ár bhfógróirí agus ár gcomhpháirtithe. Déanaimid tagairt do na fógraí sin mar"fhógraíocht phearsantaithe" sa ráiteas seo. Mar shampla, má fhéachann tú ar inneachar cluichíochta ar
xbox.com
, seans go bhfeicfidh tú fógraí do chluichí ar Microsoft Start. Chun fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sholáthar, comhcheanglaímid fianáin atá curtha ar do ghléas le faisnéis a bhailímid (seoladh IP, mar shampla) nuair a idirghníomhaíonn do bhrabhsálaí lenár suíomhanna Gréasáin. Má dhiúltaíonn tú d'fhógraíocht phearsantaithe a fháil, ní úsáidfear sonraí a ghabhann leis na fianáin sin.
Is féidir linn faisnéis fút a úsáid chun fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sholáthar duit nuair a úsáideann tú seirbhísí Microsoft. Má tá tú logáilte isteach le do chuntas Microsoft agus má thoiligh tú cead a thabhairt do Microsoft Edge do ghníomhaíocht ar líne a úsáid le haghaidh fógraíochta phearsantaithe, feicfidh tú fógraí le haghaidh táirgí agus seirbhísí bunaithe ar do ghníomhaíocht ar líne agus Microsoft Edge á úsáid agat. Chun do shocruithe príobháideachais le haghaidh Edge a chumrú, gabh chuig Microsoft Edge > Socruithe > Príobháideachas agus Seirbhísí. Chun do shocruithe príobháideachais agus fógraí a chumrú le haghaidh do chuntas Microsoft i ndáil le do ghníomhaíocht ar líne ar fud brabhsálaithe, Microsoft Edge san áireamh, nó nuair a osclaíonn tú suíomhanna gréasáin nó feidhmchláir tríú páirtí, gabh chuig do Phainéal ag
privacy.microsoft.com
.
Sna sonraí breise ar úsáid sonraí a bhaineann le fógraíocht, gheofar:
Dea-chleachtais sa tionscal fógraíochta agus ceangaltais
. Is ball é Microsoft den
Tionscnamh Fógraíochta Líonra
(NAI) agus cloíonn sé le cód iompair an NAI. Cloímid freisin leis na cláracha féinrialaithe seo a leanas:
In SAM:
Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA)
San Eoraip:
European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA)
I gCeanada:
Roghanna fógra: Comhghuaillíocht Fógraíochta Digití Cheanada (DAAC)
/
Choix de Pub: l'Alliance de la publicité numérique du Canada (DAAC)
Spriocdhíriú fógraíochta maidir le sláinte
. Sna Stáit Aontaithe, cuirimid fógraíocht phearsantaithe bunaithe ar líon teoranta catagóirí caighdeánacha, neamhíogair agus bainteach le sláinte, ar nós ailléirge, airtríteas, colaistéaról, slaghdán agus fliú, diaibéiteas, sláinte ghastraistéagach, tinneas cinn, bia sláintiúil, sláinte croí, sláinte na bhfear, sláinte fiacla, oistéapóróis, sláinte craicinn, codladh, agus cúram na súl. Déanaimid fógraíocht phearsantaithe bunaithe ar chatagóirí neamhíogair saincheaptha sláinte chomh maith a dhíriú, leis, nuair a iarrann fógróirí é.
Leanaí agus fógraíocht
. Ní sholáthróimid fógraíocht phearsantaithe do pháistí atá 18 mbliana d'aois nó níos óg de réir a gcuntas Microsoft.
Coinneáil faisnéise
. Le haghaidh fógraíocht phearsantaithe, coinnímid faisnéis ar feadh 13 mhí ar a mhéad, mura bhfuil cead againn é a choinneáil ar feadh tréimhse níos faide.
Sonraí Íogaire
. Ní bhailíonn, ní phróiseálann, ná ní nochtann Fógraíocht Microsoft sonraí pearsanta a cháilíonn mar “sonraí íogaire” faoi dhlíthe príobháideachais sonraí stáit SAM is infheidhme chun críocha fógraíocht phearsantaithe a sholáthar.
Comhroinnt faisnéise
. I gcásanna áirithe, comhroinnimid le fógróirí tuairiscí maidir le sonraí atá bailithe againn ar a suíomhanna nó a bhfógraí.
Faisnéis a bhailíonn cuideachtaí fógraíochta eile
. Uaireanta cuimsíonn fógróirí a gcuid rabhchán Gréasáin féin (nó cinn de chuid a gcomhpháirtithe fógraíochta eile) laistigh d'fhógraí dá gcuid a thaispeánaimid, chun a gcuach féin a shocrú agus a léamh. Chomh maith leis sin, oibríonn Microsoft i gcomhar le
Xandr
, comhlacht Microsoft, agus comhlachtaí fógraíochta tríú páirtí chun cabhrú le cuid dár seirbhísí fógraíochta a sholáthar, agus tugaimid cead do chomhlachtaí fógraíochta tríú páirtí eile fógraí a thaispeáint ar ár suíomhanna chomh maith. D´fhéadfadh na comhlachtaí tríú páirtí seo fianáin a chur ar do ríomhaire agus sonraí a bhailiú faoi do ghníomhaíochtaí ar líne thar suíomhanna idirlíne nó seirbhísí ar líne. Áirítear ar na cuideachtaí sin faoi láthair, ach gan a bheith teoranta dóibh:
Facebook
,
Media.ne
t
,
Outb
rain
,
Taboola
agus
Yah
oo
. Roghnaigh aon cheann de na naisc roimhe seo le tuilleadh a fháil amach faoi chleachtais gach cuideachta, lena n-áirítear na roghanna a thairgeann sí. Is comhaltaí iad mórchuid de na cuideachtaí seo freisin den
NAI
or
DAA
, a gcuireann an dá cheann acu bealach éasca ar fáil chun diúltú d'fhógraí spriocdhírithe ó chuideachtaí rannpháirteacha.
Chun díliostáil ó fhógraíocht pearsantaithe ó Microsoft a fháil, téigh chuig an leathach
díliostála
dár gcuid. Nuair a dhíliostálann tú, déantar do shainrogha a stóráil i gcuach a bhaineann go sonrach leis an mbrabhsálaí Gréasáin atá in úsáid agat. Gabhann dáta éaga cúig bliana leis an gcuach díliostála. Má scriosann tú na cuacha ar do ghléas, beidh ort díliostáil arís.
Siar go barr
Teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte
Tá teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte comhtháite le go leor táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft. Soláthraíonn Microsoft gnéithe aithint cainte bunaithe ar ghléas agus gnéithe aithint cainte scamall-bhunaithe (ar líne). Tras-scríobhann teicneolaíocht aithint cainte Microsoft sonraí gutha go téacs. Le do chead fhéin, beidh fostaithe agus díoltóirí Microsoft atá ag obair ar son Microsoft, in ann léirmheasanna a dhéanamh ar giotaí de do chuid sonraí nó gearrthóga gutha d’fhonn ár dteicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte a thógáil agus a fheabhsú. Ceadaíonn na feabhsuithe seo dúinn cumais guth-chumasaithe níos fearr a thógáil a rachaidh chun leasa úsáideoirí ar fud ár gcuid táirgí agus seirbhísí tomhaltóra agus fiontraíochta go léir. Sula athbhreithníonn fostaithe nó díoltóirí ar shonraí guth, cosnaímid céimeanna príobháideachta úsáideoirí tri bhearta a dhéanamh chun dí-shainaithint sonraí, ag éileamh comhaontuithe neamhnochta le dioltóirí agus a gcuid fostaithe, agus á cheangal go gcomhlíonann fostaithe agus díoltóirí ardchaighdeáin phríobháideachta.
Tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le Microsoft agus do shonraí gutha
.
Siar go barr
Eisiúintí réamhamhairc nó eisiúintí saor in aisce
Tairgeann Microsoft gnéithe agus táirgí réamhamhairc, insider, béite nó gnéithe agus táirgí saor in aisce eile ("réamhamhairc") lena chumasú duit iad a mheasúnú fad a bhíonn sonraí á soláthar agat do Microsoft faoin úsáid a bhaineann tú as an táirge, lena n-áirítear aiseolas agus sonraí gléis agus úsáide. Dá bharr, is féidir le réamhamhairc sonraí breise a bhailiú go huathoibríoch, líon níos lú rialuithe a sholáthar, agus bearta príobháideachais agus slándála nach ionann iad agus na bearta a bhíonn ar fáil de ghnáth inár dtáirgí, a úsáid. Má ghlacann tú páirt i réamhamharcanna, is féidir linn teagmháil a dhéanamh leat maidir le d'aiseolas nó aon suim atá agat i leanúint ag baint úsáid as an táirge i ndiaidh na heisiúna ginearálta.
Siar go barr
Athruithe ar an ráiteas príobháideachais seo
Féadfaimid an ráiteas príobháideachais seo a nuashonrú nuair is gá chun trédhearcacht níos mó a chur ar fáil nó mar fhreagairt ar:
Aiseolas ó chustaiméir, rialtóirí, lucht tionscail, nó páirtithe leasmhara eile.
Athruithe ar ár dtáirgí.
Athruithe ar ár ngníomhaíochtaí próiseála sonraí nó ar ár bpolasaithe.
Nuair a phostálaimid athruithe ar an ráiteas seo, leasóimid an dáta "nuashonrú deireanach" ag barr an ráitis agus déanfaimid cur síos ar na hathruithe ar an leathanach
Stair na n-Athruithe
. Má dhéantar athruithe ábhartha ar an ráiteas, amhail athrú ar na cúiseanna le sonraí pearsanta a phróiseáil nach bhfuil comhsheasmhach leis an gcúis lenar bailíodh iad ar dtús, cuirfimid a leithéid in iúl duit trí fhógra a chur in áit fheiceálach faoi na hathruithe sin sula gcuirfear i bhfeidhm iad nó trí fhógra a sheoladh chugat go díreach. Molaimid duit an ráiteas príobháideachais seo a athbhreithniú ó am go ham chun tuiscint a fháil ar an tslí a gcosnaíonn Microsoft do chuid faisnéise.
Siar go barr
Conas teagmháil a dhéanamh linn
Má tá údar imní, gearán, nó ceist maidir le príobháideachas agat do Phríomhoifigeach Príobháideachais nó Oifigeach Cosanta Sonraí Microsoft i do réigiún, déan teagmháil linn ar ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
. Freagróimid ceisteanna nó údair imní de réir mar a éilíonn an dlí agus laistigh de thréimhse nach faide ná 30 lá. Féadfaidh tú freisin údar imní a chur in iúl nó gearán a dhéanamh le húdarás cosanta sonraí nó oifigeach eile a bhfuil dlínse acu.
Nuair is rialaitheoir é Microsoft, mura ndeirtear a mhalairt, is iad Microsoft Corporation agus, dóibh siúd atá sa Limistéar Eorpach Eacnamaíoch, sa Ríocht Aontaithe, agus san Eilvéis, is iad Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited na rialaitheoirí sonraí le haghaidh sonraí pearsanta a bhailímid trí na táirgí atá faoi réir an ráitis seo. Is iad seo a leanas ár seoltaí:
Microsoft Privacy, Microsoft Corporation, One Microsoft Way, Redmond, Washington 98052, SAM. Teileafón: +1 (425) 882 8080.
Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited, Attn: An tOifigeach Cosanta Sonraí, One Microsoft Place, Páirc Gnó Dheisceart an Chontae, Baile na Lobhar, Baile Átha Cliath 18, Éire. Teileafón: +353 1 706 3117.
Chun fochuideachta Microsoft a aimsiú i do thír nó i do réigiún, féach liosta
suíomhanna oifige Microsoft ar fud an domhain
.
Is é Microsoft Schweiz GmbH, An Ciorcal 02, 8058 Zürich-Flughafen, an Eilvéis, ionadaí Microsoft Ireland Operations Limited de réir bhrí Airt. 14 d'Acht Cónaidhme na hEilvéise um Chosaint Sonraí.
Más mian leat do chearta a fheidhmiú faoin dlí príobháideachais sonraí stáit SAM is infheidhme, is féidir leat teagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft ag an seoladh SAM thuas, úsáid a bhaint as ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
, nó glao a chur ar ár n-uimhir saor in aisce in SAM +1 (844) 931 2038.
Má tá tú lonnaithe i gCeanada nó i gcúige ann, is féidir leat teagmháil a dhéanamh le hOifigeach Cosanta Sonraí Microsoft i gCeanada ag Príomhoifig Microsoft Cheanada, 4400-81 Bay St, Toronto, ON, M5J 0E7, ag +1 (416) 349 2506, nó úsáid ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
.
Áit a bhfuil feidhm ag dlí na Fraince, is féidir leat treoracha sonracha a sheoladh chugainn maidir le húsáid do shonraí pearsanta tar éis do bháis freisin, ach úsáid a bhaint as ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
.
Má tá tú ceist teicniúil nó tacaíochta agat, tabhair cuairt ar
Thacaíocht Microsoft
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi thairiscintí Tacaíochta Microsoft. Má tá ceist phearsanta agat faoi phasfhocal chuntas Microsoft, tabhair cuairt ar
tacaíocht chuntas Microsoft
.
Cuirimid bealaí éagsúla ar fáil duit chun do shonraí pearsanta atá faighte ag Microsoft a rialú agus chun do chearta cosanta sonraí a fheidhmiú. Is féidir leat é sin a dhéanamh trí theagmháil a dhéanamh le Microsoft ag ár
bhfoirm ghréasáin
nó leis an bhfaisnéis thuas, nó trí na huirlisí éagsúla a gcuirimid ar fáil a úsáid. Féach an rannán
Conas do shonraí pearsanta a rochtain agus a rialú
le haghaidh sonraí breise.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Intleacht Shaorga agus cumas Microsoft Copilot
Úsáideann Microsoft cumhacht na hintleachta saorga (IS) i go leor dár gcuid táirgí agus seirbhísí, lena n-áirítear trí ghnéithe giniúna IS a ionchorprú ábaltachtaí Microsoft Copilot mar shampla. Tá forbairt agus úsáid IS de chuid Microsoft faoi réir
Phrionsabail IS
agus
Caighdeán IS Freagrach
Microsoft agus tá bailiú agus úsáid sonraí pearsanta Microsoft chun gnéithe IS a fhorbairt agus a chur i bhfeidhm ag teacht leis na gealltanais a leagtar amach sa ráiteas príobháideachais seo. Soláthraíonn sonraí a bhaineann go sonrach le táirge faisnéis ábhartha bhreise. Is féidir leat tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi conas a úsáideann Microsoft IS
anseo
.
Cumais Microsoft Copilot.
Is é
Microsoft Copilot
an Compánach IS Microsoft a chuidíonn leat níos mó a bhaint amach trí eispéireas amháin a ritheann thar na gléasanna ar fad le tuiscint ar comhthéacs ábhartha ar an gréasán, ar do ríomhaire pearsanta agus ar fheidhmchláir leis na scileanna cuí a thabhairt duit ag an am ceart. Le cabhair ó Copilot, is féidir le húsáideoirí dréacht nua doiciméid Word a thosú, nó láithreoireacht PowerPoint a ghiniúint agus rochtain á déanamh acu ar Copilot i bhfeidhmchláir M365, freagraí ar chuardaigh casta ar líne a aimsiú go gasta, doiciméid ábhartha nó inneachar pearsanta eile a aimsiú, nó spreagadh a fháil chun amhráin nua, scéalta nó inneachar eile a chumadh, chomh maith le tascanna eile. Is é atá in Copilot ná teaghlach seirbhísí, agus is féidir le le bailiúchán Microsoft a bheith difriúil ag bráth ar an seirbhís nó feidhmiúlacht atá beartaithe in aon chás ar leith.
Is é
suíomh gréasáin
agus feidhmchlár Copilot (atá ar fáil ar iOS agus Android) ann ná croílár eispéireas an tomhaltóra Copilot. Istigh san eispéireas seo, is féidir le úsáideoirí cuardach a dhéanamh ar líne, téacs, íomhánna, amhráin nó aschur eile a chruthú nó bheith páirteach in gnéithe eile, mar atá breiseáin. Go chuig an suíomh agus insan aip, cuireann úsáideoirí “leideanna” isteach a thugann treoir do Copilot (m.s., “Tabhair dom moltaí le haghaidh bialann atá oiriúnach do níos mó na 10 duine in aice liom”). le freagra ábhartha a thabhairt, bainfidh Copilot úsáid as an leid seo, chomh maith le suíomh an úsáideoir, teanga, agus socruithe eile le freagra úsáideach a chumadh. I roinnt margaidh, is féidir le úsáideoirí fíordheimhnithe cead a thabhairt ar Copilot rochtain a bheith aige ar stair na leideanna leis an tairge a phearsantú níos fearr. Úsáideann an tairge Copilot seo sonraí a bhailítear leis na seirbhísí Copilot a fheabhsú, fograíocht ábhartha san áireamh. Is féidir le úsáideoirí atá sínithe isteach a stair leideanna a bhainistiú ar an Painéal Príobháideachta Microsoft agus a suíomh, teanga agus socruithe eile a athrú.
Tá Copilot le feiceáil mar cúntóir le tairgí Microsoft eile mar atá Bing agus Microsoft Edge. sna casanna sin, is ionann próiseáil sonraí agus bun- úsáidí na táirgí sin. Tá úsáid agus bailiú sonraí pearsanta Copilot in Bing i gcomhréir le chéile le príomh-thairiscint chuardaigh gréasáin Bing mar a thuairiscítear sa chuid seo. Tá tuilleadh eolais maidir le Copilot in Bing ar fáil ag
Copilot in Bing: Ár gcur chuige maidir le AI Freagrach
. In Microsoft Edge, bíonn Copilot le feiceáil san eispéireas taobh-barra agus is féidir leis cabhrú tascanna bainte leis na suíomhanna greasáin a chur i gcrích (m.s. “achoimrigh an leathanach seo”). Úsáidtear na sonraí seo i dtaca leis an rannán Microsoft Edge don ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Is tairiscint tomhaltóra eile é
Copilot Pro
agus tairgeann sé rochtain tosaíochta do shíntiúsóirí ar na múnlaí is déanaí, cumais cruthú íomhá feabhsaithe, agus rochtain ar Copilot in Microsoft Word, PowerPoint, OneNote, Excel agus Outlook. Tá tiomsú sonraí atá ag an príomhleathanach Copilot Pro cosúil leis an tiomsú sonraí atá ag Copilot tomhaltóra, mar a chuirtear síos ar thuas. Tá feidhmiúlacht Copilot chosúil san áireamh leis i síntiúis Microsoft 365 Family agus Microsoft 365 Personal. Nuair atá Copilot comhtháite le táirgí Microsoft 365, tá tiomsú sonraí Copilot i gcomhréir le chéile leis an dóigh a chuirtear síos ar tiomsú sonraí agus úsáid insan rannán Táirgiúlacht agus cumarsáid den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Tá tairiscintí Copilot déanta fá choinne úsáideoirí enterprise. Nuair a chuirtear ar a chumas ag enterprise incháilithe, tá Copilot le Cosaint ar shonraí tráchtála ar fáil do úsáideoirí atá logáilte isteach le aitheantas Entra s’acu rud a dhéanann tiomsú sonraí a íoslaghdú i dtaca le ionchais úsáideoirí enterprise. Tá tuilleadh eolais ar Copilot le Cosaint ar shonraí tráchtála ar fáil
anseo
.
Soláthraíonn Microsoft 365 Copilot le haghaidh Microsoft 365 Enterprise cosaint sonraí d’fhiontar-ghrád chomh maith le rochtain ar an ngraf corparáideach, Copilot in Microsoft 365 agus Teams, agus gnéithe saincheapadh breise eile. Tá tiomsú agus úsáid sonraí in Microsoft 365 Copilot comhsheasmhach leis na cleachtais ar féidir cur síos a fháil orthu sa rannán ‘Táirgí Enterprise agus forbróra’ den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
Táirgí fiontraíochta agus forbróra
Is táirgí Microsoft agus bogearraí gaolmhara iad Táirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra a chuirtear ar fáil agus a dheartar d'eagraíochtaí agus forbróirí go príomha. Cuimsíonn siad:
Néalseirbhísí, a ndéantar tagairt dóibh mar Sheirbhísí Ar Líne in, amhail Microsoft 365 agus Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365 agus Microsoft Intune, a ndéanann eagraíocht (ár gcustaiméir) conradh le Microsoft le haghaidh na seirbhísí ("Seirbhísí Fiontraíochta Ar Líne").
Uirlisí fiontair agus forbróra eile mar aon le seirbhísí néalbhunaithe, amhail Seirbhísí Azure PlayFab (féach
Téarmaí Seirbhíse Azure PlayFab
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil).
Táirgí freastalaí, forbróra, agus ardán hybrid cloud, amhail Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio, agus System Center, Azure Stack agus bogearraí foinse oscailte ar nós réitigh Bot Framework ("Bogearraí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra").
Feistis agus crua-earraí a úsáidtear mar bhonneagar stórais, amhail StorSimple ("Feistis Fiontraíochta").
Seirbhísí gairmiúla dá dtagraítear san OST atá ar fáil le Seirbhísí Fiontraíochta ar Líne, cosúil le seirbhísí ionduchtaithe, seirbhísí ascnaimh sonraí, seirbhísí eolaíochta sonraí, nó seirbhísí a fhorlíonann gnéithe atá cheana féin sna Seirbhísí Fiontraíochta ar Líne.
I gcás coimhlinte idir an ráiteas príobháideachais Microsoft seo agus téarmaí an chomhaontaithe/na gcomhaontuithe idir custaiméir agus Microsoft do Tháirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra, beidh téarmaí an chomhaontaithe/na gcomhaontuithe sin i bhfeidhm.
Tá tuilleadh faisnéise faoi ghnéithe agus socruithe na dTáirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra, lena n-áirítear roghanna a chuireann isteach ar do phríobháideacht nó príobháideacht na n-úsáideoirí deiridh, le fáil sna doiciméid táirge.
Mura bhfuil aon cheann de na téarmaí thíos sainmhínithe sa Ráiteas Príobháideachais seo nó sna
Téarmaí Táirge
, tugtar sainmhíniú orthu thíos.
Ginearálta
. Nuair a dhéanann custaiméir Táirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra a thriail, a cheannach, a úsáid nó liostáil dóibh, nó nuair a fhaigheann sé seirbhísí tacaíochta nó gairmiúla do tháirgí mar iad, faigheann Microsoft sonraí uait agus tiomsaíonn agus gineann sé sonraí chun an tseirbhís a sholáthar (lena n-áirítear an tseirbhís a fheabhsú, a dhaingniú, agus a nuashonrú), ár n-oibríochtaí dlisteanacha gnó a sheoladh, agus cumarsáid a dhéanamh leis an gcustaiméir. Mar shampla:
Nuair a dhéanann an custaiméir teagmháil le hionadaí díolacháin Microsoft, bailímid ainm agus sonraí teagmhála an chustaiméara, chomh maith le faisnéis faoi eagraíocht an chustaiméara, chun tacú leis an gcaidreamh.
Nuair a bhíonn an custaiméir i dteagmháil le gairmí tacaíochta Microsoft, bailímid sonraí gléis agus úsáide nó tuairiscí earráide chun fadhbanna a dhiagnóisiú agus a réiteach.
Nuair a íocann an custaiméir as táirgí, bailímid sonraí teagmhála agus íocaíochta chun an íocaíocht a phróiseáil.
Nuair a sheolann Microsoft cumarsáid chuig custaiméir, úsáidimid sonraí chun inneachar na cumarsáide a phearsantú.
Nuair a úsáideann custaiméir seirbhísí gairmiúla Microsoft, bailímid ainm agus sonraí teagmhála phointe teagmhála ainmnithe an chustaiméara agus úsáidimid eolas a sholáthraíonn an custaiméir chun na seirbhísí a iarrann an custaiméir a chur ar fáil.
Cuireann Táirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra ar do chumas táirgí nó seirbhísí eile ar líne a cheannach agus a úsáid nó liostáil dóibh, ar le Microsoft iad nó tríú páirtithe a bhfuil cleachtais dhifriúla acu maidir le príobháideacht, agus déanfar na táirgí agus seirbhísí ar líne eile sin a rialú lena ráitis agus polasaithe príobháideachais faoi seach.
Is táirgí Microsoft agus bogearraí gaolmhara iad Táirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra a chuirtear ar fáil agus a dheartar d'eagraíochtaí agus forbróirí go príomha. Cuimsíonn siad:
Néalseirbhísí, a ndéantar tagairt dóibh mar Sheirbhísí Ar Líne in, amhail Microsoft 365 agus Office 365, Microsoft Azure, Microsoft Dynamics365 agus Microsoft Intune, a ndéanann eagraíocht (ár gcustaiméir) conradh le Microsoft le haghaidh na seirbhísí ("Seirbhísí Fiontraíochta Ar Líne").
Uirlisí fiontair agus forbróra eile, agus seirbhísí néalbhunaithe, amhail Seirbhísí Azure PlayFab (chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil féach
Téarmaí Seirbhíse Azure PlayFab
).
Táirgí freastalaí, forbróra, agus ardán hybrid cloud, amhail Windows Server, SQL Server, Visual Studio, agus System Center, Azure Stack agus bogearraí foinse oscailte ar nós réitigh Bot Framework ("Bogearraí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra").
Feistis agus crua-earraí a úsáidtear mar bhonneagar stórais, amhail StorSimple ("Feistis Fiontraíochta").
Seirbhísí gairmiúla dá dtagraítear san OST atá ar fáil le Seirbhísí Fiontraíochta ar Líne, cosúil le seirbhísí ionduchtaithe, seirbhísí ascnaimh sonraí, seirbhísí eolaíochta sonraí, nó seirbhísí a fhorlíonann gnéithe atá cheana féin sna Seirbhísí Fiontraíochta ar Líne.
I gcás coimhlinte idir an ráiteas príobháideachais Microsoft seo agus téarmaí an chomhaontaithe/na gcomhaontuithe idir custaiméir agus Microsoft do Tháirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra, beidh téarmaí an chomhaontaithe/na gcomhaontuithe sin i bhfeidhm.
Tá tuilleadh faisnéise faoi ghnéithe agus socruithe na dTáirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra, lena n-áirítear roghanna a chuireann isteach ar do phríobháideacht nó príobháideacht na n-úsáideoirí deiridh, le fáil sna doiciméid táirge.
Mura bhfuil aon cheann de na téarmaí thíos sainmhínithe sa Ráiteas Príobháideachais seo nó sna
Téarmaí Táirge
, tugtar sainmhíniú orthu thíos.
Ginearálta
. Nuair a dhéanann custaiméir Táirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra a thriail, a cheannach, a úsáid nó liostáil dóibh, nó nuair a fhaigheann sé seirbhísí tacaíochta nó gairmiúla do tháirgí mar iad, faigheann Microsoft sonraí uait agus tiomsaíonn agus gineann sé sonraí chun an tseirbhís a sholáthar (lena n-áirítear an tseirbhís a fheabhsú, a dhaingniú, agus a nuashonrú), ár n-oibríochtaí dlisteanacha gnó a sheoladh, agus cumarsáid a dhéanamh leis an gcustaiméir. Mar shampla:
Nuair a dhéanann an custaiméir teagmháil le hionadaí díolacháin Microsoft, bailímid ainm agus sonraí teagmhála an chustaiméara, chomh maith le faisnéis faoi eagraíocht an chustaiméara, chun tacú leis an gcaidreamh.
Nuair a bhíonn an custaiméir i dteagmháil le gairmí tacaíochta Microsoft, bailímid sonraí gléis agus úsáide nó tuairiscí earráide chun fadhbanna a dhiagnóisiú agus a réiteach.
Nuair a íocann an custaiméir as táirgí, bailímid sonraí teagmhála agus íocaíochta chun an íocaíocht a phróiseáil.
Nuair a sheolann Microsoft cumarsáid chuig custaiméir, úsáidimid sonraí chun inneachar na cumarsáide a phearsantú.
Nuair a úsáideann custaiméir seirbhísí gairmiúla Microsoft, bailímid ainm agus sonraí teagmhála phointe teagmhála ainmnithe an chustaiméara agus úsáidimid eolas a sholáthraíonn an custaiméir chun na seirbhísí a iarrann an custaiméir a chur ar fáil.
Cuireann Táirgí Fiontraíochta agus Forbróra ar do chumas táirgí nó seirbhísí eile ar líne a cheannach agus a úsáid nó liostáil dóibh, ar le Microsoft iad nó tríú páirtithe a bhfuil cleachtais dhifriúla acu maidir le príobháideacht, agus déanfar na táirgí agus seirbhísí ar líne eile sin a rialú lena ráitis agus polasaithe príobháideachais faoi seach.
Seirbhísí fiontair ar líne
Chun na Seirbhísí Fiontair ar Líne a sholáthar, úsáideann Microsoft sonraí a sholáthraíonn tú (lena n-áirítear Sonraí Custaiméirí, Sonraí Pearsanta, Sonraí Riarthóra, Sonraí Íocaíochta, agus Sonraí Tacaíochta) agus sonraí a bhailíonn nó a ghineann Microsoft a bhaineann le húsáid na Seirbhísí Fiontair ar Líne. Próiseálaimid sonraí mar a thuairiscítear sna
Téarmaí Táirge
,
Aguisín Cosanta Sonraí Táirgí agus Seirbhísí Microsoft (DPA Táirgí agus Seirbhísí),
agus
Lárionad Iontaoibhe Microsoft
.
Sonraí Pearsanta
. Is é an custaiméir rialaitheoir na Sonraí Pearsanta agus is é Microsoft próiseálaí na sonraí sin, ach amháin (a) sa chás go ngníomhaíonn an Custaiméir mar phróiseálaí na Sonraí Pearsanta, agus sa chás sin bíonn Microsoft ina fhophróiseálaí nó (b) sa chás go luaitear a mhalairt i leagan caighdeánach
DPA Táirgí agus Seirbhísí
. Ina theannta sin, mar a dhéantar foráil dó sa
DPA Táirgí agus Seirbhísí
caighdeánach, ghlac Microsoft le freagrachtaí breise rialaitheora sonraí faoi GDPR nuair a bhíonn sonraí pearsanta á bpróiseáil aige i ndáil lena chuid oibríochtaí gnó dlisteanacha teagmhasach do soláthar a sheirbhísí do custaiméirí tráchtála Microsoft, amhail billeáil agus bainistíocht cuntais; cúiteamh; tuairisciú inmheánach múnlú gnó; agus tuairisciú airgeadais. Bainimid úsáid as Sonraí Pearsanta san fhoirm is lú so-aitheanta a thacóidh le próiseáil atá riachtanach le haghaidh na h-oibríochtaí dleathacha gnó seo. Braithimid ar shonraí staitistiúla agus ar shonraí pearsanta comhiomlána pearsantaithe sula n-úsáidtear iad le haghaidh ár n-oibríochtaí dleathacha gnó, ag fáil réidh leis an gcumas daoine aonair ar leith a shainaithint.
Sonraí Riarthóra
. Is Sonraí Riarthóra iad an fhaisnéis a thugtar do Microsoft agus tú ag clárú, ag ceannach nó ag riar Seirbhísí Fiontair ar Líne. Bainimid úsáid as Sonraí Riarthóra chun Seirbhísí Ar Líne Fiontraíochta a chur ar fáil, idirbhearta a chur i gcrích, an cuntas a riar, calaois a bhrath agus a chosc, agus ár n-oibleagáidí dlí a chomhlíonadh. Áirítear le sonraí riarthóra an t-ainm, an seoladh, an uimhir fóin agus an seoladh ríomhphoist a thugann tú, chomh maith le sonraí úsáide comhthiomsaithe a bhaineann le do chuntas, amhail na rialuithe a roghnaíonn tú. D'fhéadfadh faisnéis teagmhála do chomhghleacaithe agus do chairde a bheith san áireamh sna Sonraí Riarthóra, má aontaíonn tú í a sholáthar do Microsoft ar mhaithe le cuireadh a sheoladh chucu chun leas a bhaint as na Seirbhísí Fiontair ar Líne, agus chuige sin amháin; is féidir go ndéanfaimis teagmháil leis na daoine aonair sin le cumarsáidí lena n-áirítear faisnéis fút, amhail d'ainm agus do phictiúr próifíle.
De réir mar is gá, bainimid úsáid as Sonraí Riarthóra chun teagmháil a dhéanamh leat faoi do chuntas, síntiúis, billeáil, agus nuashonruithe ar Sheirbhísí Ar Líne Fiontraíochta, lena n-áirítear faisnéis faoi ghnéithe nua, slándáil, nó fadhbanna eile teicniúla. Déanaimid teagmháil leat freisin maidir le fiosruithe ó thríú páirtithe a fhaighimid faoi úsáid na Seirbhísí Ar Líne Fiontraíochta, mar atá leagtha amach i do chomhaontú. Ní féidir leat díliostáil ó na cumarsáidí neamhchur chun cinn sin. D'fhéadfaimis teagmháil a dhéanamh leat freisin maidir le faisnéis agus tairiscintí faoi tháirgí agus seirbhísí eile, nó d'fhaisnéis teagmhála a chomhroinnt le comhpháirtithe Microsoft. Sa chás go bhfuil seirbhísí nó réitigh shainiúla ag comhpháirtí dá leithéid chun do chuid riachtanas a chomhlíonadh, nó chun barrfheabhsú a dhéanamh ar an úsáid a bhaineann tú as na Seirbhísí Ar Líne Fiontraíochta, d'fhéadfaimis faisnéis theoranta, chomhbhailithe faoi chuntas d'eagraíochta a chomhroinnt leis an gcomhpháirtí sin. Ní dhéanfaidh Microsoft d'fhaisnéis rúnda nó do shonraí teagmhála a chomhroinnt leis an gcomhpháirtí údaraithe mura bhfuil sé de cheart againn a leithéid a dhéanamh. Is féidir leat do roghanna teagmhála a bhainistiú nó do chuid faisnéise a nuashonrú i do phróifíl chuntais.
Sonraí Íocaíochta
. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí íocaíochta chun idirbhearta a chur i gcrích, agus chun calaois a bhrath agus a chosc.
Sonraí Tacaíochta
. Soláthraíonn custaiméirí sonraí nó údaraíonn siad Microsoft chun sonraí a thiomsú maidir le tacaíocht theicniúil a fháil do Sheirbhísí Fiontair ar Líne. Próiseálaimid Sonraí Tacaíochta chun tacaíocht theicniúil a sholáthar arna thuairisciú sa
Táirgí agus Seirbhísí DPA
.
Bogearraí Logánta agus Sonraí Diagnóiseacha
. D'fhéadfadh a bheith ort bogearraí logánta (e.g. gníomhairí, feidhmchláir bainistíochta gléis) a shuiteáil ar do ghléas chun úsáid a bhaint as Seirbhísí Ar Líne nó d'fhéadfadh na bogearraí sin cur le Seirbhísí Ar Líne. Féadfaidh na bogearraí logánta Sonraí Diagnóiseacha a bhailiú (mar a shainmhínítear sa
DPA Táirgí agus Seirbhísí
) maidir le úsáid agus feidhmíocht an bhogearraí sin. Féadfaidh na sonraí sin a tharchur chuig Microsoft agus a úsáid chun na gcríoch a thuairiscítear sa
Táirgí agus Seirbhísí DPA
.
Sonraí Seirbhísí Cuardaigh Bing
. Úsáideann Seirbhísí Cuardaigh Bing, mar atá sainmhínithe sna Téarmaí Táirge, sonraí ar nós iarratais chuardaigh de réir mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán
Bing
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo a úsáid.
Siar go barr
Bogearraí fiontraíochta agus forbróra agus feistis fiontraíochta
Bailíonn bogearraí fiontraíochta agus forbróra agus feistis fiontraíochta sonraí chun feidhmiú go héifeachtach agus chun na heispéiris is fearr a chur ar fáil duit. Braitheann na sonraí a bhailímid ar na gnéithe a úsáideann tú, agus ar do shocruithe agus cumraíocht, ach go ginearálta, bíonn siad teoranta do shonraí gléis agus úsáide. Bíonn rogha ag custaiméirí faoi na sonraí a chuireann siad ar fáil. Tá samplaí de na sonraí a bhailímid anseo:
Le linn suiteála nó nuair a uasghrádaíonn tú bogearraí fiontraíochta agus forbróra, féadfaimid sonraí gléis agus úsáide a bhailiú le fáil amach an mbíonn aon deacrachtaí agat.
Agus bogearraí fiontraíochta nó feistis fiontraíochta á n-úsáid agat, féadfaimid sonraí gléis agus úsáide a bhailiú chun tuilleadh a fhoghlaim faoi do thimpeallacht oibriúcháin agus chun gnéithe slándála a fheabhsú.
Má tharlaíonn cliseadh agus bogearraí fiontraíochta nó feistis fiontraíochta á n-úsáid agat, féadfaidh tú rogha a dhéanamh chun tuairisc earráide a sheoladh chuig Microsoft chun cabhrú linn an fhadhb a dhiagnóisiú agus tacaíocht do chustaiméirí a sholáthar.
Úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí a bhailímid ó bhogearraí fiontraíochta agus forbróra agus feistis fiontraíochta lenár dtáirgí a sholáthar agus a fheabhsú, tacaíocht do chustaiméirí a sholáthar, an táirge a ghníomhachtú, cumarsáid a dhéanamh leat, agus ár ngnó a fheidhmiú.
Is ardán bainistíochta coibhneasta bunachar sonraí é Microsoft SQL Server agus cuimsíonn sé táirgí is féidir a shuiteáil mar tháirgí aonair (amhail SQL Server Management Studio). Tabhair cuairt ar an
leathanach príobháideachais Freastalaí SQL
chun mionsonraí a fháil maidir leis na sonraí a bhailímid, an chaoi a úsáidimid iad agus conas do roghanna príobháideachais a bhainistiú. Má oibríonn tú in eagraíocht, is féidir le do riarthóir socruithe áirithe teiliméadrachta a shocrú in SQL Server trí Pholasaí Grúpa.
HoloLens
. Is ríomhairí glanscrtha Windows iad gleás cinn HoloLens le nascacht Wi-Fi a chumasaíonn eispéireas réaltacht mheasartha d’fheidmchláir agus do réitigh. Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóisice Windows chun fadhbanna a réiteach agus chun Windows a choinneáil cothrom le dáta, slán, agus ag oibriú mar is ceart. Cabhraíonn sonraí diagnóiseacha dúinn HoloLens a fheabhsú agus táirgí agus seirbhísí ábhartha Microsoft leis ag brath ar na socruithe sonraí diagnóiseacha atá roghnaithe agat do do ghléas.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi shonraí diagnóiseacha Windows
.
Déanann HoloLens sonraí ata gaolta le eispéireas agus an fhearas HoloLens a bhailiú agus a phróiseáil, áirítear ceamara, micreafóin agus braiteora infridhearga a d’fhéadfadh gluaiseachtaí agus gutha a chumasú chun nascleanúint a dhéanamh.
Má roghnaíonn tú, d’fhéadfadh ceamara a úsáid chun tú a shíniú isteach go huathoibríoch ag baint úsáid as d’iris. Chun é sin a dhéanamh, glacann HoloLens pictiúr de d'iris agus tomhaiseann an fad idir príomhphointí chun luach uimhriúil uathúil maidir leatsa a stóráil. Fanann na sonraí sin ar HoloLens agus ní chomhroinntear iad le duine ar bith. Is féidir leat na sonraí sin a scriosadh ó do chonsól uair ar bith.
Ina theannta sin, braitheann HoloLens comharthaí láimhe atá ceaptha chun idirghníomhaíochtaí simplí córais a chur i gcrích (amhail nascleanúint roghchláir, peanáil/zúmáil agus scrolladh). Tá na sonraí seo próiseáilte ar do ghléas HoloLens pearsanta agus ní stórailtear é.
Scagann HoloLens pointí rianaithe bunaithe ar do thimpeallacht a ligeann ort dromchlaí spáis a thuiscint agus ligeann sé ort sócmhainní digiteacha a chur orthu. Níl aon íomhá gaolta leis na sonraí comhshaoil seo agus déanta iad a stóráil go háitiúil ar an gléas HoloLens. Is féidir leat na sonraí seo a scrios ó do ghléas HoloLens más mian leat.
Cumasaíonn micreafóin an gléas cinn orduithe gutha chun cluichí agus feidhmchláir a rialú, nó chun míreanna cuardaigh a iontráil.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le bailiú sonraí gutha
.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Táirgí táirgiúlachta agus cumarsáide
Is táirgí táirgiúlachta agus cumarsáide ann ná feidhmchláir, bogearraí, agus seirbhísí ar féidir iad a úsáid chun doiciméid a chruthú, a stóráil agus a chomhroinnt agus chun cumarsáid a dhéanamh le daoine eile.
Is táirgí táirgiúlachta agus cumarsáide ann ná feidhmchláir, bogearraí, agus seirbhísí ar féidir iad a úsáid chun doiciméid a chruthú, a stóráil agus a chomhroinnt agus chun cumarsáid a dhéanamh le daoine eile.
Microsoft 365, Office agus feidhmchláir tháirgiúlachta eile
Bailiúchán síntiúis d'fheidhmchlár agus de sheirbhísí táirgiúlachta is ea Microsoft 365, tugadh Office 365 ar leaganacha roimhe seo, lena n-áirítear Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, agus cinn eile nach iad. Is ceannachán aon uaire é Office de leaganacha na bhfeidhmchlár seo atá ar fáil ar ríomhaire nó Mac agus cuimsíonn sé Access agus Publisher. Is seirbhísí iad Microsoft 365 agus Office atá comhdhéanta d'fheidhmchláir bogearraí cliaint agus seirbhísí ar líne (nó feidhmchláir gréasáin i gcás Microsoft 365 don ghréasán), iad nasctha ar chuid mhór ardán agus a bhfuil eispéiris iomadúla idirspleácha i gceist leo. Chun tuilleadh sonraí a fháil faoi Outlook, féach an rannán
Outlook
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Cuireann seirbhísí éagsúla Microsoft 365 néal bunaithe ar do chumas thú ábhar do chomhaid a úsáid le haghaidh dearaí agus moltaí, comhoibriú le daoine eile laistigh de do chomhaid, agus cuireann siad feidhmiúlacht ar fáil duit ó tháirgí eile de chuid Microsoft, ar nós Bing agus Cortana, agus táirgí nasctha tríú páirtí. Má tá tú ag obair in eagraíocht, is féidir le do riarthóir na seirbhísí nasctha sin a chasadh as nó a dhíchumasú. Is féidir leat rochtain a fháil ar na rialuithe príobháideachais laistigh do fheidhmchláir Microsoft 365 agus Office. Chun tuilleadh eolais a fháil, féach
Socruithe Príobháideachais Cuntais
.
Seirbhís Fánaíochta Office
. Cuidíonn Seirbhís Fánaíochta Office leat do shocruithe, lena n-áirítear do shocruithe príobháideachais, a choinneáil suas chun dáta ar gach gléas atá agat ar a bhfuil feidhmchláir Microsoft 365 nó Office á rith. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach ar do fheidhmchláir le do chuntas Microsoft nó le cuntas arna eisiúint ag d’eagraíocht, sioncronaíonn an tseirbhís cuid de do shocruithe saincheaptha le freastalaithe Microsoft. Mar shampla, sioncronaíonn an tseirbhís liosta de na doiciméid is déanaí a úsáideadh nó an suíomh deireanach ar breathnaíodh air laistigh de dhoiciméad. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach ar ghléas eile leis an gcuntas céanna, íoslódálann Seirbhís Fánaíochta Office do shocruithe ó fhreastalaithe Microsoft agus cuireann sé iad leis an ngléas breise. Nuair a shíníonn tú amach as do fheidhmchláir, baineann an tseirbhís do shocruithe de do ghléas. Seolfar aon athruithe a dhéanann tú i do shocruithe saincheaptha chuig freastalaithe Microsoft.
Nuashonruithe ó Microsoft
. Úsáideann Microsoft seirbhísí amhail Click-to-Run nó Microsoft AutoUpdate (le haghaidh Mac), nó Microsoft Update (do roinnt leaganacha de Office) chun nuashonruithe slándála agus nuashonruithe tábhachtacha eile a sholáthar duit.
Tá na seirbhísí seo in ann infhaighteacht nuashonruithe ar líne do fheidhmchláir Microsoft 365 nó Office ar do ghléas a bhrath go huathoibríoch agus iad a íoslódáil agus a shuiteáil go huathoibríoch.
Sonraí Diagnóiseacha
. Úsáidtear sonraí diagnóiseacha chun (i) do fheidhmchláir Microsoft 365 nó Office a choinneáil slán agus cothrom le dáta; (ii) fadhbanna a bhrath, a dhiagnóisiú agus a cheartú; agus (iii) feabhsúcháin táirgí a dhéanamh. Ní áirítear ar na sonraí seo ainm ná seoladh ríomhphoist úsáideora, ábhar chomhaid an úsáideora, ná eolas ar fheidhmchláir nach bhfuil baint acu le Microsoft 365 nó Office. Tá rogha ag úsáideoirí idir dhá leibhéil éagsúla de bhailiú sonraí diagnóiseacha, Riachtanach agus Roghnach.
Riachtanach
. An t-íosmhéid sonraí is gá chun feidhmchláir a choinneáil slán, cothrom le dáta, agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis ar an ngléas ar a bhfuil sé suiteáilte.
Roghnach
. Sonraí breise a chabhraíonn linn feabhsúcháin táirge a dhéanamh agus a thugann eolas breisithe dúinn mar chabhair chun fadhbanna a bhrath, a dhiagnóisiú agus a cheartú.
Féach
Sonraí Diagnóiseacha
le haghaidh tuilleadh faisnéise.
Eispéiris Nasctha
. Cuireann Microsoft 365 tuilleadh eispéireas ar fáil i gcónaí i bhfeidhmchláir cliant atá ceangailte le seirbhísí néalbhunaithe agus a fhaigheann tacú uathu. Ina theannta sin, tá fo-thacar de na heispéiris bhainteacha seo ar fáil in Oifig. Má roghnaíonn tú eispéiris nasctha a úsáid, baileofar sonraí seirbhíse riachtanacha chun a chinntiú go mbeidh na heispéiris nasctha sin iontaofa, cothrom le dáta agus slán i gcónaí agus go bhfeidhmeoidh siad mar a bheadh súil leis. Féach an fhaisnéis bhreise thíos faoi shonraí seirbhíse riachtanacha.
Samplaí d'eispéiris nasctha is ea dul i mbun oibre le daoine eile ar dhoiciméad atá stóráilte ar OneDrive nó ábhar doiciméad Word a aistriú go teanga eile. Dhá chineál eispéireas nasctha atá ann.
Eispéiris a dhéanann anailís ar d'inneachar
. Eispéiris a úsáideann inneachar do chomhaid chun moltaí dearaidh, moltaí eagarthóireachta, léargas sonraí agus gnéithe eile den sórt seo a sholáthar duit. Mar shampla, Dearthóir PowerPoint nó Editor in Word.
Eispéiris a íoslódálann inneachar ar líne
. Eispéiris a cheadaíonn duit inneachar ar líne a chuardach agus a íoslódáil, lena n-áirítear teimpléid, íomhánna, samhlacha 3T, físeáin agus ábhair thagartha chun do dhoiciméid a bhreisiú. Mar shampla, teimpléid nó QuickStarter PowerPoint.
Is féidir leat rochtain a fháil ar na rialuithe príobháideachais laistigh do fheidhmchláir cliant Microsoft 365 agus Office. Cuireann na socruithe príobháideachta seo ar do chumas d'eispéiris nasctha a chumrú. Mar shampla, féadfaidh tú rogha a dhéanamh eispéiris nasctha a chumasú, trína n-íoslódáiltear inneachar ar líne, ach gan eispéiris nasctha a dhéanann anailís ar inneachar a chumasú. Má chasann tú eispéiris nasctha as, casfaidh tú eispéiris bhreise as chomh maith, ar nós comh-údar ar dhoiciméad agus stóráil comhaid ar líne. Ach fiú amháin má úsáideann tú an socrú príobháideachta chun eispéiris nasctha a chasadh as, beidh feidhmiúlacht áirithe ar fáil i gcónaí, cuir i gcás do bhosca poist a shioncronú in Outlook, chomh maith le seirbhísí riachtanacha a thuairiscítear thíos. Níl na rialuithe seo ar fáil agus Microsoft 365 á n-úsáid ar an nGréasán, toisc go mbeidh tú nasctha le néal cheana féin. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le rochtain a fháil ar na rialuithe seo, féach
Socruithe Príobháideachais Cuntais.
Má roghnaíonn tú cineálacha áirithe eispéireas nasctha a dhíchumasú, déanfar an t-ordú ribín nó roghchláir do na heispéiris nasctha sin a liathú, nó gheobhaidh tú teachtaireacht earráide nuair a dhéanann tú iarracht na heispéiris nasctha sin a úsáid.
Seirbhísí riachtanacha
. Tá sraith seirbhísí ann atá riachtanach d'fheidhmeanna Microsoft 365 agus Office agus nach féidir iad a dhíchumasú. Mar shampla, seirbhís riachtanach is ea an tseirbhís ceadúnaithe a dheimhníonn go bhfuil tú ceadúnaithe mar is cóir chun Microsoft 365 a úsáid. Déantar sonraí riachtanacha seirbhíse mar gheall ar na seirbhísí seo a bhailiú agus a sheoladh chuig Microsoft, is cuma cad iad na socruithe eile atá cumraithe agat. Féach
Seirbhísí Riachtanacha
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.
Sonraí seirbhíse riachtanacha le haghaidh eispéiris nasctha
. De bhrí go bhfuil eispéireas nasctha in úsáid agat, seoltar sonraí chuig Microsoft agus próiseálann sé na sonraí sin chun an t-eispéireas nasctha sin a chur ar fáil duit. Tá na sonraí sin riachtanach de bhrí go gcuireann an fhaisnéis ar ár gcumas na heispéiris nasctha néalbhunaithe sin a sholáthar. Sonraí seirbhíse riachtanacha a thugaimid ar na sonraí sin.
D’fhéadfaí go n-áireofaí i sonraí seirbhíse riachtanach faisnéis a bhaineann le hoibriú an eispéiris nasctha a theastaíonn chun an tseirbhís bhunúsach a choinneáil slán, cothrom le dáta, agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis. Má roghnaíonn tú eispéireas nasctha a úsáid a dhéanann anailís ar d’inneachar, Translate in Word mar shampla, seoltar an téacs a chlóscríobh tú agus a roghnaigh tú a aistriú agus déantar é a phróiseáil chun eispéireas nasctha a chur ar fáil duit. Ní dhéantar an téacs ná an t-aistriúchán a stóráil inár seirbhís. D’fhéadfaí go n-áireofaí i sonraí seirbhíse riachtanach freisin faisnéis a theastaíonn ó eispéireas nasctha chun a thasc a chur i gcrích, cosúil le faisnéis chumraíochta faoi fheidhmchlár Microsoft 365 nó Office.
Féach
sonraí riachtanacha seirbhíse
chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.
Copilot in Microsoft 365 agus Copilot Pro
. Ar fáil mar shíntiús ar leith i dtíortha áirithe, soláthraíonn gnéithe Copilot Pro atá ar fáil i bhfeidhmchláir Microsoft 365 mar  chuid de shíntiús Microsoft 365 Personal, Microsoft 365 Family, nó Copilot Pro, soláthraíonn siad cumais tháirgiúlachta atá á gcumhachtú ag intleacht shaorga trí eispéiris chomhráite fíor-ama, tríd an inneachar a chuireann tú ar fáil i bhfeidhmchláir Microsoft 365 lena n-áirítear Word, Excel, OneNote, Outlook agus PowerPoint a phróiseáil le múnla mór teanga (MMT/LLM). Níl Copilot in Microsoft 365 ná Copilot Pro ar fáil le húsáid i gceadúnais deisce Office. Nuair a úsáidtear Copilot Pro leis na feidhmchláir Microsoft 365 atá ar fáil, bainfidh Copilot úsáid as inneachar i do chuid comhad ach amháin má iarrann tú air tasc ar leith a dhéanamh ar an inneachar sonrach sin. Mar shampla, nuair a iarrann tú ar Copilot Pro alt a athscríobh duit i ndoiciméad Word nó nuair a iarrann tú ar Copilot Pro liosta ‘le déanamh’ a ghiniúint ó do chuid nótaí in OneNote. Cosúil le heispéiris nasctha, tiomsófar sonraí seirbhíse riachtanacha agus úsáid á baint agat as Copilot, a chuimsíonn faisnéis a bhaineann le hoibriú an eispéiris nasctha Copilot a theastaíonn chun an tseirbhís bhunúsach a choinneáil slán, cothrom le dáta agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis.
Féach
Copilot Pro: Feidhmchláir Microsoft 365 agus do phríobháideacht
agus
ceisteanna coitianta maidir le Copilot i síntiúis Microsoft 365 Family agus Pearsanta
chun tuilleadh eolais a fháil.
Feidhmchláir Tháirgiúlachta eile
. Cuireann Microsoft roinnt fheidhmchlár táirgiúlachta ar leith ar fáil seachas Microsoft 365 agus Office, lena n-áirítear Whiteboard (canbhás digiteach saorfoirme lena mbaintear úsáid as tadhall, clóbhualadh, agus peann), To Do (feidhmchlár bhainistiú taisc néal-bhunaithe) agus Sticky Notes (feidhmchlár deisce nótaí).
Baineann na feidhmchláir úsáid as seirbhísí néal-bhunaithe éagsúla chun feidhmiúlacht ó tháirgí Microsoft eile a chur ar fáil duit, lena n-áirítear íomhánna ó Bing a sholáthar in Whiteboard, tascanna a mholadh le cur le My Day in To Do, agus leas a bhaint as comtháthú Sticky Notes le Outlook.
Cumais ghléis a úsáid
. Baineann roinnt fheidhmchlár Microsoft 365 úsáid as cumais do ghléis agus gnéithe áirithe á n-úsáid aige. In PowerPoint, is féidir leis an ngné taifeadta cur i láthair micreafóin agus ceamara do ghléis a rochtain chun cur i láthair a thaifeadadh le fuaim agus físeán. Déantar rochtain ar mhicreafóin do ghléis freisin tríd an ngné thaifeadadh fuaime agus nuair atá Speaker Coach á úsáid. Agus tú ag labhairt, tugann Speaker Coach treoir duit ar an scáileán maidir le luas, friotal ionchuimsithigh, mionnaí móra a úsáid, focail líonaigh, agus cé acu an bhfuil an sleamhnán téacs á léamh agat. Agus cur i láthair PowerPoint á chruthú agat, is féidir leat úsáid a bhaint as na gnéithe Seat Scáileáin agus bearrtha Scáileáin freisin chun ábhair an scáileáin a ghabhadh. Cuireann roinnt fheidhmchlár Microsoft 365, PowerPoint, Word, agus OneNote Dictate ar fáil, eispéireas nasctha lena ligtear duit úsáid a bhaint as ábhair údair teanga go téacs ach úsáid a bhaint as do mhicreafón. In Word agus OneNote, athraíonn an t-eispéireas nasctha Transcribe teanga a taifeadadh go díreach sa bhfeidhmchlár trí úsáid a bhaint as do mhicreafón nó as taifeadadh gutha go tras-scríbhinn téacs le gach cainteoir ar leith scartha. Is féidir le OneNote grianghraif a chur isteach nó físeán a thaifeadadh trí úsáid a bhaint as do cheamara. Tá feidhmiúlacht comhroinnte ag na feidhmchláir Microsoft 365 uile chomh maith le To Do agus Whiteboard a dhéanann rochtain ar do theagmhálaithe chun ligean leat do chomhaid a chomhroinnt le daoine eile i do liosta teagmhálaithe. Ní dhéanfaidh feidhmchláir rochtain ar chumais do ghléis go dtí go dtosaíonn tú ag baint úsáid as an ngné.
Is féidir leat do shocruithe mhicreafóin agus ceamara a bhainistiú sa Roghchlár Socruithe Príobháideachais Windows. Téigh go dtí
Socruithe > Tosaigh > Príobháideachas nó Príobháideachas & Slándáil
. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le conas do shocruithe príobháideachais a rialú i bhfeidhmchláir, féach
socruithe príobháideachais Windows a mbaineann feidhmchláir úsáid astu
.
Siar go barr
Teaghlach Microsoft
Baineann an roinn seo don táirge Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft M365, a ligeann do grúpa teaghlaigh a cheangail tríd an aip Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft ar a Windows, Xbox, nó gléasanna soghluaiste. Caith súil siar go cúramach ar an bhfaisnéis ag
Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft
má tá rogha á dhéanamh agat grúpa teaghlaigh á chruthú nó páirt a ghlacadh ann.
D´fhéadfadh Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft cabhrú le tuismitheoirí agus caomhnóirí timpeallacht níos sábháilte á chruthú i gcóir a ngrúpa teaghlaigh le scagtha ábhar digiteach, teorainn ama scáileáin, caiteachas ar siopaí Microsoft agus Xbox, rátáil aoise a shocrú i gcóir aipeanna agus cluichí, agus comhroinnt suíomh. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le conas a bhailíonn agus a úsáideann Microsoft sonraí leanaí, féach ar an rannán
Bailiú sonraí ó leanaí
den Ráiteas Príobháideachais. Má tá tú ag úsáid Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft in Windows, féach ar an rannán
Gnéithe slándála agus sábháilteachta Windows
den Ráiteas Príobháideachais chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.
Le Sábháilteacht teaghlaigh a chur ar a chumas ar chuntas linbh, ní mór an cuntas linbh a bheith mar páirt den grúpa teaghlaigh. Cruthaítear cuntais a bhfuil cead ó thuismitheoirí de dhíth orthu go huathoibríoch mar chuid de ghrúpa teaghlaigh an duine a thug an cead don chuntas a chruthú. Do chuntais nach bhfuil cead ón tuismitheoir de dhíth orthu le bheith cruthaithe, caithfidh an tuismitheoir nó an cosantóir an cuntas a chur lena grupa teaghlaigh leis an sábháilteacht teaghlaigh a úsáid.
Nuair atá an tuairisciú ghníomhaíochta teaghlaigh ar chumas agat do pháiste, baileoidh Microsoft sonraí faoi conas a úsáideann an pháiste a ngléas, mar cuardach, gréasán, aip agus gníomhaíocht chluiche, agus tuairisc de gníomhaíochtaí an pháiste a sholáthar do na tuismitheoirí. Scriosadh go rialta tuairiscí ghníomhaíochta ó freastalaí Microsoft.
Úsáidfidh gnéithe áirithe Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh, mar shampla Comhroinnte Suíomh, Sábháilteacht Tiomáint, Tiomántáin Comhroinnte, Áiteanna, agus Foláireamh Suíomh, do chuid eolais suíomh nuair atá sé ar chumas. Nuair atá an Comhroinnte Suíomh ar chumas agat, uaslódálfaidh do ghléas eolais suíomh don scamall agus é a roinnt le daoine eile i do ghrúpa teaghlaigh. Coimeádann Microsoft do shuíomh aithne is déanaí mar pháirt den gné Comhroinnte Suíomh (cuireann gach suíomh nua in ionad an ceann roimhe sin). Nuair atá Sábháilteacht Tiomáint ar chumas agat, úsáidfear do shuíomh chun do nósanna tiomána a thaifead cosúil le má tá tú ag tiomáint laistigh de na teorainn luais, má tá tú ag úsáid do ghuthán nuair atá tú ag tiomáint, agus má luasghéaraíonn nó coscánaíonn tú go tobann. Déanfar na tuairiscí seo a uaslódáil chuig an scamall, agus is féidir leat an rogha a dhéanamh do thuairiscí tiomáint a roinnt le do ghrúpa teaghlaigh. Is féidir leat na gnéithe suíomh seo a mhúchadh aon am sna socruithe Sábháilteachta Teaghlaigh. Is féidir leat sonraí suíomh do ghléis a bhainistiú ag Deais Príobháideachas Microsoft. Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le
Sábháilteacht teaghlaigh agus do sonraí suímh
.
Siar go barr
Microsoft Launcher
Is aip Android é Microsoft Launcher a thairgeann eispéireas tosaitheoir feidhmchláir an-saincheaptha ar ghléasanna Android.
Ligeann Microsoft Launcher duit logáil isteach le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta nó le do chuntas oibre, nó é a úsáid gan aon chuntas. Mar sin féin, d'fhéadfadh roinnt feidhmeanna a bheith teoranta mura dtugann tú ceadanna áirithe.
Chun Microsoft Launcher a úsáid, ní mór an feidhmchlár a shuiteáil ar do ghléas Android, agus tá ceadanna roghnacha ag teastáil chun na gnéithe seo a leanas a chumasú:
Microsoft Copilot
. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta, is féidir leat gnéithe Copilot cosúil le comhrá, cuardach gréasáin, cuardach gutha agus cuardach íomhánna a úsáid gan uaim. Éilíonn gnéithe áirithe Copilot rochtain ar do chumais gléas, mar shampla do cheamara gléas, micreafón, grianghraif agus físeáin. Féach ar ár rannán Intleacht Shaorga agus cumais Copilot le haghaidh tuilleadh eolais. Foghlaim tuilleadh faoi théarmaí úsáide Copilot
anseo
.
Fotha Sracfhéachaint
. Cuidíonn Sracfhéachaint leat gníomhaíochtaí laethúla a eagrú, mar shampla féilire Outlook, Microsoft To Do, Nótaí Greamaitheacha agus doiciméid le déanaí i d’fheidhmchláir M365. Tar éis duit síniú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta nó le do chuntas oibre, déanfar na sonraí a shioncronú thar ghléasanna atá sínithe isteach sa chuntas céanna chun eispéiris phearsantaithe a thabhairt duit. Cuireann sé ar do chumas freisin athbhreithniú a dhéanamh ar ghníomhaíochtaí le déanaí, cosúil le grianghraif le déanaí agus úsáid feidhmchláir, a dteastaíonn ceadanna uathu chun rochtain a fháil ar ghrianghraif gléis, comhaid agus sonraí úsáide feidhmchláir.
Fotha Nuachta
. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft, is féidir leat taitneamh a bhaint as fotha nuachta pearsantaithe agus fógraí i Fotha Nuachta ó Microsoft Launcher, sioncronaithe ar fud do ghléasanna go léir. Lena chois sin, is féidir leat nuacht choimeádaithe áitiúil a fháil nuair a thugann tú cead do Microsoft Launcher rochtain a fháil ar d'fhaisnéis suímh. Is féidir leat do shainroghanna ad a bhainistiú trí phainéal príobháideachais Microsoft chun d'eispéireas a chur in oiriúint.
Fógraí Aimsire
. Ligeann Microsoft Launcher duit na hathruithe aimsire is déanaí agus is tábhachtaí a fháil ar do scáileán baile le Aimsir MSN. Is féidir leat faisnéis aimsire áitiúil atá cothrom le dáta a fháil má ligeann tú do Launcher rochtain a dhéanamh ar do shuíomh nó má chuireann tú do chód poist ar fáil.
Cúltacaigh agus Athchóirigh
: Aistrigh go héasca idir fóin nó bain triail as socruithe scáileáin baile éagsúla le cúltaca Microsoft Launcher agus gné aischuir. Is féidir cúltacaí a stóráil go háitiúil ar do ghléas nó a shábháil ar do chuntas OneDrive a bhaineann le do Chuntas Microsoft le haghaidh rochtain éasca.
Tacaíonn Microsoft Launcher le gnéithe próifíl oibre Android, rud a chuireann ar do chumas teorainn shoiléir a choinneáil idir sonraí pearsanta agus sonraí oibre ar do ghléas. Ciallaíonn sé seo gur féidir leat rochtain shlán a fháil ar acmhainní oibre gan iad a mheascadh le d'fheidhmchláir agus do shonraí pearsanta.
Chun tuilleadh a fhoghlaim faoi Microsoft Launcher agus na gnéithe a dtacaítear leis, féach
anseo
.
Siar go barr
Microsoft Teams
Baineann an rannán seo le tairiscint tomhaltóirí Teams; má úsáideann tú Teams le cuntas scoile nó oibre, féach ar an rannán
táirgí Fiontair agus forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Lárionad comhoibrithe agus cumarsáide in éineacht is ea Teams. Is féidir leat Teams a úsáid chun bheith eagraithe agus nasctha thar raon do shaoil iomláin. Cuireann Teams ar do chumas guthghlao nó glao físe a chur ar dhaoine eile. Cuireann Teams ar do chumas daoine, comhaid, grianghraif, comhráite, tascanna agus féilirí a aimsiú go héasca in áit amháin, áit atá áisiúil agus sábháilte araon. Cuireann Teams ar do chumas an fhaisnéis rúnda a stóráil, mar shampla pasfhocail, uimhreacha Microsoft Rewards agus sonraí logála isteach, agus a chomhroinnt le daoine eile i Teams. Le toiliú uait, is féidir leat do shuíomh a chomhroinnt le cairde agus le daoine muinteartha.
Mar chuid de na gnéithe sin a sholáthar, bailíonn Microsoft sonraí úsáide maidir leis na gnéithe mar aon le faisnéis faoi do mhíreanna cumarsáide, lena n-áirítear am agus dáta na cumarsáide agus na húsáideoirí atá mar chuid den mhír chumarsáide. Is féidir le Microsoft an eolas seo a roinnt le custaiméirí Enterprise nuair a dhéanann tú teagmháil trí cruinnithe ná comhrá le úsáideoir deiridh atá ag úsáid a gcuntais scoile nó oibre. Mar shampla, ma dhéanannan tú teagmháil trí comhrá Teams le húsáideoir atá ag úsáid cuntas Teams na scoile, is féidir le Microsoft do eolas a roinnt leis an úsáideoir sin mar chuid den seirbhís Teams
Comhoiriúnacht le Skype
. Mar úsáideoir Teams, is féidir leat logáil isteach in Skype le do chuntas Teams. Má logálann tú isteach in Skype le do chuid faisnéise aitheantais ó Teams, is féidir leat Skype a úsáid chun comhrá a dhéanamh le húsáideoirí eile de chuid Skype agus Teams agus glaoch orthu, agus is féidir leat rochtain a fháil ar do stair chomhrá in Teams trí Skype. Beidh úsáideoirí Skype in ann teagmháil a dhéanamh leat ar Teams agus do stádas láithreachta ar Teams a fheiceáil. Gheobhaidh tú tuilleadh faisnéise sa
rannán faoi Skype
den ráiteas príobháideachta seo.
Teagmhálaithe Teams agus Skype a aimsiú
. Áirítear i do phróifíl Teams faisnéis a chuir tú ar fáil nuair a shocraigh tú cuntas Microsoft. Chun cur ar chumas daoine eile thú a aimsiú ar Teams (nó ar tháirgí a bhíonn ag idirghníomhú le Teams le haghaidh úsáide pearsanta, Teams fiontair agus Skype ina measc), tá do phróifíl Teams san áireamh in eolairí cuardaigh poiblí de chuid Teams agus Skype, agus is féidir é go dtaispeánfar é ar Skype agus ar Teams. Ag brath ar do chuid socruithe, is féidir le húsáideoirí Skype agus Teams thú a aimsiú le d'ainm, seoladh ríomhphoist agus / nó uimhir theileafóin. Áirítear ar do phróifíl d'ainm úsáideora, abhatár agus aon sonraí eile is mian leat a chur le do phróifíl nó a thaispeáint do dhaoine eile. B’fhéidir go bhfuil do phróifíl Teams infheicthe ag custaiméirí Enterprise agus a cuid úsáideoirí deiridh nuair a bhíonn tú i dteagmháil le úsáideoir deiridh eagraíochta i gcomhrá agus cruinnithe.
Teagmhálaithe Teams
. Le do chead, sioncronóidh Teams do ghléas, Outlook agus teagmhálaithe Skype go tréimhsiúil agus déanfar seic le haghaidh úsáideoirí Teams eile a mheaitseálann teagmhálaithe ar leabhair seoltaí de chuid do ghléis, Outlook, nó Skype. Tusa atá i gceannas i gcónaí ar do theagmhálaithe agus is féidir leat stop a chur leis an sioncronú uair ar bith. Má roghnaíonn tú sioncronú na dteagmhálaithe atá ar do ghléas, Outlook, nó Skype a stopadh, nó má tá tú neamhghníomhach ar do ghléas, scriosfar aon teagmhálaí nach raibh meaitseáilte i rith phróiseas an tsioncronaithe ó Teams. Más mian leat cuireadh a thabhairt d’aon teagmhálaí atá ar do ghléas, Outlook, nó Skype chun dul isteach i gcomhrá, is féidir leat cuireadh a thabhairt d’úsáideoirí chuig 1:1 go díreach, nó is féidir le Microsoft cuireadh a thabhairt ar do shon trí SMS nó tríd an ríomhphost le haghaidh cuirí chuig comhráite grúpa. Is féidir leat bac a chur ar úsáideoirí mura bhfuil tú ag iarraidh cumarsáid a fháil uathu; anuas air sin, is féidir leat ábhar imní a thuairisciú chuig Microsoft.
Fógra do theamghálaithe nach úsáideoirí iad.
Má thaispeántar d’fhaisnéis i leabhair seoltaí an ghléis, Outlook, nó Skype de chuid úsáideoir Teams a roghnaíonn na teagmhálaithe atá acu ar an ngléas, Outlook, nó Skype a shioncronú lena dteagmhálaithe Teams, d’fhéadfadh Microsoft d’fhaisnéis a phróiseáil lena sheiceáil más úsáideoir Teams reatha thú agus chun ligean d’úsáideoirí Teams cuireadh a thabhairt duit chuig an tseirbhís, lena n-áirítear trí SMS agus ar ríomhphost. Fad is atá an t-úsáideoir Teams gníomhach ar Teams ar an ngléas agus fad is atá sioncrónú teagmhálaithe leis an ngléas nó seirbhís infheidhme cumasaithe ag an úsáideoir, stórálfar do chuid faisnéise ar ár bhfreastalaithe agus próiseálfaimid do chuid faisnéise go tréimhsiúil mar chuid d’eispéireas sioncrónaithe úsáideoirí Teams chun seiceáil an bhfuil tú tar éis clárú le Teams idir an dá linn.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le conas a phróiseálaimid d’fhaisnéis i ndáil leis an ngné shioncronú teagmhálaithe a thairgtear d’úsáideoirí Teams
.
Má roghnaíonn tú clárú le Teams, taispeánfar thú mar theagmhálaí Teams molta nua d’aon úsáideoir de chuid Teams nó Skype a bhfuil d’fhaisnéis stóráilte ina leabhar seoltaí ar ghléas, Outlook nó Skype. Mar úsáideoir Teams, beidh tú in ann bac a chur ar úsáideoirí Teams eile mura bhfuil fonn ort cumarsáid a fháil uathu. Lena chois sin, is féidir leat ábhar imní a thuairisciú chuig Microsoft.
Teagmhálaithe tríú páirtí.
Is féidir rogha a dhéanamh chun teagmhálaithe ó sholáthraithe tríú páirtí a shioncronú freisin. Má roghnaíonn tú do theagmhálaithe tríú páirtí ar Teams a dhíshioncronú, scriosfar teagmhálaithe tríú páirtí go léir ó Teams. Má thug tú cead duit úsáid a bhaint as na teagmhálaithe tríú páirtí sin i bhfeidhmchláir agus seirbhísí eile de chuid Microsoft, beidh na teagmhálaithe sin fós ar fáil do na feidhmchláir agus seirbhísí Microsoft sin.
Is féidir teagmhálaithe tríú páirtí a bhaint ó gach feidhmchlár agus seirbhís De chuid Microsoft trí chuntais tríú páirtí a bhaint de Teams. Tabhair faoi deara go mb'fhéidir go mbeidh tionchar ag baint cuntais tríú páirtí ó Teams ar d'eispéiris ar fheidhmchláir agus seirbhísí de chuid Microsoft a úsáideann an cuntas tríú páirtí sin freisin.
Féilire Teams.
Is féidir rogha a dhéanamh freisin d'fhéilire Teams a shioncronú le féilirí ó sholáthraithe tríú páirtí. Is féidir leat stopadh de do fhéilire Teams a shioncronú am ar bith ach cuntas tríú páirtí a bhaint ó Teams. Má thoiligh tú sonraí tríú páirtí a úsáid ar fheidhmchláir agus seirbhísí eile Microsoft, tabhair faoi deara go mb'fhéidir go mbeidh tionchar ag baint sonraí cuntais tríú páirtí i Teams ar d'eispéiris ar fheidhmchláir agus ar sheirbhísí eile Microsoft.
Comhroinnt suímh
. Is féidir leat do shuíomh statach nó do shuíomh beo a chomhroinnt le daoine aonair nó le grúpaí i Teams. Tusa atá i gceannas agus is féidir leat stad den chomhroinnt uair ar bith. Is féidir suíomh páistí a chomhroinnt le toiliú tuismitheoireachta nó i ngrúpaí ina bhfuil duine fásta ón ngrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft.
Brúfhógraí
. Chun glaonna, comhráite agus teachtaireachtaí eile isteach a chur in iúl duit, úsáideann Teams an tseirbhís fógraí ar do ghléas. I gcás mórchuid gléasanna, is cuideachta eile a sholáthraíonn na seirbhísí sin. Chun an té atá ag glaoch ort a chur in iúl duit, mar shampla, nó na chéad chúpla focal de chomhrá nua a thabhairt duit, ní mór do Teams é a insint don tseirbhís fógraí ionas gur féidir an fógra a sholáthar duit. Úsáidfidh an chuideachta a sholáthraíonn an tseirbhís fógraí ar do ghléas an fhaisnéis seo i gcomhréir lena téarmaí agus lena polasaí príobháideachais féin. Níl Microsoft freagrach as na sonraí a bhailíonn an chuideachta a sholáthraíonn an tseirbhís fógraí.
Mura dteastaíonn uait leas a bhaint as na seirbhísí fógra i gcás glaonna agus teachtaireachtaí isteach Teams, cas as é sna socruithe a gheofar ar do ghléas.
Comhráite agus cruinnithe le húsáideoirí deiridh custaiméirí Enterprise
. Tá a lán táirgí Microsoft atá beartaithe lena n-úsáid ag eagraíochtaí, amhail scoileanna agus gnóthais chomh maith le úsáideoirí aonair. Féach an rannán
táirgí Fiontair agus forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo má tá tú ag úsáid Teams le cuntas oibre nó scoile. Má théann tú i dteagmháil le Teams nó comhrá le úsáideoirí deiridh eagraíochta, d'fhéadfadh na sonraí athrú de réir pholasaithe na n-eagraíochtaí, más ann dóibh. Ba cheart duit aon ceist phríobháideach atá agat maidir le do shonraí roinnte i gcomhrá nó i gcruinnithe le úsáideoirí deiridh, aon iarratas maidir le do chearta chosaint sonraí, a chur ar riarthóir na heagraíochta. Níl Microsoft freagrach as cleachtais phríobháideachais nó shlándála ár gcustaiméirí, a d'fhéadfadh a bheith difriúil ó na cinn atá leagtha amach sa ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
OneDrive
Ceadaíonn OneDrive duit do chomhaid a stóráil agus a fheiceáil ar gach gléas, nach mór. Is féidir comhaid a chomhroinnt agus comhoibriú a dhéanamh orthu in éineacht le daoine eile. I leaganacha áirithe de OneDrive is féidir leat rochtain a fháil ar do OneDrive pearsanta trí shíniú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta agus ar do OneDrive for Business trí shíniú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft oibre nó scoile mar chuid den úsáid a bhaineann d'eagraíocht as Microsoft 365 nó Office 365.
Nuair a bhaineann tú úsáid as OneDrive, bailímid sonraí faoin úsáid a bhaineann tú as an tseirbhís, chomh maith leis an inneachar a stórálann tú, ionas gur féidir linn na seirbhísí a sholáthar, a fheabhsú, agus a chosaint. I measc na samplaí tá innéacs a dhéanamh d'inneachar do dhoiciméid OneDrive ionas gur féidir leat cuardach dóibh níos déanaí, agus úsáid a bhaint as faisnéis suímh le go mbeifeá ábalta cuardach a dhéanamh do ghrianghraif bunaithe ar an áit a glacadh an grianghraf. Bailímid eolas gléis chomh maith ionas gur féidir linn eispéiris phearsantaithe a sholáthar, ar nós cead a thabhairt duit inneachar a shioncronú trasna gléasanna agus na socruithe saincheaptha a thaiscéaladh.
Nuair a stórálann tú inneachar in OneDrive, gheobhaidh an t-inneachar sin na ceadúnais chomhroinnte atá ag an bhfillteán ina stórálann tú é. Mar shampla, má chuireann tú inneachar i bhfillteán poiblí, beidh an t-inneachar ar fáil go poiblí agus do dhuine ar bith ar an idirlíon ar féidir leo an fillteán sin a aimsiú. Má chuireann tú inneachar i bhfillteán príobháideach, beidh an t-inneachar príobháideach.
Nuair a chomhroinneann tú inneachar ar líonra sóisialta amhail Facebook nó ó ghléas atá sioncronaithe agat le do chuntas OneDrive, déanfar d'inneachar a uaslódáil chuig an líonra sóisialta sin nó déanfar nasc chuig an inneachar sin a phostáil ar an líonra sóisialta sin. Má dhéantar amhlaidh, beidh gach duine ar an líonra sóisialta sin in ann an t-inneachar a rochtain. Chun an t-inneachar a scriosadh, caithfidh tú é a scriosadh ón líonra sóisialta (má rinneadh é a uaslódáil chuige, seachas nasc) agus ó OneDrive.
Nuair atá inneachar ar OneDrive á chomhroinnt agat le cairde trí nasc, seoltar ríomhphost leis an nasc chuig na cairde sin. Bíonn sa nasc cód ceadúnúcháin a thugann cead do dhuine ar bith a bhfuil an nasc sin acu dul chuig d'inneachar. Má sheolann cara leat an nasc chuig daoine eile, beidh siad ábalta, leis, dul chuig d'inneachar, fiú mura mian leat é a chomhroinnt leo. Chun ceadanna rochtana a chúlghairm maidir le hinneachar atá agat ar OneDrive, sínigh isteach i do chuntas agus ansin roghnaigh an t-inneachar ar leith chun na leibhéil ceadanna rochtana a bhainistiú. Déantar nasc a dhíghníomhachtú nuair a aisghairtear an cead lena aghaidh. Ní bheidh duine ar bith in ann an nasc a úsáid chun rochtain a fháil ar an inneachar mura gcomhroinneann tú an nasc an athuair.
Ní stóráiltear comhaid atá faoin bhainistiú OneDrive for Business san áit chéanna le comhaid do OneDrive pearsanta. Bailíonn OneDrive for Business sonraí pearsanta agus comhroinneann sé iad ar mhaithe le fíordheimhniú, sonraí ar nós seoladh agus pasfhocal ríomhphoist, agus seoltar iad chuig Microsoft agus/nó chuig soláthraí do sheirbhís Microsoft 365 nó Office 365.
Siar go barr
Outlook
Tá táirgí Outlook deartha chun do tháirgiúlacht a fheabhsú trí chumarsáid níos fearr, agus áirítear iontu Outlook.com, feidhmchláir Outlook agus seirbhísí gaolmhara.
Outlook.com
. Is é Outlook.com an phríomhsheirbhís ríomhphoist ó Microsoft le haghaidh tomhaltóirí, agus áirítear air cuntais ríomhphoist le seoltaí a chríochnaíonn ar outlook.com, live.com, hotmail.com agus msn.com. Cuireann Outlook.com gnéithe ar fáil lena féidir leat nascadh le do chairde ar líonraí sóisialta. Ní mór duit cuntas Microsoft a chruthú chun Outlook.com a úsáid.
Nuair a scriosann tú ríomhphost nó mír eile ón mbosca ríomhphoist in Outlook.com, téann sé go hiondúil chuig d'fhillteán na míreanna scriosta, agus fanann sé ansin ar feadh 7 lá mura gcuireann tú ar ais é sa bhosca isteach, mura bhfolmhaíonn tú an fillteán, nó mura bhfolmhaíonn an tseirbhís an fillteán go huathoibríoch, in ord ar bith. Nuair a fholmhaíonn tú fillteán na Míreanna Scriosta, fanann na míreanna folmhaithe sin inár gcóras ar feadh suas le 30 lá sula scriostar iad go deo, ach amháin sa chás go bhfuil orainn na sonraí a choinneáil níos faide de réir an dlí.
Feidhmchláir Outlook
. Is bogearraí iad feidhmchláir chliaint Outlook a shuiteálann tú ar do ghléas agus a chuireann ar do chumas ríomhphoist, míreanna féilire, comhaid, teagmhálaithe agus sonraí eile a bhainistiú ó ríomhphost, stóras comhaid agus seirbhísí eile, ar nós Exchange Online nó Outlook.com nó freastalaithe ar nós Microsoft Exchange. Is féidir leat úsáid a bhaint as cuntais iomadúla ó sholáthraithe éagsúla, lena n-áirítear sholáthraithe tríú páirtí, le feidhmchláir Outlook,
lena n-áirítear an feidhmchlár Outlook for Windows nua
.
Chun cuntas a chur leis, ní mór duit cead a thabhairt d'Outlook sonraí a rochtain ó na seirbhísí stórais ríomhphoist nó comhad.
Nuair a chuireann tú cuntas le Outlook, sioncronófar do ríomhphost, míreanna féilire, comhaid, teagmhálaithe, socruithe agus sonraí eile ón gcuntas sin chuig do ghléas. Má tá an feidhmchlár móibíleach Outlook in úsáid agat, sioncronófar na sonraí chuig freastalaithe Microsoft chun gnéithe breise a chumasú, amhail cuardach níos tapúla, scagadh pearsantaithe ríomhphoist níos lú tábhachta, agus an cumas chun ceangaltáin ríomhphoist a chur leis ó sholáthraithe comhaid nasctha gan an feidhmchlár Outlook a fhágáil. Má tá tú ag úsáid feidhmchlár deisce Outlook, féadfaidh tú rogha a dhéanamh cibé acu an dtabharfaidh tú cead maidir le sioncronú na sonraí lenár bhfreastalaithe. Aon uair is mian leat, is féidir leat cuntas a bhaint nó athruithe a dhéanamh ar na sonraí atá sioncronaithe ó do chuntas.
Má chuireann tú cuntas leis ó eagraíocht (ar nós d'fhostóir nó scoil), féadfaidh úinéir fearann na heagraíochta polasaithe agus rialuithe a chur i bhfeidhm (mar shampla, fíordheimhniú ilfhachtóra a éileamh nó an cumas chun sonraí a ghlanadh ón ngléas go cianda) a chuireann isteach ar an úsáid a bhaineann tú as Outlook.
Cumais ghléis a úsáid
. Is féidir leis an úsáideoir ábhar ríomhphoist a dheachtaigh agus é a sheoladh trí úsáid a bhaint as an ngné Dictate, i dtaca le cliaint Outlook a dtacaíonn leis. D’fhéadfaí an ghné Dictate a chumraigh chun úsáid a bhaint as micreafón an ghléis nó aon mhicreafón eile ar féidir le húsáideoir é a nascadh lena ghléas, cosúil le péire cluaisíní micreafón-cumasaithe. D’fhéadfadh freisin go mbainfeadh Outlook úsáid as d’eolas shuíomh gléis chun faisnéis aimsire a thabhairt duit i dtaca le do shuíomh reatha chomh maith leis an gcumas a thabhairt duit suímh in aice láimhe a chuardach.
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir leis na sonraí a bhailíonn agus a phróiseálann feidhmchláir Outlook, féach an rannán
Microsoft 365
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
Skype
Cuireann Skype ar do chumas míreanna cumarsáide gutha, físeáin, SMS, agus teachtaireachtaí meandracha a sheoladh agus a fháil. Baineann an rannán seo leis an leagan Skype do thomhaltóirí; má úsáideann tú Skype for Business, féach an rannán
táirgí Fiontair agus forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Mar chuid de na gnéithe sin a sholáthar, bailíonn Microsoft sonraí úsáide maidir le do mhíreanna cumarsáide lena n-áirítear am agus dáta na cumarsáide agus na huimhreacha nó na hainmneacha úsáideora atá mar chuid den mhír chumarsáide.
Comhoiriúnacht le Teams.
Mar úsáideoir Skype, is féidir leat logáil isteach in Teams le do chuntas Skype. Má logálann tú isteach in Teams le do chuid faisnéise aitheantais ó Skype, is féidir leat Teams a úsáid chun comhrá a dhéanamh le húsáideoirí eile de chuid Skype agus Teams agus glaoch orthu, agus is féidir leat rochtain a fháil ar ghlaonna caillte agus do stair chomhrá in Skype trí Teams. Beidh úsáideoirí Teams in ann teagmháil a dhéanamh leat ar Skype agus do stádas láithreachta ar Skype a fheiceáil. Gheobhaidh tú tuilleadh faisnéise faoi Teams sa
rannán Microsoft Teams
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Ag aimsiú teagmhálaithe Teams agus Skype.
Áirítear i do phróifíl Skype faisnéis a chuir tú ar fáil agus tú ag cumrú cuntas Microsoft nó Skype. Chun cur ar chumas daoine eile tú a aimsiú ar Skype (nó ar tháirgí a bhíonn ag idirghníomhú le Skype, ar nós Skype for Business nó Microsoft Teams), tá do phróifíl Skype san áireamh in eolairí cuardaigh poiblí Skype agus Teams agus d'fhéadfadh sé a bheith le feiceáil ar Skype agus Teams araon. Ag brath ar do chuid socruithe próifíle, is féidir le húsáideoirí Skype agus Teams thú a aimsiú le d'ainm, seoladh ríomhphoist agus / nó uimhir theileafóin. Áirítear i do phróifíl d’ainm úsáideora, abhatár, agus aon sonraí eile is mian leat a chur le do phróifíl nó a thaispeáint do dhaoine eile.
Glaoch éigeandála sna Stáit Aontaithe.
Má chumasaíonn tú comhroinnt suímh le haghaidh glaonna éigeandála, baileofar do shuíomh go tréimhsiúil chun Microsoft a chumasú do shuíomh a chomhroinnt le soláthraí seirbhíse do ghlaonna éigeandála má dhiailíonn tú 911. Ní chomhroinntear d’fhaisnéis suímh ach amháin má chumasaíonn tú comhroinnt suímh le haghaidh glaonna éigeandála, agus cuireann tú glao 911.
Teagmhálaithe Skype.
Má úsáideann Outlook.com chun teagmhálaithe a bhainistiú, cuirfidh Skype na daoine ar a bhfuil aithne agat le do liosta teagmhálaithe Skype go huathoibríoch go dtí go n-iarrfaidh tú ar an bhfeidhmchlár stopadh. Le do chead, sioncronóidh Skype na teagmhálaithe atá ar do ghléas go tréimhsiúil agus déanfar seic le haghaidh úsáideoirí Skype eile a mheaitseálann teagmhálaithe ar leabhair seoltaí de chuid do ghléis nó Outlook. Tusa atá i gceannas i gcónaí ar do theagmhálaithe agus is féidir leat stop a chur leis an sioncronú uair ar bith. Is féidir leat bac a chur ar úsáideoirí mura bhfuil tú ag iarraidh cumarsáid a fháil uathu. Má roghnaíonn tú sioncronú na dteagmhálaithe atá ar do ghléas a stopadh, nó má tá tú neamhghníomhach ar do ghléas, scriosfar aon teagmhálaí nach raibh meaitseáilte i rith phróiseas an tsioncronaithe ó Skype. Más mian leat cuireadh a thabhairt d’aon teagmhálaí atá ar do ghléas nó Outlook chun dul isteach i gcomhrá, is féidir leat cuireadh a thabhairt d’úsáideoirí chuig 1:1 go díreach, nó is féidir le Microsoft cuireadh a thabhairt ar do shon trí SMS nó tríd an ríomhphost le haghaidh cuirí chuig comhráite grúpa. Is féidir leat bac a chur ar úsáideoirí mura bhfuil tú ag iarraidh cumarsáid a fháil uathu; anuas air sin, is féidir leat ábhar imní a thuairisciú chuig Microsoft.
Fógra do theagmhálaithe nach úsáideoirí iad.
Má thaispeántar d’fhaisnéis i leabhar seoltaí atá ar ghléas nó Outlook de chuid úsáideoir Skype a roghnaíonn a dteagmhálaithe atá ar an ngléas nó Outlook a shioncronú lena dteagmhálaithe Skype, d’fhéadfadh Microsoft d’fhaisnéis a phróiseáil chun seiceáil más úsáideoir Skype thú agus chun ligean d’úsáideoirí Skype cuireadh a thabhairt duit chuig an seirbhís, lena n-áirítear trí SMS agus tríd an ríomhphost. Fad is a leanann an t-úsáideoir Skype ar aghaidh a bheith gníomhach ar Skype ar a ghléas nó ar a gléas agus fad is a leanann an t-úsáideoir ar aghaidh ag cumasú sioncronú teagmhálaithe, stórálfar d’fhaisnéis ar ár bhfreastalaithe agus próiseálfaimid d’fhaisnéis go tréimhsiúil mar chuid d’eispéireas sioncronaithe an úsáideoir Skype chun seiceáil má tá tú tar éis clárú le Skype idir an dá linn.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le conas a phróiseálaimid d’fhaisnéis i ndáil leis an ngné shioncronú teagmhálaithe a thairgtear d’úsáideoirí Skype
.
Má roghnaíonn tú clárú le Skype, taispeánfar thú mar theagmhálaí Skype molta nua d’aon úsáideoir de chuid Teams agus Skype a bhfuil d’fhaisnéis stóráilte ina leabhar seoltaí ar ghléas nó Outlook. Mar úsáideoir Skype, beidh tú in ann bac a chur ar úsáideoirí eile de chuid Skype agus Teams mura bhfuil fonn ort cumarsáid a fháil uathu. Lena chois sin, is féidir leat ábhar imní a thuairisciú chuig Microsoft.
Cuideachtaí comhpháirtíochta
. Chun Skype a chur ar fáil do níos mó daoine, téimid i gcomhpháirtíocht le cuideachtaí eile chun gur féidir Skype a thairiscint trí sheirbhísí na gcuideachtaí sin. Má úsáideann tú Skype trí chuideachta nach Microsoft í, rialaíonn beartas príobháideachta na cuideachta sin an tslí a láimhseáiltear na sonraí. Chun an dlí is infheidhme a chomhlíonadh nó freagairt do phróiseas bailí dlí, nó chun cabhrú lenár gcuideachta comhpháirtíochta nó oibreoir áitiúil an dlí a chomhlíonadh nó freagairt a thabhairt, is féidir go ndéanfaimid do shonraí a rochtain, a aistriú a nochtadh, nó a chaomhnú. D'fhéadfadh d'inneachar príobháideach, mar shampla, ar nós a bhfuil i do theachtaireachtaí meandracha, teachtaireachtaí físeáin stóráilte, glórphost, nó aistrithe comhad a bheith san áireamh ansin.
Bainisteoir Skype
. Le Skype Manager is féidir leat úsáid Skype grúpa (úsáid do theaghlaigh, mar shampla) a bhainistiú ó áit lárnach amháin. Nuair a chumraíonn tú grúpa, tusa a bheidh mar Riarthóir Bainisteoir Skype agus feicfidh tú pátrúin úsáide, lena n-áirítear faisnéis mhionsonraithe, cosúil le sonraí tráchta agus sonraí ceannachán, maidir le baill eile den ghrúpa a bhfuil an rochtain sin ceadaithe acu. Má chuireann tú faisnéis leis, amhail d'ainm, beidh daoine eile sa ghrúpa in ann é a fheiceáil. Is féidir le baill den ghrúpa toiliú a aistarraingt ó Bhainisteoir Skype ach cuairt a thabhairt ar a
leathanach cuntais Skype
.
Brúfhógraí
. Chun glaonna, comhráite, agus teachtaireachtaí eile isteach a chur in iúl duit, úsáideann feidhmchláir Skype an tseirbhís fógra ar do ghléas. I gcás mórchuid gléasanna, is cuideachta eile a sholáthraíonn na seirbhísí seo. Chun an té atá ag glaoch ort a chur in iúl duit, mar shampla, nó na chéad chúpla focal de chomhrá nua a thabhairt duit, ní mór do Skype é a insint don tseirbhís fógra ionas gur féidir leo an fógra a sholáthar duit. Úsáidfidh an chuideachta a sholáthraíonn an tseirbhís fógra ar do ghléas an fhaisnéis seo de réir a dtéarmaí agus a bpolasaí príobháideachais féin. Níl Microsoft freagrach as na sonraí a bhailíonn an chuideachta a sholáthraíonn an tseirbhís fógraí. Mura dteastaíonn uait leas a bhaint as na seirbhísí fógra i gcás glaonna agus teachtaireachtaí isteach Skype, cas as é sna socruithe a gheofar i bhfeidhmchlár Skype ar do ghléas.
Gnéithe aistriúcháin
. Nuair a úsáideann tú gnéithe aistriúcháin Skype, bailíonn agus úsáideann Skype do chomhrá chun an tseirbhís aistriúcháin a chur ar fáil. Le cead uait, d’fhéadfadh go n-úsáidfí do shonraí chun cabhrú le táirgí agus le seirbhísí Microsoft a fheabhsú. Chun cabhrú leis an teicneolaíocht aitheanta cainte foghlaim agus feabhsú, déantar anailís ar abairtí agus ar thras-scríbhinní uathoibríocha agus cuirtear na ceartúcháin, más ann dóibh, isteach inár gcóras. Cuireann sé sin le feidhmíocht seirbhísí níos fearr. D’fhéadfadh trascríobh láimhe de do ghearrthóga gutha a bheith san áireamh sna sonraí seo. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoin gcaoi a ndéanann Microsoft bainistíocht ar do shonraí gutha, féach
teicneolaíochtaí Aithint cainte
.
Gnéithe taifeadta
. Tá gné thaifeadta i leaganacha áirithe de Skype trínar féidir leat cuid de do ghlao fuaime / físe, nó é go léir, a chomhroinnt. Déanfar an taifeadadh a stóráil agus a chomhroinnt mar chuid de stair do chomhráite leis an duine nó grúpa a bhí ar an nglao leat.
Ba chóir duit do fhreagrachtaí dlíthiúla a thuiscint sula ndéanann tú aon chumarsáid a thaifeadadh. D’fhéadfadh go n-áireofaí air seo toiliú roimh ré a fháil ó gach duine a ghlacann páirt sa chomhrá nó aon údaruithe eile de réir mar is gá.
Níl Microsoft freagrach as an úsáid a bhaineann tú as do thaifeadtaí nó gnéithe an taifeadta.
Róbait Skype
. Is ríomhchláir iad róbait a thairgeann Microsoft nó tríú páirtithe lenar féidir a lán nithe úsáideacha a dhéanamh, amhail cuardach do nuacht, cluichí a imirt, agus mórán eile. Ag brath ar a gcumais, féadfaidh rochtain a bheith ag róbait ar d'ainm taispeána, do ID Skype, do thír, do réigiún, do theanga, agus aon teachtaireachtaí, fuaime nó físe, nó aon inneachar a chomhroinneann tú leis an róbat. Déan athbhreithniú ar phróifíl an róbait agus ar a ráiteas príobháideachais sula dtosaíonn tú comhrá aon le haon nó comhrá grúpa le róbat. Féadfaidh tú róbat a scriosadh mura dteastaíonn uait teagmháil a dhéanamh leis a thuilleadh. Sula gcuireann tú róbat le grúpa, deimhnigh go bhfuil rannpháirtithe an ghrúpa toilteanach a gcuid sonraí a chomhroinnt leis an róbat.
Fotheidealú
. Áirítear i ngnéithe áirithe Skype feidhmiúlacht inrochtaineachta cosúil le fotheidealú. I rith ghlaonna Skype, féadfaidh rannpháirtí glao gné gutha go téacs a ghníomhachtú, a cheadaíonn don úsáideoir amharc ar an gcomhrá fuaime mar théacs. Má ghníomhachtaíonn úsáideoir an ghné seo, ní bhfaighidh rannpháirtithe eile glao fógra. Úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí seo gutha agus téacs chun fotheidealú fuaime a sholáthar d'úsáideoirí.
Gnéithe an Cheamara
. Nuair a úsáideann tú an ghné ceamara i SwiftKey, is féidir leat rogha a dhéanamh d’fhíseáin agus d’íomhánna a fheabhsú le seirbhísí lionsaí tríú páirtí. Is gné é Lionsa a úsáideann Réaltacht Mhéadaithe (RA) chun do fhéiníní a athrú ar bhealach spraíúil, mar shampla cuma a chur ort mar an t-ainmhí is fearr leat. Ag baint úsáide as an gceamara i Skype, is féidir leat an ghné lionsa atá corpraithe sa Skype a roghnú chun d'aghaidh agus do lámha a athrú. Ag brath ar an lionsa a roghnaíonn tú, is féidir d'fhíseáin agus d'íomhánna a phróiseáil chun faisnéis a bhaint amach faoi shuíomh áiteanna éagsúla ar d'aghaidh agus ar do lámha. Úsáidtear na sonraí asbhainte chun éifeachtaí RA a chur i bhfeidhm ar d’aghaidh agus ar do lámha amháin. Ní úsáidtear aon cheann de na sonraí seo chun tú a aithint go pearsanta. Déantar na sonraí seo a phróiseáil ar feadh an tseisiúin ar do ghléas amháin, agus ansin scriostar láithreach iad. Ní sheoltar na sonraí seo chuig Skype nó chuig aon tríú páirtí.
Siar go barr
Surface
Cuireann Microsoft a réimse gléasanna agus giuirléidí Surface ar fáil chun eispéireas ríomhaireachta den scoth a sholáthar, lena n-áirítear an gréasán a scimeáil, ag féachaint ar fhíseáin agus ag sruthú físeáin, ag imirt cluichí, ag rith feidhmchláir ar nós Excel, Word agus OneNote, agus tuilleadh. Áirítear leis seo gléasanna agus giuirléidí ar nós Surface Laptops, Surface Studios, Surface Book, Surface Pro, Surface Headphones, Surface Earbuds, Surface Dock, Surface Keyboard, agus tuilleadh. Mar chuid den eispéireas sin, bailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóiseach áirithe, mar a dhéantar cur síos air thíos.
Sonraí diagnóiseacha
. Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóiseach agus tú ag baint úsáid as do ghléasanna Surface, giuirléidí Surface, agus feidhmchláir Surface. Is féidir go n-áirítear le sonraí diagnóiseach faisnéis faoi thuairteáil, fheidhmíocht, agus úsáid táirgí Surface. Baintear úsáid as na sonraí a sheoltar chuig Microsoft chun Surface a choinneáil slán, cothrom le dáta agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifeá ag súil leis agus is féidir leis cabhrú linn feabhsuithe eile a dhéanamh do Surface.
Tá dhá leibhéal de shonraí diagnóiseacha agus gníomhaíochta ann: Sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha agus roghnacha.
Is í
sonraí riachtanacha diagnóiseacha
é an t-íosmhéid sonraí atá uainn chun cabhrú le gléasanna Surface, giuirléidí Surface, agus an feidhmchlár Surface a choinneáil slán, cothrom le dáta, agus ag feidhmiú mar a bheifeá ag súil leis.
Is iad
sonraí roghnacha diagnóiseacha
sonraí diagnóiseacha agus úsáide sa bhreis faoi do ghléasanna Surface, giuirléidí Surface, agus an feidhmchlár Surface. Má roghnaíonn tú sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnach a sheoladh chuig Microsoft, cuimsítear sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanach freisin.
Seoltar sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanach chuig Microsoft i gcónaí le haghaidh gach gléas Surface, agus an feidhmchlár Surface. Ach is féidir leat a roghnú cé acu an ligtear cead do Surface sonraí diagnóiseacha a bhailiú agus é a sheoladh chuig Microsoft. Is féidir leat an rogha sin a dhéanamh agus tú ag socrú do ghléas Surface den chéad uair nó an socrú a athrú ag am ar bith sa bhfeidhmchlár Surface.
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil, féach
Sonraí diagnóiseacha le haghaidh táirgí Surface
agus
sonraí Diagnóiseacha san fheidhmchlár Surface
. Chun liosta de na sonraí diagnóiseacha Surface a bailíodh a fháil, féach
Sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha le haghaidh táirgí Surface
.
Siar go barr
Surface Duo
Gléas póca is ea an Surface Duo a bhfuil dhá scáileán air ar mhaithe le táirgiúlacht agus tú gníomhach. Is é córas oibriúcháin Android Google a dhéanann é a chumhachtú, tacaíonn Surface Do le nascacht cheallach agus Wi-Fi agus is féidir é a úsáid faoi choinne seirbhísí ríomhphoist, brabhsáil ar an idirlíon, cluichí a imirt, agus ar mhaithe le nascacht ghnó.
Tugann Microsoft eispéireas in Surface a bhíonn ag feidhmiú ar chóras oibriúcháin Android. Mar chuid d’eispéireas Surface Duo tá aipeanna ar nós Microsoft Launcher, Setup Wizard, agus Do Chompánach Fóin. Is féidir leat ID Google a úsáid le síniú isteach agus seirbhísí áirithe Google a chumasú; ansin, is féidir leat an cuntas Microsoft atá agat a úsáid le síniú isteach agus seirbhísí Microsoft a chumasú. Seans go mbeidh aipeanna agus seirbhísí Microsoft ag brath ar fhaisnéis atá curtha ar fáil ag Google. Éilíonn gnéithe áirithe, ‘suíomh’ mar shampla, go ndéanfaidh tú an fheidhmíocht sin a chumasú le haghaidh Google, agus ina dhiaidh sin cead a thabhairt do Microsoft an fhaisnéis sin a threisiú.
Sonraí diagnóiseacha
. Bailíonn Surface Duo sonraí diagnóisice chun fadhbanna a réiteach agus d’fhonn go mbeidh eispéireas lárnach Surface Duo úr slán, agus é ag feidhmiú i gceart. Cuidíonn na sonraí seo linn feabhas a chur ar Surface agus ar tháirgí agus seirbhísí gaolmhara Microsoft. Ar na sonraí sin, ní áirítear d’ainm úsáideora, do sheoladh ríomhphoist, ná ábhar do chomhad. Tá dhá leibhéal do shonraí diagnóiseacha: Sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha agus roghnacha.
Riachtanach
. An líon is lú sonraí a bhfuil gá leo chun eispéireas lárnach Surface Duo a choinneáil slán úr, agus é ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis.
Roghnach
. Sonraí breise a chuidíonn linn feabhsúcháin táirge a dhéanamh agus a thugann eolas breisithe dúinn mar chun cuidiú le Microsoft fadhbanna a bhrath, a dhiagnóisiú agus a chur ina gceart.
Tuilleadh faisnéise i Socruithe Príobháideachais Surface Duo
.
Socruithe suímh Surface Duo
. Bíonn Surface Duo ag brath ar sheirbhísí suímh Google chun suíomh beacht geografach an ghléis a fháil amach d’fhonn aimsir na háite a thaispeáint. Is féidir suíomh do Surface Duo a fháil amach go céimeanna éagsúla cruinnis agus in amanna is féidir é a shocrú go cruinn beacht. Más mian leat go mbeidh aipeanna Microsoft ábalta tagairt a dhéanamh don aimsir nó d’eolas eile a bhaineann leis an áit, nó an aimsir nó an t-eolas sin a thaispeáint, caithfidh tú seirbhísí suímh Google chomh maith le rochtain suímh Microsoft a chumasú. Seans go mbeidh ort na socruithe seo a chumasú arís eile in aipeanna áirithe don aip sin agus is féidir iad a shocrú nó a athrú i Socruithe Surface Duo. Tugann
Polasaí Príobháideachais Google
mionsonraí maidir le seirbhís suímh Google agus cleachtais ghaolmhara a bhaineann le príobháideachas sonraí. Féach
Socruithe Suímh Surface Duo
le haghaidh tuilleadh eolais.
Feidhmchláir Microsoft atá mar chuid de Surface Duo
. Tá roghanna na sonraí diagnóisice d’eispéireas lárnach Surface Duo cumraithe duit nuair a dhéanann tú an Surface Duo a chumrú ar dtús, agus is féidir iad a athrú i Socruithe an Surface Duo sa rannán a bhaineann le Sonraí Diagnóisice.
Seans go n-iarrfaidh aipeanna eile de chuid Microsoft ar an Surface Duo ort an fheidhmíocht a chumasú ionas gur féidir leat leas a bhaint as eispéireas iomlán na haipe, nó seans go n-iarrfar ort bailiúchán roghnach sonraí diagnóisice a cheadú. Is féidir leat na socruithe do na haipeanna seo a athrú i Socruithe an Surface Duo faoi ainm na haipe. Tá faisnéis bhreise maidir leis na feidhmchláir seo ar fáil sna rannáin
táirgí Táirgiúlachta agus cumarsáide
agus
Cuardaigh agus Brabhsála
den Ráiteas Príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
LinkedIn
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi na sonraí a bhailíonn LinkedIn agus an chaoi a úsáidtear agus a chomhroinntear iad, féach ar
Pholasaí Príobháideachais
de chuid LinkedIn.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Cuardaigh agus brabhsáil
Cruthaíonn táirgí cuardaigh agus intleachta saorga nasc idir tusa agus an fhaisnéis agus déanann siad faisnéis a bhrath agus a phróiseáil, agus gníomhaíonn siad ina leith go cliste—ag foghlaim agus ag athrú le himeacht ama. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le hintleacht shaorga agus cumais Copilot i dtáirgí cuardaigh Microsoft, féach ar an rannán
cumais Intleachta Saorga agus Microsoft Copilot
thuas.
Cruthaíonn táirgí cuardaigh agus intleachta saorga nasc idir tusa agus an fhaisnéis agus déanann siad faisnéis a bhrath agus a phróiseáil, agus gníomhaíonn siad ina leith go cliste—ag foghlaim agus ag athrú le himeacht ama. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil maidir le hintleacht shaorga agus cumais Copilot i dtáirgí cuardaigh Microsoft, féach ar an rannán
cumais Intleachta Saorga agus Microsoft Copilot
thuas.
Bing
Áirítear le seirbhísí Bing seirbhísí cuardaigh agus mapála, chomh maith le feidhmchláir agus cláir eile a gcuirtear síos orthu sa chuid seo. Déantar sonraí a bhailiú agus a phróiseáil i mórán foirmeacha le seirbhísí Bing, lena n-áirítear téacs dúchaithe nó clóscríofa, sonraí urlabhra, agus íomhánna. Áirítear seirbhísí Bing ar sheirbhísí eile de chuid Microsoft chomh maith, amhail feidhmchláir Microsoft 365, Cortana, agus gnéithe áirithe in Windows (a dtagraímid dóibh mar eispéiris arna gcumhachtú ag Bing).
Nuair a dhéanann tú cuardach, nó nuair a úsáideann tú eispéireas arna chumhachtú ag Bing ina gcaithfear cuardach a dhéanamh nó ordú a iontráil ar do shon, baileoidh Microsoft na téarmaí cuardaigh nó na horduithe a sholáthraíonn tú, (ar féidir leo a bheith i bhfoirm téacs, sonraí gutha, nó íomhá), mar aon le do sheoladh IP, do shuíomh, na haitheantóirí uathúla a gheofar inár gcuacha agus i dteicneolaíochtaí comhchosúla, am agus dáta do chuardaigh agus cumraíocht do bhrabhsálaí. Mar shampla, má úsáideann tú seirbhísí guth-chumasaithe Bing, seolfar d'ionchur gutha agus do shonraí feidhmíochta a ghabhann leis an bhfeidhmiúlacht ghutha chuig Microsoft. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoin gcaoi a ndéanann Microsoft bainistíocht ar do shonraí gutha, féach
teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte
. Agus, má úsáideann tú seirbhísí íomhá-chumasaithe Bing, seolfar an íomhá a sholáthraíonn tú chuig Microsoft. Nuair a úsáideann tú eispéireas arna chumhachtú ag Bing, amhail Bing Lookup, chun focal nó abairt ar leith a chuardach laistigh de leathanach Gréasáin nó doiciméad, seoltar an focal nó an abairt sin chuig Bing mar aon le roinnt inneachair mórthimpeall air/uirthi ionas gur féidir torthaí cuardaigh atá ábhartha maidir le comhthéacs a chur ar fáil.
Cuardach Bing feabhsaithe ag AI
. Cuimsíonn cuardach Bing feidhmiúlacht cuardaigh gréasáin feabhsaithe IS, ag úsáid Microsoft Copilot, a thacaíonn le húsáideoirí trí thorthaí cuardaigh ábhartha a sholáthar, athbhreithniú agus achoimre a dhéanamh ar fud an ghréasáin, ceisteanna taighde a scagadh tríd an taithí comhrá agus cruthaitheacht a spreagadh trí chuidiú le húsáideoirí inneachar a chruthú. Tá úsáid agus bailiú sonraí pearsanta Copilot in Bing i gcomhréir le chéile le príomh-thairiscint chuardaigh gréasáin Bing mar a thuairiscítear sa chuid seo. Tá tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le Copilot in Bing ar fáil ag
Copilot in Bing: Ár gcur chuige maidir le AI Freagrach
.
Moltaí cuardaigh
. I gcás ghné na moltaí cuardaigh, seolfar chuig Microsoft na carachtair a chlóscríobhann tú isteach in eispéireas Bing-chumhachtaithe (ar nós moltaí cuardaigh agus láithreáin i mbrabhsálaí Microsoft Edge) chun cuardach a dhéanamh agus na rudaí a gcliceálann tú orthu. Sa chaoi sin, is féidir linn moltaí ábhartha a thabhairt duit agus ag clóscríobh do chuardaigh. Chun an ghné seo a chasadh air nó as agus Cuardach Bing in úsáid agat, téigh chuig
Socruithe Bing
. Tá modhanna eile chun an ghné seo in eispéiris Bing-chumhachtaithe eile a rialú, mar shampla i mbrabhsálaí Microsoft Edge. Ní féidir Moltaí Cuardaigh a chasadh as i mbosca cuardaigh Windows 10 agus Windows 11. Má roghnaíonn tú, is féidir an bosca cuardaigh nó an deilbhín ar an tascbharra a chealú i gcónaí.
Clár um fheabhsú eispéireas Bing le haghaidh Deasc Bing agus Barra Uirlisí Bing
. Má bhíonn Deasc Bing nó Barra Uirlisí Bing á úsáid agat agus má roghnaíonn tú le bheith rannpháirteach sa Chlár um Fheabhsú Eispéireas Bing, bailímid freisin sonraí bhreise faoi conas a úsáideann tú na sainfheidhmchláir Bing seo, ar nós na seoltaí agus suíomhanna atá feicthe agat, chun ábharthacht agus rangú a fheabhsú duit. Le do phriobháideacht a chosaint, ní bhaintear úsáid as na sonraí a bhailítear tríd an Ríomhchlár um Fheabhsú Eispéireas Bing chun tú a shainaithint nó chun teagmháil a dhéanamh leat, nó chun fógraíocht a dhíriú ort. Is féidir leat an Clár um Fheabhsú Eispéireas Bing a dhíchumasú am ar bith i Socruithe Deasc Bing nó Barra Uirlisí Bing. Ar deireadh, scriostar an fhaisnéis a bhailiodh tríd an gClár Fheabhsú Chleachtadh Bing tar éis 18 mí.
Coimeád agus dí-aithint
. Déanfaimid ceisteanna cuardaigh stóráilte a dhí-aithint tríd an seoladh IP ina iomláine a bhaint tar éis 6 mhí, agus aitheantóirí fianáin agus aitheantóirí tras-seisiúin eile, a úsáidtear chun cuntas nó gléas ar leith a aithint, a bhaint tar éis 18 mí.
Pearsantú tríd an gcuntas Microsoft
. Tugann seirbhísí Bing áirithe eispéireas níos fearr duit nuair a shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta, mar shampla, do stair chuardaigh a shioncronú idir gléasanna. Is féidir leat na gnéithe pearsantaithe sin a úsáid chun d'ábhair spéise, ceanáin, agus socruithe a shaincheapadh, agus chun do chuntas a cheangal le seirbhísí tríú páirtí. Téigh chuig
Socruithe Bing
chun do shocruithe pearsantaithe a bhainistiú, nó oscail
Painéal Príobháideachta Microsoft
chun do chuid sonraí a bhainistiú.
Stair na gcuardach a bhainistiú
. Agus tú sínithe isteach ar cuntas Microsoft pearsanta, is féidir leat do stair chuardaigh agus comhrá ar an
bpainéal painéal Príobháideachta Microsoft
a scriosadh. Tugann an tseirbhís Stair na gCuardach ó Bing, atá le fáil i Socruithe Bing, bealach eile duit chun amharc arís ar na téarmaí cuardaigh a chuir tú isteach cheana agus ar na torthaí a ndearna tú cliceáil orthu nuair a bhain tú úsáid as cuardach Bing i do bhrabhsálaí. Is féidir leat an stair chuardaigh ar ghléas a ghlanadh tríd an tseirbhís sin. Cuimhnítear freisin ar na comhráite a bhíonn agat le Microsoft Copilot in Bing mar “Gníomhaíocht le déanaí”. Sábháiltear stair gníomhaíochtaí le déanaí, agus ainmneacha na gcomhráite bunaithe de réir réamhshocraithe ar an gcéad cheist den chomhrá. Taispeántar do ghníomhaíocht le déanaí ar thaobh na láimhe deise den fhuinneog comhrá agus tú ag úsáid na seirbhíse. Má dhéantar do stair a ghlanadh, ní féidir an stair sin a thaispeáint i do Stair Chuardaigh nó i do stair chomhrá, ach ní scriostar faisnéis ónár logaí cuardaigh. Coinnítear na logaí sin agus baintear an fhaisnéis phearsanta díobh de réir mar atá sonraithe thuas nó de réir mar a d'ordaigh tú tríd an bpainéal príobháideachta. Má tá tú sínithe isteach i gcuntas oibre nó scoile Microsoft a úsáideann Cuardach Microsoft in Bing, is féidir leat stair do chuardaigh Chuardach Microsoft in Bing a easpórtáil ach ní féidir leat í a scrios. Is féidir le do riarthóir seirbhíse Chuardach Microsoft in Bing stair chomhbhailithe cuardaigh a fheiceáil sna húsáideoirí fiontair uile ach ní bhíonn cuardach aonair a dhéanann úsáideoir le feiceáil.
Seirbhísí tríú páirtí a úsáideann Bing
. Bíonn rochtain agat ar eispéiris arna gcumhachtú ag Bing nuair atá seirbhísí tríú páirtí in úsáid agat, ar nós Yahoo!. Chun na seirbhísí sin a chur ar fáil, faigheann Bing sonraí ó na comhpháirtithe sin agus ó chomhpháirtithe eile, lena n-áirítear do cheist chuardaigh agus na sonraí lena mbaineann (amhail dáta, am, seoladh IP agus aitheantóir uathúil). Seolfar na sonraí sin chuig Microsoft chun an tseirbhís chuardaigh a sholáthair. Úsáidfidh Microsoft na sonraí sin faoi mar a thuairiscítear sa ráiteas seo nó de réir coinníollacha eile dár n-oibleagáidí conarthacha lenár gcomhpháirtithe. Ba chóir duit féachaint ar pholasaithe príobháideachais na seirbhísí tríú páirtí má bhíonn aon cheisteanna agat maidir le bailiú agus úsáid sonraí.
Cuireadh na sonraí ar aghaidh chuig an spriocshuíomh gréasáin
. Nuair a roghnaíonn tú toradh cuardaigh nó fógra ó leathanach torthaí cuardaigh Bing agus nuair a théann tú chuig an spriocshuíomh gréasáin, gheobhaidh an spriocshuíomh gréasáin na gnáthshonraí a sheolann do bhrabhsálaí chuig gach suíomh gréasáin a n-osclaíonn tú — amhail do sheoladh IP, cineál do bhrabhsálaí agus do theanga, agus óstainm an tsuímh as ar tháinig tú (
https://www.bing.com/
sa chás seo).
Sonraí ó Bing, agus ó eispéiris arna gcumhachtú ag Bing, a chomhroinnt le tríú páirtithe
. Féadfaimid roinnt sonraí dí-aitheanta (sonraí nach bhfuil aitheantas duine sonrach ar eolas) ó Bing, agus ó eispéiris arna gcumhachtú ag Bing a chomhroinnt le tríú páirtithe roghnaithe. Sula ndéanaimid a leithéid, cuirimid na sonraí trí mhodh oibrithe arna dhearadh chun sonraí íogaire áirithe a bhaint, a d'fhéadfadh a bheith curtha san áireamh sna téarmaí cuardaigh ag na húsáideoirí féin (amhail uimhreacha slándála sóisialaí nó uimhreacha cárta creidmheasa). Sa bhreis air sin, éilímid ar na tríú páirtithe sin an fhaisnéis sin a choinneáil slán agus gan na sonraí a úsáid chun aon chríche eile.
Siar go barr
Microsoft Edge
Cibé uair a úsáideann tú brabhsálaí Gréasáin chun an t-Idirlíon a rochtain, seoltar sonraí maidir le do ghléas ("sonraí caighdeánacha gléis") chuig na suíomhanna Gréasáin a osclaíonn tú agus na seirbhísí ar líne a úsáideann tú. Áirítear ar shonraí caighdeánacha gléis seoladh IP do ghléis, cineál agus teanga an bhrabhsálaí, amanna rochtana, agus seoltaí gréasáin tarchuir. D'fhéadfaí na sonraí seo a logáil ar fhreastalaithe Gréasáin na suíomhanna Gréasáin nó na seirbhísí ar líne sin. Braitheann an sórt sonraí a lógáiltear agus an úsáid a bhaintear astu ar chleachtais phríobháideachta na suíomhanna gréasáin a osclaíonn tú agus na seirbhísí gréasáin a úsáideann tú. Gnéithe áirithe i Microsoft Edge, mar shampla nuair a osclaíonn tú táb nua sa bhrabhsálaí, ceanglaíonn siad thú le hinneachar Microsoft Start agus ceanglaíonn agus d’eispéiris le hábhar den sórt sin sa rannán Microsoft Start den ráiteas príobháideachta seo. Lena chois sin, seolann Microsoft Edge brabhsálaí ID uathúil chuig láithreáin ghréasáin áirithe chun cur ar ár gcumas sonraí comhiomlána a fhorbairt a úsáidtear chun gnéithe agus seirbhísí brabhsálaí a fheabhsú.
Microsoft Edge le haghaidh Windows, Linux, agus macOS
. Is é Microsoft Edge an brabhsálaí gréasáin réamhshocraithe le haghaidh Windows 10 agus tá sé ar fáil freisin ar leaganacha eile de Windows agus de macOS a bhfuil tacú ann dóibh.
Stóráiltear ar do ghléas sonraí faoin tslí a n-úsáideann tú do bhrabhsálaí, ar nós do stair bhrabhsála, sonraí foirme Gréasáin, comhaid shealadacha idirlín, agus cuacha. Is féidir na sonraí seo a scriosadh ó do ghléas le Scrios Stair Bhrabhsála.
Le Microsoft Edge, is féidir inneachar a ghabháil agus a shábháil ar do ghléas, ar nós:
Socruithe agus Tuilleadh
. Ceadaíonn sé duit do leabharmhairc,ceanáin, íoslódálacha,stair, iarmhír comhadainm agus bailiúcháin a bhainistiú go furasta in aon áit amháin.
Bailiúcháin
. Ceadaíonn sé duit téacsanna,íomhánna, físeáin, agus inneachar eile a bhailiú ar leathanach nóta ar do bhrabhsálaí. Nuair a tharraingíonn tú inneachar chuig do bhailiúchán, cuirtear é i dtaisce ar do ghléas agus féadfar é a scrios trí do bhailiúchán.
Pionna Láithreán Gréasáin ar an Tascbharra
. a cheadaíonn duit na láithreáin ghréasáin is fearr leat a phionnáil ar thascbharra Windows. Beidh láithreáin ghréasáin in ann na leathanaigh ghréasáin dá gcuid atá pionnáilte agat a fheiceáil, ionas gur féidir leo suaitheantas fógra a chur ar fáil duit ionas go mbeidh a fhios agat go bhfuil rud éigin nua ar a láithreáin ghréasáin ar cheart duit breathnú air.
Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí is gá chun gnéithe a iarrann tú a sholáthar i Microsoft Edge. Agus tú sínithe isteach i Microsoft Edge le chuntas Microsoft pearsanta nó oibre nó scoile, sioncrónaíonn Microsoft Edge le do shonraí brabhsálaí atá sábháilte ar ghléas thar gléasann eile atá sínithe isteach. Is féidir leat na sonraí brabhsálaí a shioncronóidh a roghnú, lena n-áirítear do cheanáin, stair bhrabhsála, breiseáin agus sonraí gaolmhara, socruithe, táib oscailte, iontrálacha foirme uathlíonta (mar d'ainm, do sheoladh, agus d'uimhir fóin), pasfhocail, faisnéis íocaíochta, agus cineálacha sonraí eile, faoi mar a thiocfaidh siad chun cinn. Má roghnaíonn tú breisithe a fuair tú ó shiopaí Gréasáin tríú páirtí a shioncronú, íoslódálfar cóip de na breisithe sin go díreach ó na siopaí Gréasáin sin ar do chuid gléasanna sioncronaithe. Má bhíonn Monatóir Pasfhocal casta air agat, déantar d’fhaisnéis aitheantais a haiseáil, a chriptiú agus a sheoladh chuig seirbhís Mhonatóir Pasfhocal Microsoft le rabhadh a thabhairt duit más rud é gur braitheadh d’fhaisnéis aitheantais mar chuid d’ionsaí mailíseach nó sárú. Ní dhéanfaidh Microsoft na sonraí sin a choinneáil nuair a bheidh an tseiceáil thart. Is féidir sioncronú a dhíchumasú nó a chumrú i socruithe Microsoft Edge.
Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach i Microsoft Edge le do chuntas Microsoft phearsanta nó oibre nó scoile, stórálfaidh Microsoft Edge sainroghanna príobháideachais do chuntais. Úsáidfidh Microsoft Edge na sainroghanna sábháilte chun sainroghanna príobháideachais do chuntais thar do ghléasanna sínithe isteach, lena n-áirítear le linn do ghléas Windows a bheith cumraithe nó nuair shíníonn tú isteach le Microsoft Edge ar do chuntas le gléas nua.
Úsáideann
Moltaí cuardaigh agus suímh
Microsoft Edge do cheisteanna cuardaigh agus stair bhrabhsála chun brabhsáil níos tapa agus moltaí cuardaigh níos ábhartha a sholáthar duit. Seolann Microsoft Edge an t-eolas a chlóscríobhann tú isteach i mbarra seoltaí an bhrabhsálaí chuig an soláthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe atá cumraithe sa bharra seoltaí chun moltaí cuardaigh a thairiscint duit de réir mar a chlóscríobhann tú. Is féidir na gnéithe seo a chasadh as uair ar bith i socruithe an bhrabhsálaí. Chun torthaí cuardaigh a sholáthar, seolann Microsoft Edge do chuid ceisteanna cuardaigh, faisnéis chaighdeánach cuardaigh agus suíomh (má tá suíomh cumasaithe agat) chuig do sholáthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe. Más é Bing do sholáthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe, úsáidimid na sonraí seo mar a thuairiscítear i rannán Bing den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Microsoft Edge a bhailíonn agus a úsáideann sonraí ó do ghníomhaíocht chuardaigh ar fud an ghréasáin, lena n-áirítear suíomhanna Gréasáin nach leatsa iad agus a oibríonn Microsoft, chun seirbhísí Microsoft a fheabhsú, ar nós Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing agus Microsoft News. D'fhéadfadh an t-iarratas cuardaigh, na torthaí cuardaigh a thaispeántar duit, faisnéis dhoimeagrafach atá mar chuid de na torthaí cuardaigh, agus an t-idirghníomhú atá agat leis na torthaí cuardaigh sin a bheith san áireamh sna sonraí sin, ar nós na nasc a chliceálann tú orthu. Microsoft Edge bearta chun na sonraí a bhailíonn sé a dhí-aithint trí shonraí a bhaint lena sainaithnítear an duine nó an gléas ónar bailíodh iad agus coinnítear na sonraí sin ar feadh bliana amháin ó bhailítear iad. Ní úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí seo a bhailítear chun fógraí a phearsanú ná a chur ar fáil duit. Is féidir na gnéithe seo a chasadh as uair ar bith i socruithe an bhrabhsálaí.
Déanann Microsoft Edge inneachar a íoslódáil ó sheirbhísí Microsoft Edge le d’eispéiris bhrabhsála a fheabhsú; mar shampla, nuair a dhéantar sonraí a íoslódáil chun inneachar suímh a réamhléiriú faoi choinne brabhsáil níos mire nó chun inneachar a sholáthar chun gnéithe is mian leat a úsáid a chumhachtú, amhail teimpléid a chur ar fáil don rannán Bailiúcháin.
Féadfaidh tú rogha a dhéanamh freisin do ghníomhaíocht bhrabhsála Microsoft Edge a chomhroinnt chun ligean dúinn seirbhísí Microsoft Edge agus Seirbhísí Microsoft amhail fógraí, cuardach, siopadóireacht agus nuacht a phearsantú. Áirítear i ngníomhaíocht bhrabhsála Microsoft Edge do stair, ceanáin, sonraí úsáide, inneachar gréasáin agus sonraí brabhsála eile. Tá tuilleadh faisnéise faoinár
bpolasaithe príobháideachais fógraíochta
sa rannán fógraíochta den ráiteas príobháideachta. I bpainéal príobháideachta Microsoft is féidir leat úsáid do ghníomhaíochta brabhsála a rialú le haghaidh fógraí pearsantaithe sa socrú
Amharc ar fhógraí a bhfuil spéis agat iontu
. Má dhíchumasaíonn tú an socrú seo i ndeis príobháideachta Microsoft, gheobhaidh tú eispéiris ghréasáin phearsantaithe cosúil le cuardaigh agus nuachta bunaithe ar do ghníomhaíocht brabhsála. Is féidir leat stop a chur le roinnt do ghníomhaíocht brabhsála Microsoft Edge trí
Lig do Microsoft do ghníomhaíocht bhrabhsála a úsáid, lena n-áirítear stair, ceanáin, úsáid agus sonraí brabhsála eile chun Microsoft Edge agus Seirbhísí Microsoft a phearsantú amhail fógraí, cuardach, siopadóireacht agus nuacht
a dhíchumasú i socruithe Edge. Agus gnéithe Copilot á n-úsáid i mbarra taoibh Microsoft Edge, is féidir leat an rogha a dhéanamh ligean do Copilot in Edge rochtain a fháil ar inneachar an leathanaigh ghréasáin a bhfuil tú ag féachaint air chun léargais bhreise a sholáthar, mar achoimrí leathanaigh. Tá úsáid sonraí a bhaineann le heispéiris Copilot de réir an úsáid sonraí Copilot den rannán Bing den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Bailíonn Microsoft Edge na sonraí diagnóiseacha is gá chun fadhbanna a réiteach agus chun Microsoft Edge a choimeád chun dáta, slán agus ag obair i gceart. Cabhraíonn sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha linn Microsoft Edge agus Windows a fheabhsú, leis.
Is féidir leat rogha a dhéanamh sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha a sheoladh faoin gcaoi a n-úsáideann tú Microsoft Edge agus faisnéis faoi ghníomhaíocht do bhrabhsálaí, lena n-áirítear stair bhrabhsála agus téarmaí cuardaigh chuig Microsoft chun cabhrú linn Microsoft Edge agus táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft eile a fheabhsú. I gcás Microsoft Edge ar Windows 10, cuirtear an fhaisnéis seo ar fáil nuair a chumasaíonn tú sonraí roghnacha diagnóiseacha. Le haghaidh sonraí, féach an rannán Diagnóisic Windows sa ráiteas príobháideachta. Maidir le Microsoft Edge ar chórais oibriúcháin eile, soláthraítear faisnéis dhiagnóiseach roghnach nuair a chumasaíonn tú
Feabhsaigh táirgí Microsoft trí shonraí a sheoladh faoi conas a úsáideann tú an brabhsálaí
nó
Cuir feabhas ar chuardach agus táirgí Microsoft trí eolas a sheoladh faoi láithreáin Ghréasáin a dtugann tú cuairt orthu i Microsoft Edge
i suímh an bhrabhsálaí.
Seoltar na sonraí diagnóiseacha a bhailíonn Microsoft Edge chuig Microsoft agus stóráiltear iad le haitheantóir uathúil amháin nó níos mó a chabhróidh linn suiteáil úsáideora aonair a shainaithint ar ghléas, agus saincheisteanna seirbhíse agus patrúin úsáide na seirbhíse brabhsálaí a thuiscint.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le Microsoft Edge, sonraí brabhsála agus príobháideachas
.
Microsoft Edge ar iOS agus Android
. Bailíonn Microsoft Edge on iOS agus gléasanna Android na sonraí is gá chun gnéithe a iarrann tú a sholáthar i Microsoft Edge. Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha, leis, chun fadhbanna a réiteach agus chun Microsoft Edge a choimeád chun dáta, slán agus ag obair i gceart. Cabhraíonn sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha linn Microsoft Edge a fheabhsú, leis.
Ina theannta sin, is féidir leat sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha a chomhroinnt faoin gcaoi a n-úsáideann tú Microsoft Edge agus faisnéis faoi shuíomhanna gréasáin a dtugann tú cuairt orthu (stair bhrabhsála) le haghaidh eispéiris phearsantaithe ar do bhrabhsálaí, Windows 10, agus táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft eile. Cuidíonn an fhaisnéis seo linn Microsoft Edge agus táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft eile a fheabhsú. Seoltar na sonraí roghnacha diagnóiseacha seo chugainn nuair a chumasaíonn tú
Comhroinn sonraí úsáide le haghaidh pearsantú
nó
Comhroinn eolas faoi shuímh idirlín a dtugann tú cuairt orthu
i socruithe an bhrabhsálaí.
Seoltar na sonraí diagnóiseacha a bhailíonn Microsoft Edge chuig Microsoft agus stóráiltear iad le haitheantóir uathúil amháin nó níos mó a chabhróidh linn úsáideoir aonair a shainaithint ar ghléas, agus saincheisteanna seirbhíse agus patrúin úsáide na seirbhíse brabhsálaí a thuiscint.
Úsáideann Microsoft Edge sonraí ó do ghníomhaíocht chuardaigh ar fud an ghréasáin, lena n-áirítear suíomhanna Gréasáin nach le Microsoft iad nó nach oibríonn Microsoft, chun seirbhísí Microsoft a fheabhsú, ar nós Microsoft Edge, Microsoft Bing agus Microsoft News. D’fhéadfadh sonraí phearsanta a bheith san áireamh sna sonraí a bhailíonn Microsoft Edge; mar sin féin, déanann Microsoft Edge bearta chun na sonraí a sciúr agus a dhí-aithint. Ní úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí seo chun fógraí a phearsanú ná a chur ar fáil duit. Is féidir na gnéithe seo a chasadh as uair ar bith i socruithe an bhrabhsálaí.
Foghlaim tuilleadh mar gheall ar sonraí ar thorthaí an chuardaigh le haghaidh feabhsúchán táirge
.
Chun eolas a fháil ar chleachtais phríobháideachta leaganacha oidhreachta Microsoft Edge (leaganacha 44 agus ní ba luaithe), féach an rannán Brabhsálaithe—Oidhreacht Microsoft Edge agus Internet Explorer sa ráiteas príobháideachta.
Siar go barr
Microsoft Translator
Córas agus seirbhís mheaisínaistriúcháin é Microsoft Translator atá deartha chun téacs agus ionchur gutha a aistriú go huathoibríoch idir líon mór teangacha tacaithe. Cuirtear Microsoft Translator ar fáil mar fheidhmchlár neamhspleách do thomhaltóirí le haghaidh Android, iOS, agus Windows agus tá cumais seirbhíse an fheidhmchláir comhtháite i réimse táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft, ar nós Translator Hub, Translator for Bing, agus Translator for Microsoft Edge. Próiseálann Microsoft Translator sonraí an téacs, na híomhá agus an urlabhra a chuireann tú isteach, chomh maith le sonraí an ghléis agus sonraí úsáide. Bainimid úsáid as na sonraí sin chun Microsoft Translator a chur ar fáil, chun d’eispéiris a phearsantú, agus chun ár dtáirgí agus ar seirbhísí a fheabhsú. Chuir Microsoft bearta gnó agus teicniúla chun feidhme a dearadh chun cuidiú leis na sonraí a chuireann tú isteach ar Microsoft Translator a shainaithint. Mar shampla, nuair a dhéanaimid téacs a shampláil go randamach chun Microsoft Translator agus teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte a fheabhsú, scriosaimid na haitheantóirí agus téacs áirithe, amhail seoltaí ríomhphoist agus roinnt seicheamh uimhreacha a braitheadh sa sampla agus a bhféadfadh sonraí pearsanta bheith iontu. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoin gcaoi a ndéanann Microsoft bainistíocht ar do shonraí gutha, féach
teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte
.
Ar leithligh ó Microsoft Translator, tá seirbhísí aistriúcháin Microsoft ar fáil mar ghnéithe i dtáirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft eile a bhfuil cleachtais phríobháideachta éagsúla acu seachas Microsoft Translator. Féach an rannán
táirgí Fiontair agus forbróra
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi Microsoft Azure Cognitive Services Translator Text API. Custom Translator, agus Translator Speech API. Maidir leis an ngné Aistrigh i bhfeidhmchláir Microsoft 365 agus Skype, féach an rannán
Táirgí táirgiúlachta agus cumarsáide
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
SwiftKey
Próiseálann méarchlár Microsoft SwiftKey agus seirbhísí néalbhunaithe gaolmhara (le chéile, na “SwiftKey Services”) sonraí faoi na focail a úsáideann tú agus conas a chlóscríobhann agus a úsáideann tú na sonraí seo chun do stíl scríbhneoireachta a fhoghlaim agus chun uathcheartú pearsanta agus téacs réamh-mheastacháin a chur ar fáil duit a chuireann in oiriúint duit. Bainimid úsáid as na sonraí sin chomh maith chun réimse gnéithe eile a thairiscint amhail tuartha haischlibeanna agus emoji.
Foghlaimíonn teicneolaíocht tuartha SwiftKey ón dóigh a n-úsáideann tú teanga chun samhail teanga pearsantaithe a fhorbairt duit. Dearcadh optamaithe is ea an tsamhail seo de na focail agus na frásaí is mó a úsáideann tú i gcomhthéacs agus léiríonn sé do stíl uathúil scríbhneoireachta. Sa tsamhail í féin beidh na focail a chlóscríobhann tú go minic agus iad eagraithe ar bhealach a chuireann ar a gcumas d’algartaim SwiftKey tuartha a dhéanamh, bunaithe ar théacs atá curtha isteach agat cheana féin. Baintear leas sa tsamhail as gach cás ina n-úsáideann tú do mhéarchlár, lena n-áirítear nuair a chlóscríobhann tú agus tú ag úsáid aipeanna nó ag tabhairt cuairt ar shuíomhanna gréasáin. Ní dhéanann méarchlár agus samhail SwiftKey sonraí a bhailiú ó réimsí áirithe amhail na cinn sin a aithnítear go mbíonn sonraí pasfhocail nó íocaíochta iontu, chun iarracht a dhéanamh gan sonraí íogaire a bhailiú. Ní logáileann ná ní stórálann Seirbhísí SwiftKey na sonraí atá i do mhúnla, ach amháin má roghnaíonn tú do shonraí a roinnt linn (mar a thuairiscítear thíos). Nuair a úsáideann tú SwiftKey Services, bailímíd sonraí an ghléis agus sonraí úsáide chomh maith. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach i do chuntas SwiftKey agus nuair a aontaíonn tú na sonraí seo a leanas a roinnt, úsáidfimid sonraí gléis dí-shainaitheanta, sonraí úsáide, agus sonraí samhla chun anailís a dhéanamh ar fheidhmíocht seirbhíse agus chun cabhrú lenár dtáirgí a fheabhsú.
Chomh maith, tá comhpháirt roghnach néil ar a dtugtar Cuntas SwiftKey mar chuid de SwiftKey Services. Má roghnaíonn tú Cuntas SwiftKey a chruthú, déanfar do shamhail teanga a shioncronú le néalseirbhís Chuntas SwiftKey, ionas go mbeidh tú in ann tairbhe a bhaint as an tsamhail sin ar na gléasanna éagsúla a úsáideann tú agus rochtain a bheith agat ar sheirbhísí breise amhail sioncronú tuartha agus cúltaca. Nuair a chruthaíonn tú Cuntas SwiftKey, baileoidh Microsoft do sheoladh ríomhphoist agus sonraí bunúsacha déimeagrafacha chomh maith. Déantar na sonraí ar fad a bhailítear a aistriú chuig ár bhfreastalaithe thar chainéil chriptithe. Má tá tú sínithe isteach ar do chuntas SwiftKey, is féidir leat do shonraí pearsanta agus roghanna cuntais SwiftKey a rialú ag
data.swiftkey.com
.
Is féidir leat liostáil SwiftKey go roghnach chomh maith chun do shonraí teanga agus clóscríofa agus/nó gearrthóga gutha a chomhroinnt d’fhonn táirgí Microsoft a fheabhsú. Ag brath ar na liostálacha roghnacha a roghnaíonn tú, féadfaidh SwiftKey giotaí gearr sonraí a sheoladh faoi na rudaí a chlóscríobhann tú agus/nó do ghearrthóga gutha, agus sonraí ceartaithe gaolmhara chuig ár bhfreastalaithe lena bpróiseáil. Úsáidtear na sleachta téacs seo i bpróisis uathoibrithe éagsúla chun a dheimhniú go bhfuil ár seirbhísí tuartha ag obair i gceart agus chun feabhsuithe táirgí a dhéanamh. Chun do phríobháideachas a chaomhnú, déanann Seirbhísí SwiftKey na blúirí téacs seo a dhí-aithint, agus fiú má tá Cuntas SwiftKey agat, ní bheidh na blúirí téacs seo nasctha leis.
Má shíníonn tú isteach chuig do Chuntas SwiftKey agus má shocraíonn tú do shonraí teanga agus clóscríofa nó gearrthóga gutha a chomhroinnt, déanfaidh Microsoft do sonraí comhroinnte a phróiseáil d’fhonn patrúin nua úsáide teanga a aimsiú ar fud ár n-úsáideoirí ar fad. Cuireann sé seo ar ár gcumas ár samhlacha bunúsacha a fheabhsú do theangacha ar leith. Déantar sonraí teanga agus clóscríobh a úsáidtear sa phróiseas seo a bhailiú le chéile, agus má bhíonn focail nó grúpaí focal a bheadh pearsanta do dhaoine ar leith nó grúpaí beaga úsáideoirí, déantar iad sin a bhaint.
Is féidir leat an cead a thug tú a aistarraingt in am ar bith i dtaca le shonraí teanga agus clóscríofa ar mhaithe le feabhsú táirgí. Déantar sin i Socruithe SwiftKey. Is féidir leat an cead a thug tú a aistarraingt i Socruithe SwiftKey chomh maith, maidir le SwiftKey Services do shonraí pearsanta a choimeád Nuair a dhéanann tú an cead a aistarraingt maidir le SwiftKey do shonraí a choimeád, déanfar na sonraí go léir a bailíodh de thoradh ar an úsáid a bhain tú as Seirbhísí SwiftKey a scriosadh.
Seans go bhfaighidh tú fógraí ar do ghléas ó am go chéile a chuirfidh thú ar an eolas maidir le nuashonruithe táirgí agus gnéithe a d’fhéadfadh a bheith suimiúil duit. Féadfaidh tú na fógraí sin inár dtáirgí a dhíchumasú aon uair i Socruithe SwiftKey.
Nuair a úsáideann tú an ghné ceamara i SwiftKey, is féidir leat rogha a dhéanamh d’fhíseáin agus d’íomhánna a fheabhsú le seirbhísí lionsaí tríú páirtí. Is gné é Lionsa a úsáideann Réaltacht Mhéadaithe (RA) chun do fhéiníní a athrú ar bhealach spraíúil, mar shampla cuma a chur ort mar an t-ainmhí is fearr leat. Ag baint úsáide as an gceamara ar mhéarchlár SwiftKey, is féidir leat an ghné lionsa atá corpraithe sa mhéarchlár a roghnú chun d’aghaidh agus do lámha a athrú. Ag brath ar an lionsa a roghnaíonn tú, is féidir d'fhíseáin agus d'íomhánna a phróiseáil chun faisnéis a bhaint amach faoi shuíomh áiteanna éagsúla ar d'aghaidh agus ar do lámha. Úsáidtear na sonraí asbhainte chun éifeachtaí RA a chur i bhfeidhm ar d’aghaidh agus ar do lámha amháin. Ní úsáidtear aon cheann de na sonraí seo chun tú a aithint go pearsanta. Déantar na sonraí seo a phróiseáil ar feadh an tseisiúin ar do ghléas amháin, agus ansin scriostar láithreach iad. Ní sheoltar na sonraí seo chuig SwiftKey nó chuig aon tríú páirtí.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Windows
Is timpeallacht phearsantaithe ríomhaireachta é Windows a chumasaíonn duit seirbhísí, sainroghanna, agus inneachar a oscailt ar do ghléasanna ríomhaireachta uile, lena n-áirítear fóin agus táibléid, chuig an Surface Hub agus fánaíocht leanúnach a dhéanamh orthu. In ionad fanacht mar ríomhchlár bogearraí statach ar do ghléas, tá comhpháirteanna tábhachtach de Windows bunaithe ar an néal, agus déantar eilimintí néil agus áitiúla Windows a nuashonrú go rialta, rud a thugann na feabhsuithe agus na gnéithe is déanaí duit. Chun an t-eispéireas ríomhaireachta seo a sholáthair, bailímid sonraí maidir leatsa, le do ghléas, agus leis an tslí a n-úsáideann tú Windows. Agus toisc gur rud pearsanta é Windows, cuirimid roghanna ar fáil duit maidir leis an bhfaisnéis phearsanta a bhailímid agus cén úsáid a bhainimid as. Tabhair faoi deara, má tá do ghléas Windows á bhainistiú ag d'eagraíocht (amhail d'fhostóir nó scoil), d'fhéadfadh d'eagraíocht úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí bainistíochta láraithe a sholáthraíonn Microsoft nó cuideachtaí eile chun rochtain a fháil ar do shonraí agus na sonraí sin a phróiseáil chun socruithe gléis a rialú (socruithe príobháideachta san áireamh), polasaithe gléis, nuashonruithe bogearraí, bailiú sonraí a dhéanaimidme nó an eagraíocht, nó gnéithe eile de do ghléas. Lena chois sin, d'fhéadfadh d'eagraíocht úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí bainistíochta a sholáthraíonn Microsoft nó cuideachtaí eile agus do chuid sonraí ón ngléas sin a phróiseáil, lena n-áirítear do chuid sonraí idirghníomhaíochta, sonraí diagnóiseacha, agus inneachar do chuid cumarsáide agus do chomhaid.
Is comhpháirt bhunriachtanach de Microsoft Windows iad
Na Socruithe Windows
, Socruithe Ríomhaire mar a aithníodh roimhe. Cuireann sé comhéadan áisiúil ar fáil le haghaidh roghanna úsáideora a choigeartú, an córas oibriúcháin a chumraigh, agus gléasanna nasctha a bhainistiú le gur féidir leat cuntais úsáideora a bhainistiú, socruithe líonra a choigeartú, agus gnéithe éagsúla de Windows a shaincheapadh. Cuireann Windows meicníocht ar fáil le gur féidir cumais fheidhmchláir éagsúla a rochtain ar nós ceamara, micreafón, suíomh, féilire, teagmhálaithe, stair glaoigh, teachtaireachtaí an ghléis agus tuilleadh, agus rochtain ar do shonraí pearsanta a rialú. Tá a leathanach socruithe príobháideachais féin ag gach cumas sna socruithe Windows, le gur féidir leat a rialú cén fheidhmchláir ar féidir úsáid a bhaint as gach cumas. Seo roinnt phríomhghnéithe de Shocruithe:
Saincheapadh: Is féidir leat gnéithe éagsúla de Windows a shaincheapadh, lena n-áirítear an chuma, na socruithe teanga, agus na socruithe príobháideachais. Baineann socruithe Windows úsáid as do mhicreafón agus an fhuaim á rialú, an ceamara agus ceamara agus suíomh comhtháite á úsáid chun an gile a athrú istoíche chun cabhrú leat do Windows a shaincheapadh.
Bainistíocht Fhorimeallach: Bainistíocht Fhorimeallach: Suiteáil agus bainistigh forimill amhail printéirí, monatóirí, agus tiomántáin seachtracha.
Cumraíocht Líonra: Coigeartaigh socruithe líonraithe, lena n-áirítear Wi-Fi, Ethernet, naisc ceallacha agus VPN agus bainfear úsáid as seoladh fisiciúil MAC, uimhir IMEI agus uimhir fóin má thacaíonn an gléas le ceallach.
Bainistíocht Cuntais: Cuir cuntais úsáideora leis nó bain iad, athraigh socruithe cuntais, agus bainistigh roghanna sínigh isteach.
Roghanna ag leibhéal an chórais: Cumraigh na socruithe taispeána, fógraí, roghanna cumhachta, bainistigh liosta na bhfeidhmchlár arna suiteáil agus tuilleadh.
Bainistíocht Príobháideachais & slándála: cumraigh do roghanna príobháideachais amhail suíomh, bailiú sonraí diagnóiseacha srl. Mionchoigeartaigh na feidhmchláir agus seirbhísí ar leith ar féidir leo cumais ghléis a rochtain tríothu a chasadh as.
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi bhailiú sonraí in Windows, féach
achoimre bhailiúcháin sonraí le haghaidh Windows
. Pléitear sa ráiteas seo Windows 10 agus Windows 11 agus baineann tagairtí Windows sa rannán seo leis na leaganacha táirge sin. Baineann ráitis phríobháideachais ar leith le seanleaganacha Windows (lena n-áirítear Windows Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, agus Windows 8.1).
Is timpeallacht phearsantaithe ríomhaireachta é Windows a chumasaíonn duit seirbhísí, sainroghanna, agus inneachar a oscailt ar do ghléasanna ríomhaireachta uile, lena n-áirítear fóin agus táibléid, chuig an Surface Hub agus fánaíocht leanúnach a dhéanamh orthu. In ionad fanacht mar ríomhchlár bogearraí statach ar do ghléas, tá comhpháirteanna tábhachtach de Windows bunaithe ar an néal, agus déantar eilimintí néil agus áitiúla Windows a nuashonrú go rialta, rud a thugann na feabhsuithe agus na gnéithe is déanaí duit. Chun an t-eispéireas ríomhaireachta seo a sholáthair, bailímid sonraí maidir leatsa, le do ghléas, agus leis an tslí a n-úsáideann tú Windows. Agus toisc gur rud pearsanta é Windows, cuirimid roghanna ar fáil duit maidir leis an bhfaisnéis phearsanta a bhailímid agus cén úsáid a bhainimid as. Tabhair faoi deara, má tá do ghléas Windows á bhainistiú ag d'eagraíocht (amhail d'fhostóir nó scoil), d'fhéadfadh d'eagraíocht úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí bainistíochta láraithe a sholáthraíonn Microsoft nó cuideachtaí eile chun rochtain a fháil ar do shonraí agus na sonraí sin a phróiseáil chun socruithe gléis a rialú (socruithe príobháideachta san áireamh), polasaithe gléis, nuashonruithe bogearraí, bailiú sonraí a dhéanaimidme nó an eagraíocht, nó gnéithe eile de do ghléas. Lena chois sin, d'fhéadfadh d'eagraíocht úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí bainistíochta a sholáthraíonn Microsoft nó cuideachtaí eile agus do chuid sonraí ón ngléas sin a phróiseáil, lena n-áirítear do chuid sonraí idirghníomhaíochta, sonraí diagnóiseacha, agus inneachar do chuid cumarsáide agus do chomhaid.
Is comhpháirt bhunriachtanach de Microsoft Windows iad
Na Socruithe Windows
, Socruithe Ríomhaire mar a aithníodh roimhe. Cuireann sé comhéadan áisiúil ar fáil le haghaidh roghanna úsáideora a choigeartú, an córas oibriúcháin a chumraigh, agus gléasanna nasctha a bhainistiú le gur féidir leat cuntais úsáideora a bhainistiú, socruithe líonra a choigeartú, agus gnéithe éagsúla de Windows a shaincheapadh. Cuireann Windows meicníocht ar fáil le gur féidir cumais fheidhmchláir éagsúla a rochtain ar nós ceamara, micreafón, suíomh, féilire, teagmhálaithe, stair glaoigh, teachtaireachtaí an ghléis agus tuilleadh, agus rochtain ar do shonraí pearsanta a rialú. Tá a leathanach socruithe príobháideachais féin ag gach cumas sna socruithe Windows, le gur féidir leat a rialú cén fheidhmchláir ar féidir úsáid a bhaint as gach cumas. Seo roinnt phríomhghnéithe de Shocruithe:
Saincheapadh: Is féidir leat gnéithe éagsúla de Windows a shaincheapadh, lena n-áirítear an chuma, na socruithe teanga, agus na socruithe príobháideachais. Baineann socruithe Windows úsáid as do mhicreafón agus an fhuaim á rialú, an ceamara agus ceamara agus suíomh comhtháite á úsáid chun an gile a athrú istoíche chun cabhrú leat do Windows a shaincheapadh.
Bainistíocht Fhorimeallach: Bainistíocht Fhorimeallach: Suiteáil agus bainistigh forimill amhail printéirí, monatóirí, agus tiomántáin seachtracha.
Cumraíocht Líonra: Coigeartaigh socruithe líonraithe, lena n-áirítear Wi-Fi, Ethernet, naisc ceallacha agus VPN agus bainfear úsáid as seoladh fisiciúil MAC, uimhir IMEI agus uimhir fóin má thacaíonn an gléas le ceallach.
Bainistíocht Cuntais: Cuir cuntais úsáideora leis nó bain iad, athraigh socruithe cuntais, agus bainistigh roghanna sínigh isteach.
Roghanna ag leibhéal an chórais: Cumraigh na socruithe taispeána, fógraí, roghanna cumhachta, bainistigh liosta na bhfeidhmchlár arna suiteáil agus tuilleadh.
Bainistíocht Príobháideachais & slándála: cumraigh do roghanna príobháideachais amhail suíomh, bailiú sonraí diagnóiseacha srl. Mionchoigeartaigh na feidhmchláir agus seirbhísí ar leith ar féidir leo cumais ghléis a rochtain tríothu a chasadh as.
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi bhailiú sonraí in Windows, féach
achoimre bhailithe sonraí le haghaidh Windows
. Pléitear sa ráiteas seo Windows 10 agus Windows 11 agus baineann tagairtí Windows sa rannán seo leis na leaganacha táirge sin. Baineann ráitis phríobháideachais ar leith le seanleaganacha Windows (lena n-áirítear Windows Vista, Windows 7, Windows 8, agus Windows 8.1).
Gníomhachtú
Nuair a ghníomhachtaíonn tú Windows, déantar eochair tháirge faoi leith a cheangal leis an ngléas ar a bhfuil do bhogearraí suiteáilte. Seolfar an eochair tháirge agus sonraí na mbogearraí agus do ghléis chuig Microsoft chun cabhrú chun do cheadúnas maidir leis na bogearraí a fhíordheimhniú. Is féidir go seolfaí na sonraí seo an athuair más gá do cheadúnas a athghníomhachtú nó a bhailíochtú. Ar fhóin ar a bhfuil Windows ag rith, seoltar aitheantóirí gléis agus líonra, chomh maith le suíomh an ghléis, chuig Microsoft, an chéad uair a chumhachtaítear an gléas, le haghaidh cuspóirí maidir le clárú baránta, easnamh stoic a shlánú, agus cosc calaoise.
Siar go barr
Stair gníomhaíochtaí
Cabhraíonn stair gníomhaíochtaí chun cuntas a choinneáil ar an méid a dhéanann tú ar do ghléas, ar nós na bhfeidhmchlár agus seirbhísí a úsáideann tú, na comhaid a osclaíonn tú, agus na láithreáin gréasáin a bhrabhsálann tú. Tá do stair gníomhaíochtaí stóráilte go logánta ar do ghléas nuair a úsáidtear feidhmchláir agus gnéithe difriúla cosúil le Microsoft Edge Legacy, roinnt feidhmchlár Microsoft Store, agus aipeanna Microsoft 365.
Is féidir leat na socruithe chun stair do ghníomhaíochtaí a stóráil go logánta ar do ghléas a chasadh as, agus is féidir leat stair na ngníomhaíochtaí ar do ghléas a ghlanadh uair ar bith ach dul chuig
Príobháideachas >stair ghníomhaíochta
san fheidhmchlár socruithe Windows.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi stair gníomhaíochtaí in Windows
.
Siar go barr
ID fógraíochta
Gineann Windows ID fógraíochta uathúil maidir le gach duine a úsáideann gléas, ar féidir le forbróirí feidhmchláir agus líonraí fógraíochta é a úsáid ansin dá gcuspóirí féin, lena n-áirítear fógraíocht ábhartha a sholáthar i bhfeidhmchláir. Nuair a bhíon ID fógraíochta cumasaithe, is féidir le feidhmchláir Microsoft agus tríú páirtí an ID fógraíochta a rochtain agus a úsáid ar an mbealach céanna ar féidir le láithreáin ghréasáin aitheantóir uathúil a stóráiltear i gcuach a rochtain agus a úsáid. Dá bhrí sin, is féidir le forbróirí feidhmchláir agus líonraí fógraíochta an t-aitheantóir fógraíochta a úsáid chun fógraíocht níos ábhartha agus eispéiris níos pearsantaithe sna feidhmchláir ar an nGréasán a sholáthar. Ní bhailíonn Microsoft an t-aitheantóir fógraíochta le haghaidh na n-úsáidí a thuairiscítear anseo ach amháin nuair a roghnaíonn tú an ID fógraíochta a chumasú mar chuid de do shocrú príobháideachta.
Baineann socrú an ID fógraíochta le feidhmchláir Windows a úsáideann aitheantóir fógraíochta Windows. Is féidir leat rochtain ar an aitheantóir seo a chasadh as am ar bith tríd an ID fógraíochta sna Socruithe Windows a chasadh as. Má roghnaíonn tú é a chasadh air arís, athshocrófar an ID fógraíochta agus ginfear aitheantóir nua. Nuair a dhéanann feidhmchlár tríú páirtí an ID fógraíochta a rochtain, beidh úsáid an ID fógraíochta faoi réir a pholasaí príobháideachta féin.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi ID fógraíochta in Windows 10
.
Ní bhaineann socrú an ID fógraíochta le modhanna eile fógraíochta bunaithe ar ábhair spéise a chuireann Microsoft nó tríú páirtithe ar fáil, ar nós cuach a úsáidtear chun fógraí taispeána bunaithe ar ábhair spéise a sholáthar ar láithreáin ghréasáin. Féadfaidh táirgí tríú páirtí a ndéantar rochtain orthu trí Windows nó atá suiteáilte ar Windows cineálacha eile fógraíochta bunaithe ar ábhair spéise a sholáthar faoi réir a gcuid polasaithe príobháideachta féin. Soláthraíonn Microsoft cineálacha eile fógraí bunaithe ar ábhair spéise i dtáirgí áirithe de chuid Microsoft, go díreach agus trí chomhpháirtíocht le soláthraithe fógraí tríú páirtí. Tá tuilleadh faisnéise maidir leis an úsáid a bhaineann Microsoft as sonraí le haghaidh fógraíochta le fáil sa rannán
Conas a úsáidimid sonraí pearsanta
den ráiteas seo.
Siar go barr
Diagnóisic
Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóisice Windows chun fadhbanna a réiteach agus chun Windows a choinneáil cothrom le dáta, slán, agus ag oibriú mar is ceart. Cuidíonn na sonraí seo linn feabhas a chur ar Windows agus ar tháirgí agus seirbhísí gaolmhara Microsoft. Seoltar na sonraí sin ar aghaidh chuig Microsoft stóráiltear iad le haitheantóir uathúil amháin nó níos mó a chabhróidh linn úsáideoir aonair a shainaithint ar ghléas aonair, agus saincheisteanna seirbhíse agus patrúin úsáide an ghléis a thuiscint.
Tá dhá leibhéal de shonraí diagnóiseacha agus gníomhaíochta ann: Sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha agus roghnacha. Tagraíonn cáipéisíocht áirithe táirgí agus ábhair eile do shonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha mar bhunsonraí diagnóiseacha agus sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha mar shonraí diagnóiseacha iomlána.
Má úsáideann eagraíocht (amhail d'fhostóir nó scoil) Azure Active Directory (AAD) chun an cuntas a chuireann sé ar fáil duit a bhainistiú agus chun do ghléas a chlárú i gcumraíocht próiseálaí sonraí diagnóiseacha Windows, rialaítear próiseáil sonraí diagnóiseacha i ndáil le Windows le conradh idir Microsoft agus an eagraíocht. Má úsáideann eagraíocht (amhail d'fhostóir nó scoil) uirlisí bainistíochta Microsoft nó má úsáideann sí Microsoft chun do ghléas a bhainistiú, úsáidfimid agus próiseálfaimid sonraí diagnóiseacha agus earráide ó do ghléas chun cead a thabhairt don bhainistíocht, monatóireacht, agus fabhtcheartú a dhéanamh ar ghléasanna na heagraíochta, agus chun críocha eile de chuid na heagraíochta.
Baineann
sonraí diagnóiseacha Riachtanach
le faisnéis maidir le do ghléas, a shocruithe agus a chumais, agus cibé an bhfuil sé ag feidhmiú i gceart. Bailímid na sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha a leanas:
Sonraí gléis, nascachta agus cumraíochta:
Sonraí faoin ghléas mar shampla an cineál próiseálaí, déantóir OEM, cineál agus cumas cadhnra, líon agus cineál ceamaraí, dochtearraí agus tréithe cuimhne.
Cumais líonra agus sonraí nasctha cosúil le seoladh IP an ghléis, líonra móibíleach (lena n-áirítear IMEI agus oibreoir móibíleach), agus cibé an bhfuil an gléas nasctha le líonra saor in aisce nó líonra íoctha.
Sonraí maidir leis an gcórais oibriúcháin agus a chumraithe cosúil le leagan an chóras oibriúcháin agus an uimhir thógála, an réigiún agus na socruithe teanga, socruithe sonraí na diagnóisice, agus cibé an mbaineann an gléas leis an ríomhchlár Windows Insider.
Sonraí faoi forimeallaigh nasctha amhail samhail, déantóir, tiománaithe, agus sonraí comhoiriúnachta.
Sonraí faoina feidhmchláir atá suiteáilte ar an ngléas amhail ainm fheidhmcláir, leagan, agus foilsitheoir.
Cibé an bhfuil an gléas ullamh do nuashonrú agus cibé an bhfuil tosca a bhacfadh an cumas nuashonruithe a fháil, ar nós ceallra íseal, spás diosca teoranta, nó nascacht trí líonra íoctha.
Cibé ar éirigh le nuashonruithe nó ar theip orthu.
Sonraí maidir lena iontaofa atá an córas bailithe diagnóisice féin.
Tuairisciú bunsonraí earráide, arb ionann é agus sonraí sláinte an chórais oibriúcháin agus na bhfeidhmchlár atá ag rith ar do ghléas. Mar shampla, insíonn tuairisciú bunsonraí earráide dúinn má chrochann nó má theipeann ar fheidhmchlár, ar nós Microsoft Péint nó cluiche tríú páirtí.
Áirítear i sonraí roghnacha diagnóiseacha
faisnéis níos mionsonraithe faoi do ghléas agus a socruithe, a chumais, agus sláinte an ghléis. Áirítear ar shonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha sonraí faoi na suíomhanna Gréasáin a bhrabhsálann tú, gníomhaíocht an ghléis (ar a dtugtar úsáid uaireanta), agus tuairisciú feabhsaithe earráidí a chabhraíonn le Microsoft táirgí agus seirbhísí a dheisiú agus a fheabhsú le haghaidh gach úsáideoir. Nuair a roghnaíonn tú sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha a sheoladh, cuirfear na sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha san áireamh i gcónaí, agus tiomsóimid an fhaisnéis bhreise seo a leanas:
Sonraí breise maidir leis an ngléas, nascacht, agus cumraíocht, de bhreis ar an méid a thiomsaítear faoi shonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha.
Faisnéis stádais agus logála maidir le sláinte do chórais oibriúcháin agus comhpháirteanna eile an chórais de bhreis ar shonraí a thiomsaítear maidir le nuashonrú agus córais diagnóisice faoi shonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha.
Gníomhaíocht feidhmchlár, ar nós cad iad na ríomhchláir atá lainseáilte ar ghléas, cá fhad a ritheann siad, agus cé chomh tapa a fhreagraíonn siad d'ionchur.
Gníomhaíocht brabhsálaithe, lena n-áirítear stair bhrabhsála agus téarmaí cuardaigh, i mbrabhsálaithe Microsoft (Microsoft Edge nó Internet Explorer).
Tuairisciú breisithe earráidí, lena n-áirítear staid chuimhne do ghléis nuair a theipeann ar chóras nó feidhmchlár (a bhféadfadh inneachar úsáideora, ar nós codanna de chomhad a bhí in úsáid agat nuair a tharla an fhadhb, a bheith ann go neamhdheonach).
Is féidir nach dtiomsófar cuid de na sonraí a thuairiscítear thuas ó do ghléas fiú má roghnaíonn tú sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha a chur isteach. Íoslaghdaíonn Microsoft líon na sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha a thiomsaítear ó gach gléas trí chuid de na sonraí a thiomsú ó fhothaca gléasanna (sampla) amháin. Tríd an uirlis Amharcóir Sonraí Diagnóiseacha a rith, feicfidh tú an deilbhín a léiríonn cibé an cuid de shampla do ghléas agus anuas air sin cad iad na sonraí ar leith a bhailítear ó do ghléas. Tá treoracha ar fáil faoin chaoi an uirlis Amharcóir Sonraí Diagnóiseacha a íoslódáil i Windows fheidhmchlár na socruithe diagnóisice agus & aiseolais.
Bíonn míreanna sonraí ar leith a bhailítear i ndiagnóisic Windows faoi réir athrú chun solúbthacht a thabhairt do Microsoft maidir le bailiú na sonraí is gá le haghaidh na gcuspóirí a tuairiscíodh. Mar shampla, chun a chumasú do Microsoft an fhadhb feidhmíochta is déanaí a chuireann isteach ar eispéireas ríomhaireachta úsáideoirí gléas Windows fhabhtcheartú nó gléas atá nua don mhargadh a nuashonrú, seans go mbeidh ar Microsoft míreanna sonraí a bhailiú nach raibh bailíodh roimhe ’ seo. Le haghaidh liosta reatha de na cineálacha sonraí a bhailítear ag
Sonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha
agus
sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha
, féach
teagmhais agus réimsí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha Windows (Bunleibhéal)
nó
sonraí diagnóiseacha Windows Roghnach (Leibhéal iomlán).
Soláthraímid codanna teoranta d'fhaisnéis ó thuairiscí earráide do chomhpháirtithe (ar nós dhéantóir an ghléis) chun cabhrú leo táirgí agus seirbhísí a oibríonn le Windows agus le táirgí agus seirbhísí eile de chuid Microsoft a fhabhtcheartú. Ní cheadaítear dóibh an fhaisnéis seo a úsáid ach amháin chun na táirgí agus na seirbhísí sin a dheisiú nó a fheabhsú. Chomh maith leis sin, féadfaimid roinnt sonraí diagnóiseacha comhiomlána, dí-aitheanta, cosúil le treochtaí ginearálta úsáide maidir le feidhmchláir agus gnéithe Windows, a chomhroinnt le tríú páirtithe roghnaithe.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi shonraí diagnóiseacha in Windows
.
Aithint breactha dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireachta
. Is féidir rogha a dhéanamh, leis, cabhrú le Microsoft aithint breactha dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireachta a fheabhsú trí shonraí diagnóiseacha breactha dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireachta a sheoladh. Má roghnaíonn tú é, baileoidh Microsoft samplaí den inneachar a chlóscríobhann nó a scríobhann tú chun gnéithe ar nós aithint lámhscríbhneoireachta, uathchríochnú, tuar an chéad fhocail eile agus ceartú litrithe a fheabhsú san iliomad teangacha a úsáideann custaiméirí Windows. Nuair a bhailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóiseacha breactha dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireachta, roinntear iad ina samplaí beaga chun aitheantóirí uathúla, faisnéis seicheamhaithe, agus sonraí eile (ar nós seoltaí ríomhphoist agus luachanna uimhriúla) a d'fhéadfaí a úsáid chun an t-inneachar bunaidh a atógáil nó an t-ionchur a ghaolú leatsa. Áirítear ann chomh maith sonraí feidhmíochta gaolmhara, ar nós athruithe a dhéantar de láimh ar théacs, mar aon le focail a chuir tú leis an bhfoclóir.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi bhreacadh dúigh agus clóscríbhneoireacht i Windows 10 a fheabhsú
.
Siar go barr
Tairiscintí pearsantaithe
Má roghnaíonn tú
Tairiscintí pearsantaithe
a chasadh air, úsáidfimid faisnéis faoi do ghléas agus faoin gcaoi a n-úsáideann tú é, lena n-áirítear sonraí diagnóiseacha Windows, in éineacht le d'fhaisnéis chuntais agus sonraí a bhailíonn táirgí agus seirbhísí eile de chuid Microsoft chun leideanna, fógraí agus moltaí pearsantaithe a chur ar fáil duit chun d'eispéiris Windows a fheabhsú. Áirítear in eispéiris shaincheaptha moltaí maidir le conas Windows a shaincheapadh agus a bharrfheabhsú, chomh maith le fógraí agus moltaí le haghaidh táirgí agus seirbhísí, gnéithe, feidhmchláir agus crua-earraí Microsoft agus tríú páirtí le haghaidh d'eispéiris Windows. Mar shampla, d'fhéadfadh Windows insint duit faoi ghnéithe nua chun cabhrú leat an leas is fearr a bhaint as do ghléas. Má shruthaíonn tú scannáin i do bhrabhsálaí, is féidir go molfaidh Windows feidhmchlár duit ón Microsoft Store, feidhmchlár a shruthaíonn ar shlí níos éifeachtaí. Nó, má tá tú ag rith as spás ar do thiomántán crua, is féidir go molfaidh Windows duit triail a bhaint as OneDrive nó crua-earraí a cheannach chun tuilleadh spáis a fháil.
Nuair a bhíonn tairiscintí pearsantaithe ar siúl, féadfaidh Windows do shonraí diagnóiseacha riachtanacha a úsáid chun tairiscintí a phearsantú. D’fhéadfadh faisnéis maidir le do ghléas, a shocruithe agus a chumais, agus cibé an bhfuil sé ag obair i gceart nó nach bhfuil a bheith san áireamh sna sonraí seo. Má tá cinneadh déanta agat sonraí diagnóiseacha roghnacha a roinnt, d'fhéadfadh go n-áireofaí sna sonraí a úsáidtear chun tairiscintí a phearsantú faisnéis faoin gcaoi a n-úsáideann tú feidhmchláir agus gnéithe, chomh maith le faisnéis bhreise faoi shláinte do ghléis. Féadfaimid faisnéis faoi do ghléas agus do ghníomhaíocht a úsáid freisin chun tairiscintí a phearsantú go háitiúil ar do ghléas, fiú nuair nach bhfágann na sonraí do ghléas. Ní bhainimid úsáid as ábhar dumpaí tuairteála, urlabhra, clóscríobh, nó sonraí ionchuir breactha dúigh chun tairiscintí a phearsantú.
Chomh maith le faisnéis faoi do ghléas agus faoin gcaoi a n-úsáideann tú é, lena n-áirítear sonraí diagnóiseacha Windows, féadfaimid na sonraí seo a leanas ó tháirgí eile Microsoft agus ó do chuntas a úsáid nó a chomhcheangal le sonraí diagnóiseacha Windows chun tairiscintí a phearsantú:
Gníomhaíocht Ghréasáin, má thugann tú cead do Microsoft Edge do ghníomhaíocht ghréasáin a bhailiú le haghaidh cuardaigh phearsantaithe, fógraí agus nuachta.
Eolas faoin úsáid a bhaineann tú as táirgí agus seirbhísí eile de chuid Microsoft, lena n-áirítear Microsoft Bing, Microsoft 365, Xbox, agus láithreáin ghréasáin Microsoft, amhail MSN.com.
Stair síntiúis agus ceannaigh.
Sonraí ó shuíomhanna gréasáin tríú páirtí a d'fhéadfaí a roinnt le Microsoft.
Féadfaimid faisnéis a úsáid freisin faoi d'idirghníomhaíochtaí le leideanna, moltaí agus promóisin chun na tairiscintí pearsantaithe agus teachtaireachtaí comhchosúla i dtáirgí eile Microsoft a sholáthar agus a fheabhsú.
Chun bainistiú a dhéanamh ar an gcaoi a n-úsáidtear sonraí a bhailíonn táirgí eile Microsoft chun tairiscintí a phearsantú, is féidir leat cuairt a thabhairt ar do
leathanach fógraí agus tairiscintí pearsantaithe
. D'fhéadfadh na sonraí a úsáidimid chun tairiscintí a phearsantú athrú le himeacht ama, ach beidh an liosta is déanaí d'fhoinsí sonraí ar an leathanach seo i gcónaí ionas gur féidir leat cinntí a dhéanamh maidir leis an gcaoi a n-úsáideann Microsoft do shonraí. I roinnt réigiún ar nós an Limistéir Eorpaigh Eacnamaíoch, stopann tairiscintí pearsantaithe ar Windows úsáid sonraí ó tháirgí microsoft eile chun leideanna, fógraí agus moltaí a phearsantú i Windows. I réigiúin eile, is féidir leat bainistiú a dhéanamh ar an gcaoi a n-úsáidtear sonraí a bhailíonn táirgí eile Microsoft chun tairiscintí a phearsantú trí chuairt a thabhairt ar do
leathanach fógraí agus tairiscintí pearsantaithe
.
Baintear úsáid as sonraí comhthéacsúla ó do ghléas agus roinnt sonraí bunúsacha cuntais chun teachtaireachtaí cuí a thaispeáint duit in Windows is cuma an múchtar an socrú tairiscintí pearsantaithe nó an úsáid a bhaintear as sonraí ó tháirgí eile Microsoft chun tairiscintí a phearsantú. Mar shampla, úsáidtear na sonraí seo chun a chinntiú go bhfuil an t-ábhar sa teanga cheart agus oiriúnach do d'aoisghrúpa.
Baineann tairiscintí pearsantaithe le leideanna, tairiscintí, fógraí agus moltaí a fheiceann tú i Windows. Ní bheidh tionchar ag athrú an tsocraithe seo ar na cineálacha tairiscintí a fheiceann tú i dtáirgí eile Microsoft. Is féidir leat an socrú seo a athrú ag am ar bith trí chuardach a dhéanamh ar
thairiscintí pearsantaithe
san fheidhmchlár Windows Settings.
Tuilleadh faisnéise faoi tairiscintí pearsantaithe
.
Eispéiris shaincheaptha
Tá tairiscintí pearsantaithe á gcur in ionad eispéiris shaincheaptha i leaganacha níos déanaí de Windows. Mura bhfuil an Windows Update is déanaí suiteáilte agat, b'fhéidir go bhfeicfidh tú eispéiris shaincheaptha ar do ghléas fós.
Má roghnaíonn tú Eispéiris shaincheaptha a chasadh air, úsáidfimid do shonraí diagnóiseacha Windows (Bunúsach nó Iomlán, mar a roghnaigh tú) chun leideanna, fógraí, agus moltaí pearsantaithe a thairiscint duit chun táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft a bhreisiú chun do riachtanais a chomhlíonadh. Má roghnaigh tú Bunúsach mar do shocrú sonraí diagnóiseacha, bunaítear pearsantú ar fhaisnéis maidir le do ghléas, a shocruithe agus cumais, agus cibé an bhfuil sé ag obair i gceart. Má roghnaigh tú Iomlán, bunaítear pearsantú ar fhaisnéis maidir leis na láithreáin ghréasáin a bhrabhsálann tú chomh maith, conas a úsáideann tú feidhmchláir agus gnéithe, mar aon le faisnéis bhreise maidir le sláinte do ghléis. Ní úsáidimid eolas i dtaobh na suíomhanna Gréasáin a bhrabhsálann tú, a bhfuil i ndumpaí tuairteála, sonraí ionchuir cainte, clóscríbhneoireachta, nó breactha dúigh chun pearsantú a dhéanamh, áfach, nuair a fhaighimid sonraí den sórt sin ó chustaiméirí a bhfuil Iomlán roghnaithe acu. Seoltar na sonraí sin ar aghaidh chuig Microsoft agus stóráiltear iad le haitheantóir uathúil amháin nó níos mó a chabhróidh linn úsáideoir aonair a shainaithint ar ghléas aonair, agus saincheisteanna seirbhíse agus patrúin úsáide an ghléis a thuiscint.
Áirítear in eispéiris shaincheaptha moltaí maidir le conas Windows a shaincheapadh agus a bharrfheabhsú, chomh maith le fógraí agus moltaí le haghaidh táirgí agus seirbhísí, gnéithe, feidhmchláir agus crua-earraí Microsoft agus tríú páirtí le haghaidh d'eispéiris Windows. Mar shampla, chun cabhrú leat gach buntáiste a bhaint as do ghléas, is féidir go n-inseoimid duit faoi ghnéithe nach eol duit nó gnéithe nua. Má tá fadhb agat le do ghléas Windows, is féidir go dtairgfear réiteach duit. Is féidir go dtairgfear deis duit chun do scáileán glasála a shaincheapadh le pictiúir, nó tuilleadh pictiúr den chineál a thaithníonn leat, nó níos lú den chineál nach dtaitníonn leat, a fheiceáil. Má shruthaíonn tú scannáin i do bhrabhsálaí, is féidir go molfar feidhmchlár duit ón Microsoft Store, a shruthaíonn ar shlí níos éifeachtaí. Nó, má tá tú ag rith as spás ar do thiomántán crua, is féidir go molfaidh Windows duit triail a bhaint as OneDrive nó crua-earraí a cheannach chun tuilleadh spáis a fháil.
Foghlaim tuilleadh faoi eispéiris shaincheaptha in Windows
.
Siar go barr
Lárionad Aiseolais
Is feidhmchlár réamhshuiteáilte é Lárionad Aiseolais a sholáthraíonn bealach chun aiseolas maidir le táirgí Microsoft agus feidhmchláir suiteáilte céad agus tríú páirtí a bhailiú. Nuair a úsáideann tú Lárionad Aiseolais. Léann Lárionad Aiseolais go tréimhsiúil an liosta feidhmchlár suiteáilte chun aipeanna a chinneadh ar féidir aiseolas a sheoladh ina leith. Cinneann an Mol Aiseolais na haipeanna atá suiteáilte ar do ghléas trí API poiblí. Ina theannta sin, le haghaidh HoloLens, baineann Feedback Hub úsáid as do cheamara agus do mhicreafón nuair a roghnaíonn tú do thimpeallacht agus d’fhuaim ionchurtha a roinnt. Baineann sé úsáid freisin as an leabharlann grianghraif agus comhaid chun seatanna scáileáin agus taifeadtaí scáileáin a rochtain a chuireann tú faoi iamh le seoladh mar chuid den aiseolas.
Féadfaidh tú síniú isteach sa Lárionad Aiseolais trí úsáid a bhaint as do chuntas Microsoft pearsanta nó as cuntas atá curtha ar fáil ag d'eagraíocht (amhail d'fhostóir nó scoil) a úsáideann tú chun síniú isteach i dtáirgí Microsoft. Má shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas oibre nó scoile ceadaítear duit aiseolas a chur ar fáil do Microsoft i gcomhpháirt le d’eagraíocht. D’fhéadfadh go mbeadh an t-aiseolas a sholáthraíonn tú nuair a úsáideann tú do chuntas oibre nó scoile nó do chuntas pearsanta Microsoft, infheicthe ag an bpobal, ag brath ar na socruithe atá cumraithe ag riarthóirí na heagraíochta. Ina theannta sin, má chuirtear aiseolas ar fáil trí úsáid a bhaint as do chuntas oibre nó scoile, is féidir le riarthóirí na heagraíochta féachaint ar an aiseolas tríd an Lárionad aiseolais.
Nuair a sheolann tú aiseolas faoi fhadhb chuig Microsoft, nó nuair a chuireann tú sonraí breise le fadhb, seolfar sonraí diagnóiseacha chuig Microsoft chun táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft a fheabhsú. Ag brath ar do shocruithe sonraí diagnóiseacha sa rannán
aiseolais&
Diagnóisic de shocruithe Windows, seolfaidh an Lárionad Aiseolas sonraí diagnóiseacha go huathoibríoch nó beidh an rogha agat iad a sheoladh chuig Microsoft ag an am a sholáthraíonn tú aiseolas. Bunaithe ar an gcatagóir a roghnaítear nuair a chuirtear isteach aiseolas, d’fhéadfaí sonraí pearsanta breise a bhailiú chun fabhtcheartú breise a dhéanamh ar na fadhbanna; mar shampla faisnéis a bhaineann le suíomh nuair a chuirtear isteach aiseolas faoi sheirbhísí suímh nó faisnéis a bhaineann le stánadh nuair a chuirtear isteach aiseolas faoin réaltacht mheasctha. Chomh maith leis sin, d’fhéadfadh Microsoft d’aiseolas agus na sonraí a bhailítear nuair a chuireann tú isteach d’aiseolas a chomhroinnt le comhpháirtithe Microsoft (mar shampla déantóir gléis nó forbróir dochtearraí) chun cabhrú leo táirgí agus seirbhísí a oibríonn le Windows agus le táirgí agus seirbhísí eile Microsoft a fhabhtcheartú.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi shonraí diagnóiseacha in Windows
.
Siar go barr
Faigh Cabhair
Cabhraíonn Cabhair úsáideoirí Windows chun tacaíocht teicniúil a fháil ar Windows agus feidhmchláir Microsoft eile. Soláthraíonn sé tacaíocht féinseirbhíse (cosúil le naisc le hailt chabhracha nó treoracha maidir le conas is féidir le húsáideoirí Windows fadhbanna a réiteach ina n-aonar), Diagnóisic, agus an custaiméir a nascadh le gníomhaire beo Microsoft de réir mar is cuí. Is féidir leat síniú isteach sa chomhpháirt Cabhair le do chuntas Microsoft chun cás tacaíochta do thomhaltóirí a chruthú. D'fhéadfadh sé go gceadófaí d'úsáideoirí cuntas fiontair cás tacaíochta do chustaiméirí a chruthú ag brath ar chonradh tacaíochta a n-eagraíochta, agus má chumasaíonn a riarthóir tionóntaí é.
Seans go molfaidh Cabhair duit Diagnóisic a rith. Má thoilíonn tú, láimhseáiltear sonraí diagnóiseacha de réir na rannáin
Diagnóisic
.
Má cheadaíonn socruithe an chórais é, féadfar micreafón an chórais a úsáid chun an cheist tacaíochta a ghabháil seachas an gá atá agat le clóscríobh. Is féidir leat é seo a rialú sna “Socruithe Príobháideachta Micreafóin” san fheidhmchlár Socruithe Windows. Gheobhaidh Cabhair rochtain freisin ar do Liosta Feidhmchlár chun cabhrú leis an Mol Aiseolais a oscailt go dtí an aip cheart má roghnaíonn tú tús a chur leis an bpróiseas aiseolais laistigh de Chabhair. Déanfaidh an Mol Aiseolais an t-aiseolas go léir a iontráil agus a rialú, mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán Mol Aiseolais den Ráiteas Príobháideachais seo. Ní úsáideann Cabhair do shonraí suímh mar chuid dá sheirbhísí.
Siar go barr
Foscríbhinní beo
Trá-scríobhann foscríbhinní beo fuaim chun cabhrú le tuiscint inneachar cainte. Is féidir le foscríbhinní beo foscríbhinní a ghiniúint ó fhuaim ar bith a bhfuil caint ann, cé acu atá an fhuaim ar líne, fuaim a d’íoslódáil tú ar do ghléas, nó fuaim a bhfuair tú ó do mhicreafón. De réir réamhshocraithe, tá tras-scríbhinn fuaim micreafóin díchumasaithe.
Ní phróiseáiltear sonraí gutha a chuirtear fotheideal orthu ach ar do ghléas agus ní chomhroinntear iad chuig an néal nó le Microsoft.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi fhoscríbhinní beo
.
Siar go barr
Seirbhísí suímh, brath gluaisne, agus taifeadadh
Seirbhís suímh Windows
. Cuireann Microsoft seirbhís suímh i bhfeidhm a chabhraíonn chun suíomh beacht geografach gléas sonrach Windows a dhearbhú. Ag brath ar chumais an ghléis, is féidir suíomh an ghléis a chinneadh le leibhéil éagsúla chruinnis agus d'fhéadfaí é a chinneadh go beacht i gcásanna áirithe. Nuair a bhíonn suíomh cumasaithe agat ar ghléas Windows, nó nuair atá cead tugtha agat d'fheidhmchláir Microsoft faisnéis suímh a rochtain ar ghléasanna nach gléasanna Windows iad, bailíonn Microsoft sonraí maidir le túir chille agus pointí rochtana Wi-Fi agus a gcuid suíomhanna agus cuirtear na sonraí sin leis an mbunachar sonraí suímh nuair a bhíonn aon sonraí a d'fhéadfadh a bheith mar bhonn leis an duine nó an gléas ónár bailíodh na sonraí curtha as an áireamh. Úsáidtear an eolas súimh neamh-aitheanta seo le seirbhísí suímh Microsoft a fheabhsú.
Is féidir le seirbhísí agus gnéithe Windows (amhail brabhsálaithe agus Cortana), feidhmchláir atá ag rith ar Windows, agus láithreáin ghréasáin atá oscailte i mbrabhsálaithe Windows rochtain a fháil ar shuíomh an ghléis trí Windows má cheadaíonn do shocruithe dóibh é sin a dhéanamh. Iarrann gnéithe agus feidhmchláir áirithe cead suímh nuair a shuiteálann tú Windows den chéad uair, iarrann cuid acu é an chéad uair a úsáideann tú an feidhmchlár, agus iarrann cuid eile é gach uair a mbíonn rochtain agat ar shuíomh an ghléis. Tá faisnéis maidir leis na cineálacha áirithe feidhmchlár de chuid Windows a úsáideann suíomh an ghléis le fáil i rannán
feidhmchláir Windows
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Nuair a bhíonn rochtain ag feidhmchlár nó ag gné ar shuíomh an ghléis agus nuair atá tú sínithe isteach le do chuntas Microsoft, déanfaidh do ghléas Windows a shuíomh a uaslódáil chuig an néal áit a mbeidh sé ar fáil ar do ghléasanna d'fheidhmchláir nó do sheirbhísí eile a úsáideann do chuntas Microsoft agus a bhfuil cead tugtha duit iad a úsáid. Ní choimeádfaimid ach an suíomh deireanach a bhí ar eolas (tagann gach suíomh nua in ionad an tsuímh roimhe). Stóráiltear sonraí maidir le stair suímh is déanaí ghléas Windows freisin ar an ngléas fiú mura bhfuil cuntas Microsoft in úsáid, agus is féidir le feidhmchláir agus gnéithe áirithe de chuid Windows rochtain a fháil ar an stair suímh seo. Is féidir leat stair suímh do ghléis a ghlanadh am ar bith i roghchlár socruithe Windows.
San feidhchlar Socruithe Windows, chomh maith leis sin feicfidh tú go bhfuil rochtain ag feidhmchláir ar shuíomh beacht an ghléis nó ar stair suímh do ghléis, is féidir rochtain ar shuíomh an ghléis le haghaidh feidhmchláir áirithe a chasadh as nó air, nó is féidir rochtain ar shuíomh an ghléis a chasadh as. Féadfaidh tú suíomh réamhshocraithe a shocrú chomh maith, a úsáidfear nuair nach féidir an tseirbhís suímh suíomh níos beaichte a roghnú don ghléas.
Tá roinnt eisceachtaí ar conas is féidir suíomh do ghléis a chinneadh nach bhfuil faoi bhainistíocht dhíreach na socruithe suímh.
Is cineál feidhmchláir ar leith iad feidhmchlár deisce nach n-iarrfaidh cead ar leith chun faisnéis shuíomh do ghléis a aimsiú agus nach mbeidh le feiceáil sa liosta óna roghnaíonn tú na feidhmchláir ar féidir leo do shuíomh a úsáid. Is féidir iad a íoslódáil ón Microsoft Store, ón Idirlíon nó a shuiteáil le cineálacha áirithe meáin (ar nós CD, DVD, nó gléas stórais USB). Lainseáiltear iad le comhad .EXE nó. DLL, agus de ghnáth ritheann siad ar do ghléas, murab ionann agus feidhmchláir bunaithe ar an nGréasán (a ritheann sa néal).
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi fheidhmchláir deisce tríú páirtí agus an chaoi a d'fhéadfaidís a bheith in ann suíomh do ghléis a chinneadh nuair atá socrú suímh an ghléis casta as
.
D'fhéadfadh feidhmchláir agus seirbhísí tríú páirtí áirithe a bhfuil ar fáil ar Windows teicneolaíochtaí eile a úsáid (cosúil le Bluetooth, Wi-Fi, móideim ceallach etc.) nó seirbhísí suímh néalbhunaithe le suíomh do ghléis a chinneadh le céimeanna éagsúla cruinnis fiú nuair a bhíonn socrú shuíomh an ghléis casta as agat.
I dteannta le cabhair a fháil i gcás éigeandála a éascú, uair ar bith a dhéanann tú glao éigeandála, déanfaidh Windows iarracht do shuíomh beacht a chinneadh agus a chomhroinnt, beag beann ar do shocruithe suímh. Má tá cárta SIM i do ghléas nó ná tá seirbhís cheallach in úsáid ar bhealach éigin eile, beidh rochtain ag d'oibreoir móibíleach ar shuíomh do ghléis.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi shuíomh in Windows 10
.
Suíomh Ginearálta
. Má chasann tú an ghné Suíomh Ginearálta air, i gcás feidhmchláir nach bhfuil rochtain ag do shuíomh beacht orthu, beidh rochtain acu ar do shuíomh ginearálta, ar nós do chathair, cód poist nó réigiún.
Aimsigh mo ghléas
. Ceadaíonn an ghné Aimsigh mo gléas do riarthóir ghléas iniompartha Windows suíomh an ghléis sin a aimsiú ó account.microsoft.com/devices. Chun Aimsigh mo ghléas a chumasú, ní mór go mbeadh riarthóir sínithe isteach le cuntas Microsoft agus go mbeadh an socrú suímh cumasaithe. Oibreoidh an ghné seo fiú amháin má tá rochtain ar shuíomh diúltaithe ag úsáideoirí eile dá bhfeidhmchláir uile. Nuair a dhéanann an riarthóir iarracht an gléas a aimsiú, feicfidh úsáideoirí fógra sa limistéar fógra.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi Aimsigh mo ghléas in Windows 10
.
Taifeadadh
. Tá gné thaifeadta i ngléasanna áirithe Windows trínar féidir leat gearrthóga fuaime agus físeán de do ghníomhaíocht a ghabháil ar an ngléas, do chumarsáid le daoine eile san áireamh. Más mian leat seisiún a thaifead, beidh an taifead sábháilte go háitiúil i do ghléas. I gcásanna áirithe, is féidir go mbeidh an rogha agat taifeadadh a tharchur chuig táirge nó seirbhís Microsoft a chraolann an taifeadadh go poiblí.
Tábhachtach Ba chóir duit do fhreagrachtaí dlíthiúla a thuiscint sula ndéantar aon chumarsáid a thaifeadadh agus/nó a tharchur. D’fhéadfadh go n-áireofaí air seo toiliú roimh ré a fháil ó gach duine a ghlacann páirt sa chomhrá nó aon údaruithe eile de réir mar is gá.
Níl Microsoft freagrach as an úsáid a bhaineann tú as gnéithe taifeadta nó do thaifeadtaí.
Siar go barr
Reacaire
Is feidhmchlár léitheoireachta scáileáin é Narrator a chabhraíonn leat Windows a úsáid gan scáileán. Tairgeann Reacaire cur síos cliste ar íomhánna agus teidil leathanach agus achoimrí ar leathanaigh Ghréasáin nuair a thagann tú ar íomhánna nach bhfuil cur síos orthu agus ar naisc dhébhríocha.
Nuair a roghnaíonn tú tuairisc íomhá a fháil trí Reacaire + Ctrl + D a bhrú, seolfar an íomhá chuig Microsoft chun anailís a dhéanamh ar an íomhá agus cur síos a ghiniúint. Ní úsáidtear íomhánna ach chun an tuairisc a ghiniúint agus ní stórálann Microsoft iad.
Nuair a roghnaíonn tú tuairiscí teidil leathanaigh a fháil trí Reacaire + Ctrl + D a bhrú, seolfar URL an tsuímh ar a bhfuil tú chuig Microsoft chun tuairisc teidil an leathanaigh a ghiniúint agus chun seirbhísí Microsoft a sholáthar agus a fheabhsú, amhail seirbhísí Bing mar a thuairiscítear i rannán Bing thuas.
Nuair a roghnaíonn tú liosta de naisc choitianta chuig leathanach Gréasáin a fháil trí Reacaire + a bhrú agus S a bhrú faoi dhó, seolfar URL an tsuímh ar a bhfuil tú chuig Microsoft chun tuairisc teidil an leathanaigh a ghiniúint agus chun seirbhísí Microsoft a sholáthar agus a fheabhsú, amhail seirbhísí Bing.
Is féidir leat na gnéithe seo a dhíchumasú ag am ar bith ach dul chuig
Reacaire>Faigh tuairiscí íomhá, teidil leathanaigh agus naisc mhóréilimh
i Socruithe in Windows.
Is féidir leat aiseolas a sheoladh freisin faoi Reacaire le cabhrú le Microsoft fadhbanna le Reacaire a aithint agus a réiteach agus táirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft, mar Windows, a fheabhsú. Is féidir aiseolas ó bhéal a chur isteach ag am ar bith i Reacaire trí Eochair Reacaire + Alt + F a úsáid. Nuair a úsáideann tú an t-ordú seo, seolfar an feidhmchlár Lárionad Aiseolais, ionas go mbeidh an deis agat aiseolas ó bhéal a chur isteach. Má chumasaíonn tú an socrú "Cabhraigh le ‘Reacaire’ a fheabhsú" san fheidhmchlár ‘socruithe Windows’, agus cuireann tú aiseolas ó bhéal isteach tríd an Lárionad Aiseolais, cuirfear sonraí gléis agus úsáide a bailíodh le déanaí, lena n-áirítear sonraí loga rianaithe tarlaithe (ETL), isteach in éineacht le d'aiseolas ó bhéal chun feabhas a chur ar tháirgí agus ar sheirbhísí Microsoft, amhail Windows.
Siar go barr
Nasc fóin - Nasc le Windows
Ligtear duit leis an ngné Phone Link d’fhón Android a nascadh le do Chuntas Microsoft agus le d’iPhone trí Bluetooth chun nascadh le do ríomhaire Windows. Nascfaidh do ghléas Android le do Chuntas Microsoft agus nascfaidh d’iPhone trí Bluetooth, lena gcumasaítear réimse eispéireas tras-ghléis thar do ghléasanna Windows uile nuair atá tú sínithe isteach nó nasctha trí Bluetooth. Is féidir Nasc Fóin a úsáid chun féachaint ar ghrianghraif a tógadh le déanaí ó d'fhón Android ar do ghléas Windows; glaonna a dhéanamh agus a fháil ó d'fhón Android ar do ghléas Windows; féachaint ar theachtaireachtaí téacs agus iad a sheoladh ó do ghléas Windows; gníomhaíochtaí eile maidir le fógraí fón Android a fheiceáil, a ruaigeadh nó a dhéanamh ar do ghléas Windows; do scáileán fóin a chomhroinnt ar do ghléas Windows trí fheidhm scáthánaithe Nasc Fóin; agus rochtain láithreach a fháil ar fheidhmchláir Android suiteáilte ar d’fhón Android ar do ghléas Windows. Is féidir leat úsáid a bhaint as Phone Link chun glaonna a chur agus a fháil, féachaint ar théacsanna agus iad a sheoladh, agus féachaint air, diúltú do nó gníomhaíochtaí eile a dhéanamh i dtaca le fógra ó do ghléas Windows.
Chun Phone Link a úsáid, caithfidh Link to Windows a bheith suiteáilte ar do ghléas Android. Is féidir leat freisin Phone Link a íoslódáil do d’iPhone go roghnach.
Chun Phone Link a úsáid, ní mór duit logáil isteach i do chuntas Microsoft ar an ngné Phone Link ar do ghléas Windows agus ar Link to Windows ar d'fhón Android nó Bluetooth a bheith cumasaithe ar d’iPhone. Caithfidh d’fhón Android agus do ghléas Windows a bheith nasctha leis an idirlíon. Beidh ort Bluetooth a chumasú agus d’fhón a phéireáil le do ríomhaire do gnéithe áirithe. Chun feidhm Glaonna a úsáid, ní mór Bluetooth a bheith cumasaithe ar d'fhón Android.
Ar feadh cumasaithe do ghléas Windows, is féidir leat roghnú chun d’fhón a nascadh le do chuntas Microsoft. Sínigh isteach i Nasc le Windows ar d’fhón Android, deonaigh ceadanna agus cuir an eispéireas ionduchtuithe i gcrích chun seo a dhéanamh. Agus é curtha i gcrích, sioncronaigh Link to Windows do shonraí do do ríomhairí Windows uile mar a shínigh tú isteach i do chuntas Microsoft. Féach thíos le haghaidh mionsonraí ar an dóigh a úsáidtear do shonraí.
Mar chuid de ghnéithe Nasc Fóin a sholáthar duit, bailíonn Microsoft sonraí feidhmíochta, úsáide agus gléis lena n-áirítear, mar shampla, cumais chrua-earraí d'fhóin phóca agus do ghléis Windows, líon agus fad do sheisiún ar Nasc Fóin, agus an méid a chaith tú ar chumrú.
Is féidir leat d’fhón Android a dhínascadh de do ghléas Windows ag am ar bith trí dul isteach i do shocruithe Phone Link agus a roghnú d’fhón Android a bhaint. Is féidir leat an rud céanna a dhéanamh ó na socruithe in Link to Windows ar d’fhón Android. Chun faisnéis mhionsonraithe a fháil, féach
ar ár leathanach tacaíochta
.
Is féidir leat d’iPhone a dhínascadh de do ghléas Windows ag am ar bith trí dul isteach i do shocruithe Phone Link agus a roghnú d’fhón Android a bhaint. Is féidir leat an rud céanna a dhéanamh ó d’iPhone trí dhul isteach i
Socruithe > Bluetooth > Roghnaigh ainm do ríomhaire > cliceáil an deilbhín (i) >
agus
Déan Dearmad ar an nGléas seo
a roghnú. Is féidir le gach úsáideoir an phéireáil Bluetooth a bhaint trí na heispéiris a dhíchumasú.
Teachtaireachtaí Téacs – gléasanna Android.
Ligeann Nasc Fóin duit féachaint ar theachtaireachtaí téacs a fhaigheann tú ar d'fhón Android ar do ghléas Windows agus teachtaireachtaí téacs a sheoladh ó do ghléas Windows. Teachtaireachtaí téacs a fuarthas agus a seoladh le 30 lá anuas agus iad sin amháin a bheidh le feiceáil ar do ghléas Windows. Stóráiltear na teachtaireachtaí téacs seo go sealadach ar do ghléas Windows. Ní stórálaimid do theachtaireachtaí téacs riamh ar ár bhfreastalaithe ná ní dhéanaimid aon teachtaireachtaí téacs a athrú ná a scriosadh ar d'fhón Android. Feicfidh tú teachtaireachtaí a sheoladh trí SMS (Seirbhís Gearrtheachtaireachtaí) agus MMS (Seirbhís Cur Teachtaireachta Ilmheáin) ar ghléasanna Android agus teachtaireachtaí a seoladh trí RCS (Seirbhísí Saibhre Cumarsáide) ar ghléasanna Samsung áirithe atá ar líonraí oibreoir móibíleach áirithe a fheiceáil. Chun an feidhmiúlacht seo a chur ar fáil, osclaíonn Nasc Fóin ábhar do theachtaireachtaí agus eolas teagmhála na ndaoine nó na ngnólachtaí óna bhfaigheann tú teachtaireachtaí téacs nó a seolann tú teachtaireachtaí téacs chucu.
Teachtaireachtaí Téacs – iPhones.
Ligeann Nasc Fóin duit féachaint ar theachtaireachtaí a seoladh chuig d’iPhone ar do ghléasanna Windows agus teachtaireachtaí téacs a sheoladh ó do ghléas Windows. Ní bheidh ach teachtaireachtaí téacs a fuarthas agus a seoladh laistigh de do sheisiún Bluetooth nó iMessage le feiceáil ar do ghléasanna Windows. Stóráiltear na teachtaireachtaí téacs seo go sealadach ar do ghléas Windows. Ní stórálaimid do theachtaireachtaí téacs riamh ar ár bhfreastalaithe ná ní dhéanaimid aon teachtaireachtaí téacs a athrú ná a scriosadh ar d'iPhone. Is féidir leat teachtaireachtaí a seoladh tríd SMS (Seirbhís Gearrtheachtaireachtaí) a fheiceáil. Chun an feidhmiúlacht seo a chur ar fáil, osclaíonn Nasc Fóin ábhar do theachtaireachtaí agus eolas teagmhála na ndaoine nó na ngnólachtaí óna bhfaigheann tú teachtaireachtaí téacs nó a seolann tú teachtaireachtaí téacs chucu.
Glaonna – gléasanna Android.
Ligeann  Nasc Fóin duit glaonna a dhéanamh agus a fháil ó d'fhón Android ar do ghléas Windows. Tríd Nasc Fóin, is féidir leat do ghlaonna le déanaí a fheiceáil ar do ghléas Windows freisin. Chun an ghné seo a ghníomhachtú, ní mór duit ceadanna áirithe a chumasú ar do ghléas Windows agus ar d'fhón Android, leithéidí rochtain ar logaí glaonna agus cead chun glaonna fóin a dhéanamh ó do ríomhaire. Is féidir na ceadanna seo a aisghairm uair ar bith ar leathanach socruithe Nasc Fóin ar do ghléas Windows agus i socruithe d'fhóin Android. Glaonna a fuarthas agus a rinneadh le 30 lá anuas agus iad sin amháin a bheidh le feiceáil faoi logaí glaonna ar do ghléas Windows. Stóráiltear mionsonraí na nglaonna sin go sealadach ar do ghléas Windows. Ní athraímid ná ní scriosaimid stair do ghlaonna ar d'fhón Android.
Glaonna – iPhones.
Ligeann Nasc Fóin duit glaonna a chur agus a fháil ó d’iPhone ar do ghléas Windows. Tríd Nasc Fóin, is féidir leat do ghlaonna le déanaí a fheiceáil ar do ghléas Windows freisin. Chun an ghné a ghníomhú, ní mór duit an ghné Sioncronaigh Teagmhálaithe a chumasú faoi shocruithe Bluetooth ar d’iPhone. Stóráiltear mionsonraí na nglaonna sin go sealadach ar do ghléas Windows. Ní athraímid ná ní scriosaimid stair do ghlaonna ar d'fhón Android.
Grianghraif – gléasanna Android.
Ligeann  Nasc Fóin duit grianghraif ó d'fhón Android a chóipeáil, a chomhroinnt, a chur in eagar, a shábháil nó a scriosadh ó d’fhón Android ar do ghléas Windows. Ní bheidh ach líon teoranta do na ghrianghraif is déanaí ó albam an cheamara agus ón bhfillteán Gabhálacha scáileáin ar d'fhón Android le feiceáil ar do ghléas Windows ag aon uair amháin. Stóráiltear na grianghraif seo go sealadach ar do ghléas Windows, agus de réir mar a ghlacann tú tuilleadh grianghraf ar d'fhón Android, bainimid na cóipeanna sealadacha de sheanghrianghraif ó do ghléas Windows. Ní stórálaimid do ghrianghraif riamh ar ár bhfreastalaithe ná ní dhéanaimid aon ghrianghraif a athrú ná a scriosadh ar d'fhón Android.
Fógraí – gléasanna Android.
Ligeann Nasc Fóin duit fógraí d’fhóin Android a fheiceáil ar do ghléas Windows. Trí Nasc Fóin, is féidir leat fógraí d'fhóin Android a léamh agus a ruaigeadh ó do ghléas Windows, nó gníomhaíochtaí eile maidir le fógraí a dhéanamh. Chun an ghné seo a ghníomhachtú ar Nasc Fóin, ní mór duit ceadanna áirithe a chumasú, leithéidí sioncronaigh fógraí ar do ghléas Windows agus ar d'fhón Android araon. Is féidir na ceadanna seo a aisghairm uair ar bith ar leathanach socruithe Nasc Fóin ar do ghléas Windows agus i socruithe d'fhóin Android. Chun faisnéis mhionsonraithe a fháil, féach
ar ár leathanach tacaíochta
.
Fógraí – iPhones.
Ligeann Nasc Fóin duit fógraí d’iPhone a fheiceáil ar do ghléas Windows. Trí Phone Link, is féidir leat fógraí d'iPhone a léamh agus a dhiúltú ó do ghléas Windows, nó gníomhaíochtaí eile maidir le fógraí a dhéanamh. Chun an ghné Phone Link seo a ghníomhú, ní mór duit ceadanna áirithe a chumasú, leithéidí sioncronaigh fógraí ar do ghléas Windows agus ar d'iPhone araon. Is féidir na ceadanna seo a aisghairm uair ar bith ar leathanach socruithe phone Link ar do ghléas Windows agus i socruithe Bluetooth d'iPhone.
Scáthánú Scáileáin Fóin - gléasanna Android.
Ar ghléasanna a dtacaítear leo
, ligeann Nasc Fóin duit féachaint ar scáileán d'fhóin Android ar do ghléas Windows. Beidh scáileán d'fhóin Android le feiceáil agat ar do ghléas Windows mar shruth picteilíní agus seinnfear aon fhuaim a chumasaíonn tú ar scáileán d'fhóin Android fad a bhíonn sé nasctha le do ghléas Windows trí Nasc Fóin ar d'fhón Android.
Frithchaitheamh feidhmchlár – gléasanna Android.
Ar ghléasanna a dtacaítear leo, ligeann Nasc Fóin duit d’fheidhmchláir Android atá suiteáilte ar d’fhón Android a úsáid ar do ghléas Windows. Mar shampla, is féidir leat feidhmchlár ceoil a lainseáil i do sheisiúin Windows agus éisteacht le fuaim ón feidhmchlár sin ar do challairí ríomhaire. Bailíonn Microsoft liosta de d’fheidhmchláir Android agus ghníomhachtaí le déanaí chun an seirbhís a sholáthar agus taispeáint duit d’fheidhmchláir a úsáideach is déanaí. Ní stórálann Microsoft cén feidhmchlár atá suiteáilte agat nó faisnéis ar bith atá curtha ar taispeáint ag an feidhmchlár san eispéireas atá agat leis.
Aistriú inneachair – gléasanna Android.
Ar ghléasanna a dtacaítear leo, ligeann Nasc Fóin duit inneachar amhail comhaid, doiciméid, grianghraif, srl. a chóipeáil agus a ghreamú idir d’fhón Android agus do ghléas Windows. Is féidir leat inneachar a aistríu ó d’fhón Android chuig do ghléas Windows agus ó dó ghléas Windows chuig d’fhón Android trí inneachair tarraing agus scaoil idir na gléasanna.
Ball te láithreach – gléasanna Android.
Ar ghléasanna a dtacaítear leo, cumasaíonn Nasc le Windows d’úsáideoirí sonraí ball te móibíleach a chomhroinnt lena ríomhaire péireáilte thar chumarsáid Bluetooth slán. Is féidir d’fheidhmchlár ríomhaire a nascadh leis an idirlíon tríd an eitleog líonra Windows ansin. Tabhair faoi deara go bhfuil seans go mbeidh táillí sonraí i bhfeidhm ag brath ar an bplean sonraí móibíleacha atá agat.
Sioncronú teagmhálaithe – gléasanna Android.
Ligeann Nasc le Windows duit do theagmhálaithe Android a shionscronú leis an néal Microsoft chun iad a rochtain i dtáirgí agus seirbhísí Microsoft eile. Is féidir leat an ghné seo a chumasú trí dul chuig socruithe Nasc le Windows agus an ghné “Sioncrónú teagmhálaí” a chumasú. Stóráiltear do shonraí teagmhálaithe ar líne agus comhcheanglaítear le do chuntas Microsoft iad. Is féidir leat roghnú chun sioncrónú a díchumasú agus na teagmhálaithe seo a scriosadh ag am ar bith.
Tuilleadh faisnéise
.
Sioncronú teagmhálaithe – iPhone.
Ligean Nasc Fóin duit do theagmhálaithe a shioncrónú ó d’iPhone chun iad a rochtain le haghaidh teachtaireachtaí agus glaonna. Is féidir leat an ghné seo a chumasú ach a dhul chuig socruithe Bluetooth ar d’iPhone agus scorán ar Sioncronú Teagmhálaithe faoi ainm do ríomhaire tar éis d’iPhone a nascadh le Phone Link. Is féidir leat a roghnú sioncronú a dhíchumasú ag am ar bith trí Sioncronú Teagmhálaithe a scorán as.
Téacs go guth.
Áirítear i ngnéithe Nasc Fóin feidhmiúlacht inrochtaineachta cosúil le téacs go guth. Féadfaidh tú gné téacs go guth a ghníomhachtú, a chumasaíonn duit ábhar teachtaireachta téacs nó fógra a chloisteáil mar fhuaim. Má ghníomhachtaíonn tú an ghné seo, léifear do theachtaireachtaí téacs agus d'fhógraí os ard de réir mar a fhaightear iad.
Fiontar Office – Gléasanna Android.
Ligeann an Nasc le Windows duit grianghraif a chur i leaganacha gréasáin agus deisce feidhmchlár áirithe Microsoft 365 amhail PowerPoint, Excel agus Word go díreach ó d’fhón póca. Éilíonn sé seo ar do riarthóir TR Eispéiris roghnacha nasctha le haghaidh Microsoft Office a chumasú agus beidh ort do ghléas móibíleach a cheangail le do chuntas oibre nó scoile agus cead ghrianghraf a sholáthar do do chuntas. Tar éis ionduchtuithe, mairfidh do sheisiúin 15 nóiméad chun cumasú duit do ghrianghraif a aistriú ó do ghléas móibíleach. Chun an gné seo a úsáid arís, beidh ort do chód QR a scanadh arís. Ní bhailíonn Nasc le Windows do chuntas oibre nó scoile nó faisnéis faoi do Fhiontar. Chun an seirbhís seo a sholáthar, baineann Microsoft úsáid as seirbhís néil chun do chomhaid a aistriú le grianghraif a chur i leaganacha gréasáin agus deisce de aipeanna áirithe Microsoft 365 m.s do chomhaid PowerPoint Online nó Word Online.
Siar go barr
Eispéiris thrasghléis
Curfidh Eispéiris thrasghléasanna tú ar do chumas rochtain a dhéanamh ar do ghléas móibíleach ón ríomhaire leis an gcuntas Microsoft atá agat. Is féidir iad seo a bhainistiú faoi ‘Gléasanna móibíleach’ sa rannán Bluetooth & Gléasanna i do shocruithe Windows PC. Mar chuid de na seibhísí sep a fheabhsú, bailaíonn Microsoft sonraí maidir le feidhmíocht agus úsáid mar atá eolas faoi chumas crua-earraí do ghléas móibíleach agus gléasanna Windows. Is féidir leat seo a chasadh as nó air in am ar bith i do shocruithe Windows PC.
Úsáid do ghléas móibíleach mar cheamara nasctha.
Cuireann an gné seo tú ar do chumas ceamara do ghléas móibileach a úsáid in aipeanna nó tairgí a thacaíonn le do cheamara. Is féidir an gné seo a chumasú iad seo faoi ‘Gléasanna móibíleacha’ sa rannán Gléasanna &Bluetooth sna socruithe ar do ríomhaire. Ní dhéanann Microsoft taifead ar do chuid seisiún ceamaraí nó ar aon eolas a thaispeántar ag do cheamara in aon aip nó táirgí.
Faigh fógraí grianghraif ó do gléas móibíleach.
Ligeann an gné seo duit fógraí a fháil ó do gléas móibíleach nasctha ar do ríomhaire Windows. Tá na grianghraif seo i dtaisce ar do ríomhaire Windows agus tú ag cur na grianghraif seo in eagar nó á oscailt. Beidh ort tús a chur le sábhail ar do ríomhaire pearsanta leis na grianghraif sin a chur i dtaisce go dtí go scriosann tú iad. Ní stórálaimid do ghrianghraif riamh ar ár bhfreastalaithe ná ní dhéanaimid aon ghrianghraif a athrú ná a scriosadh ar d'fhón Android.
Taispeáin do ghléas móibíleach i Taiscéalaí Comhad
. Ligeann an ghné sin duit rochtain a fháil ar chomhaid do ghléis mhóibíligh in Taiscéalaí Comhad. Is féidir an gné seo a chumasú iad seo faoi ‘Gléasanna móibíleacha’ sa rannán Gléasanna &Bluetooth sna socruithe ar do ríomhaire. Ní stórálfaidh Microsoft inneachar do chomhaid ina sheirbhísí.
Siar go barr
Gnéithe slándála agus sábháilteachta
Criptiú gléis
. Cabhraíonn criptiú an ghléis na sonraí atá stóráilte ar do ghléas a chosaint agus é á chriptiú le cabhair BitLocker Drive Encription. Nuair atá an criptiú gléis cumasaithe, déanfaidh Windows an tiomántán ina bhfuil Windows suiteáilte a chriptiú go huathoibríoch agus eochair athshlánú a chruthú. Déantar cóip chúltaca go huathoibríoch ar an gcnaipe athshlánaithe BitLocker i do chuntas pearsanta OneDrive Microsoft. Ní úsáideann Microsoft do chnaipí aonair athshlánaithe ar chúis ar bith.
Uirlis Bainte Bogearraí Mailíseacha
. Beidh an Uirlís Bainte Bogearraí Mailíseacha (MSRT) ag rith i do ghléas ar a laghad uair in aghaidh na míosa mar chuid de Windows Update. Seiceálann an MSRT gléasanna le haghaidh ionfhabhtú ó bhogearraí mailíseacha sonracha ("bogearraí mailíseacha") agus cabhraíonn sé chun aon ionfhabhtú a aimsítear a bhaint. Nuair a ritear an MSRT, baineann sé na bogearraí mailíseacha a liostaítear ar shuíomh gréasáin Microsoft Support má tá na bogearraí sin i láthair ar do ghléas. I rith seiceála le haghaidh bogearraí mailíseacha, seolfar tuairisc chuig Microsoft ina mbeidh sonraí sonracha na mbogearraí mailíseacha a braitheadh, earráidí agus sonraí eile maidir le do ghléas. Mura mian leat go seolfadh an MSRT na sonraí sin chuig Microsoft, is féidir comhpháirt tuairiscithe an MSRT a dhíchumasú.
Teaghlach Microsoft
. Is féidir le tuismitheoirí Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft a úsáid chun tuiscint agus teorainn a chur i bhfeidhm ar an chaoi a n-úsáideann na páistí a ngléas. Caith súil siar go cúramach ar an bhfaisnéis ag
Sábháilteacht Teaghlaigh Microsoft
má tá rogha á dhéanamh agat grúpa teaghlaigh á chruthú nó páirt a ghlacadh ann. Má chónaíonn tú i réigiún a dteastaíonn cead uait chun cuntas a chruthú chun seirbhísí Microsoft a rochtain, is féidir go mbeidh leid agat iarratas a dhéanamh nó toiliú tuismitheora a thabhairt. Má tá úsáideoir faoi aois reachtúil i do réigiún, iarrfar orthu cead tuismitheora nó caomhnóir a iarraidh trí ríomhphost duine fásta a ’ iontráil. Nuair atá an tuairisc gníomhaíochta Teaghlaigh cumasaithe do pháiste, baileoidh Microsoft sonraí faoi conas a úsáideann an páiste an gléas agus seolfaidh sé tuairisc chuig na tuismitheoirí faoi sin. Scriosadh go rialta tuairiscí ghníomhaíochta ó freastalaí Microsoft.
SmartScreen Microsoft Defender agus Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste
. Oibríonn Microsoft chun cabhrú le do ghléas agus do phasfhocail a chosaint ó fheidhmchláir, comhaid agus inneachar gréasáin neamhshábháilte.
Cabhraíonn SmartScreen Microsoft Defender leat a chosaint agus tú ag úsáid ár seirbhísí trí bagairtí ortsa, ar do ghléas nó ar do phasfhocail. Is féidir feidhmchláir nó inneachar gréasán a d'fhéadfadh a bheith neamhshábháilte a aimsíonn SmartScreen Microsoft Defender agus é ag seiceáil suíomhanna a thugann tú cuairt orthu, comhaid a íoslódálann tú agus feidhmchláir a suiteálann agus ritheann tú a bheith curtha san áireamh sna bagairtí seo. Agus SmartScreen Microsoft Defender ag seiceáil inneachar feidhmchlár agus Gréasáin, seoltar sonraí maidir leis an inneachar agus do ghléas chuig Microsoft, lena n-áirítear seoladh iomlán Gréasáin an inneachair. Nuair a bhíonn gá le hanailís bhreise chun bagairtí slándála a aithint, féadfar faisnéis faoin suíomh gréasáin nó faoi bhfeidhmchlár amhrasach—amhail an t-inneachar a thaispeántar, na fuaimeanna a seinntear agus cuimhne feidhmchláir—a sheoladh chuig Microsoft. Ní bhainfear úsáid as na sonraí seo ach chun críocha slándála chun teagmhais slándála, goid céannachta, calaoise, nó gníomhaíochtaí mailíseacha, meabhlacha nó mídhleathacha eile a bhrath, a chosaint ina gcoinne agus chun freagairt dóibh. Má bhraitheann SmartScreen Microsoft Defender go bhféadfadh inneachar a bheith neamhshábháilte, feicfidh tú fógra foláirimh in áit an inneachair. Is féidir SmartScreen Microsoft Defender a chasadh air nó as sa feidhmchlár Slándáil Windows.
Sna cásanna a thacaítear leis, cabhraíonn Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste le bogearraí atá suiteáilte agus a ritheann ar do ghléas a sheiceáil chun cinntiú má tá sé mailíseach, gan iarraidh b’fhéidir, nó má tá bagairtí ar tusa agus do ghléas eile i gceist. Ar ghléas tacaithe, tosaíonn Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste i mód meastóireachta agus úsáidtear na sonraí a bhailímid ar son SmartScreen Microsoft Defender amhail ainm comhaid, heais d'inneachar an chomhaid, suíomh an íoslódála, agus deimhnithe digiteacha an chomhaid, chun cinntiú má tá do ghléas ina iarrathóir maith chun Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste a úsáid le haghaidh cosaint slándála breise. Níl Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste cumasaithe agus ní chuirfidh sé bac le linn an mód meastóireachta B’fhéidir nach iarrthóirí maith iad gléasanna áirithe dá chuirfeadh Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste isteach taobh amuigh de sin ar tascanna úsáideora beartaithe agus dlisteanacha - mar shampla, forbróirí a úsáideann cuid mhaith comhaid neamhshínithe. Más iarrthóir maith do Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste tusa, castar air go huathoibríoch ansin é, agus cuirfidh sé cosaint breise ar do ghléas ar fáil taobh amuigh de SmartScreen Microsoft Defender Mura bhfuil treoracha breise ann, ní bheidh Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste ar fáil agus beidh sé casta as go buan. Mura tacaítear le do ghléas nó mura iarrthóir maith do Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste é, leanann SmartScreen Microsoft Defender ar aghaidh le do ghléas a chosaint. Nuair a chuimsítear Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste agus aithníonn sé feidhmchlár mar mailíseach, gan iarraidh b’fhéidir nó neamhaithnid agus neamhshínithe, cuirfidh sé bac agus tabharfaidh sé fógra duit sula osclaíonn, ritheann nó suiteálann sé an feidhmchlár.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste
.
Agus SmartScreen Microsoft Defender nó Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste ag seiceáil comhad, seoltar sonraí maidir leis an gcomhad sin chuig Microsoft, lena n-áirítear ainm an chomhaid, heais d'inneachar an chomhaid, suíomh an íoslódála, agus deimhnithe digiteacha an chomhaid.
Is féidir Rialú Feidhmchlár Cliste a chasadh air nó as sa feidhmchlár Slándáil Windows.
Clár Frithvíreas Microsoft Defender
. Cuardaíonn Clár Frithvíreas Microsoft Defender bogearraí gan iarraidh, feidhmchláir a d'fhéadfadh a bheith gan iarraidh, agus inneachar mailíseach eile ar do ghléas. Castar Clár Frithvíreas Microsoft Defender air go huathoibríoch ar do ghléas chun é a chosaint mura bhfuil aon bhogearraí frith-bhogearraí mailíseacha eile á chosaint go gníomhach. Má tá Clár Frithvíreas Microsoft Defender casta air, déanfaidh sé monatóireacht ar stádas slándála do ghléis. Nuair a bhíonn Clár Frithvíreas Microsoft Defender casta air, nó ag rith toisc go bhfuil Scanadh Teoranta Tréimhsiúil cumasaithe, seolfaidh sé tuairiscí go huathoibríoch chuig Microsoft ina bhfuil sonraí faoi bhogearraí mailíseacha amhrasta agus bogearraí eile gan iarraidh, feidhmchláir a d'fhéadfadh a bheith gan iarraidh, agus uaireanta comhaid ina bhfuil bogearraí mailíseacha, b'fhéidir. Más féidir le sonraí pearsanta a bheith i dtuairisc, ní sheolfar an tuairisc go huathoibríoch, agus gheobhaidh tú nod sula seoltar í. Is féidir leat Clár Frithvíreas Microsoft Defender a chumrú ar bhealach nach seolfar tuairiscí agus bogearraí mailíseacha amhrasta chuig Microsoft.
Siar go barr
Caint, gníomhachtú gutha, breacadh dúigh agus clóscríobh
Caint
. Cuireann Microsoft gné aitheanta cainte ghléasbhunaithe agus teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte néalbhunaithe (ar líne) ar fáil.
Ach an socrú aitheanta cainte ar líne a chasadh air, ceadaíonn sé d'fheidhmchláir aithint cainte néalbhunaithe Microsoft a úsáid. Lena chois sin, Windows 10, cumasaíonn an socrú aitheanta cainte ar líne do chumas deachtú a úsáid laistigh de Windows.
Má chasann tú caint air agus tú ag cumrú gléas HoloLens nó ag suiteáil Windows Mixed Reality, beidh tú in ann do ghuth a úsáid d'orduithe, deachtú agus idirghníomhaíochtaí feidhmchláir. Cumasófar aithint cainte gléasbhunaithe agus socruithe aitheanta cainte ar líne araon. Agus an dá shocrú cumasaithe, beidh an gléas ag éisteacht le d'ionchur gutha fad a bhíonn do ghléas cinn casta air agat, agus seolfar do shonraí gutha chuig teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte néalbhunaithe Microsoft.
Nuair a úsáideann tú teicneolaíochtaí aitheanta cainte néalbhunaithe ó Microsoft, cibé an gcumasaítear iad leis an socrú aitheanta cainte ar líne nó nuair a idirghníomhaíonn tú le HoloLens nó le clóscríobh gutha, bailíonn agus úsáideann Microsoft do thaifeadtaí gutha chun an tseirbhís aitheanta cainte a sholáthar trí thras-scríobh téacs de na focail labhartha sna sonraí gutha a chruthú. Ní stórálfaidh Microsoft, ní samplálfaidh Microsoft agus ní éistfidh Microsoft le do thaifeadtaí gutha gan do chead. Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoin gcaoi a ndéanann Microsoft bainistíocht ar do shonraí gutha, féach
teicneolaíochtaí Aithint cainte
.
Is féidir leat aithint cainte gléasbhunaithe a úsáid gan do shonraí gutha a sheoladh chuig Microsoft. Mar sin féin, cuireann teicneolaíochtaí aithint cainte néalbhunaithe Microsoft cumas aitheanta níos cruinne ar fáil ná mar a dhéanann an aithint cainte gléasbhunaithe. Nuair atá an socrú aitheanta cainte ar líne casta as, oibreoidh seirbhísí cainte nach mbraitheann ar an néal agus a bhaineann úsáid as aithint gléasbhunaithe amháin - amhail fotheidil bheo, Narrator, nó rochtain gutha - fós agus ní bhaileoidh Microsoft aon sonraí gutha.
Is féidir leat aithint cainte ar líne a chasadh as am ar bith. Stopfaidh sé seo aon fheidhmchláir a bhraitheann ar an socrú aitheanta cainte ar líne ó do shonraí gutha a sheoladh chuig Microsoft. Má tá gléas cinn á úsáid HoloLens nó Windows Mixed Reality, is féidir aithint cainte gléasbhunaithe a chasadh as uair ar bith. Ciallóidh sé sin nach féidir leis an ngléas bheith ag éisteacht le d'ionchur gutha.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le haithint cainte in Windows
.
Gníomhachtú Gutha
. Soláthraíonn Windows feidhmchláir faoi thacaíocht leis an gcumas freagairt a thabhairt agus gníomhú bunaithe ar eochairfhocail gutha a bhaineann go sonrach leis an bhfeidhmchlár sin—mar shampla ligean do Cortana éisteacht le "Hey Cortana" agus freagairt a thabhairt uirthi.
Má tá cead tugtha agat d'fheidhmchlár éisteacht le haghaidh eochairfhocail ghutha, beidh Windows ag éisteacht go gníomhach leis an micreafón le haghaidh na n-eochairfhocal sin. A luaithe a aithnítear eochairfhocal, beidh rochtain ag an bhfeidhmchlár ar do thaifeadadh gutha, agus is féidir leis an taifeadadh a phróiseáil, gníomhú, agus freagairt a dhéanamh, le freagra labhartha, mar shampla. Is féidir go seolfaidh an feidhmchlár an taifeadadh gutha chuig a sheirbhísí féin sa néal chun na horduithe a phróiseáil. Ba chóir go n-iarrfadh gach feidhmchlár cead ort sula n-osclaíonn sé taifeadtaí gutha.
Lena chois sin, is féidir gníomhachtú gutha a chumasú fad a bhíonn an gléas glasáilte. Má chumasaítear é, leanfaidh an feidhmchlár lena mbaineann ar aghaidh ar éisteacht leis an micreafón d'eochairfhocail, fad a bhíonn do ghléas glasáilte, agus is féidir leis gníomhachtú do dhuine ar bith a labhraíonn gar don ghléas. Nuair a bhíonn an gléas glasáilte, beidh rochtain ag an bhfeidhmchlár ar an tacar céanna cumas agus eolais agus a bhíonn fad a bhíonn an gléas díghlasáilte.
Is féidir gníomhachtú gutha a chasadh as uair ar bith.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi ghníomhaíochtú gutha in Windows
.
Fiú agus gníomhachtú gutha casta as, is féidir go bhfuil roinnt feidhmchlár agus seirbhísí tríú páirtí ag éisteacht i gcónaí leis an micreafón agus ag bailiú d'ionchur gutha.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le feidhmchláir deisce tríú páirtí agus an tslí a bhféadfaidís bheith in ann rochtain a fháil i gcónaí ar do mhicreafón fiú agus na socruithe seo casta as
.
Clóscríobh gutha
. I Windows 11, nuashonraíodh deachtú agus athainmníodh é mar chlóscríobh gutha. Fheadainn an clóscríobh gutha teicneolaíochtaí aitheanta cainte gléasbhunaithe agus ar líne a úsáid chun a sheirbhís tras-scríobh cainte go téacs a chumhachtú. Is féidir leat roghnú gearrthóga gutha a chur ar fáil, leis, chun clóscríobh gutha a fheabhsú. Má roghnaíonn tú gan gearrthóga gutha a chur ar fáil, is féidir leat clóscríobh gutha a úsáid go fóill. Is féidir do rogha a athrú am ar bith sna socruithe clóscríobh gutha. Ní stórálfaidh Microsoft, ní samplálfaidh Microsoft agus ní éistfidh Microsoft le do thaifeadtaí gutha gan do chead.
Tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le Microsoft agus do shonraí gutha
.
Rochtain ghutha
. Cuireann Windows cumas ar gach duine, lena n-airítear daoine faoi mhíchumas gluaiseachta, a ríomhaire pearsanta a rialú agus téacs a scríobh lena guth. Mar shampla, tacaíonn rochtain ghutha le cásanna amhail ag oscailt, agus bogadh idir, feidhmchláir, ag brabhsáil ar líne, agus ag scríobh ríomhphost. Treisíonn rochtain ghutha aithint cainte comhaimseartha gléasbhunaithe chun caint a aithint go cruinn agus tacaítear leis gan nasc Idirlín. Nuair a spreagann úsáideoir rochtain ghutha, úsáideann sé an maidhc ar an gléas.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le rochtain ghutha
.
Dúigh & Pearsanú clóscríofa
. Bailítear d'fhocail chlóscríofa agus lámhscríofa chun liosta focail saincheaptha, aithint carachtar níos fearr chun cabhrú leat clóscríobh agus scríobh ar do ghléas, agus moltaí téacs a bhíonn le feiceáil nuair a bhíonn tú ag clóscríobh nó ag scríobh a chur ar fáil duit.
Is féidir leat Breacadh Dúigh & pearsantú clóscríbhneoireachta a chasadh as am ar bith. Scriosfaidh sé seo do liosta focal custaiméir atá stóráilte ar do ghléas. Má chasann tú é air arís, beidh ort do liosta focal saincheaptha a athchruthú.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi bhreacadh dúigh & pearsanú clóscríbhneoireachta in Windows
.
Siar go barr
Socruithe sioncronaithe agus cúltaca
Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach chuig Windows le do cuntas Microsoft nó cuntas oibre nó scoile, is féidir le Windows do shocruithe, comhaid agus sonraí cumraíochta gléis a stóráil i bhfreastalaithe Microsoft. Windows seo ach na socruithe, comhaid agus sonraí cumraíochta gléis stóráilte a úsáid chun é a dhéanamh níos éasca duit d'eispéireas a ascnamh ar ghléas eile.
Is féidir leat an ghné seo a chasadh as agus Windows a stopadh ó do shocruithe, do chomhaid, agus do shonraí cumraíochta a stóráil san ó na socruithe Windows. Is féidir leat na sonraí a rinneadh cúltaca dóibh roimhe ar do chuntas Microsoft a scriosadh, ach cuairt a thabhairt
ar do leathanach Gléasanna Cuntais Microsoft
.
Tuilleadh eolais maidir le cúltaca Windows agus socruithe sioncronaithe
.
Siar go barr
Seirbhísí Nuashonrúcháin
Áirítear ar Sheirbhísí Nuashonrúcháin le haghaidh Windows Windows Update agus Microsoft Update. Is seirbhís é Windows Update a sholáthraíonn nuashonruithe bogearraí do bhogearraí Windows agus do bhogearraí tacaíochta eile, ar nós tiománaithe agus dochtearraí a sholáthraíonn déantóirí gléis. Is seirbhís é Microsoft Update a sholáthraíonn nuashonruithe bogearraí le haghaidh bogearraí eile de chuid Microsoft ar nós Microsoft 365.
Déanann Windows Update nuashonruithe ar bhogearraí Windows a íoslódáil go huathoibríoch ar do ghléas. Is féidir leat Windows Update a chumrú chun na nuashonruithe sin a shuiteáil go huathoibríoch de réir mar a chuirtear ar fáil iad (molta) nó iarraidh ar Windows fógra a sheoladh chugat nuair is gá atosú chun críoch a chur le suiteáil nuashonruithe. Feidhmchláir a chuirtear ar fáil trí Microsoft Store, déantar iad a nuashonrú go huathoibríoch trí Microsoft Store, mar a thuairiscítear sa rannán
Microsoft Store
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
Brabhsálaithe Gréasáin—Oidhreacht Microsoft Edge agus Internet Explorer
Baineann an chuid seo le leaganacha oidhreachta de Microsoft Edge (leagan 44 agus faoina bhun). Féach an rannán
Microsoft Edge
den ráiteas príobháideachais chun faisnéis a fháil faoi leaganacha nach leaganacha oidhreachta de Microsoft Edge iad.
Is é Microsoft Edge brabhsálaí réamhshocraithe Gréasáin Microsoft le haghaidh Windows. Gheofar Internet Explorer, brabhsálaí oidhreachta Microsoft, in Windows freisin. Gach uair a úsáideann tú brabhsálaí Gréasáin chun an t-idirlíon a rochtain, seoltar sonraí maidir le do ghléas ("sonraí caighdeánacha gléis") chuig na suíomhanna Gréasáin a osclaíonn tú agus na seirbhísí ar líne a úsáideann tú. Áirítear ar shonraí caighdeánacha gléis seoladh IP do ghléis, cineál agus teanga an bhrabhsálaí, amanna rochtana, agus seoltaí gréasáin tarchuir. D'fhéadfaí na sonraí seo a logáil ar fhreastalaithe Gréasáin na suíomhanna Gréasáin sin. Braitheann an sórt sonraí a lógáiltear agus an úsáid a bhaintear astu ar chleachtais phríobháideachta na suíomhanna gréasáin a osclaíonn tú agus na seirbhísí gréasáin a úsáideann tú. Lena chois sin, seolann Microsoft Edge brabhsálaí ID uathúil chuig láithreáin ghréasáin áirithe chun cur ar ár gcumas sonraí comhiomlána a fhorbairt a úsáidtear chun gnéithe agus seirbhísí brabhsálaí a fheabhsú.
Ina theannta sin, stóráiltear ar do ghléas sonraí faoin tslí a n-úsáideann tú do bhrabhsálaí, ar nós do stair bhrabhsála, sonraí foirme Gréasáin, comhaid shealadacha idirlín, agus cuacha. Is féidir na sonraí seo a scriosadh ó do ghléas le Scrios Stair Bhrabhsála.
Le Microsoft Edge, is féidir inneachar a ghabháil agus a shábháil ar do ghléas, ar nós:
Nóta Gréasáin
. Ligeann sé duit anótálacha dúigh agus téacs a chruthú ar na leathanaigh Ghréasáin a osclaíonn tú, agus iad a ghearradh, a shábháil, nó a chomhroinnt.
Léitheoireacht ghníomhach
. Ligeann sé duit liostaí léitheoireachta a chruthú agus a bhainistiú, lena n-áirítear suíomhanna Gréasáin agus doiciméid.
Lárionad
. Ceadaíonn sé duit do liostaí léitheoireachta, ceanáin, íoslódálacha, agus stair a bhainistiú go furasta in aon áit amháin.
Pionna Láithreán Gréasáin ar an Tascbharra
. a cheadaíonn duit na láithreáin ghréasáin is fearr leat a phionnáil ar thascbharra Windows. Beidh láithreáin ghréasáin in ann na leathanaigh ghréasáin dá gcuid atá pionnáilte agat a fheiceáil, ionas gur féidir leo suaitheantas fógra a chur ar fáil duit ionas go mbeidh a fhios agat go bhfuil rud éigin nua ar a láithreáin ghréasáin ar cheart duit breathnú air.
Déanfar roinnt faisnéise brabhsálaí Microsoft a shábháiltear ar do ghléas a shioncronú ar ghléasanna eile nuair a shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft. Mar shampla, in Internet Explorer, áirítear ar an bhfaisnéis seo do stair bhrabhsála agus ceanáin; agus in Microsoft Edge, áirítear air do cheanáin, liostaí léitheoireachta, iontrálacha uathlíonta foirme, (amhail d'ainm, seoladh agus uimhir fóin), agus d’fhéadfadh sonraí le haghaidh breisithe a shuiteáil bheith san áireamh leis. Mar shampla, má shioncronaíonn tú do liosta léitheoireachta Microsoft Edge ar ghléasanna eile, seolfar cóipeanna den inneachar a roghnaíonn tú a shábháil chuig do liosta léitheoireachta chuig gach gléas sioncronaithe le féachaint air níos déanaí. Is féidir leat sioncronú in Internet Explorer a dhíchumasú ach dul chuig
Socruithe
>
Tosaigh
>
Cuntais
>
Sioncronaigh do shocruithe
. (Féach an rannán
Siocnronaigh socruithe
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil.) Is féidir freisin sioncronú faisnéis bhrabhsálaí Microsoft Edge a dhíchumasú ach an rogha sioncronaithe a chasadh as i Socruithe Microsoft Edge.
Baineann Microsoft Edge agus Internet Explorer úsáid as do cheisteanna cuardaigh agus as do stair bhrabhsála chun brabhsáil níos tapa agus torthaí cuardaigh níos ábhartha a sholáthar duit. Áirítear ar na gnéithe seo:
Seolann
moltaí cuardaigh
in Internet Explorer an fhaisnéis a chlóscríobhann tú i mbarra seoltaí an bhrabhsálaí go huathoibríoch chuig do sholáthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe (amhail Bing) chun moltaí cuardaigh a thairiscint de réir mar a chlóscríobhann tú gach carachtar.
Seolann
moltaí cuardaigh agus suímh
in Microsoft Edge go huathoibríoch an fhaisnéis a chlóscríobhann tú i mbarra seoltaí an bhrabhsálaí chuig Bing (fiú má tá soláthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe eile roghnaithe agat) chun moltaí cuardaigh a thairiscint de réir mar a chlóscríobhann tú gach carachtar.
Is féidir na gnéithe seo a chasadh as uair ar bith. Chun torthaí cuardaigh a sholáthar, seolann Microsoft Edge agus Internet Explorer do chuid ceisteanna cuardaigh, faisnéis chaighdeánach cuardaigh agus suíomh (má tá suíomh cumasaithe agat) chuig do sholáthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe. Más é Bing do sholáthraí cuardaigh réamhshocraithe, úsáidimid na sonraí seo mar a thuairiscítear i rannán
Bing
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Siar go barr
Gnéithe AI Windows
Cliceáil le Déanamh
Is féidir le ‘Cliceáil le Déanamh’ rith i gcomhpháirtíocht le ‘Athchuimhnigh’ nó mar ghné neamhspleách. Agus é ar siúl agat, is féidir leat Cliceáil le Déanamh a úsáid chun gearrthóga scáileáin a ghabháil agus a anailísiú agus láithreacht téacs agus íomhánna a aithint, ag cur ar do chumas gníomhartha ábhartha a dhéanamh do gach ceann acu. Mar shampla, is féidir le Cliceáil le Déanamh roghanna a thabhairt duit chun íomhá gearrthóige scáileáin a chur in eagar, nó téacs a ghabhann sé a athbhreithniú nó a athoibriú. Ní féidir le Cliceáil le Déanamh inneachar an téacs nó na n-íomhánna a aithníodh i ngearrthóg scáileáin, ach is féidir leat intleacht shaorga logánta agus uirlisí eile a úsáid chun an t-inneachar a athrú más mian leat. Fanann gach rud ar do ghléas logánta, mura ndéanann tú rogha fhollasach, ar nós íomhá a sheoladh chuig Bing le haghaidh cuardaigh,  ag iarraidh ar ‘Cliceáil le Déanamh’ achoimre a sholáthar ar théacs atá roghnaithe ag an úsáideoir (agus sa chás sin seolfar é chuig seirbhís néil IS Azure Microsoft),  nó ag baint úsáide as intleacht shaorga logánta eile nó uirlis eile chun gearrthóg scáileáin ó ‘Cliceáil le Déanamh’ a athrú.
Cuireann Cliceáil le Déanamh  ar do chumas leis micreafón a úsáid chun téacs a chuardach i ngearrthóg scáileáin. Má chliceálann tú ar an gcnaipe micreafóin, tosaíonn Cliceáil le Déanamh ag éisteacht leis an méid a deirtear, a chuirtear isteach sa bhosca cuardaigh, agus aibhsíonn sé na meaitseanna go léir ón gcuardach. Ní sheoltar an fhuaim a ghabhann an micreafón taobh amuigh den ghléas.
‘Athchuimhnigh’ Windows
Is gné de chuid Windows é ‘Athchuimhnigh’ nach bhfuil ar fáil ach ar CoPilot+ PC a ligeann d'úsáideoirí rudaí a chonaic siad ar a ngléas a aimsiú ag baint úsáide as an téacs agus na leideanna amhairc a bhfuil cuimhne acu orthu. Chun Athchuimhnigh a úsáid, ní mór d'úsáideoir liostáil chun alaghraif a shábháil ar Copilot+ PC, ar íomhánna iad de gach rud atá oscailte agus infheicthe ar scáileán an úsáideora a bhfuil meiteashonraí gaolmhara ar nós ainm an fheidhmchláir agus stampa ama-dháta san áireamh iontu . Stóráiltear na sonraí ar fad go logánta ar an ngléas agus tá siad cosanta ag Slándáil Sínithe Isteach Feabhsaithe (ESS) Windows Hello, a sholáthraíonn síniú isteach bithmhéadrach níos sláine agus a chabhraíonn lena chinntiú nach bhfuil rochtain ar fhaisnéis na gcustaiméirí ach ag an custaiméir féin. Gach uair a lainseálann daoine ‘Athchuimhnigh’ iarrfar orthu fíordheimhniú a dhéanamh le síniú isteach bithmhéadrach Windows Hello nó le PIN sula ndíchripteofar an t-inneachar i bhfillteán na n-alaghraf. Ritheann Cliceáil le Déanamh ar bharr alaghraf in Athchuimhnigh agus cabhraíonn sé le húsáideoirí rudaí a dhéanamh ar shlí níos tapúla trí ligean dóibh gníomhartha a dhéanamh lena gcuid inneachar, íomhánna nó téacs ar an scáileán. Déantar anailís ar na halaghraif go logánta ar an ngléas i gcónaí agus athraíonn na gníomhartha atá ar fáil de réir an chineáil inneachair a bhraitear.
Ligeann Athchuimhnigh duit freisin mhicreafón do ghléas Copilot+ PC a úsáid chun téacs a chuardach sna halaghraif a gabhadh. Má chliceálann tú ar an gcnaipe micreafóin atá suite taobh istigh den bhosca ionchuir cuardaigh laistigh d’fhuinneog ‘Athchuimhnigh’, tosaíonn sé ag éisteacht leis an méid a deirtear agus cuireann sé isteach sa bhosca cuardaigh é. Fanann an micreafón in úsáid go dtí go gcuireann tú do chuid cainte ar sos , agus ag an bpointe sin múchtar é go dtí go mbrúnn tú an cnaipe micreafóin go sonrach arís. Aibhseofar na meaitseanna ar fad ón gcuardach sna torthaí. Ní sheoltar an fhuaim a ghabhann an micreafón taobh amuigh den ghléas.
Fanann na sonraí a ghabhann Athchuimhnigh, sonraí pearsanta (m.sh., seatanna, meiteashonraí, torthaí próiseála, agus fiosruithe úsáideora) ina measc, ar an ngléas logánta laistigh den chuntas sínithe isteach ina bhfuil tú sínithe isteach ar an  Copilot+ PC, agus ní sheoltar taobh amuigh den ghléas iad mura ndéanann tú gníomh áirithe. Mar shampla, má dhéanann tú alaghraf a chóipeáil agus a ghreamú isteach i bhfeidhmchlár eile, nó má roghnaíonn tú alaghraf a chur ann agus aiseolas á chur isteach agat trí Lárionad Aiseolais Windows. Is é an t-aon bhealach chun inneachar ó Athchuimhnigh a chomhroinnt le duine ná trí ghníomh soiléir an úsáideora ar an ngléas féin.
Is féidir leat do chuid inneachar (mar shampla Alaghraif, meiteashonraí, ceisteanna cuardaigh, agus stair) a rialú trí alaghraif a úsáid nó a scriosadh, inneachar a scagadh nó trí bhrabhsálaí tacaithe a úsáid i mód príobháideach. Faigh tuilleadh eolais faoi do phríobháideacht agus faoi rialú d’eispéiris ‘Athchuimhnigh’
anseo
.
Chomh maith le gné cuardaigh ‘Athchuimhnigh’, tá amlíne ag Athchuimhnigh  freisin, ina n-eagraítear do chuid alaghraf in ord ama agus ina n-amharcléirítear iad i scrollbharra cothrománach ar féidir leat é a úsáid chun do ghníomhaíochtaí roimhe seo a aimsiú agus a ghiaráil ar do ríomhaire. Chomh maith leis na gnéithe atá ar fáil san amlíne,  is féidir leat alaghraif a scriosadh ón amharc seo, ceann ar cheann nó de réir gach alaghraf a bhfuil fearann Gréasáin ann (m.sh., gach ceann ó www.bing.com) nó alaghraif ó fheidhmchlár ar leith.
Tá scagaire ‘Ábhar íogair’ ag Athchuimhnigh leis atá ar siúl de réir réamhshocraithe chun cabhrú le cosc a chur ar choinneáil faisnéise a d'fhéadfadh a bheith de chineál ní b'íogaire (m.sh., uimhreacha cárta creidmheasa, uimhreacha ID eisithe ag an stát agus araile). Is féidir le húsáideoirí an scagaire seo a chasadh as más mian leo i socruithe Windows.
Siar go barr
Feidhmchláir Windows
Áirítear feidhmchláir áirithe de chuid Microsoft le Windows agus tá cinn eile ar fáil i Microsoft Store. Áirítear ar na feidhmchláir sin:
Feidhmchlár Mapaí
. Cuireann an feidhmchlár Mapaí seirbhísí ar fáil bunaithe ar an gceantar ina bhfuil tú agus baineann sé úsáid as seirbhísí Bing chun do chuardaigh a phróiseáil laistigh d'fheidhmchlár Mapaí. Nuair a bhíonn rochtain ag an bhfeidhmchlár Mapaí ar do shuíomh, agus nuair a bhíonn seirbhísí suíomhbhunaithe cumasaithe agat in Windows, nuair a úsáideann tú an eochair “@” chun cuardach a thionscain i dtéacsbhoscaí a bhfuil tacú ann dóibh i bhfeidhmchláir Windows, bailíonn seirbhísí Bing an téacs a chlóscríobhann tú tar éis na heochrach "@", chun moltaí suíomhbhunaithe a chur ar fáil. Féach an rannán
Bing
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo chun tuilleadh a fhoghlaim maidir leis na heispéiris seo arna gcumhachtú ag Bing. Nuair is eol do shuíomh d'fheidhmchlár Mapaí, fiú nuair nach bhfuil an feidhmchlár in úsáid, is féidir go mbaileoidh Microsoft sonraí suímh dí-aitheanta ó do ghléas chun seirbhísí Microsoft a fheabhsú. Is féidir rochtain fheidhmchlár Mapaí ar do shuíomh a dhíchumasú ach an tseirbhís suímh a chasadh nó rochtain fheidhmchlár Mapaí ar an tseirbhís suímh a chasadh as.
Is féidir tuairisc a choinneáil d'áiteanna ceanáin agus ar chuardach mapa a rinneadh le deireanas san fheidhmchlár Mapaí. Áireofar d'áiteanna ceanáin agus do stair chuardaigh mar mholtaí cuardaigh. Má ligfidh tú cead don bhfeidhmchlár Maps do cheamara a rochtain, beidh tú in ann an suíomh ar tharla do ghrianghraif a ghabhadh - mar shampla, inseofar le grianghraf de do ghluaisteán an áit ina bhfuil do ghluaisteán páirceáilte freisin. Is féidir leat do shuíomh a roinnt le daoine eile i do theagmhálaithe freisin. Má tá tú sínithe isteach le do chuntas Microsoft, beidh na háiteanna is ansa leat, do stair chuardaigh agus socruithe áirithe feidhmchláir sioncronaithe thar ghléasanna agus sheirbhísí eile. Chun tuilleadh eolais a fháil, féach an rannán
socruithe Sioncronaithe agus cúltaca
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Feidhmchlár Ceamara
. Má cheadaíonn tú don fheidhmchlár Ceamara do shuíomh a úsáid, déantar sonraí suímh a leabú sna grianghraif agus sna físeáin a ghlacann tú le do ghléas. Bíonn sonraí tuairisciúla eile, ar nós cineál ceamara agus tá an dáta ar glacadh an pictiúr nó an físeán, leabaithe, leis, sna grianghraif agus sna físeáin. Má roghnaíonn tú grianghraf nó físeán a chomhroinnt, beidh sonraí leabaithe ar fáil do na daoine agus do na seirbhísí a gcomhroinneann tú leo. Tar éis dó a bheith cumasaithe, is féidir leat i gcónaí rochtain fheidhmchláir an cheamara ar do shuíomh a dhíchumasú ach gach rochtain ar do sheirbhís suímh a dhíchumasú i roghchlár Socruithe do ghléis nó rochtain fheidhmchláir an cheamara ar an tseirbhís suímh a chasadh as.
Nuair a bhíonn an feidhmchlár Ceamara ar oscailt, taispeánann sé dronuilleoga braite ag an gceamara roghnaithe d’áiteanna san íomhá a d'fhéadfadh a bheith in úsáid le haghaidh feabhsú íomhá. Ní choinníonn an feidhmchlár Ceamara aon sonraí feabhsaithe íomhá. Is féidir leat socruithe rochtana do cheamara a athrú i gcónaí sa roghchlár Socruithe feidhmchlár Ceamara nó sa roghchlár Socruithe Windows. Baineann an feidhmchlár Camera úsáid as roinnt chumas gléis amhail suíomh, ceamara, micreafón, físeán, agus leabharlann ghrianghraif. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Feidhmchlár Grianghraif
. Tá dhá leagan den feidhmchlár Grianghraif ar fáil. Áirítear leis an feidhmchlár Grianghraif nuashonraithe gnéithe cosúil le comhtháthú iCloud agus amhairc fillteán áitiúla agus sa néal. Áiríonn an leagan oidhreachta roimhe seo den feidhmchlár Grianghraif gnéithe ar nós Eagarthóir Físe, táb Daoine agus Albaim. Tá tú ag baint úsáide as an bhfeidhmchláir Grianghraif nuashonraithe má léiríonn an rannán “Maidir le” i socruithe na bhfeidhmchláir Grianghraif gurb é an feidhmchlár an feidhmchlár Grianghraif “Nuashonraithe”. I gcásanna áirithe, féadfaidh úsáideoir an feidhmchlár Grianghraif nuashonraithe agus an leagan oidhreachta Grianghraif a íoslódáil ar a ngléas.
Cabhraíonn an feidhmchlár nuashonraithe Grianghraif leat do ghrianghraif agus físeáin a eagrú, a amharc agus a chomhroinnt. Mar shampla, cuireann an feidhmchlár Ghrianghraif bealacha difriúla i láthair chun ghrianghraif agus físeáin a eagrú i ngrúpaí de réir ainm, dáta a glacadh, nó dáta a mionathraíodh, agus ina fillteáin chomh maith áit a bhfuil na comhaid sin stóráilte, ar nós stóráilte go logánta ar do ghléas nó sioncrónaithe chuid do ghléas ó OneDrive, iCloud agus néalseirbhísí ar líne eile. Ligeann an feidhmchlár seo duit comhaid a bhogadh, a chóipeáil nó a uaslódáil chuig suíomhanna difriúla ar do ghléas nó chuig OneDrive. Taispeánann an táb Gach Grianghraf do ghrianghraif agus físeáin atá stóráilte go logánta nó sioncrónaithe de réir dáta a glactar iad. Ligeann an táb ceanáin duit amharc ar ghrianghraif agus físeáin ar mhaith leatsa nó a cuireadh sna ceanáin roimhe seo. Ligeann an táb fillteáin duit amharc ar ghrianghraf agus físeáin de réir a suíomh stórais. Tá táib ann chomh maith áit a bhfuil tú ábalta do ghrianghraif agus físeáin ó néalseirbhísí ar fáil (amhail OneDrive agus seirbhísí tríú-pháirtí eile) a bhfuil sioncrónaithe agat ar do ghléas.
Ina theannta sin, cabhraíonn an feidhmchlár Grianghraif Microsoft leat do ghrianghraif agus físeáin a eagrú, a amharc agus a chomhroinnt. Mar sin féin, má úsáideann tú an feidhmchlár oidhreachta Ghrianghraif, b'fhéidir go bhfeicfinn gnéithe eile nach bhfuil ar fáil sa leagan níos nuaí den feidhmchlár Ghrianghraif, lena n-áirítear Bailiúcháin, Albaim, Eagarthóir Físeáin agus an socrú Daoine. Taispeánann an táb Bailiúchán grianghraif agus físeáin de réir an dáta a glacadh iad. Cabhraíonn an táb Albaim leat a ngrianghraif agus físeáin a eagrú de réir suíomhanna agus clibeanna i bpáirt. Ligeann Eagarthóir físeáin duit físeáin a chur in eagar, a chruthú agus a chomhroinnt.
Is féidir an socrú Daoine a chumasú ar leathanach socruithe feidhmchlár oidhreachta Ghrianghraf agus ar an táb Daoine an feidhmchláir. Nuair a bheidh sé cumasaithe, bainfidh an feidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraif úsáid as teicneolaíocht grúpála aghaidhe chun do ghrianghraif agus físeáin a eagrú sa ghrúpaí. Is féidir leis an ngné ghrúpála aghaidheanna a bhrath i ngrianghraf nó i bhfíseán agus a fháil amach an bhfuil siad cosúil ó amharc le haghaidheanna sna grianghraif agus físeáin eile i do bhailiúchán grianghraif áitiúil. Is féidir leat grúpáil aghaidheanna a chomhcheangal le teagmhálaí i d’fheidhmchlár Daoine.
Nuair a chumraítear é sa fheidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraif, stórálfar do ghrúpálacha ar do ghléas a fhad is a roghnaíonn tú na grúpálacha nó na grianghraif nó físeáin a choinneáil. Má tá an socrú Daoine casta air, beidh leid ann chun ligean don fheidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraf leanúint de ghrúpálacha aghaidheanna a cheadú nuair a bheidh trí bliana imithe thart ón idirghníomhú deireanach leis an bhfeidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraf. Is féidir leat dul go dtí an leathanach Socruithe i bhfeidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraif uair ar bith chun an socrú Daoine a chasadh air nó as. Má chastar an gné as, bainfidh sé seo sonraí grúpála aghaidhe ó fheidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraif, ach ní bhainfidh sé do ghrianghraif ná d'fhíseáin.
Foghlaim tuilleadh faoi fheidhmchlár oidhreachta Grianghraif agus faoi ghrúpáil aghaidheanna
.
Má roghnaíonn tú grianghraf nó físeán a chomhroinnt leis an bhfeidhmchlár Grianghraif nó an bhfeidhmchlár oidhreachta Ghrianghraif, beidh aon sonraí leabaithe (amhail suíomh, cineál ceamara, agus dáta) inrochtana do na daoine agus na seirbhísí a gcomhroinneann tú an grianghraf nó an físeán leo.
Feidhmchlár daoine
. Ligeann an feidhmchlár Daoine duit do theagmhálaithe uile a fheiceáil agus cumarsáid a dhéanamh in aon áit amháin. Nuair a chuireann tú cuntas leis an bhfeidhmchlár Daoine, cuirfear na teagmhálaithe ó do chuntas leis an bhfeidhmchlár Daoine go huathoibríoch. Is féidir cuntais eile a chur le feidhmchlár na ndaoine, leis, amhail do líonraí sóisialta (Facebook agus Twitter, mar shampla) agus cuntais ríomhphoist. Nuair a chuireann tú cuntas leis, insímid duit cad iad na sonraí is féidir le feidhmchlár na ndaoine a iompórtáil nó a shioncronú leis an tseirbhís i dtrácht agus is féidir leat an méid is mian a chur leis a roghnú. Is féidir go ndéanfadh feidhmchláir eile a shuiteálfá sonraí a shioncronú chuig an bhfeidhmchlár Daoine, leis, lena n-áirítear sonraí breise a chur le teagmhálaithe. Nuair a amharcann tú ar theagmhálaí san fheidhmchlár Daoine, déanfar faisnéis faoi do chaidreamh le déanaí leis an teagmhálaí (ar nós ríomhphost agus imeachtaí féilire, lena n-áirítear ó fheidhmchláir a sioncronaíonn an feidhmchlár Daoine sonraí uathu) a aisghabháil agus a thaispeáint duit. Is féidir cuntas a bhaint ón bhfeidhmchlár Daoine uair ar bith.
Feidhmchlár Ríomhphoist agus Féilire
. Cuireann an feidhmchlár Ríomhphoist agus Féilire ar do chumas do chuid ríomhphost, féilirí agus comhaid a nascadh in aon áit amháin, lena n-áirítear iad siúd ó sholáthraithe ríomhphoist agus stórais comhad tríú páirtí. Cuireann an feidhmchlár seirbhísí bunaithe ar shuíomh ar fáil, ar nós faisnéis faoin aimsir ar d'fhéilire, ach is féidir leat an úsáid a bhaineann d'fheidhmchlár as do shuíomh a dhíchumasú. Nuair a chuireann tú cuntas leis an bhfeidhmchlár Ríomhphost agus Féilire, sioncronaítear do ríomhphoist, míreanna féilire, comhaid, teagmhálaithe, agus socruithe eile ó do chuntas go huathoibríoch le do ghléas agus le freastalaithe Microsoft. Aon uair is mian leat, is féidir leat cuntas a bhaint nó athruithe a dhéanamh ar na sonraí atá sioncronaithe ó do chuntas. Chun cuntas a chumrú, ní mór duit faisnéis aitheantais (ar nós ainm úsáideora agus pasfhocal) an chuntais a chur isteach san fheidhmchlár, a sheolfar tríd an idirlíon chuig freastalaí an tríú páirtí. Bainfidh an feidhmchlár triail as ceangal slán (SSL) a úsáid ar dtús chun do chuntas a chumrú ach seolfar an t-eolas sin gan chriptiú mura dtacaíonn do sholáthraí ríomhphoist le SSL. Má chuireann tú cuntas leis ó eagraíocht (ar nós seoladh ríomhphoist cuideachta), féadfaidh úinéir fhearann na heagraíochta polasaithe agus rialuithe áirithe a chur i bhfeidhm (mar shampla, fíordheimhniú ilfhachtóra a éileamh nó an cumas chun sonraí a ghlanadh ón ngléas go cianda) a d'fhéadfadh cur isteach ar an úsáid a bhaineann tú as an bhfeidhmchlár. Baineann an feidhmchlár seo úsáid as cumais do ghléis amhail suíomh, ceamara. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Feidhmchlár Teachtaireachtaí Oibreora Windows (a aithníodh roimhe mar Cur Teachtaireachtaí Microsoft)
. Faigheann agus taispeánann an feidhmchlár Windows Operator Messages téacsanna SMS a bhaineann leis an gcuntas ó d’oibritheoir soghluaiste maidir le do phlean sonraí (amhail teorannacha billeála agus sonraí) ar do ríomhaire nó do ghléas. Stóráiltear na teachtaireachtaí seo go logánta ar do ghléas. Is féidir leat na teachtaireachtaí seo a rochtain, a fheiceáil, agus a scrios ó do ghléas freisin. Baineann an feidhmchlár seo úsáid as cumais do ghléis amhail teagmhálaithe. Tabhairt cuairt ar Microsoft Store ar Windows chun tuilleadh a fhoghlaim, le do thoil.
Is é
an feidhmchlár Cloig
do mhol don bhainistíocht ama agus fócais ar Windows. Nuair a shíneann úsáideoirí isteach lena gcuntas Microsoft is féidir leo Microsoft To Do a chumasú, ar eispéireas néal nasctha é. Nuair a chasann an t-úsáideoir Focus Session air, stórálfar sonraí an tseisiúin go logánta agus is féidir le húsáideoir é a ghlanadh ach dul chuig leathanach na socraithe cloig. Ina theannta sin, tacaíonn Focus Sessions le ceangail le cuntais Spotify chun éisteacht le fuaim thimpeallach chun cabhrú le húsáideoirí a n-aird a dhíriú. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Is feidhmchlár Windows é
Iris Microsoft
atá deartha go sonrach do ghléasanna tadhall-dhírithe, peann-chumasaithe amhail táibléid agus gléasanna 2-in-1. Cuireann sé eispéireas glacadh nótaí saorfhoirme ar fáil d’úsáideoirí. Baineann an feidhmchlár úsáid as intleacht shaorga (IS) agus meaisínfhoghlaim le do lámhscríbhinn a dhéanann sonraí a phróiseáil go logánta ar do ghléas a aithint i mbealach níos fearr. Agus iad nasctha le Microsoft 365 (síntiús de dhíth), is féidir le húsáideoirí a bhféilire M365 agus teagmhálaithe laistigh den fheidhmchlár a rochtain gan stró. Déantar an t-ábhar cruthaithe ag úsáideoirí a shábháil go huathoibríoch ag an suíomh sábhála réamhshocraithe sa leabharlann chomhaid le haghaidh tagartha amach anseo. Ligeann Journal duit an leabharlann ghrianghraf agus ceamara agus micreafón an ghléis a rochtain le gur féidir leat iad a chur le leabhar oibre. Foghlaim faoin bhfeidhmchlár Irise
anseo
nó tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Cabhraíonn an feidhmchlár
Pleananna móibíleacha
leat dul ar líne gan stró agus i níos mó suíomhanna ar do ríomhaire Windows 10 agus gléasanna 11 LTE. Ar chlárú le haghaidh plean sonraí ar do ghléas, bunaítear nasc le d’oibritheoir móibíl, lena gcuirtear ar do chumas thú ceannacháin a chur i gcrích trí thairseach ar líne an oibritheora móibíl. Beidh cárta SIM lena dtacaítear de dhíth chun an bhfeidhmchlár seo a úsáid. Bainfidh an feidhmchlár Mobile Plan úsáid as do IMEI, IMSI, EID, ICCID, agus do Thír (suíomh garbh a chinntítear trí Aitheantas Gréasán Ceallaigh nó Athrú IP Wi-Fi) le cinntiú cén oibritheoirí móibíleacha atá ar fáil i do cheantar. D’fhéadfaí go seolfadh an t-oibritheoir móibíleach fógraí chuig úsáideoirí tríd an bhfeidhmchlár Mobile Plans. Baineann an feidhmchlár seo úsáid as cumais do ghléis amhail a cheamara agus a mhicreafón. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Tá
Microsoft PC Manager
ar fáil i réigiúin áirithe agus is uirlis deisce é atá dírithe ar fheidhmíocht do ríomhaire a threisiú. Bunaithe ar d’iarratas, déanfaidh Bainisteoir Ríomhaire do ghléas a scanadh, agus ligeann sé duit comhaid nach bhfuil ag teastáil nó comhaid sealadacha a scriosadh, barr feabhais a chur ar an cache, stop a chur le hathruithe neamhcheadaithe nó teacht aniar uathu, nó gnéithe eile amhail seiceáil sláinte, treiseoir aon chlic, glanadh stórála, bainistíocht chomhaid nó mír-aníos, agus cosaint do shocruithe réamhshocruithe.
Cuirfidh PC Manager bac ar mhíreanna-aníos bunaithe ar rialacha maidir le bac fógraí agus na fuinneoga mír-aníos roghnaithe agat trí bhac saincheaptha. Má aontaíonn tú páirt a ghlacadh sa “Microsoft PC Manager Pop-up Plan”, nuair a chuireann tú bac ar fuinneoga mír-aníos trí bhac saincheaptha is féidir leat cabhrú linn barr feabhais ar an ngné bhainistíocht mhíreanna-aníos de chuid Microsoft PC Manager trí seatanna scáileáin den mhír-aníos a ghlacadh agus iad a sheoladh chuig Microsoft. Ní bhailíonn Microsoft eolas seachas seatanna scáileáin, teideal Windows, agus an aicme Windows. Coinnítear seatanna scáileáin a seoladh ar feadh tréimhse ama gairid agus scriostar iad ar bhonn rialta. Is féidir leat do roghanna Pop-Up Plan a bhainistiú trí shocruithe PC Manager ag am ar bith. D’fhéadfaí go ndéanfadh an ghné aiseolais in PC Manager sonraí pearsanta a phróiseáil má chuireann tú san áireamh é san aiseolas a chuireann tú ar fáil do Microsoft. Scriostar an t-aiseolas a fhaightear ó úsáideoirí tar éis phróiseáil go rialta. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Is áirge áisiúil in Windows é an
Uirlis Sciota
a bhaineann úsáid as do mhicreafón agus do leabharlann ghrianghraf chun seatanna scáileáin agus taifeadtaí scáileáin a ghabháil agus a stóráil. Áirítear gné Text Action leis an Snipping Tool, a bhaineann úsáid as tacaíocht maidir le carachtar optúil ionsuite a aithint. Is féidir leat roghnú agus cóipeáil go díreach ó íomhánna trí úsáid OCR. Ina theannta sin, is féidir leat úsáid a bhaint as an ngné Text Action chun eolas íogaire a chur i gceilt ó théacs a gabhadh. Le gearrthaisce déantar rudaí a cóipeáladh ón Snipping Tool a chóipeáil de do ghearrthaisce freisin. Má chumasaíonn tú stair ghearrthaisce thar ghléasanna, féadfar úsáid a bhaint as an ábhar a cóipeáladh thar ghléasanna éagsúla gan stró. Is féidir le húsáideoirí a roghanna gearrthaisce agus bearrtha a bhainistiú trí na socruithe Windows. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Is uirlis ilfheidhmeach é an
feidhmchlár Taifeadáin fuaime
a dearadh le haghaidh fuaim a ghabháil trí do mhicreafón i gcúinsí éagsúla. Agus tú i mbun taifeadta, is féidir leat nóiméid tábhachtacha a mharcáil chun codanna tábhachtacha a aimsiú gan stró níos moille. Is féidir leat freisin bearradh, leibhéil fuaime a choigeartú, nó athruithe eile a chur i bhfeidhm de réir mar is gá, agus do thaifeadtaí a athsheinm. Sábháiltear do thaifeadtaí go huathoibríoch i d’fhillteán Comhaid le haghaidh rochtain gan stró, agus is féidir leat d’fhuaime taifeadta a roinnt le do theaghlach agus do chairde. Tabhair cuairt ar
Microsoft Store
chun níos mó a fhoghlaim.
Is eagarthóir físeáin é
Microsoft Clipchamp
atá deartha chun cruthú físeáin a éascú. Ligeann sé d’úsáideoirí físeáin, íomhánna, agus comhaid fhuaime a thabhairt le chéile, chomh maith le téacs agus éifeachtaí a chur leis, agus ansin an físeán críochnaithe a shábháil dá ngléas, nó a bhfíseáin a stóráil ina OneDrive pearsanta tríd a gcuntas Microsoft. Is féidir le húsáideoirí físeáin stoic agus ceol stoic nó éifeachtaí stoic, greamáin, gnéithe grafacha, cúlraí, agus tuilleadh a chur leis freisin. Is féidir le húsáideoirí a roghnú freisin rochtain a ligean do Clipchamp ar a gceamara agus a micreafón chun físeáin a thaifead díreach óna ngléas. Chun eispéireas níos fearr a chur ar fáil, amhail cén teanga a thaispeáint duit, baileoidh Clipchamp do shuíomh garbh. Is féidir le húsáideoirí Clipchamp a rochtain le cuntas Microsoft pearsanta nó teaghlaigh tríd an bhfeidhmchlár Clipchamp le haghaidh Windows 10 nó Windows 11 agus sa bhrabhsálaí Edge nó Chrome ag
https://app.clipchamp.com
.
Is é
Seinnteoir Meán
an seinnteoir réamhshocraithe comhaid ilmheáin (fuaime agus físe). Nuair a roghnaíonn tú comhad ilmheán a oscailt, léifidh Seinnteoir Meán inneachar an chomhaid sin. Nuair a osclaíonn tú Sennteoir Meán, léifidh sé a bhfuil i do leabharlann Ceoil agus fillteáin leabharlainne Físe chun a leabharlann Ceoil féin agus leathanaigh na leabharlann Físe a líonadh laistigh den Media Player chun cabhrú leat ilmheán a eagrú, a fheiceáil agus a inneachair a chur ar siúl.
Chun d’eispéireas a shaibhriú agus tú ag seinm ceoil, déanfaidh Seinnteoir Meán iarracht go huathoibríoch ealaín ealaíontóirí agus ealaín albam a thaispeáint don ábhar a imríonn tú agus don ábhar i do leabharlann ceoil. Chun an fhaisnéis seo a sholáthar, seolann Seinnteoir Meán iarratas faisnéise chuig Microsoft ina bhfuil sonraí caighdeánacha gléis, amhail seoladh IP do ghléis, leagan bogearraí an ghléis, do shocruithe réigiúnacha agus teanga, agus aitheantóir don ábhar. Más mian leat, is féidir an ghné seo a dhíchumasú ar leathanach Socruithe na haipe.
Scannáin agus Teilifís. Ligeann
Scannáin Microsoft & Teilifís duit scannáin agus eipeasóidí teilifíse a fháil ar cíos nó a cheannach agus iad a sheinm ar do ghléas.
Chun cabhrú leat teacht ar ábhar a d’fhéadfadh spéis a bheith agat ann, baileoidh Movies & TV sonraí faoi na scannáin agus na seónna teilifíse a bhféachann tú orthu, lena n-áirítear fad na himeartha agus aon rátálacha a thugann tú.
Is féidir le Movies & TV comhaid físe áitiúla atá stóráilte ar do ríomhaire a thaispeáint agus a chur ar siúl freisin. Chun seo a dhéanamh, teastaíonn rochtain uaidh ar an leabharlann físe ar do ghléas.
Seinnteoir Meán Oidhreachta Windows.
Nuair a úsáideann tú Seinnteoir Meán Oidhreachta Windows, is féidir leis inneachar meán amhail comhaid físe, fuaime agus pictiúir a léamh, rud a ligeann duit CDanna, DVDanna, agus inneachar digiteach eile (ar nós comhaid físe agus fuaime) a sheinm, CD a chonlú, agus do leabharlann meáin a bhainistiú. Chun d'eispéireas a shaibhriú nuair a sheinneann tú inneachar i do leabharlann, taispeánann Windows Media Player faisnéis ghaolmhar meán, ar nós teideal an albaim, teidil amhrán, ealaín albaim, ealaíontóir, agus cumadóir. Chun d'fhaisnéis mheán a mhéadú, seolfaidh Windows Media Player iarratas chuig Microsoft ina mbeidh faisnéis ríomhaire chaighdeánach, aitheantóir don inneachar meán, agus an fhaisnéis meán atá le fáil cheana fein i do leabharlann Windows Media Player (lena n-áirítear faisnéis a d'fhéadfadh a bheith curtha in eagar nó iontráilte agat fein) ionas go n-aithneoidh Microsoft an rian agus go gcuirfear ar ais faisnéis bhreise atá ar fáil.
Le Windows Media Player is féidir leat inneachar atá sruthaithe chugat thar líonra a athsheinm. Chun an tseirbhís seo a sholáthar, ní mór do Sheinnteoir Meán Windows cumarsáid a dhéanamh le freastalaí meán sruthaithe. Is soláthraithe inneachair nach inneachar Microsoft é de ghnáth a oibríonn na freastalaithe seo. Le linn meáin shruthaithe a bheith á n-athsheinm, seolfaidh Seinnteoir Meán Windows log chuig an bhfreastalaí meán sruthaithe nó chuig freastalaí/freastalaithe Gréasáin eile má iarrann an freastalaí meán sruthaithe é. Áirítear ar an log seo sonraí ar nós: am ceangail, seoladh IP, leagan an chórais oibriúcháin, leagan de Sheinnteoir Meán Windows uimhir aitheantais Player (aitheantóir Player), dáta, agus prótacal. Chun do phríobháideacht a chosaint, seolann Windows Media Player aitheantóir Player difriúil i gcás gach seisiúin de réir réamhshocraithe.
Siar go barr
Windows Hello
Le Windows Hello is féidir do ghléasanna a oscailt ar an bpointe le fíordheimhniú bithmhéadrach. Má chasann tú Windows Hello air, úsáidfear d'aghaidh, do mhéarlorg, nó d'imreasc chun tú a shainaithint bunaithe ar thacar pointí nó gnéithe uathu a bhaintear amach as an íomhá agus a stóráiltear ar do ghléas mar theimpléad—ach ní stóráiltear fíor-íomhá de d'aghaidh ná de d'imreasc. Sonraí fíorúcháin bithmhéadrachta a úsáidtear nuair a shíníonn tú isteach, ní fhágann siad an gléas. Fanfaidh do shonraí bithmhéadracha ar do ghléas go dtí go baineann tú iad. Tar éis tréimhse shuntasach neamhghníomhaíochta, áfach, Windows Hello iarrfar ort a dheimhniú gur mian leat leanúint de do shonraí bithmhéadracha a stóráil. Is féidir sonraí fíorúcháin bithmhéadrachta a scriosadh ó laistigh de Shocruithe. Foghlaim tuilleadh faoi
Windows Hello
.
Siar go barr
Windows Search
Le Windows Search is féidir do chuid stuif agus an Gréasán a chuardach ó aon áit amháin. Má roghnaíonn tú Windows Search a úsáid chun "do stuif" a chuardach, soláthróidh sé torthaí do mhíreanna ar do OneDrive pearsanta, do OneDrive for Business má chumasaítear é, soláthraithe néalstórais eile a mhéad a bhfuil tacú ann dóibh ó na soláthraithe tríú páirtí sin, agus ar do ghléas. Má roghnaíonn tú Windows Search a úsáid chun an gréasán a chuardach, nó chun moltaí cuardaigh a fháil le Windows Search, is é Bing a chumhachtóidh do thorthaí cuardaigh agus úsáidfimid do cheist chuardaigh mar a thuairiscítear i rannán
Bing
den ráiteas príobháideachais seo.
Foghlaim tuilleadh faoi cuardaigh in Windows 10
.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Siamsaíocht agus seirbhísí gaolmhara
Spreagann Siamsaíocht agus Seirbhísí Gaolmhara eispéiris shaibhre agus cuireann siad ar do chumas raon inneachair, feidhmchlár agus cluichí a rochtain.
Spreagann Siamsaíocht agus Seirbhísí Gaolmhara eispéiris shaibhre agus cuireann siad ar do chumas raon inneachair, feidhmchlár agus cluichí a rochtain.
Xbox
Is é líonra Xbox an tseirbhís ar líne de chuid Microsoft do chluichíocht agus siamsaíocht ar líne atá comhdhéanta de bhogearraí agus eispéiris ar líne thar ardáin éagsúla. Ligeann an tseirbhís duit cluichí a aimsiú agus a imirt, inneachar a rochtain agus ceangal le cairde ar Xbox agus ar líonraí cluichíochta agus sóisialta eile.
Nuair a chláraíonn tú le haghaidh phróifíl Xbox, sannaimid leasainm cluichire (leasainm poiblí) agus aitheantóir uathúil. Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach ar ghléasanna, feidhmchláir agus seirbhísí Xbox, úsáidtear an t-aitheantóir uathúil nó na haitheantóirí uathúla sin chun na sonraí a bhailímid faoin úsáid agat a stóráil.
Is gléasanna iad consóil Xbox ar féidir cluichí, scannáin, ceol agus cineálacha siamsaíochta digití eile a aimsiú agus a imirt nó a sheinm orthu. Chomh maith leis sin, déanaimid aitheantóir uathúil gléis a shannadh nuair a shíníonn tú isteach ar eispéiris Xbox — i bhfeidhmchláir nó ar chonsól. Nuair a bhíonn do chonsól Xbox ceangailte leis an Idirlíon, mar shampla, agus nuair a shíníonn tú isteach ar an gconsól, aithnímid an consól agus an leagan de chóras oibriúcháin an chonsóil atá in úsáid agat.
Sonraí a bhailímid faoi
úsáid seirbhísí, cluichí, feidhmchlár agus consól Xbox agat, cuimsíonn siad:
Nuair a shíníonn tú isteach ar Xbox agus amach as, na cluichí a imríonn tú agus na feidhmchláir a úsáideann tú, dul chun cinn do chluiche, d’éachtaí agus staidreamh faoi do chluichí, na rudaí a cheannaíonn tú agus an t-inneachar a fhaigheann tú.
Na cluichí a imríonn tú agus na feidhmchláir a úsáideann tú, dul chun cinn an chluiche, gnóthachtáil, am imirt in aghaidh an chluiche, agus staitisticí eile maidir le súgartha.
Sonraí feidhmíochta faoi chonsóil Xbox, Xbox Game Pass agus feidhmchláir eile Xbox, líonra Xbox, gléasanna nasctha, agus do nasc líonra, lena n-áirítear earráidí bogearraí nó crua-earraí.
An t-inneachar arna chur leis, arna uaslódáil nó arna chomhroinnt agat trí líonra Xbox, lena n-áirítear téacs, pictiúir agus an físeán a dhéantar a ghabháil i gcluichí agus feidhmchláir.
Gníomhaíocht shóisialta, lena n-áirítear sonraí comhrá agus idirghníomhaíochtaí le cluichirí eile, agus na naisc (cairde a chuirtear leis agus daoine a leanann tú) a dhéanann tú ar líonra Xbox.
Má úsáideann tú consól nó feidhmchlár Xbox ar ghléas eile ar féidir leis líonra Xbox a rochtain, agus má chuimsíonn an gléas sin gléas stórála (tiomántán crua nó aonad cuimhne), stórálfar sonraí úsáide ar an ngléas stórála lena seoladh chuig Microsoft an chéad uair eile a shíníonn tú isteach ar Xbox, fiú má bhíonn tú ag imirt as líne.
Cuidíonn na sonraí a bhailímid dúinn eispéiris coimeádta a chur ar fáil duit. Áirítear orthu sin thú a cheangal le cluichí, inneachar agus seirbhísí, chomh maith le tairiscintí, lascainí agus moltaí a thabhairt duit. Chun do shocruithe a athrú le haghaidh na moltaí seo, tabhair cuairt ar
leathanach sábháilteachta agus príobháideachais Xbox ar líne
.
Ceamara agus Micreafón
. Agus iad i mbun Xbox á úsáid, is féidir le himreoirí cumais an ghléis, amhail an micreafón, an ceamara, agus taifeadadh scáileán a úsáid lena n-eispéireas cluichíochta a fheabhsú. Nuair a imrítear cluiche Xbox sa Windows Game Bar, d’fhéadfaí go mbainfí úsáid as an gceamara agus an micreafón, lena n-áirítear chun grianghraif agus físeáin a léamh agus chun seatanna scáileáin a ghlacadh agus a thaifeadadh.
Sonraí diagnóiseacha Xbox
. Tá dhá chatagóir i gceist le sonraí diagnóiseacha: riachtanach agus roghnach.
Riachtanach
. Cuirfidh Xbox na sonraí riachtanacha chuig Microsoft. An líon is lú sonraí a bhfuil gá leo chun Xbox a choinneáil slán úr, agus é ag feidhmiú mar a bheifí ag súil leis.
Roghnach
. Is sonraí roghnacha ann ná sonraí breise a ndéanann tú cinneadh iad a chomhroinnt le Microsoft. B’fhéidir go mbeidh sonraí eile maidir le feidhmíocht agus úsáid thairgí agus seirbhísí Xbox chomh maith le tuairisciú earráid san áireamh le sonraí roghnach.
Foghlaim tuilleadh ag
Bainistigh socruithe le haghaidh comhroinnt roghnach sonraí
.
Gabhálacha cluiche
. Is féidir le haon imreoir a bhfuil páirt á glacadh aige i seisiún cluiche il-imreoirí físeán a thaifeadadh (gearrthóga cluiche) agus gabhálacha scáileáin a dhéanamh den amharc cluiche atá aige. Is féidir do charachtar cluiche agus leasainm cluichire a ghabháil i ngearrthóga cluiche agus gabhálacha scáileáin na n-imreoirí eile le linn an tseisiúin sin. Má dhéanann imreoir gearrthóga agus gabhálacha scáileáin den chluiche ar ríomhaire, seans go ndéanfar an comhrá fuaime a ghabháil freisin sna gearrthóga cluiche.
Fotheidealú
. I gcomhrá fíor-ama (“cóisir”) Xbox, is féidir le himreoirí gné gutha go téacs a ghníomhachtú, a cheadaíonn dóibh amharc ar an gcomhrá sin mar théacs. Má ghníomhachtaíonn imreoir an ghné seo, cuirtear fotheideal ar gach cumarsáid gutha sa chóisir don imreoir. Úsáideann Microsoft na sonraí téacs sin chun fotheidealú comhrá a sholáthar do na himreoirí a dteastaíonn sé uathu agus le haghaidh na gcuspóirí eile a ndéantar cur síos orthu sa ráiteas seo.
Sonraí Xbox ar féidir le daoine eile amharc orthu
. Is féidir leo siúd a leanas breathnú ar do leasainm cluichire, staidreamh cluichí agus imeartha, éachtaí, láithreacht (cibé an bhfuil nó nach bhfuil tú sínithe isteach ar Xbox faoi láthair), inneachar a chomhroinneann tú agus sonraí eile maidir le do ghníomhaíocht ar Xbox:
Imreoirí eile atá sínithe isteach ar Xbox.
Custaiméirí de chuid seirbhísí tríú páirtí lena bhfuil do phróifíl nasctha, nó
Seirbhísí eile a bhaineann le Xbox (seirbhísí cuideachtaí comhpháirtíochta san áireamh).
Mar shampla, is faisnéis phoiblí do leasainm cluichire agus do scóir ar chlár ceann riain an chluiche agus ní féidir iad a chur i bhfolach. Le haghaidh sonraí eile, is féidir leat do shocruithe príobháideachais a choigeartú ar an gconsól agus ag
Xbox.com
chun comhroinnt leis an bpobal nó le cairde a theorannú nó a bhacadh.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise ag
socruithe príobháideachais agus sábháilteachta Xbox ar líne
.
Sonraí Xbox a chomhroinntear le tríú páirtithe lena n-áirítear foilsitheoirí cluiche agus feidhmchláir
. Nuair a úsáideann tú cluiche ar líne Xbox nó feidhmchlár atá ceangailte leis an líonra ar do chonsól Xbox, ríomhaire nó gléas móibíleach, bíonn rochtain ag foilsitheoir an chluiche nó an fheidhmchláir sin ar shonraí faoin úsáid a bhaineann tú as chun cabhrú leis a tháirge a sholáthar agus a fheabhsú agus tacaíocht a chur ar fáil ina leith. D’fhéadfadh an méid seo a leanas bheith san áireamh sna sonraí sin: d’aitheantóir úsáideora Xbox agus do leasainm cluichire, faisnéis theoranta cuntais amhail tír agus raon aoise, sonraí faoi do chumarsáid i gcluichí, gníomhaíocht fhorfheidhmithe Xbox, seisiúin imeartha (mar shampla, rudaí a rinneadh sa chluiche, na cineálacha feithiclí a úsáideadh sa chluiche), do láithreacht ar líonra Xbox, an méid ama a chaitheann tú ag imirt an chluiche nó an fheidhmchláir, rangaithe, staidreamh, próifílí cluichirí, abhatáranna nó pictiúir de chluichirí, liostaí cairde, fothaí gníomhaíochta na gclubanna oifigiúla ina bhfuil tú páirteach, ballraíocht i gclubanna oifigiúla, agus aon inneachar eile a chruthaíonn nó a chuireann tú isteach sa chluiche nó san fheidhmchláir.
Bíonn a gcaidreamh uathúil neamhspleách féin le húsáideoirí ag foilsitheoirí agus forbróirí tríú páirtí na gcluichí agus na bhfeidhmchlár, agus déanann siad sonraí pearsanta a bhailiú agus a úsáid i gcomhréir lena bpolasaithe príobháideachais ar leith. Ba chóir duit athbhreithniú cúramach a dhéanamh ar a bpolasaithe chun an dóigh a n-úsáideann siad na sonraí a fháil amach. Mar shampla, d’fhéadfadh foilsitheoirí a roghnú sonraí cluiche a nochtadh nó a thaispeáint (amhail ar chláir ceann riain) trína seirbhísí féin. D’fhéadfadh nasc lena bpolasaithe a bheith le fáil ar leathanaigh mionsonraí cluiche nó feidhmchláir i Microsoft Store.
Foghlaim níos mó ag
Comhroinnt Sonraí le Cluichí agus Aipeanna
.
Chun stop a chur le comhroinnt sonraí cluiche nó feidhmchlár le foilsitheoir, bain cluichí nó feidhmchláir an fhoilsitheora de na gléasanna go léir ar a bhfuil siad suiteáilte agat. D’fhéadfadh roinnt rochtain foilsitheoir ar shonraí do pháiste a chúlghairm ag
microsoft.com/consent
.
Leanaí agus teaghlach
. Más mian le do pháistí líonra Xbox a úsáid, is féidir leat próifílí páiste agus déagóra a shocrú dóibh a luaithe is a bheidh cuntas Microsoft acu. Is féidir le heagraithe fásta i do ghrúpa teaghlaigh Microsoft roghanna toilithe agus socruithe sábháilteachta ar líne a athrú do phróifílí páistí agus déagóirí ar
Xbox.com
.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi ghrúpaí teaghlaigh Microsoft ag
Déan saol do theaghlaigh a shimpliú
.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi phróifílí Xbox a bhainistiú ag
socruithe sábháilteachta agus príobháideachta ar líne Xbox
.
Chun tuilleadh faisnéise a fháil faoi bhailiú sonraí Microsoft ó leanaí, lena n-áirítear Xbox, féach an rannán
Bailiú Sonraí ó Leanaí
den ráiteas príobháideachta seo.
Sábháilteacht
. D'fhonn cabhrú le timpeallacht shábháilte cluichíocht a dhéanamh den líonra Xbox agus Caighdeáin an Phobail do Xbox a fhorfheidhmiú, féadfaimid guth, téacs, íomhánna, físeáin agus inneachar sa chluiche a bhailiú agus a athbhreithniú (ar nós gearrthóga cluiche a uaslódálann tú, comhráite atá agat agus rudaí atá post agat i gcluichí agus cluichí).
Frithchalaois agus cosc caimiléireachta
. Tá sé tábhachtach dúinn timpeallacht chothrom imeartha a sholáthar. Coisctear calaois, haiceáil, goid cuntas agus aon ghníomhaíocht neamhúdaraithe nó chalaoiseach eile nuair a úsáideann tú cluiche Xbox ar líne nó aon fheidhmchlár nasctha leis an líonra ar do chonsól Xbox, ríomhaire nó gléas móibíleach. D'fhonn calaois agus caimiléireacht a bhrath agus a chosc, féadfaimid úsáid a bhaint as uirlisí frith-aicearra agus cosc caimiléireachta, feidhmchláir agus teicneolaíochtaí eile. Féadfaidh teicneolaíochtaí den sórt sin sínithe digiteacha a chruthú (ar a dtugtar “hais”) ag baint úsáide as faisnéis áirithe a bhailítear ó do chonsól Xbox, ríomhaire nó gléas móibíleach agus conas a úsáideann tú an gléas sin. D’fhéadfadh faisnéis faoin mbrabhsálaí, gléas, gníomhaíochtaí, aitheantóirí cluiche agus córais oibriúcháin a bheith san áireamh anseo.
Oidhreacht
.
Xbox 360
. Bailíonn an consól Xbox seo sonraí riachtanacha diagnóiseacha teoranta le cinntiú go bhfeidhmíonn do chonsól mar a bheifí súil leis agus consól atá ceangailte leis an Líonra Xbox á úsáid.
Kinect
. Tá comhcheangal ceamara, micreafóin agus braiteora infridheirg sa bhraiteoir Kinect, agus d’fhéadfaí leis guth agus gluaiseachtaí a chumasú chun an imirt a rialú. Mar shampla:
Más mian leat, is féidir an ceamara a úsáid chun síniú isteach sa líonra Xbox go huathoibríoch le haithint aghaidhe. Fanann na sonraí sin ar an gconsól agus ní chomhroinntear iad le duine ar bith. Is féidir leat na sonraí sin a scriosadh ó do chonsól uair ar bith.
Le haghaidh cluichíochta, mapálfaidh Kinect an fad idir ailt an choirp chun duine cipíneach díot a chruthú a chabhraíonn le Kinect cluichíocht a chumasú.
Cumasaíonn micreafóin Kinect comhrá gutha idir imreoirí le linn cluichíochta. Cumasaíonn an micreafóin fosta orduithe gutha chun consól, cluiche, nó feidhmchláir a rialú, nó chun téarmaí cuardaigh a iontráil.
Is féidir braiteoir Kinect a úsáid, leis, le haghaidh cumarsáid fuaime agus físeáin trí sheirbhísí ar nós Skype.
Foghlaim níos mó faoi Kinect ag
Xbox Kinect agus Príobháideachas
.
Siar go barr
Microsoft Store
Seirbhís ar líne is ea Microsoft Store, atá inrochtana trí ríomhaire, trí chonsól an Xbox agus an Xbox App, trínar féidir leat dul ag brabhsáil, feidhmchláir agus inneachar digiteach eile a íoslódáil, a cheannach, a rátáil, agus a athbhreithniú. Cuimsíonn sé:
Feidhmchlár agus inneachar do ghléasanna Windows ar nós fóin phóca, ríomhairí, agus táibléid.
Cluichí, síntiúis agus feidhmchláir eile le haghaidh consóil Xbox agus gléasanna eile.
Táirgí agus aipeanna le haghaidh Microsoft 365, SharePoint, Exchange, Access, agus Project (leaganacha 2013 nó níos déanaí).
Bailímid sonraí maidir leis an gcaoi a ndéanann tú Microsoft Store a rochtain agus a úsáid; na táirgí a d'amharc tú orthu, a cheannaigh, nó a shuiteáil tú; na roghanna a shocraigh tú maidir le hamharc ar fheidhmchláir i Microsoft Store; agus aon rátálacha, athbhreithniú, nó tuairiscí faidhbe a chuireann tú isteach. Baineann do chuntas Microsoft le rátálacha agus léirmheasanna uait; agus má scríobhann tú léirmheas, foilseofar an t-ainm agus an pictiúr ón gcuntas Microsoft in éineacht leis an léirmheas. Baineann Microsoft Store úsáid as an réigiún arna choigeartú ar do ghléas chun ábhar ábhartha agus incháilithe agus marsantú a thaispeáint. Baineann Microsoft Store úsáid as d’aitheantóir gléis chun na cearta táirge a mbaineann le gléas ar leith a bhainistiú.
Cead d'fheidhmchláir Microsoft Store
. Dearadh cuid mhaith de na feidhmchláir a shuiteálann tú ó Microsoft Store chun tairbhe a bhaint as gnéithe bogearraí agus crua-earraí faoi leith ar do ghléas. D'fhéadfadh an úsáid a bhaineann feidhmchlár éigin as gnéithe crua-earra nó bogearraí faoi leith rochtain ar do shonraí a thabhairt don fheidhmchláir sin nó do sheirbhís atá gaolmhar leis. Mar shampla, d'fhéadfadh feidhmchlár eagarthóireachta grianghraif ceamara do ghléis a oscailt chun ligean duit grianghraf nua a ghlacadh nó grianghraif nó físeáin atá stóráilte ar do ghléas a oscailt lena gcur in eagar, agus d'fhéadfadh treoir bialann do shuíomh a úsáid chun moltaí a dhéanamh maidir le bialanna in aice láimhe. Gheofar faisnéis maidir leis na gnéithe a úsáideann feidhmchlár ar leathanach tuairiscithe táirge an fheidhmchláir i Microsoft Store. Is iomaí gné d'fheidhmchláir Microsoft Store is féidir a chasadh as nó air trí shocruithe príobháideachta do ghléis. In Windows, is minic is féidir leat na feidhmchláir a úsáideann gné ar leith a roghnú. Go to
Tosaigh > Socruithe > Príobháideachas nó Príobháideachas & Slándáil
, roghnaigh an ghné (Féilire, mar shampla), ansin roghnaigh cad iad na ceadanna feidhmchláir a chasfaidh tú air nó as. Ní bheidh feidhmchláir "Clasaiceacha Windows" ar liostaí na bhfeidhmchlár i socruithe príobháideachais Windows ar féidir leo gnéithe crua-earraí agus bogearraí a úsáid, agus ní bheidh aon tionchar ag na socruithe sin ar na feidhmchláir seo.
Nuashonruithe feidhmchláir
. Mura bhfuil na nuashonruithe uathoibríocha feidhmchláir díchumasaithe agat sna socruithe ábhartha Microsoft Store, seiceálfaidh Microsoft Store go huathoibríoch an bhfuil nuashonruithe feidhmchláir ann lena chinntiú go bhfuil an leagan is déanaí agat, agus déanfar iad a íoslódáil agus a shuiteáil. D'fhéadfadh feidhmchláir nuashonraithe gnéithe difriúla de chrua-earraí agus de bhogearraí Windows a úsáid, i gcomparáid le leaganacha roimhe seo, a d'fhéadhfadh rochtain a thabhairt dóibh ar shonraí difriúla ar do ghléas. Iarrfar do thoiliú ort má osclaíonn feidhmchlár nuashonraithe gnéithe áirithe, ar nós suímh. Agus is féidir leat athbhreithniú a dhéanamh ar na gnéithe crua-earraí agus bogearraí a úsáideann feidhmchláir ach amharc ar an leathanach leis an gcur síos ar an táirge i Microsoft Store.
Maidir leis an úsáid a bhaineann gach feidhmchlár as aon sonraí a bhailítear trí na gnéithe seo, is faoi réir polasaí príobháideachta fhorbóir an fheidhmchláir atá sí. Má dhéanann feidhmchlár atá ar fáil trí Microsoft Store aon sonraí pearsanta a bhailiú nó a úsáid, ní mór d'fhorbróir an fheidhmchláir polasaí príobháideachais a sholáthar, agus gheofar nasc chuig an polasaí príobháideachais ar leathanach tuairiscithe táirge an fheidhmchláir i Microsoft Store.
Feidhmchláir taobhlódáilte agus mód forbróra
. Cuirtear gnéithe forbróra ar nós an tsocraithe "mód forbróra" ar fáil d'fhorbróirí amháin. Má chumasaíonn tú gnéithe forbróra, is féidir go dtiocfaidh do ghléas chun a bheith neamhiontaofa nó neamh-in-úsáidte, agus tú a chur faoi bhagairt slándála. Nuair a íoslódálann tú nó nuair a fhaigheann feidhmchláir ó fhoinsí taobh amuigh de Microsoft Store, a dtugtar feidhmchlár"taobhlódáil" air, freisin, is féidir go mbeidh do ghléas agus do shonraí pearsanta níos leochailí i gcás ionsaí nó úsáid gan choinne a bhainfeadh feidhmchláir astu. Is féidir nach n-oibreodh beartas, fógraí, ceadanna, agus gnéithe eile de Windows mar atá ceaptha mar chabhair chun do phríobháideacht a chosaint nuair a osclaíonn feidhmchláir do shonraí mar atá tuairiscithe sa ráiteas seo i gcás feidhmchlár taobhlódáilte nó nuair a chumasaítear gnéithe forbróra.
Siar go barr
Microsoft Start
Is seirbhís ábhair é Microsoft Start (mar a aithníodh roimhe mar Microsoft News) lena n-áirítear nuacht, aimsir, spóirt, agus airgeadas. Tá feidhmchláir Microsoft Start ar fáil in go leor ardán, ar nós iOS agus Android. Tá an seirbhís Microsoft Start san áireamh i seirbhísí Microsoft eile chomh maith, ar nós an brabhsálaí Microsoft Edge agus giuirléidí ar Windows.
Nuair a dhéanann tú na feidhmchláir Microsoft Start, Aimsir MSN, nó Microsoft News a shuiteáil, bailíonn muid sonraí lena n-insítear dúinn cé acu ar shuiteáil an feidhmchlár mar is ceart, an dáta suiteála, leagan an fheidhmchláir, agus sonraí eile maidir le do ghléas amhail an córas oibriúcháin agus brabhsálaí. Bailítear na sonraí seo ar bhonn rialta le cabhrú linn cinntiú méid na n-úsáideoirí feidhmchláir agus chun fadhbanna feidhmiúlacht a mbaineann le leaganacha éagsúla an fheidhmchláir, le córais oibríochta agus le brabhsálaithe a shainaithint. Baineann muid úsáid as do shuíomh chun ábhar ábhartha a chur ar fáil duit amhail nuacht agus aimsir áitiúil.
Bailímid sonraí freisin maidir le do chuid idirghníomhaíochtaí le seirbhísí Microsoft Start, amhail minicíocht úsáide agus ailt feicthe, chun inneachar ábhartha a sholáthar duit. Soláthraíonn cuid de sheirbhísí Microsoft Start eispéireas feabhsaithe nuair a shíníonn tú isteach le do chuntas Microsoft, lena n-áirítear ligean duit d'ábhair spéise agus do cheanáin a shaincheapadh. Baineann muid úsáid as do shuíomh chun ábhar ábhartha a chur ar fáil duit amhail nuacht agus aimsir áitiúil. Is féidir leat pearsantú a bhainistiú trí shocruithe Microsoft Start agus Bing, chomh maith le trí shocruithe i seirbhísí Microsoft eile, lena n-áirítear seirbhísí Microsoft Start. Bainimid úsáid as sonraí bailithe freisin chun fógraí a sholáthair duit a d'fhéadfadh a bheith suimiúil duit. Is féidir diúltú d'fhógraíocht bunaithe ar ábhair spéise trí na naisc fógraíochta laistigh de sheirbhísí Microsoft Start, nó trí chuairt a thabhairt ar an leathanach
díliostála
Microsoft.
Le leaganacha roimhe seo de MSN Money bhí ar do chumas dul chuig faisnéis phearsanta airgeadais ó institiúidí airgeadais tríú páirtí. Ní dhéantar ach an fhaisnéis sin a thaispeáint ar MSN Money, ní stóráiltear é ar ár bhfreastalaithe. Déantar d'fhaisnéis aitheantais sínithe isteach a úsáideann tú chun dul chuig faisnéis airgeadais ó thríú páirtithe a chriptiú ar do ghléas agus ní sheoltar iad chuig Microsoft. Tá na hinstitiúidí airgeadais sin, chomh maith le seirbhísí tríú páirtí eile a bhfuil rochtain agat orthu trí sheirbhísí MSN, faoi réir a dtéarmaí agus a mbeartas príobháideachais féin.
Siar go barr
Silverlight
Cabhraíonn Microsoft Silverlight leat inneachar saibhir ar an ngréasán a oscailt agus taitneamh a bhaint as. Cumasaíonn Silverlight do shuíomhanna agus do sheirbhísí sonraí a stóráil ar do ghléas. Baineann gnéithe eile de Silverlight le ceangal le Microsoft chun nuashonruithe a fháil, nó le freastalaithe de chuid Microsoft agus de chuid tríú páirtithe chun inneachar digiteach faoi chosaint a sheinm.
Uirlis Chumraíochta Silverlight
. Is féidir leat roghanna a dhéanamh faoi na gnéithe sin san Uirlis Cumhraíocht Silverlight. Chun uirlis Cumraíochta Silverlight a oscailt, deaschliceáil ar inneachar atá á thaispeáint ag Silverlight faoi láthair agus roghnaigh
Silverlight
. Is féidir freisin uirlis Chumraíochta Silverlight a rith go díreach. In Windows, mar shampla, is féidir an uirlis a rochtain trí "Microsoft Silverlight" a chuardach.
Stóras feidhmchláir Silverlight
. Tá na feidhme bunaithe ar Silverlight in ann comhaid sonraithe a chur i dtáisce go háitiúil i do ríomhaire le cuspóirí éagsúla, mar shampla do shocruithe a shábháil, comhaid móra a chur i dtáisce do gnéithe grafacha (ar nós cluichí, léarscáileanna agus íomhánna), agus inneachar atá cruthaithe agat le feidhmeanna faoi leith a chur i dtáisce. Is féidir an stóráil feidhme a dhíchumasú nó a shocrú leis an uirlis Cumhraíochta Silverlight.
Nuashonruithe Silverlight
. Beidh Silverlight ag seiceáil freastalaithe Microsoft go téarmach le nuashonraithe a fháil amach, agus na gnéithe is déanaí a chur ar fáil duit. Beidh comhad bheag le heolas faoin leagan Silverlight is déanaí á íoslódáil ar do ríomhaire agus á chur i gcomparáid leis an leagan atá agat. Má tá leagan nua ar fáil, beidh sé íoslódáilte agus suiteáilte ar do ríomhaire. Is féidir na nuashonraithe a dhíchumasú nó a shocrú leis an uirlis Cumhraíochta Silverlight.
Bainistíocht Cearta Digiteacha
. Baineann Silverlight úsáid as Bainistíocht Cirta Digiteacha Microsoft (DRM) chun na cearta atá ag úinéirí inneachair a chosaint. Má tá rochtain agat ar inneachar cosanta ag DRM (ar nós ceol nó fís) le Silverlight, beidh cearta úsáid mhéide uait ó freastalaí cirta san Idirlíon. Chun taithí athsheinm foirfe a sholáthair duit, ní bheidh rochtain le feiceáil sula sheolann Silverlight an t-iarratas chuig an freastalaí cirta. Agus cearta úsáide meán á n-iarraidh agat, soláthróidh Silverlight ID don bhfreastalaí ceart ID le haghaidh an chomhaid inneachais faoi chosaint DRM agus bunsonraí maidir le do ghléas, lena n-áirítear sonraí maidir leis na comhpháirteanna DRM ar do ghléas ar nós a leibhéil athcheartaithe agus slándála, agus aitheantóir uathúil do ghléis.
Nuashonraithe DRM
. I gcásanna áirithe, beidh nuashonra ar Silverlight nó ar DRM uait chun rochtain a fháil ar inneachar cosanta ag DRM i do ghléas. Má dhéanann tú iarracht inneachar ar gá nuashonrú DRM dó a sheinm, seolfaidh Silverlight iarratas chuig freastalaí Microsoft ina gcuimseofar bunsonraí maidir le do ghléas, lena n-áirítear faisnéis maidir leis na comhpháirteanna DRM ar do ríomhaire, dála a leibhéil athcheartaithe agus slándála, sonraí fabhtcheartaithe, agus aitheantóir uathúil maidir le do ghléas. Úsáideann freastalaí Microsoft an t-aitheantóir seo chun nuashonrú uathúil DRM a chur ar fáil do do ghléas, a shuiteálfaidh Silverlight ina dhiaidh sin. Is féidir nuashonraithe chomhpháirt DRM a chasadh as nó a chumrú ar tháb
Athsheinm
in uirlis Chumraíochta Silverlight.
Siar go barr
Réaltacht mheasctha Windows
Ligeann Réaltacht mheasctha Windows duit eispéireas Réaltacht fhíorúil a bheith agat a thumann tú i d’aipeanna agus do chluichí. Tá comhcheangal ceamara, micreafóin, agus braiteora infridhearga sa bhraiteoir Réaltacht Mheasctha, agus d'fhéadfadh leis guth agus gluaiseachtaí a chumasú chun an cluiche a smachtú agus nascleanúint trí aipeanna agus cluichí.
Bailíonn Microsoft sonraí diagnóisice Windows chun fadhbanna a réiteach agus chun Windows a choinneáil cothrom le dáta, slán, agus ag oibriú mar is ceart. Cabhraíonn sonraí diagnóiseacha dúinn Réaltacht Mheasctha a fheabhsú agus táirgí agus seirbhísí ábhartha Microsoft leis ag brath ar na socruithe sonraí diagnóiseacha atá roghnaithe agat do do ghléas.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise faoi shonraí diagnóiseacha Windows
.
Déanann Réaltacht Mheasctha atá gaolta go sonrach le heispéireas Réaltacht Mheasctha sonraí a phróiseáil agus a bhailiú, mar shampla:
Tomhasann Réaltacht Mheasctha an fhad idir ailt do chorp chun ionadaíocht cipíneach a chruthú duit. Má tá tú nasctha leis an idirlíon, bailímid na luachanna uimhriúla sin chun d’eispéireas a áisiú agus a fheabhsú.
Ina theannta sin, braitheann Réaltacht Mheasctha comharthaí láimhe atá ceaptha chun idirghníomhaíochtaí simplí córais a chur i gcrích (amhail nascleanúint roghchláir, peanáil/zúmáil agus scrolladh). Tá na sonraí seo próiseáilte ar do ríomhaire pearsanta agus ní stórailtear é.
Cumasaíonn micreafóin an gléas cinn orduithe gutha chun cluichí agus feidhmchláir a rialú, nó chun míreanna cuardaigh a iontráil.
Faigh tuilleadh faisnéise maidir le bailiú sonraí gutha
.
Is féidir braiteoir Réaltacht Mheasctha Windows a úsáid, leis, le haghaidh cumarsáid fuaime agus físeáin trí sheirbhísí ar nós Skype.
Féach achoimre
Eolas eile
Siar go barr
Siar go Barr
Sub-policy 21
https://www.linkedin.com/legal/privacy-policy:
Skip to main content
LinkedIn respects your privacy
LinkedIn and 3rd parties use essential and non-essential cookies to provide, secure, analyze and improve our Services, and to show you relevant ads (including
professional and job ads
) on and off LinkedIn. Learn more in our
Cookie Policy
.
Select Accept to consent or Reject to decline non-essential cookies for this use. You can update your choices at any time in your
settings
.
Accept
Reject
Privacy Policy
Effective September 18, 2024
LinkedIn's global Privacy Policy below applies worldwide. If you're located in the EU, EEA, UK, or Switzerland, you can review additional information that will apply to you in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Your Privacy Matters
LinkedIn’s mission is to connect the world’s professionals to allow them to be more productive and successful. Central to this mission is our commitment to be transparent about the data we collect about you, how it is used and with whom it is shared.
This Privacy Policy applies when you use our Services (described below). We offer our users
choices
about the data we collect, use and share as described in this Privacy Policy,
Cookie Policy
, Settings and our
Help Center.
Choices
﻿
Settings
are available to Members of LinkedIn and Visitors are provided separate controls.
Learn More
.
Table of Contents
Data We Collect
How We Use Your Data
How We Share Information
Your Choices and Obligations
Other Important Information
Introduction
We are a social network and online platform for professionals. People use our Services to find and be found for business opportunities, to connect with others and find information. Our Privacy Policy applies to any Member or Visitor to our Services.
Our registered users (“Members”) share their professional identities, engage with their network, exchange knowledge and professional insights, post and view relevant content, learn and develop skills, and find business and career opportunities. Content and data on some of our Services is viewable to non-Members (“Visitors”).
We use the term “Designated Countries” to refer to countries in the European Union (EU), European Economic Area (EEA), and Switzerland. Members and Visitors located in the Designated Countries or the UK can review additional information in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
Services
This Privacy Policy, including our Cookie Policy applies to your use of our Services.
This Privacy Policy applies to LinkedIn.com, LinkedIn-branded apps, and other LinkedIn-branded sites, apps, communications and services offered by LinkedIn (“Services”), including off-site Services, such as our ad services and the “Apply with LinkedIn” and “Share with LinkedIn” plugins, but excluding services that state that they are offered under a different privacy policy. For California residents, additional disclosures required by California law may be found in our
California Privacy Disclosure
.
Data Controllers and Contracting Parties
If you are in the “Designated Countries”, LinkedIn Ireland Unlimited Company (“LinkedIn Ireland”) will be the controller of your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
If you are outside of the Designated Countries, LinkedIn Corporation will be the controller of (or business responsible for) your personal data provided to, or collected by or for, or processed in connection with our Services.
As a Visitor or Member of our Services, the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to this Privacy Policy and other documents referenced in this Privacy Policy, as well as updates.
Change
Changes to the Privacy Policy apply to your use of our Services after the “effective date.”
LinkedIn (“we” or “us”) can modify this Privacy Policy, and if we make material changes to it, we will provide notice through our Services, or by other means, to provide you the opportunity to review the changes before they become effective. If you object to any changes, you may
close your account.
You acknowledge that your continued use of our Services after we publish or send a notice about our changes to this Privacy Policy means that the collection, use and sharing of your personal data is subject to the updated Privacy Policy, as of its effective date.
1. Data We Collect
1.1 Data You Provide To Us
You provide data to create an account with us.
Registration
To create an account you need to provide data including your name, email address and/or mobile number, general location (e.g., city), and a password. If you register for a premium Service, you will need to provide payment (e.g., credit card) and billing information.
You create your LinkedIn profile (a complete profile helps you get the most from our Services).
Profile
You have
choices
about the information on your profile, such as your education, work experience, skills, photo,
city or area
, endorsements, and optional
verifications
of information on your profile (such as verifications of your identity or workplace). You don’t have to provide additional information on your profile; however, profile information helps you to get more from our Services, including helping recruiters and business opportunities find you. It’s your choice whether to include
sensitive information
on your profile and to make that sensitive information public. Please do not post or add personal data to your profile that you would not want to be publicly available.
You may give other data to us, such as by syncing your calendar.
Posting and Uploading
We collect personal data from you when you provide, post or upload it to our Services, such as when you fill out a form, (e.g., with demographic data or salary), respond to a survey, or submit a resume or fill out a job application on our Services.
If you sync your calendars with our Services, we will collect your calendar meeting information to keep growing your network by suggesting connections for you and others, and by providing information about events, e.g. times, places, attendees and contacts.
You don’t have to post or upload personal data; though if you don’t, it may limit your ability to grow and engage with your network over our Services.
1.2 Data From Others
Others may post or write about you.
Content and News
You and others may post content that includes information about you (as part of articles, posts, comments, videos) on our Services. We also may collect public information about you, such as professional-related news and accomplishments, and make it available as part of our Services, including, as permitted by your settings, in notifications to others of
mentions in the news
.
Others may sync their calendar with our Services
Contact and Calendar Information
We receive personal data (including contact information) about you when others import or sync their calendar with our Services, associate their contacts with Member profiles, scan and upload business cards, or send messages using our Services (including invites or connection requests). If you or others opt-in to sync email accounts with our Services, we will also collect “email header” information that we can associate with Member profiles.
Customers and partners may provide data to us.
Partners
We receive personal data (e.g., your job title and work email address) about you when you use the services of our customers and partners, such as employers or prospective employers and applicant tracking systems providing us job application data.
Related Companies and Other Services
We receive data about you when you use some of the other services provided by us or our
Affiliates
, including Microsoft. For example, you may choose to send us information about your contacts in Microsoft apps and services, such as Outlook, for improved professional networking activities on our Services
1.3 Service Use
We log your visits and use of our Services, including mobile apps.
We log usage data when you visit or otherwise use our Services, including our sites, app and platform technology, such as when you view or click on content (e.g., learning video) or ads (on or off our sites and apps), perform a search, install or update one of our mobile apps, share articles or apply for jobs. We use log-ins, cookies,
device information
and internet protocol (“IP”) addresses to identify you and log your use.
1.4 Cookies and Similar Technologies
We collect data through cookies and similar technologies.
As further described in our
Cookie Policy
, we use cookies and similar technologies (e.g., pixels and ad tags) to collect data (e.g., device IDs) to recognize you and your device(s) on, off and across different services and devices where you have engaged with our Services. We also allow some others to use cookies as described in our Cookie Policy. If you are outside the Designated Countries, we also collect (or rely on others who collect) information about your device where you have not engaged with our Services (e.g., ad ID, IP address, operating system and browser information) so we can provide our Members with relevant ads and better understand their effectiveness.
Learn more
. You can
opt out
from our use of data from cookies and similar technologies that track your behavior on the sites of others for ad targeting and other ad-related purposes. For Visitors,
the controls are
here
.
1.5 Your Device and Location
We receive data through cookies and similar technologies
When you visit or leave our Services (including some plugins and our cookies or similar technology on the sites of others), we receive the URL of both the site you came from and the one you go to and the time of your visit. We also get information about your network and device (e.g., IP address, proxy server, operating system, web browser and add-ons, device identifier and features, cookie IDs and/or ISP, or your mobile carrier). If you use our Services from a mobile device, that device will send us data about your location based on your phone settings. We will ask you to opt-in before we use GPS or other tools to identify your precise location.
1.6 Communications
If you communicate through our Services, we learn about that.
We collect information about you when you communicate with others through our Services (e.g., when you send, receive, or engage with messages, events, or connection requests, including our marketing communications). This may include information that indicates who you are communicating with and when. We also use
automated systems
to support and protect our site. For example, we use such systems to suggest possible responses to messages and to manage or block content that violates our User Agreement or
Professional Community Policies
.
1.7 Workplace and School Provided Information
When your organization (e.g., employer or school) buys a premium Service for you to use, they give us data about you.
Others buying our Services for your use, such as your employer or your school, provide us with personal data about you and your eligibility to use the Services that they purchase for use by their workers, students or alumni. For example, we will get contact information for “
LinkedIn Page
” (formerly Company Page) administrators and for authorizing users of our premium Services, such as our recruiting, sales or learning products.
1.8 Sites and Services of Others
We get data when you visit sites that include our ads, cookies or plugins or when you log-in to others’ services with your LinkedIn account.
We receive information about your visits and interaction with services provided by others when you log-in with LinkedIn or visit others’ services that include some of our plugins (such as “Apply with LinkedIn”) or our ads, cookies or similar technologies.
1.9 Other
We are improving our Services, which means we get new data and create new ways to use data.
Our Services are dynamic, and we often introduce new features, which may require the collection of new information. If we collect materially different personal data or materially change how we collect, use or share your data, we will notify you and may also modify this Privacy Policy.
Affiliates
Affiliates are companies controlling, controlled by or under common control with us, including, for example, LinkedIn Ireland, LinkedIn Corporation, LinkedIn Singapore and Microsoft Corporation.
2. How We Use Your Data
We use your data to provide, support, personalize and develop our Services.
How we use your personal data will depend on which Services you use, how you use those Services and the choices you make in your
settings
. We may use your personal data to improve, develop, and provide products and Services, develop and train artificial intelligence (AI) models, develop, provide, and personalize our Services, and gain insights with the help of AI, automated systems, and inferences, so that our Services can be more relevant and useful to you and others. You can review LinkedIn's Responsible AI principles
here
and learn more about our approach to generative AI
here
.
Learn more
about the inferences we may make, including as to
your age and gender
and how we use them.
2.1 Services
Our Services help you connect with others, find and be found for work and business opportunities, stay informed, get training and be more productive.
We use your data to authorize access to our Services and honor your settings.
Stay Connected
Our Services allow you to stay in touch and up to date with colleagues, partners, clients, and other professional contacts. To do so, you can “connect” with the professionals who you choose, and who also wish to “connect” with you. Subject to your and their
settings
, when you connect with other Members, you will be able to search each others’ connections in order to exchange professional opportunities.
We use data about you (such as your profile, profiles you have viewed or data provided through address book uploads or partner integrations) to help others find your profile, suggest connections for you and others (e.g. Members who share your contacts or job experiences) and enable you to invite others to become a Member and connect with you. You can also opt-in to allow us to use your precise location or proximity to others for certain tasks (e.g. to suggest other nearby Members for you to connect with, calculate the commute to a new job, or notify your connections that you are at a professional event).
It is your choice whether to invite someone to our Services, send a connection request, or allow another Member to become your connection. When you invite someone to connect with you, your invitation will include your network and basic profile information (e.g., name, profile photo, job title, region). We will send invitation reminders to the person you invited. You can
choose
whether or not to share your own list of connections with your connections.
Visitors have
choices
about how we use their data.
Stay Informed
Our Services allow you to stay informed about news, events and ideas regarding professional topics you care about, and from professionals you respect. Our Services also allow you to improve your professional skills, or learn new ones. We use the data we have about you (e.g., data you provide, data we collect from your engagement with our Services and inferences we make from the data we have about you), to personalize our Services for you, such as by recommending or ranking relevant content and conversations on our Services. We also use the data we have about you to suggest skills you could add to your profile and skills that you might need to pursue your next opportunity. So, if you let us know that you are interested in a new skill (e.g., by watching a learning video), we will use this information to personalize content in your feed, suggest that you follow certain Members on our site, or suggest related learning content to help you towards that new skill. We use your content, activity and other data, including your name and photo, to provide notices to your network and others. For example, subject to your
settings
, we may notify others that you have updated your profile, posted content, took a
social action
, used a feature, made new connections or were
mentioned in the news
.
Career
Our Services allow you to explore careers, evaluate educational opportunities, and seek out, and be found for, career opportunities. Your profile can be found by those looking to hire (for a job or a
specific task
) or be hired by you. We will use your data to recommend jobs and show you and others relevant professional contacts (e.g., who work at a company, in an industry, function or location or have certain skills and connections). You can signal that you are
interested
in changing jobs and share information with recruiters. We will use your data to recommend jobs to you and you to recruiters. We may use automated systems to provide content and recommendations to help make our Services more relevant to our Members, Visitors and customers. Keeping your profile accurate and up-to-date may help you better connect to others and to opportunities through our Services.
Productivity
Our Services allow you to collaborate with colleagues, search for potential clients, customers, partners and others to do business with. Our Services allow you to communicate with other Members and schedule and prepare meetings with them. If your
settings
allow, we scan messages to provide “bots” or similar tools that facilitate tasks such as scheduling meetings, drafting responses, summarizing messages or recommending next steps.
Learn more
.
2.2 Premium Services
Our premium Services help paying users to search for and contact Members through our Services, such as searching for and contacting job candidates, sales leads and co-workers, manage talent and promote content.
We sell premium Services that provide our customers and subscribers with customized-search functionality and tools (including messaging and activity alerts) as part of our talent, marketing and sales solutions. Customers can export limited information from your profile, such as name, headline, current company, current title, and general location (e.g., Dublin), such as to manage sales leads or talent, unless you
opt-out
. We do not provide contact information to customers as part of these premium Services without your consent. Premium Services customers can store information they have about you in our premium Services, such as a resume or contact information or sales history. The data stored about you by these customers is subject to the policies of those customers. Other enterprise Services and features that use your data include
TeamLink
and
LinkedIn Pages
(e.g., content analytics and followers).
2.3 Communications
We contact you and enable communications between Members. We offer settings to control what messages you receive and how often you receive some types of messages.
We will contact you through email, mobile phone, notices posted on our websites or apps, messages to your LinkedIn inbox, and other ways through our Services, including text messages and push notifications. We will send you messages about the availability of our Services, security, or other service-related issues. We also send messages about how to use our Services, network updates, reminders, job suggestions and promotional messages from us and our partners. You may change your communication
preferences
at any time. Please be aware that you cannot opt out of receiving service messages from us, including security and legal notices.
We also enable
communications
between you and others through our Services, including for example
invitations
,
InMail
,
groups
and
messages
between connections.
2.4 Advertising
We serve you tailored ads both on and off our Services. We offer you choices regarding personalized ads, but you cannot opt-out of seeing non-personalized ads.
We target (and measure the performance of) ads to Members, Visitors and others both on and off our Services directly or through a variety of partners, using the following data, whether separately or combined:
Data collected by advertising technologies on and off our Services using pixels, ad tags (e.g., when an advertiser installs a LinkedIn
tag
on their website), cookies, and other device identifiers;
Member-provided information (e.g., profile, contact information, title and industry);
Data from your use of our Services (e.g., search history, feed, content you read, who you follow or is following you, connections,
groups
participation, page visits, videos you watch, clicking on an ad, etc.), including as described in Section 1.3;
Information from advertising
partners
, vendors and
publishers
; and
Information inferred from data described above (e.g., using job titles from a profile to infer industry, seniority, and compensation bracket; using graduation dates to infer age or using first names or pronoun usage to infer gender; using your feed activity to infer your interests; or using device data to recognize you as a Member).
Learn more
about the inferences we make and how they may be used for advertising.
Learn more
about the ad technologies we use and our advertising services and partners. You can learn more about our compliance with laws in the Designated Countries or the UK in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
We will show you ads called
sponsored content
which look similar to non-sponsored content, except that they are labeled as advertising (e.g., as “ad” or “sponsored”). If you take a social action (such as like, comment or share) on these ads, your action is associated with your name and viewable by others, including the advertiser. Subject to your
settings
, if you take a social action on the LinkedIn Services, that action may be mentioned with related ads. For example, when you like a company we may include your name and photo when their sponsored content is shown.
Ad Choices
You have choices regarding our uses of certain categories of data to show you more relevant ads. Member settings
can be found here
. For Visitors,
the setting is here
.
Info to Ad Providers
We do not share your personal data with any third-party advertisers or ad networks except for: (i) hashed IDs or device identifiers (to the extent they are personal data in some countries); (ii) with your separate permission (e.g., in a lead generation form) or (iii) data already visible to any users of the Services (e.g., profile). However, if you view or click on an ad on or off our Services, the ad provider will get a signal that someone visited the page that displayed the ad, and they may, through the use of mechanisms such as cookies, determine it is you. Advertising partners can associate personal data collected by the advertiser directly from you with hashed IDs or device identifiers received from us. We seek to contractually require such advertising partners to obtain your explicit, opt-in consent before doing so where legally required, and in such instances, we take steps to ensure that consent has been provided before processing data from them.
2.5 Marketing
We promote our Services to you and others.
In addition to advertising our Services, we use Members’ data and content for invitations and communications promoting membership and network growth, engagement and our Services, such as by showing your connections that you have used a feature on our Services.
2.6 Developing Services and Research
We develop our Services and conduct research
Service Development
We use data, including public feedback, to conduct
research
and development for our Services in order to provide you and others with a better, more intuitive and personalized experience, drive membership growth and engagement on our Services, and help connect professionals to each other and to economic opportunity.
Other Research
We seek to create economic opportunity for Members of the global workforce and to help them be more productive and successful. We use the personal data available to us to research social, economic and workplace trends, such as jobs availability and skills needed for these
jobs
and policies that help bridge the gap in various industries and geographic areas. In some cases, we work with trusted third parties to perform this research, under
controls
that are designed to protect your privacy. We may also make public data available to
researchers
to enable assessment of the safety and legal compliance of our Services. We publish or allow others to publish economic insights, presented as aggregated data rather than personal data.
Surveys
Polls and surveys are conducted by us and others through our Services. You are not obligated to respond to polls or surveys, and you have choices about the information you provide. You may
opt-out
of survey invitations.
2.7 Customer Support
We use data to help you and fix problems.
We use data (which can include your communications) to investigate, respond to and resolve complaints and for Service issues (e.g., bugs).
2.8 Insights That Do Not Identify You
We use data to generate insights that do not identify you.
We use your
data
to perform analytics to produce and share insights that do not identify you. For example, we may use your data to generate statistics about our Members, their profession or industry, to calculate ad impressions served or clicked on (e.g., for basic business reporting to support billing and budget management or, subject to your
settings
, for reports to advertisers who may use them to inform their advertising campaigns), to show Members' information about engagement with a
post
or LinkedIn
Page
, to publish visitor demographics for a Service or create demographic workforce insights, or to understand usage of our services.
2.9 Security and Investigations
We use data for security, fraud prevention and investigations.
We and our Affiliates, including Microsoft, may use your data (including your communications) for security purposes or to prevent or investigate possible fraud or other violations of the law, our
User Agreement
and/or attempts to harm our Members, Visitors, company, Affiliates, or others.
Social Action
E.g. like, comment, follow, share
Partners
Partners include ad networks, exchanges and others
3. How We Share Information
3.1 Our Services
Any data that you include on your profile and any content you post or social action (e.g., likes, follows, comments, shares) you take on our Services will be seen by others, consistent with your settings.
Profile
Your profile is fully visible to all Members and customers of our Services. Subject to your
settings
, it can also be visible to others on or off of our Services (e.g., Visitors to our Services or users of third-party search tools). As detailed in our
Help Center
, your settings, degree of connection with the viewing Member, the subscriptions they may have, their
usage of our Services
, access channels and search types (e.g., by name or by keyword) impact the availability of your profile and whether they can view certain fields in your profile.
Posts, Likes, Follows, Comments, Messages
Our Services allow viewing and sharing information including through posts, likes, follows and comments.
When you share an article or a post (e.g., an update, image, video or article) publicly it can be viewed by everyone and re-shared anywhere (subject to your
settings
). Members, Visitors and others will be able to find and see your publicly-shared content, including your name (and photo if you have provided one).
In a
group
, posts are visible to others according to group type. For example, posts in private groups are visible to others in the group and posts in public groups are visible publicly. Your membership in groups is public and part of your profile, but you can change visibility in your
settings
.
Any information you share through companies’ or other organizations’ pages on our Services will be viewable by those organizations and others who view those pages' content.
When you follow a person or organization, you are visible to others and that “page owner” as a follower.
We let senders know when you act on their message, subject to your
settings
where applicable.
Subject to your
settings
, we let a Member know when you view their profile. We also give you
choices
about letting organizations know when you've viewed their Page.
When you like or re-share or comment on another’s content (including ads), others will be able to view these “social actions” and associate it with you (e.g., your name, profile and photo if you provided it).
Your employer can see how you use Services they provided for your work (e.g. as a recruiter or sales agent) and related information. We will not show them your job searches or personal messages.
Enterprise Accounts
Your employer may offer you access to our enterprise Services such as Recruiter, Sales Navigator, LinkedIn Learning or our advertising Campaign Manager. Your employer can review and manage your use of such enterprise Services.
Depending on the enterprise Service, before you use such Service, we will ask for permission to share with your employer relevant data from your profile or use of our non-enterprise Services. For example, users of Sales Navigator will be asked to share their “social selling index”, a score calculated in part based on their personal account activity. We understand that certain activities such as job hunting and personal messages are sensitive, and so we do not share those with your employer unless you choose to share it with them through our Services (for example, by applying for a new position in the same company or mentioning your job hunting in a message to a co-worker through our Services).
Subject to your
settings
, when you use workplace tools and services (e.g., interactive employee directory tools) certain of your data may also be made available to your employer or be connected with information we receive from your employer to enable these tools and services.
3.2 Communication Archival
Regulated Members may need to store communications outside of our Service.
Some Members (or their employers) need, for legal or professional compliance, to archive their communications and social media activity, and will use services of others to provide these archival services. We enable archiving of messages by and to those Members outside of our Services. For example, a financial advisor needs to archive communications with her clients through our Services in order to maintain her professional financial advisor license.
3.3 Others’ Services
You may link your account with others’ services so that they can look up your contacts’ profiles, post your shares on such platforms, or enable you to start conversations with your connections on such platforms. Excerpts from your profile will also appear on the services of others.
Subject to your
settings
, other services may look up your profile. When you opt to link your account with other services, personal data (e.g., your name, title, and company) will become available to them. The sharing and use of that personal data will be described in, or linked to, a consent screen when you opt to link the accounts. For example, you may link your Twitter or WeChat account to share content from our Services into these other services, or your email provider may give you the option to upload your LinkedIn contacts into its own service. Third-party services have their own privacy policies, and you may be giving them permission to use your data in ways we would not. You may
revoke
the link with such accounts.
The information you make available to others in our Services (e.g., information from your profile, your posts, your engagement with the posts, or message to Pages)
may be available to them on other services
. For example, search tools, mail and calendar applications, or talent and lead managers may show a user limited profile data (subject to your
settings
), and social media management tools or other platforms may display your posts. The information retained on these services may not reflect updates you make on LinkedIn.
3.4 Related Services
We share your data across our different Services and LinkedIn affiliated entities.
We will share your personal data with our Affiliates to provide and develop our Services. For example, we may refer a query to Bing in some instances, such as where you'd benefit from a more up to date response in a chat experience. In regions outside the Designated Countries, we may also share your publicly-shared content (such as your public LinkedIn posts) with our Affiliates, including Microsoft, to provide or develop their services.
Where allowed
, we may combine information internally across the different Services covered by this Privacy Policy to help our Services be more relevant and useful to you and others. For example, we may personalize your feed or job recommendations based on your learning history.
3.5 Service Providers
We may use others to help us with our Services.
We use others to help us provide our Services (e.g., maintenance, analysis, audit, payments, fraud detection, customer support, marketing and development). They will have access to your information (e.g., the contents of a customer support request) as reasonably necessary to perform these tasks on our behalf and are obligated not to disclose or use it for other purposes. If you purchase a Service from us, we may use a payments service provider who may separately collect information about you (e.g., for fraud prevention or to comply with legal obligations).
3.6 Legal Disclosures
We may need to share your data when we believe it’s required by law or to help protect the rights and safety of you, us or others.
It is possible that we will need to disclose information about you when required by law, subpoena, or other legal process or if we have a good faith belief that disclosure is reasonably necessary to (1) investigate, prevent or take action regarding suspected or actual illegal activities or to assist government enforcement agencies; (2) enforce our agreements with you; (3) investigate and defend ourselves against any third-party claims or allegations; (4) protect the security or integrity of our Services or the products or services of our Affiliates (such as by sharing with companies facing similar threats); or (5) exercise or protect the rights and safety of LinkedIn, our Members, personnel or others. We attempt to notify Members about legal demands for their personal data when appropriate in our judgment, unless prohibited by law or court order or when the request is an emergency. We may dispute such demands when we believe, in our discretion, that the requests are overbroad, vague or lack proper authority, but we do not promise to challenge every demand. To learn more see our
Data Request Guidelines
and
Transparency Report
.
3.7 Change in Control or Sale
We may share your data when our business is sold to others, but it must continue to be used in accordance with this Privacy Policy.
We can also share your personal data as part of a sale, merger or change in control, or in preparation for any of these events. Any other entity which buys us or part of our business will have the right to continue to use your data, but only in the manner set out in this Privacy Policy unless you agree otherwise.
4. Your Choices & Obligations
4.1 Data Retention
We keep most of your personal data for as long as your account is open.
We generally retain your personal data as long as you keep your account open or as needed to provide you Services. This includes data you or others provided to us and data generated or inferred from your use of our Services. Even if you only use our Services when looking for a new job every few years, we will retain your information and keep your profile open, unless you close your account. In some cases we choose to retain certain information (e.g., insights about Services use) in a depersonalized or aggregated form.
4.2 Rights to Access and Control Your Personal Data
You can access or delete your personal data. You have many choices about how your data is collected, used and shared.
We provide many
choices
about the collection, use and sharing of your data, from deleting or correcting data you include in your
profile
and controlling the visibility of your
posts
to advertising
opt-outs
and
communication
controls. We offer you
settings
to control and manage the personal data we have about you.
For personal data that we have about you, you can:
Delete Data
: You can ask us to erase or delete all or some of your personal data (e.g., if it is no longer necessary to provide Services to you).
Change or Correct Data
: You can edit some of your personal data through your account. You can also ask us to change, update or fix your data in certain cases, particularly if it’s inaccurate.
Object to, or Limit or Restrict, Use of Data
: You can ask us to stop using all or some of your personal data (e.g., if we have no legal right to keep using it) or to limit our use of it (e.g., if your personal data is inaccurate or unlawfully held).
Right to Access and/or Take Your Data
: You can ask us for a copy of your personal data and can ask for a copy of personal data you provided in machine readable form.
Visitors can
learn more about how to make these requests here
. You may also contact us using the contact information below, and we will consider your request in accordance with applicable laws.
Residents in the
Designated Countries and the UK
, and
other regions
, may have additional rights under their laws.
4.3 Account Closure
We keep some of your data even after you close your account.
If you choose to close your
LinkedIn
account, your personal data will generally stop being visible to others on our Services within 24 hours. We generally delete closed account information within 30 days of account closure, except as noted below.
We retain your personal data even after you have closed your account if reasonably necessary to comply with our legal obligations (including law enforcement requests), meet regulatory requirements, resolve disputes, maintain security, prevent fraud and abuse (e.g., if we have
restricted
your account for breach of our
Professional Community Policies
), enforce our User Agreement, or fulfill your request to "unsubscribe" from further messages from us. We will retain de-personalized information after your account has been closed.
Information you have shared with others (e.g., through InMail, updates or group posts) will remain visible after you close your account or delete the information from your own profile or mailbox, and we do not control data that other Members have copied out of our Services. Groups content and ratings or review content associated with closed accounts will show an unknown user as the source. Your profile may continue to be displayed in the services of others (e.g., search tools) until they refresh their cache.
5. Other Important Information
5.1. Security
We monitor for and try to prevent security breaches. Please use the security features available through our Services.
We implement security safeguards designed to protect your data, such as HTTPS. We regularly monitor our systems for possible vulnerabilities and attacks. However, we cannot warrant the security of any information that you send us. There is no guarantee that data may not be accessed, disclosed, altered, or destroyed by breach of any of our physical, technical, or managerial safeguards. Please visit our
Safety Center
for additional information about safely using our Services, including
two-factor authentication
.
5.2. Cross-Border Data Transfers
We store and use your data outside your country.
We process data both inside and outside of the United States and rely on legally-provided mechanisms to lawfully transfer data across borders.
Learn more
. Countries where we process data may have laws which are different from, and potentially not as protective as, the laws of your own country.
5.3 Lawful Bases for Processing
We have lawful bases to collect, use and share data about you. You have choices about our use of your data. At any time, you can withdraw consent you have provided by going to settings.
We will only collect and process personal data about you where we have lawful bases. Lawful bases include consent (where you have given consent), contract (where processing is necessary for the performance of a contract with you (e.g., to deliver the LinkedIn Services you have requested) and “legitimate interests.”
Learn more
.
Where we rely on your
consent
to process personal data, you have the right to withdraw or decline your consent at any time and where we rely on legitimate interests, you have the right to object.
Learn More
. If you have any questions about the lawful bases upon which we collect and use your personal data, please
contact our Data Protection Officer here
.
If you're located in one of the Designated Countries or the UK, you can learn more about our lawful bases for processing in our
European Regional Privacy Notice
.
5.4. Direct Marketing and Do Not Track Signals
Our statements regarding direct marketing and “do not track” signals.
We currently do not share personal data with third parties for their direct marketing purposes without your permission.
Learn more
about this and about our response to “do not track” signals.
5.5. Contact Information
You can contact us or use other options to resolve any complaints.
If you have questions or complaints regarding this Policy, please first
contact LinkedIn
online. You can also reach us by
physical mail
. If contacting us does not resolve your complaint, you have more
options
. Residents in the
Designated Countries
and
other regions
may also have the right to
contact our Data Protection Officer here
or at
DPO@linkedin.com
. If this does not resolve your complaint, Residents in the Designated Countries and other regions may have more
options
under their laws.
Consent
Where we process data based on consent, we will ask for your explicit consent. You may withdraw your consent at any time, but that will not affect the lawfulness of the processing of your personal data prior to such withdrawal. Where we rely on contract, we will ask that you agree to the processing of personal data that is necessary for entering into or performance of your contract with us. We will rely on legitimate interests as a basis for data processing where the processing of your data is not overridden by your interests or fundamental rights and freedoms.
Sub-policy 23
https://privacy.microsoft.com/en-ca/privacystatement:
This is the Trace Id: a09ea899ae12081538eb65d8c49829c1
Sub-policy 24
https://www.hotjar.com/legal/policies/privacy:
Are you an agency specialized in UX, digital marketing, or growth? Join our
Partner Program
Close banner
Hotjar Logo
Products
Solutions
Pricing
Case studies
Resources
Contact Sales
Sign in
Get started
English
Language
Get started
Toggle navigation menu
Legal / Policies
Back to legal overview
Privacy Policy
Date: 17 January 2024
Version number: 7.1
Language
English
We will NEVER sell Your Personal Data to Third Parties.
Hotjar will only share or disclose Personal Data as described in this Privacy Policy.
This Privacy Policy applies to Personal Data processed by Hotjar Ltd. (“
Hotjar
”, “
We
”, “
Us
” and “
Our
”) when You visit
www.hotjar.com
in addition to any sub-pages that are integrated within it (the “
Site
”); and/or make use of Hotjar’s Platform.
This Privacy Policy explains what Personal Data We collect through Our Site and Platform, how and why We collect it, how We use and disclose the Personal Data We collect and information on how to exercise privacy rights over this Personal Data.
We have also included a section on the processing of Personal Data sent to Hotjar from visitors to a Hotjar Enabled Site.
We may revise this Privacy Policy from time to time but We will never do so in a manner that compromises Our commitment to respect the privacy of individuals. The most current version of this Privacy Policy governs Our practices for collecting, processing and disclosing Personal Data. We will provide notice via email to Our Customers and on this page of any material modifications to this Privacy Policy. Continued use of Our Site and/or Platform following the effective date of any modifications will constitute acceptance of the modified Agreement (this includes Our
Terms of Service
,
Data Processing Agreement
,
Acceptable Use Policy
and this Privacy Policy).
All capitalized terms in this Privacy Policy shall have the same meaning as defined in the
Terms of Service
and in the Applicable Law.
Information about Hotjar
Hotjar is a company headquartered in the European Union (EU) that provides Software as a Service (SaaS). Hotjar is a digital experience insights platform that provides visual behaviour insights, in-the-moment feedback, and 1:1 interviews, all in one place.
Personal Data Collected by Hotjar
The Personal Data We collect depends on whether the individual is:
A visitor to the Hotjar Site
A Customer or user (the “
User
”) of the Hotjar Platform
A Tester who signed up on the Hotjar Platform
Personal Data collected from a visitor of the Hotjar Site
This section applies to Personal Data Hotjar collects from visitors to the Hotjar Site (
hotjar.com
) or any of Our sub-sites or sub-domains (e.g.
help.hotjar.com
, etc.).
Any Personal Data provided by a visitor to Our Site will be used only as described in this Privacy Policy and Hotjar’s
Acceptable Use Policy
.
Usage Data
When someone visits the Hotjar Site, We may temporarily store the name of their internet service provider, IP address, the website they visited Us from, the parts of Our Site they visit, the date and duration of the visit, and information from the device (e.g. device type, operating system, screen resolution, language, country you are located in, and web browser type) used during their visit or other similar information that helps Us understand your behaviour on our Site. We process this usage data to facilitate access to Our Site (e.g. to adjust Our Site to the devices that are used). We may use this data to analyze, develop, improve, secure or optimize the use, function and performance of Our Sites, or to make sure We are reaching out to the right audience. Wherever possible, we will use usage data in an aggregated and/or anonymized form. Depending on the context, the legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(a) and Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Cookies
Cookies are small data files transferred onto computers or devices. Hotjar uses cookies to process information including standard internet log information and details of the visitor’s behavioral patterns upon visiting Our Site. This is done to:
operate Our Site;
provide visitors to Our Site with a better experience by providing Us with insights on how visitors use Our Site; and
for marketing purposes, as detailed below.
For more info about the cookies We make use of, please visit Our
Cookie Information page
.
Contacting Us
Visitors to Our Site have the opportunity to contact Us to ask Us questions, for example via a contact form, where We ask for contact information (e.g. name, email address etc.). We use this data solely in connection with answering the queries We receive.
If a visitor to Our Site receives emails from Us, We may use certain analytics tools, to capture data such as when the email is opened or when any links or banners in the email have been clicked. This data helps Us understand the effectiveness of Our communications and marketing campaigns.
The legal basis for this processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Personal Data collected from Hotjar’s Customers, Users and Testers
This section applies to Personal Data Hotjar collects from its Customers, Users and Testers when making use of Hotjar’s Platform.
When someone signs up for an account with Hotjar, contacts Our customer support for assistance, or subscribes to Our content or special offers, We may ask for additional Personal Data such as their name, email address and additional details about them or the organization they represent.
We will solely process this Personal Data to provide Our Platform in accordance with Article 6(1)(b) GDPR. If you are a User of Our Platform on behalf of a Hotjar Customer that has concluded this Agreement with Hotjar, the legal basis for Hotjar to process your Personal Data is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR. Please refer to Our
Terms of Service
for further details on signing up and using Our Platfor.
We temporarily store IP addresses of Customers, Users and Testers of Our Platform for associated performance metrics (i.e. data related to how well Our Platform performs) and to monitor and track application errors. We will never access these IP addresses without any operational or security need. We automatically delete these IP addresses within thirty (30) calendar days.The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR. We may use technical data (such as keypresses, timestamps, etc.) collected through the Platform to analyze, develop, improve or optimize the use, function and performance of Our Site, or to make sure we are reaching out to the right audience. Wherever possible, we will use usage data in an aggregated or anonymized form.
A Customer
may delete their Hotjar account
at any time. Users and Testers may delete their respective accounts through their account settings. After account deletion, We may retain Personal Data (in part or in whole) associated with the Customer, User or Tester to meet any regulatory and reporting requirements for the timeframes stipulated by law and to be able to address customer service issues. Any other Personal Data We were processing relating to Our Customer, Tester and/or Users of that Hotjar account will be deleted permanently within thirty (30) calendar days. This does not apply to any Personal Data collected as part of Customer research within the Engage Product. To maintian the quality of the research data, any research-related Personal Data may need to be kept for a reasonably required time.
We may use Personal Data and other Data about Our Customers, Users and/or Testers (including but not limited to demographic information, location information, information about the computer or device from which they access Our Platform) to create, wherever possible, anonymized and aggregated information and analytics. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
The information We collect from Our Customers, Users and/or Testers is disclosed only in accordance with the Agreement and the Applicable Law.
Personal Data collected from Engage Product Testers
THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY TO THE REGISTERED TESTERS OF OUR ENGAGE PRODUCT
When a Tester signs up to the Engage Product, we will ask them to share some Personal Data with Us to create a Tester profile. The Tester profile information will be revealed to Hotjar and Our Customers, who may invite you to usability study interviews ("
Interviews
"). The Engage Product has been built to connect Testers with the best-matched Customers for their Interviews. Better matches means happier Customers and more payouts for Testers. We analyse the data Testers provide Us with, along with the information about the Tester’s use of Our Platform, to suggest a good Interview match.
We collect and process Tester Personal Data to allow Testers to participate in Customer research, as well as for database management, managing contacts and sending messages, analytics, managing Our hosting and backend infrastructure, paying Testers for their service, Tester registration and authentication and displaying content from external platforms.
The data categories we will ask Testers to provide in order to build the Tester profile may include but are not limited to, name, age, country of residence, educational background, profession, marital status, phone number and other registration information. This information allows us to effectively match Testers with the right Customers. Testers may also optionally upload an avatar or enter their gender, but can remove this at any time. If a Tester deletes their account, their profile data will be removed too. Depending on the context, the legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(b) GDPR and Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
We will also collect information that relates to how Testers use Our Platform. The categories of Personal Data relating to this include but are not limited to timezone, broad location (town or district), web browser, operating system and the device used, referral sources, email engagement data, data on how you use the Engage Product (including last login date and frequency) and account signup date. This information allows Us to personalize the Engage Product to Testers’ needs and to improve Our Engage Product. We do not collect precise, real-time information about the location of a Tester’s device. We delete (or anonymize) such Tester Personal Data as soon as you cancel your account. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
On an entirely voluntary basis, Testers may choose to connect their social media account with their Tester profile. This will grant Us read-only access to their social media account and we will store their social media account ID, along with a secure 'access key' that these social media companies provide to Us. If Tester grants Us access, we may also process their email address that is associated with the social media account, name, profile picture, gender and age range, which we may use to enhance Tester profile data on the Engage Product. We use social media account data as a 'quality signal' to confirm that the Engage Product account belongs to a real person and therefore, sharing of social account data may affect the number of Interview invitations a Tester receives. We will never post content to a Tester’s social profile without their permission and we will never request or access their private messages on these accounts. Testers can choose to disconnect their social media accounts at any time, which will prevent Us from being able to access them. Social media account data will also be deleted if you choose to delete your Hotjar account. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(a) GDPR.
In order to be able to remunerate Our Testers we will process payment related information that Testers share with Us such as PayPal email address, residential address, etc.. We may also need to keep a history of payments made to Testers. This is needed to comply with accounting and legal rules. This data may be kept up to seven (7) years. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(b) GDPR.
Hotjar’s use of Personal Data
Access and Disclosure to Third Parties
We use a select number of trusted external service providers for certain technical data analysis, processing and/or storage offerings (e.g., IT and related services). These Third Party service providers are carefully selected and meet high data protection and security standards. We only share data with them that is required for the services offered and We contractually bind them to keep any information We share with them as confidential and to process Personal Data only according to Our instructions. The legal basis for such processing would be Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
In addition to services providers, other categories of Third Parties may include:
Vendors/public institutions.
To the extent that this is necessary in order to make use of certain services requiring special expertise (such as legal, accounting or auditing services) We may share Personal Data with vendors of such services or public institutions that offer them (e.g. courts). The legal basis of this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Disclosure in the Event of Merger, Sale, or Other Asset Transfers.
If We are involved in a merger, acquisition, financing due diligence, reorganization, bankruptcy, receivership, purchase or sale of assets, or transition of service to another provider, then Data may be sold or transferred as part of such a transaction, as permitted by law and/or contract. The legal basis for such processing would be Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Other than the cases mentioned above, We will only transfer Personal Data to Third Parties without express consent in accordance with Article 6(1)(a) GDPR or if We are obliged to do so by statutory law or by instruction from a public authority or court as outlined in Our
Terms of Service
.
Communication Purposes
We may occasionally send notification emails about updates to Our product, legal documents, customer support or for marketing purposes. To the extent required by Applicable Law, We will only send such messages if We have obtained consent in accordance with Article 6(1)(a) GDPR. In all other cases, the legal basis of this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Except for cases where We are required to do so by law (e.g. notification of a data breach, providing you with important information about your account, updating our legal documents, etc.), recipients of Our communication shall have the opportunity to unsubscribe from receiving these messages free of charge. We process requests to be placed on do-not-contact lists as required by Applicable Law.
Marketing Purposes
We use Personal Data given to Us by Hotjar’s Customers, Users, Testers and/or visitors to Our Site to target advertisements to:
Hotjar’s Customers, Users, Testers and/or visitors to Our Site to keep them informed about Hotjar and any product changes we make; and
Potential new Customers or Testers that appear to have shared interests or similar demographics.
The legal basis of this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
We do this by sharing Personal Data with Third Party marketing platforms that have high privacy and confidentiality standards and which have gone through a legal and security review by Hotjar. This ensures that these Third Parties cannot do anything with the Personal Data We provide them other than use it for the express purpose of providing Us with the marketing services We contract them for.
This Personal Data is only shared with these Third Parties through secure and encrypted means. If you wish to opt out of this processing activity, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
with the subject line “Opt-Out of Marketing”.
Compliance and Protection
We may use Personal Data to (legal basis for the respective processing in parentheses):
protect Our, Our Customers’/Users’, Testers’, visitors’ to Our Site or Third Parties’ rights, privacy, safety or property including by making and defending legal claims (Article 6(1)(b), (c) or (f) GDPR);
audit Our internal processes for compliance with legal and contractual requirements and internal policies (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR);
enforce Our
Terms of Service
(Article 6(1)(b) or (f) GDPR);
protect, investigate and deter against fraudulent, harmful, unauthorized, unethical or illegal activity, including cyberattacks and identity theft (Article 6(1)(f) GDPR); and
comply with the Applicable Law, lawful requests and legal process, such as to respond to subpoenas or requests from government authorities (Article 6(1)(c) or (f) GDPR).
Benchmarking
Hotjar reserves the right to use and retain Data in a de-identified and/or aggregated form to improve Our Site and/or Platform and for statistical and benchmarking purposes, including enabling comparisons within the same industry to enhance the insights collected through Our Site and Platform. Benchmarks look at all collected metrics and compare them to others of the same nature. These de-identified and/or aggregated benchmarks may be published and shared publicly within Our Platform or in the form of other content We publish which may show a summary of results for a certain category or question type.
No Data which can individually identify Our Customers, or their end-users, Our Users or Our Testers will ever be shown in this statistical or benchmark data.
The legal basis for aggregating/anonymizing this Personal Data is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Intra-group sharing of User and visitor Data
Hotjar is part of the Content Square SAS group (“
Contentsquare
”) which is headquartered in Paris, France. In the course of our normal operations, Hotjar may share Data (e.g. name and contact details, etc.) of Users of Hotjar accounts, Testers, and visitors of Our Site (hotjar.com) with Contentsquare.
The purpose of sharing this Data is to pursue synergies in sales and marketing, which is in both Hotjar’s and Contentsquare’s legitimate commercial interests. The legal basis of this Data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR. Hotjar and Contentsquare are jointly responsible for these processing activities (so-called joint controllership). If you would like more information in this regard or would like to exercise your rights as described in this Privacy Policy, please contact Us at dpo@hotjar.com.
Other Purposes with Your Consent
In some cases, We may ask you for consent to collect, use or share Personal Data for other purposes. For example, We may ask you for consent to send marketing emails where required by law or to post testimonials or endorsements. In such cases, there will always be the ability to deny or revoke consent if desired. The legal basis for the data processing is under Article 6(1)(a) GDPR.
Duration of Processing
Unless a different timeframe has been specifically stated in this Privacy Policy or in
Our Pricing Page,
Personal Data will be retained for as long as is necessary for the purpose(s) for which We originally collected it or to provide Our Platform, resolve disputes, establish legal defenses, conduct audits, pursue legitimate business purposes, and enforce Our Agreement. We may also retain information as required by Applicable Law.
International Transfers of Personal Data
In most cases, Personal Data We collect is stored in the EU. However, in some limited cases, customer information may be accessed from, or other Personal Data (e.g., email, etc.) may be transferred outside of the EU. These countries may have different data protection laws. Hotjar endeavors to ensure appropriate safeguards are in place requiring that Personal Data will remain protected. Hotjar has concluded Standard Contractual Clauses with entities who We share Personal Data with outside of the EU. Further details about this can be found in Our article on
Data Storage
.
Children’s Information
Hotjar’s Platform is not directed to children under 13 (or other age as required by local law), and We do not knowingly collect Personal Data from children. If you learn that your child has provided Us with Personal Data without your consent, you may contact Us at dpo@hotjar.com. If We learn that We have collected a child’s Personal Data in violation of Applicable Law, We will promptly take steps to investigate this, delete such information and, if applicable, terminate the child’s account. We will also make sure to have preventive measures in place for this not to happen again in the future.
Rights over Personal Data
If you are a visitor to Our Site or a Customer, User and/or Tester of Our Platform and We have collected Personal Data about you, you have a right to access and to be informed about what Personal Data is processed by Hotjar, a right to rectification/correction, erasure/anonymization and restriction of processing (subject to certain exceptions and other requirements prescribed by law). You also have the right to receive from Hotjar a structured, common and machine-readable format of Personal Data you provided Us.
When you have provided consent, you may withdraw it at any time, without affecting the lawfulness of the processing that was carried out prior to withdrawing it. Whenever you withdraw consent, you acknowledge and accept that this may have a negative influence on the quality of Our Site and/or Platform. Please be aware that when you withdraw consent, We may delete the Personal Data previously processed on the basis of your consent and will not be allowed to keep it further which will mean that it cannot be accessed, downloaded or otherwise secured by you.
In addition, you have the right to lodge a complaint with your respective data protection authority.
To protect your privacy, We take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling your request. We can only identify you via your email address and we can only adhere to your request and provide information if We have Personal Data about you through you having made contact with Us directly and/or you are using Our Site and/or Platform.
To protect your privacy, We will take steps to verify your identity before fulfilling any consumer request under the Applicable Law. When you make a request, We will ask you to provide sufficient information that allows Us to reasonably verify you are the person We collected Personal Data about or an authorized representative, which may include your email address.
If You are located in California…
This section only applies to Our processing of Personal Data as a “business” under the California Consumer Privacy Act (CCPA).
The CCPA provides California residents with the right to know what
Categories of Personal Data
Hotjar has collected about them and whether Hotjar disclosed that Personal Data for a business purpose (e.g. to a service provider) in the preceding twelve (12) months.
If you are a California resident and would like to exercise any of your rights under the CCPA, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
. We will process your request in accordance with the Applicable Laws.
Sales of Personal Information Under the CCPA.
For purposes of the CCPA, Hotjar does not “sell” Personal Data, nor do We have actual knowledge of any “sale” of Personal Data of minors under 16 years of age.
Non-Discrimination.
California residents will have the right to exercise the rights conferred to them by the CCPA.
Authorized Agent.
Only you, or someone legally authorized to act on your behalf, may make a verifiable consumer request under the CCPA. If applicable, you may also make a verifiable consumer request on behalf of your minor child. To designate an authorized agent, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
.
If You are located in Brazil…
This section only applies to Our processing of Personal Data under the Brazilian
Lei Geral de Proteção de Dados
(LGPD).
In addition to the rights described above, you also have the right to:
access your Personal Data processed by Hotjar;
unless restricted by law, request information about the public and private entities with which We have shared your Personal Data;
oppose to the processing carried out; and/or
receive information about the possibility of not providing your consent and the consequences of such denial.
If you are a Brazilian resident or were in Brazil when your Personal Data was collected and would like to exercise any of your rights under the LGPD, please contact Us at
dpo@hotjar.com
. We will process your request in accordance with the Applicable Laws.
Personal Data collected from a visitor of a Hotjar Enabled Site
This section applies to Personal Data sent to Hotjar from Our Customers about visitors to their site using Our Platform (i.e. a Hotjar Enabled Site).
When an end-user visits a Hotjar Enabled Site, the Hotjar Enabled Site’s privacy policy will apply to the Personal Data collected and not this Privacy Policy.
This section should always be read in conjunction with the specific privacy policy of the Hotjar Enabled Site which will contain further details regarding the processing of your Personal Data by the Hotjar Enabled Site.
When making use of Our Platform, Our Customers are bound by Our Privacy Policy, Our
Terms of Service
, and Our
Acceptable Use Policy
. You can get more information about Hotjar by visiting
Our Site
.
If you are a visitor to a Hotjar Enabled Site, Hotjar may temporarily process your IP address so that We can ensure Our service is running smoothly and improve the quality of Our Platform. Any IP addresses We process are used exclusively for associated performance metrics (i.e. data related to how well Our Platform performs on the Hotjar Enable Site) and to monitor and track application errors. For this purpose, We may temporarily store your IP address with Hotjar’s
Sub-Processors
which are subject to strict obligations of confidentiality and will process it only according to Our instructions. We will never access these IP addresses without any operational or security need. We automatically delete any IP addresses We process or store within thirty (30) calendar days. The legal basis for this data processing is Article 6(1)(f) GDPR.
Some Hotjar Customers may have the ability to integrate Data they have collected through Our Platform with other end-user data they have in their possession (e.g. their customer information).
Depending on the web browser you use, it might be possible for you to disallow Hotjar from collecting Data when visiting a Hotjar Enabled Site. To discover if your web browser offers this functionality visit Our
Do Not Track page
.
Please note that We cannot respond to any requests from end-users of Hotjar Enabled Sites related to their Personal Data, including requests to provide, rectify or delete any end-user Personal Data. Any requests from end users of Hotjar Enabled Sites related to Customer Personal Data should be sent to the relevant Hotjar Customer.
Previous Versions of this Privacy Policy
Version 7.1 (
compare markup changes between version 7 and 7.1
)
Sub-policy 25
http://www.privacy.org.nz/:
Our website uses cookies so we can
analyse our site usage and
give you the best experience. Click "Accept" if you’re happy with this, or click "More" for information about cookies on our site, how to opt out, and how to disable cookies altogether.
More
Accept ×
We respect your Do Not Track preference.
Close ×
Nau mai, haere mai
Your privacy is precious; let us help you protect it.
Speaker applications are open for Privacy Week 2025
Privacy Amendment Bill – what you need to know
Biometrics Code consultation
Use our response calculator
Send an enquiry
Lodge a privacy issue with another agency
Notify Us of a breach
Make a privacy complaint
What's new on the website?
down arrow
Make a privacy complaint
We're keen to work with New Zealanders to get their privacy queries and complaints sorted quickly and fairly. Before you complain to us, you need to
complain directly to the business or organisation that you feel has breached your privacy.
If you haven’t been able to work out your privacy issue with them,
then you can complain to us
. We aim to ensure that you're treated fairly, whatever your background or circumstances. We work in accordance with the Human Rights Act 1993.
Lodge a privacy issue with another agency
(external link)
.
Use our Response Date Calculator for access and correction requests
.
Answer your questions about privacy breaches
.
Fill in our online enquiry form
.
Make a privacy complaint to us
(external link)
.
We review all the complaints we receive. If we can resolve them quickly, we will. If your case requires a complicated or comprehensive investigation, then owing to high volumes, the wait time for an investigator is up to six months.
Privacy Amendment Bill: what you need to know
The Privacy Amendment Bill is making its way through Parliament, and we know organisations are starting to think about how this will impact them. We’ve put together key information on the Bill, which we’ll update as it progresses.
Read more about our upcoming guidance, how you can be involved or ask for what you need, and what the timing looks like for this work
(external link)
.
Agencies: report a data breach
If you're an organisation and have a privacy breach that is likely to cause anyone serious harm, you are legally required to notify us and any affected persons as soon as you can.
As a guide, our expectation is that a breach notification should be made to our Office no later than 72 hours after agencies are aware of a notifiable privacy breach.
Work out whether you need to notify us
.
How long is 72 hours
(external link)
?
Do I need to notify my privacy breach
(external link)
?
Notify Us of a privacy breach
Commissioner to proceed with biometrics privacy code
The Privacy Commissioner will proceed with developing a privacy code of practice to create specific rules for agencies using biometrics.
We’ve made several important changes to the draft code since our last consultation and are giving people a further chance to have their say. Consultation is open now until 14 March 2025.
Learn more about the code and have your say
(external link)
.
Use our free e-learning tools
We can help you and your workmates learn about privacy, or sharpen your skills with our free e-learning tools. There are 10 free courses to choose from, and they are all run as online learning modules. Learn at your own pace and receive a certificate of completion.
Topics range
from Privacy 101 to specialist topics like health and education. You can learn more about reporting privacy breaches, approved information sharing agreements (AISA) and more.
Get learning with our e-learning modules
(external link)
.
Our news and views
Read our latest media releases and news.
Subscribe to Privacy News, our free monthly newsletter.
See case notes and court decisions.
Order free brochures for your customers or clients.